—— Institut | Ecole française 
= QUE à Français , d'Extréme-Orient 
Li de Pondichéry 


Collection Indologie 106 


Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 
Tantric Studies in Memory of Hélène Brunner 


ae | 
{ DATE TA OT 


s Sal: A AUETE SEE : Le à Ze à 7 


sous la direction de / edited. by 
Dominic Goodall & André Padoux 


CONTENTS 


RÉNALE S STE A A EL nn cd ct eme 
LAS QE PONINIOUNEMS SRE No dde dus Sviuse ane 
André Papoux : Hélène Brunner — Une vie, une œuvre . . . .. 
Liste des publications d'Hélène Brunner . . ........... 
Diwakar AcHARYA : The Samskäravidhi: À Manual on the Trans- 
formatory Rite of the Lakulisa-Päsupatas . . . . . . .... 
Peter BisscHop : he description of Sivapura in the early Väyu- 
ANA SRE Le 100 LE See DANS ba pes 
Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. OrR : People of the Festival... 
Pierre-Sylvain Fiz1oZzar : Note sur les modes de représentation de 
Sadäsiva dans l'ordonnance iconographique et architecturale 
HRAEMPICS SES LARGE NS NS Sets ee 
T. GANESAN : Analyses of the Vijayägama and Sväyambhuvägama 
Dominic GooDALL : À first edition ofthe [Satika-]Kälajñäna, the 
shortest of the non-eclectic recensions of the Kälottara . . .. 
Gerhard OBERHAMMER : Bharadväjas Nyäsopadesah: Bemerkun- 
gen zu Bhäradväjasamhitä L,1-70 . ........... 
Marion RASTELLI: The “Panñcarätra Passages” in Agnipuräna 21-70 
Alexis SANDERSON : The Saiva Exegesis of Kashmir . . ..... 
Francesco SFERRA : Materials for the Study of the Levels of Sound 
in the Sanskrit Sources of the Saivasiddhänta  . . . .... 
Raffaele TORELLA : Studies on Utpaladevas Kvarapratyabhijñä- 
vivrti. Part III: Can a cognition become the object of another 
LOBRATONE Votre TEE ner A Ne ane Ne Are 
Judit Tôrzsôk : The Search in Saiva Scriptures for Meaning in 
RCA ee Crete raté nf fa Are 
Somadeva VasuDEvA : Synasthetic Iconography: 1. the Nädiphän- 
PTE D M UO AN A Al arriere 


113 
125 
167 
187 
231 


443 


475 


485 


517 
551 


Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Préface 


L'importance de la contribution d'Hélène BRUNNER à l’étude du $ivaïsme, la 
grande estime où nous tenons ses travaux, comme aussi l’ancienne amitié qui 
liait à elle l’un de nous, nous ont fait penser qu’il serait juste et opportun de 
faire paraître un volume à sa mémoire dont les contributions montreraient par 
leur ensemble la présence continuée de son œuvre dans les esprits ou les travaux 
en cours, et, par leurs apports propres, la poursuite et les progrès de la recherche 
dans le domaine des ägamas dont elle fut une pionnière il y a près d’un demi- 
siècle. 

Encouragée par Jean FiLLIOZAT, fondateur visionnaire de l'IFP Hélène 
BRUNNER avait commencé son étude des ägamas $ivaïtes à Pondichéry dans 
le cadre de l’Institut Français d’Indologie (comme on disait alors). Elle y a 
par la suite beaucoup travaillé — en particulier avec le pandit N.R. BHaTT de 
l'EFEO - et c’est dans cette « Collection Indologie » (autrefois « Publications 
du département d'indologie ») qu’a paru notamment son œuvre maîtresse sur 
la Somasambhupaddhati. Cette étude volumineuse est devenue un ouvrage fon- 
damental de référence pour ceux qui s'intéressent au tantrisme aujourd'hui. On 
comprend dès lors que l'EFEO et l’IFP aient approuvé l’idée de ce volume et 
en aient assumé la publication, ce dont nous leur sommes très vivement recon- 
naissants. 

Des treize contributions ici rassemblées, onze sont des études éivaïtes. C’est 
évidemment chose normale pour un volume d'hommage à Hélène BRUNNER. 
Mais ce l’est également d’une manière plus générale pour un recueil d’études 
tantriques. Cela d’abord parce que, pour ce qui est de la quantité et la qualité 
des œuvres, le phénomène tantrique est avant tout éivaïte (nous ne parlons 
pas ici du bouddhisme). Mais ce l’est aussi, croyons-nous, fondamentalement 
et essentiellement, parce que le tantrisme (si on peut utiliser ce substantif) est 
avant tout $ivaïte. L'apport tantrique visnouïte est bien moins marqué, et même 
à certains égards secondaire. Il n’en a pas moins son importance et son intérêt, 
que nous tenons à reconnaître, sur le plan tant textuel et philosophique que 
socio-religieux. Mais ce n’est pas le lieu maintenant de traiter de ce problème. 


8 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Voyons ces treize études, qui ont été imprimées selon l’ordre alphabétique des 
noms de leurs auteurs. 

L'article de Diwakar AcHARYA, sur la Samskäravidhi, un manuel de rituel 
des Lakuli$a-Pä$upatas, se trouve être le premier par une heureuse rencontre 
puisqu'il concerne une des plus anciennes formes d’ascétisme éivaïte, relevant 
de l’Atimärga. Il y donne le texte édité, traduit et annoté de l’une des quatre 
vidhis attribuées à un certain Gärgya qu’il avait trouvées dans un manuscrit né- 
palais datant sans doute du XIV siècle. Cet ouvrage précédemment inconnu 
présente le rituel pä$upata d'initiation et se révèle être l’ancêtre des rites $ivaïtes 
d'initiation qu'a étudiés Hélène BRUNNER, notamment dans le troisième vol- 
ume de la Somafambhupaddhati. 

C’est également de textes non tantriques que traite Peter BisscHop, qui ex- 
amine deux passages apparentés, l’un du Väyupuräna, l’autre du vieux Skanda- 
puräna, à propos de leur description du Sivapura, le paradis de Siva. Littérature 
puränique, donc, mais où figure Vigrahe$vara, déité tantrique présente dans « a 
kind of post-Pañcärthika Atimärga ». 

« People of the festival », de Richard H. Davis et Leslie C. ORR, nous éloigne 
de l'étude textuelle et nous rapproche de la réalité humaine en passant en revue, 
sur la base de la Mahotsavavidhi d’Aghoraëiva et d’inscriptions de temples du 
sud de l’Inde, les acteurs de toutes sortes qui jouent un rôle dans l’importante 
performance rituelle qu'est un mahotsava. Cette vaste mise en scène rituelle 
dans le cadre du temple a pris au cours des siècles une ampleur qu’elle n’avait pas 
au début. Le fait qu’elle ait persisté à certains égards jusqu'aux temps modernes 
ne peut qu’en rendre l'examen plus intéressant du point de vue tant rituel que 
socio-économique. Comme Davis et ORR le rappellent, c’est là un sujet dont 
Hélène BRUNNER avait eu l’occasion d’aborder certains aspects dans la Soma- 
fambhupaddhati comme dans divers articles. Mais cette étude-ci a l'intérêt de 
reprendre le thème de façon globale et systématique en envisageant le cas de 
tous les acteurs et en recourant également à des sources tamoules, auxquelles 
Hélène BRUNNER n'avait pas eu accès. 

C’est encore du temple $ivaïte que traite Pierre-Sylvain FILLIOZAT dans ce 
qu'il intitule modestement une note, « Sur les modes de représentation de Sada- 
$iva dans l'ordonnance iconographique et architecturale du temple », exposé 
fondé en grande partie sur le vidyäpäda du Matañgapäramesvara avec la Vrtti 
de Bhatta Rämakantha. « Comprendre Sadäsiva et comprendre le temple, c’est 
comprendre le fond de la doctrine éivaïte », nous dit-il. La divinité suprême, qui 
est par nature inaccessible, a voulu cependant se rendre accessible à ses fidèles 


Préface 9 


en prenant des états, des hypostases à de multiples niveaux plus proches des 
humains, aspects qui sont présents dans le temple. On voit ainsi comment, par 
les images qui $ y trouvent et au terme des rites qui y sont accomplis, le temple 
apparaît comme une représentation du corps de $iva, être omniprésent dans 
le cosmos. Toute la théologie éivaïte y est présente, visible dans les panneaux 
narratifs, accessible à plusieurs niveaux de lecture, vécue dans les gestes du rituel, 
représentée mentalement tout en étant localisée en divers points du temple. 
Cette étude attentive, précise, sensible, fait bien ressortir, avec l'importance 
du temple, le caractère fondamental de représentation mentale de la pratique 
rituelle tantrique. 

On revient aux textes avec le court article de T. GANESAN qui présente en 
résumé le contenu de deux ägamas inédits à partir des transcrits de l’IFP : le V7- 
jayägama, qui, bien qu'il s’agisse d’un Siddhäntatantra, est consacré au culte et 
aux fêtes de la déesse Durgä, et le Suäyambhuvägama, grand tantra qui mélange 
le texte du Sväyambhuvasütrasañgraha avec des chapitres consacrés au culte pub- 
lic de Siva dans un temple. Vient ensuite la première édition critique du Satika- 
kälottaratantra, texte présenté, édité et commenté par Dominic GOODALL, qui 
le date d’avant le XI° siècle. Il s’agit d’une des versions (celle-ci en cent stances) 
d’un ägama connu également sous les noms d’Agneya, Väthula et Kälottara et 
dont la seule version publiée jusqu'ici est celle en 350 vers que N.R. BHATT 
avait publié en 1979 sous le titre Särdhatrisatikälottarägama. Le Kälottara à 
joué un rôle fondamental dans le développement des rites éivaïtes : c’est le 
Dvisatikälottara, version en 200 stances, qui a été adopté comme santra de base 
pour toutes les paddhati du Siddhänta transmises jusqu’à nos jours, y compris 
celle de Somasambhu. 

Peut-être pouvons-nous mentionner maintenant, à la suite des précédentes, 
puisqu'elle concerne aussi le Saivasiddhänta, l’étude de Francesco SFERRA, 
« Materials for the study of the levels of sound in the Sanskrit sources of 
the Saivasiddhänta ». Cet article rappelle d’abord les conceptions relatives à 
l’évolution du son dans les textes saiddhäntika publiés, ainsi que dans la lit- 
téraire secondaire, avant de fournir une édition, avec leurs traductions, de 
quelques passages pertinents de la Ratnatrayollekhini d’Aghorasiva (XII° siè- 
cle). En appendice, sont cités des passages d’un autre commentaire, jusqu'ici 
inconnu, sur les mêmes stances de la Rafnatrayapariksä. 

Ce n’est plus seulement du Saivasiddhänta qu’il s’agit dans les quatre études 
suivantes, mais du Mantramärga en général, notamment dans ses développe- 
ments cachemiriens. Vient en premier la contribution d’Alexis SANDERSON 


10 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


« The Saiva exegesis of Kashmir » où l’on trouve une vue d’ensemble de ce que 
l’on peut savoir aujourd’hui d’une des plus brillantes traditions religieuses et 
philosophiques de l’Inde, vue que possède particulièrement bien l’auteur de 
cette étude. Un sujet aussi considérable ne se pouvait pas traiter dans les 25 ou 
30 pages auxquelles il avait été prévu que se limiteraient les contributions à ce 
volume. Mais pouvait-on y publier un article de la longueur d’un livre ? Cela 
nous a posé un problème. Toutefois l'intérêt, qui nous en semble exceptionnel, 
nous a amenés à l’inclure — et à être heureux de pouvoir le faire. SANDERSON 
rappelle d’abord avec précision ce qui, au sein du Mantramärga éivaïte, dis- 
tingue le Siddhänta des traditions vouées au culte de Bhairava ou de la Déesse. 
Tout en rappelant ce que ces deux ensembles traditionnels ont en commun, il 
note ce qui les différencie, notamment les différences concernant le statut so- 
cial des adeptes et le rôle des temples. Il souligne aussi, ce faisant, l'importance 
donnée par les exégètes cachemiriens, brahmanes vivant dans le monde, à la 
gnose (jf%äna) salvatrice, au détriment de l’approche extatique visionnaire des 
tantras, les exégètes saiddhäntika étant marqués quant à eux par « uncompro- 
mising ritualism, relative mundanity and professionalism », affirmation que, 
bien entendu, il explicite, notamment en rappelant que l’accent mis sur la gnose 
n’excluait nullement les pratiques rituelles. Il termine la section de son étude 
consacrée au Siddhänta en mentionnant le cas du Pirigalämata qui montre que 
les oppositions entre Siddhänta et « Säkta-inclined tantras » n'étaient pas aussi 
tranchées qu’on le croit généralement. 

Passant à l’exégèse des tantras $äkta-$aiva, SANDERSON la répartit en deux 
tendances, le Kälïkula et le Trika. Le premier enseigne le culte de diverses 
formes de la déesse Käli, adorée seule entourée d’une cercle de divinités sec- 
ondaires, alors que, dans les traditions relevant du Krama, Käli est au centre 
d’une série d’hypostases incarnant des phases (krzma) de son activité cosmique 
dont le dynamisme séquentiel anime l’univers en même temps que la con- 
science du dévot, isomorphe de celle de Käli (ou des Kälïi). Le principal texte 
du Kälikula, le Jayadrathayämala, à été particulièrement étudié par SANDER- 
son. Il en traite ici rapidement tout en montrant l'influence qu’a eue ce texte, 
dont on retrouve des citations et nombre de divinités dans les manuels de rit- 
uel éivaïtes. On y trouve aussi des éléments krama. C’est surtout l’exégèse 
du Krama que SANDERSON examine, tradition mal connue parce que ses textes 
n’ont généralement pas été édités, mais importante tant par son apport original 
que par son influence, qui se retrouve notamment dans le Trika et en particulier 
chez Abhinavagupta. Il en présente les auteurs et les œuvres principales, no- 


Préface 11 


tamment les trois Mahänayaprakä$a ainsi qu’un texte jusqu’à présent, croyons- 
nous, inconnu, le Chummäsañketaprakäsa, dont l’examen ici apporte vraiment 
du nouveau. SANDERSON est assez bref sur le Trika. On notera ce qu’il dit de 
la datation du Vémakesvarimata, puis du $ivaïsme du Svacchanda et du Netra- 
tantra (sur lesquels reposera désormais le culte $ivaïte au Cachemire — deux 
textes, incidemment, qu'Hélène BRUNNER connaissait bien, mais sans en avoir 
remarqué tous les traits) et de leur commentaire par Ksemaräja, le maître et le 
disciple ayant tous deux « propagated Krama-based analyses, Abhinavagupta of 
the Trika’s Mälinivijayottaratantra and Ksemaräja of the Svacchandatantra and 
the Merratantra ». Ksemaräja aurait aussi, selon SANDERSON, fortement tendu à 
lire les Sivasätra dans l'esprit du Krama, texte dont il tend à penser qu’il ne faut 
pas exagérer l'importance. Il y a dans cette grande étude plusieurs autres points 
sur lesquels on aimerait attirer l’attention, mais on ne peut guère le faire dans 
cette préface. Après une utile chronologie de la littérature éivaïte cachemiri- 
enne, SANDERSON, dans une dernière section, « À Brief History », donne les 
raisons qu’il a de penser que le Siddhänta, qui avait pratiquement disparu du 
Cachemire dès le X° siècle, avait dû y être la forme dominante du $ivaïsme, 
pour être remplacé, dans le domaine non-éäkta, par les cultes de Svacchanda et 
d’Amrtesvarabhairava, non sans toutefois laisser des traces dans ces cultes. Du 
côté $akta, SANDERSON pense que le Trika y avait été beaucoup moins largement 
présent que le Kälikula, c’est-à-dire le Krama — lequel a d’ailleurs influencé les 
auteurs du Trika alors que l'inverse ne s’est pas produit — cela même si le Trika 
y est sans doute apparu avant le Krama. L’ampleur et le brillant de l’œuvre 
d’Abhinavagupta (influencé souvent par le Krama) nous cache, pense-il, cette 
réalité. Il souligne enfin l’importance qu’a eue notamment au Cachemire le 
culte de Tripurasundari — c’est au demeurant celui qui s’est le plus largement 
répandu en Inde où il a duré jusqu’à nos jours. Il y aurait ainsi beaucoup à 
revoir dans ce que nous croyons généralement savoir du $ivaïsme cachemirien. 
On voit dans tout ce qui précède la valeur de l’apport à notre volume de cette 
contribution. 

On revient à l’examen d’un texte, mais en restant dans l’exégèse éivaïte, 
avec la présentation commentée par Raffaele TORELLA d’un passage de la Vivrti 
d'Utpaladeva sur ses Pratyabhijnäkärikä, œuvre dont il avait retrouvé un frag- 
ment, qu'il a entrepris de publier. La découverte de ce fragment est importante 
car elle permet non seulement de mieux connaître certains aspects de la pensée 
d’Utpaladeva mais aussi de mieux comprendre les portions correspondantes du 
vaste commentaire, la Vimarsint, qu'Abhinavagupta avait fait de cette Vivrri, 


12 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


portions qui, sans elle, nous restaient souvent obscures. La section ici présen- 
tée par TORELLA porte sur la mémoire (smarana), Utpaladeva y réfutant l’idée 
qu’elle est simplement la reconnaissance d’une perception antérieure, alors que, 
pour la Pratyabhijñä, elle est l’effet de l’identité de la conscience individuelle 
et de la Conscience divine. On voit apparaître dans ce texte, une fois de plus, 
l'extrême subtilité de l’exégèse cachemirienne. 

On reste largement dans le domaine de l’exégèse avec l'étude de Judit 
Torzsôk « The Search in Saiva Scriptures for Meaning in Tantric ritual », où 
l’on voit certains tantras kaula ou leurs exégètes soit juger les rites inutiles (car 
seule sauve la grâce divine ou la gnose, ou les mantras), soit les réinterpréter en 
leur donnant une portée nouvelle, plus riche parce que transcendant l’action 
vers le sens. Cela se fait par le biais de l’analyse sémantique traditionnelle (#4r- 
vacana) qui trouve dans les mots un sens plus riche ; ou par l’intériorisation, 
la représentation mentale vécue se substituant avec une plus grande efficacité 
salvatrice à l’action rituelle matériellement accomplie. Mais comment renon- 
cer au rite quand on est un täntrika, c’est-à-dire un hyper-ritualiste ? Il y a Là 
un point important. Résumant ces diverses attitudes dans sa conclusion, Ju- 
dit TorzsôK fait remarquer que cette tension ne laissait pas de se rencontrer 
déjà dans les Upanisads : elle est sans doute généralement indienne, mais le 
phénomène tantrique ne l’est-il pas lui aussi ? 

La contribution de Somdev VAsuDEvA, « Synaesthetic iconography : the 
nädiphäntakrama » touche au cas particulier, propre au domaine tantrique, des 
divinités « alphabétiques », en l’occurence celui de la déesse Mälini, qui a une 
place importante dans le Trika et qui est faite des lettres de l'alphabet sanskrit 
disposées dans un ordre particulier mêlant voyelles et consonnes, commençant 
par NA pour se terminer par PHA, d’où sa désignation nädiphäntakrama. Va- 
SUDEVA présente onze recensions de cette séquence qui comportent quelques 
variantes, mais dont les phonèmes, correspondent toujours chacun à une déesse, 
leur ensemble formant le corps de la Mälini, s’étageant en elle en des points 
précis de la tête aux pieds. Ces phonèmes/déesses sont à placer par ny4sa en 
49 points du corps de l’adepte qui est ainsi purifié et divinisé. Ces points sont 
toujours les mêmes dans les diverses recensions et correspondent aux mêmes 
lettres, même si l’ordre n’est pas invariable. Cette correspondance constante ne 
serait pas sans raison : elle s’expliquerait par la ressemblance entre la graphie de 
ces phonèmes dans une des formes de l’écriture brähmiï et la forme des parties 
du corps humain où on les place rituellement. Or ces phonèmes se pronon- 
cent oralement. Le #yäsa de l’alphabet sanskrit dans cet ordre, donnerait ainsi 


Préface 13 


lieu à une représentation globale, cénesthésique, à la fois visuelle, celle des let- 
tres écrites, et phonique, celle du son de ces phonèmes, expérience divinisante 
corporellement vécue, chose assurément curieuse. 

Viennent enfin les deux contributions visnouïtes à ce volume, que, pour 
souligner la particularité et la place qu’elles méritent dans ce recueil essentielle- 
ment éivaïte, nous n'avons pas mentionnées à leur place alphabétique, mais sé- 
parément. Vient d’abord l’étude sur le Nyäsopadesa de Bharadväja de Gerhard 
OBERHAMMER dont nous aimerions d’abord rappeler que sans lui le Zntrika- 
bhidhänako$a publié par l’Académie des Sciences d'Autriche, et qui est un utile 
apport à la connaissance du domaine tantrique, n'aurait jamais vu le jour : on 
lui en doit de la reconnaissance. Dans cette étude, donc, il examine un court 
traité sur la prapatti qui ne se présente pas comme un des principaux textes 
révélés du Pañcarätra, mais plutôt comme un enseignement dont l'autorité ne 
se repose pas uniquement sur les samhitä, mais aussi sur les Véda, les Upanisad et 
les Dharmasästra. Le texte, qui est postérieur à Rämänuja, s'intéresse au thème 
de la prapatti du point de vue de la praxis et semble avoir été rédigé dans un 
contexte visistädvaita. 

Marion RASTELLI, enfin, confirmant une trentaine d’années après Hélène 
BRUNNER que les chapitres 72-106 de l’Agnipuräna proviennent d’une source 
ägamique, fait un travail attentif de recherche des sources possibles des chapitres 
21 à 70 de l’Agnipuräna, qui sont généralement considérés comme faits de ci- 
tations de textes du Päñcarätra. Elle arrive à la conclusion que leur matière 
provient notamment de la Näradiyasamhitä et (pour les chapitres 39-70) du 
Hayasirsapäñcarätra. L'examen de ces passages a en outre l'intérêt de mon- 
trer la présence dans le Päñcarätra de notions que l’on ne trouve pas dans les 
samhitäs que nous connaissons. 

Nous remercions tous les contributeurs de leurs textes comme de leur 
coopération à la mise au point de ces articles pour l'impression. Quelques 
lecteurs nous ont communiqué leurs corrections Outre les contributeurs, nous 
remercions les personnes suivantes de nous avoir communiqué quelques recti- 
fications pendant les derniers jours de la mise en page : Hugo Davip, Arlo 
GRIFFITHS, Harunaga [sAACSON, Nina MirNiG et Isabelle RATIÉ. Dominic 
GooDALL, qui s’est occupé de la mise en page de ce volume, tient à remercier 
deux personnes qui ont apporté leur aide dans la manipulation du logiciel 
ETEX : Kengo HARIMOTO et Somdev VASUDEVA. 

En ce qui concerne les informations bibliographiques, nous les avons re- 
groupées en trois endroits : les manuscrits consultés sont indiqués à la fin de 


14 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


chaque contribution ; une liste, que nous espérons complète, des publications 
d'Hélène BRUNNER se trouve après la note bibliographique qui suit cette pré- 
face ; une liste générale de tous les autres ouvrages cités dans ce volume se situe 
tout à la fin. 


Dominic GoopaLL et André Papoux, 
le 25 janvier 2007, 
à Pondichéry et à Paris, respectivement. 


Les contributeurs 


Drwakar ACHARYA, Visiting Lecturer, University of Kyoto 

PETER BisscHop, Lecturer in Sanskrit, University of Edinburgh 

RicHarD H. Davis, Professor of Religion, Bard College 

PIERRE-SYLVAIN FiLL10ZAT, Membre de l'Académie des Inscriptions 
& Belles-Lettres 

T. GANESAN, Research Scholar, French Institute of Pondicherry 

Dominic GoopaLi, Responsable du Centre EFEO de Pondichéry 

GERHARD OBERHAMMER, Professor emeritus fiir Indologie, Univer- 
sität Wien 

Lesuie C. ORR, Associate Professor, Religion Department, Concordia 
University, Montréal 

ANDRÉ PADoOUXx, Directeur de recherche honoraire au CNRS 

Marion RASTELLI, Research Scholar, Osterreichische Akademie der 
Wissenschaften 

ALEXIS SANDERSON, Spalding Professor of Eastern Religions and 
Ethics, AU Souls College, Oxford 

FRANCESCO SFERRA, Professor of Sanskrit, Università degli Studi di 
Napoli L'Orientale 

RAFFAELE TORELLA, Professor of Sanskrit, Università di Roma « La 
Sapienza » 

Juorr TôRzsôk, Maître de conférences, Université Charles-de- 
Gaulle, Lille 

SOMDEV VASUDEVA, Editor, Clay Sanskrit Library, Oxford 


Hélène Brunner — Une vie, une œuvre 


Hélène BRUNNER — Hélène LAcHAUX, de son nom de naissance —, à la mé- 
moire de qui ce volume est dédié, naquit à Pouzolles, dans le département de 
l'Hérault, le 20 mai 1920. Elle fut très tôt attirée par les mathématiques et les 
sciences, d’où sans doute l’esprit de précision et de rigueur qui a marqué toute 
son œuvre. Si elle était sensible à ce qui fait l’attrait religieux et spirituel ou 
esthétique de l'Inde, elle s’agaçait parfois de l’imprécision et des illogismes des 
textes qu’elle déchiffrait avec une patience et une attention extrêmes. Rien, au 
départ, ne semblait la destiner à devenir indianiste, ce qu’elle ne fit que tar- 
divement. Elève de l'Ecole Normale Supérieure de l'Enseignement Primaire 
de Fontenay-aux-Roses, section mathématiques et physique (1940-1942), elle 
obtint le Certificat d’Aptitude au Professorat des Ecoles Normales (le diplôme 
qui devint l’actuel CAPES). Elle enseigna dès lors les mathématiques et les sci- 
ences dans divers établissements secondaires, en France d’abord, puis en Alle- 
magne et en Ethiopie. Pendant la guerre, alors qu’elle était en Algérie, son père, 
Emile LACHAUX, qui était resté en France et était entré dans la Résistance, fut 
arrêté (à Bollène, où il était percepteur) par la Gestapo et déporté au camp de 
Ravensbrück, puis à celui de Flessenburg (en Tchécoslovaquie) où il mourut. 
Il est caractéristique de l’attitude morale d'Hélène LACHAUX d’avoir demandé, 
après la fin des hostilités, à être envoyée en Allemagne, pour apprendre à con- 
naître équitablement sans les juger les habitants du pays qui avait fait le malheur 
de sa famille. Elle enseigna alors pendant deux années (1951-1953) au Lycée 
français de Berchtesgaden. Elle se trouva ensuite deux ans à Addis-Abeba. C’est 
à cette époque-là qu’elle découvrit certains aspects de la pensée indienne qui 
l’intéressèrent aussitôt et qu’elle obtint d’être nommée (en 1955) professeur de 
mathématiques et de sciences au Collège Français de Pondichéry où elle resta 
sept ans. Je me souviens de l’avoir accueillie, alors que j'étais conseiller culturel 
adjoint de l’ambassade de France en Inde, à sa première arrivée à New-Delhi : 
rien ne laissait deviner que cette jeune enseignante de sciences, d’allure sportive 
— un peu ‘scoute” — deviendrait une indianiste de réputation internationale ; 
je n’en étais à ce moment-là qu’au début de mes incursions dans la pensée de 
l’Inde. Nous n’aurions alors guère pu imaginer que cette première rencontre, 


16 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


officielle, serait le prodrome de ce qui devint par la suite pour nous, au-delà de 
relations professionnelles suivies et étroites, une grande et durable amitié. 

À Pondichéry, Hélène LACHAUX se mit en rapport avec l’Institut Français 
de Pondichéry qui venait d’être fondé à la suite du traité de session des Etab- 
lissements français en Inde et que dirigeait Jean FiLLIOZAT, professeur au Col- 
lège de France. Celui-ci reconnut ses aptitudes et l’engagea à apprendre le 
sanskrit pour étudier les ägamas dont l’Institut s’employait à rassembler des 
manuscrits et à promouvoir l'étude. C’est ainsi que commença une carrière 
de chercheur qui devait faire d'Hélène une des plus éminentes spécialistes du 
domaine $ivaïte tantrique et plus spécialement du $ivaïsme saiddhäntika. Elle 
fut, dans ce travail, toujours encouragée et soutenue par Jean FILLIOZAT, dont 
c’est ici l’occasion de rappeler le rôle fondamental qu'avec l’Institut Français 
de Pondichéry il a joué dans la vie de l’indianisme français, dans le développe- 
ment de la recherche et la diffusion des travaux : si cet Institut et sa collection de 
publications se sont développés et ont acquis une réputation mondiale, c’est en 
premier lieu à lui, à son activité, à son travail de pionnier, qu’on le doit. Tant 
qu’il fut là, l’appui et l’aide de l’IFP ne manquèrent jamais à Hélène BRUN- 
NER. Rappelons aussi le soutien que celle-ci a trouvé auprès du pandit R. N. 
BHATT dans sa recherche sur les ägamas, ainsi que la contribution essentielle de 
ce dernier à la collecte et à l’étude de ces textes. C’est pendant qu’elle était à 
Pondichéry qu'Hélène rencontra un philosophe suisse, Fernand BRUNNER, qui 
avait, un temps, dirigé la Maison de la Suisse de la Cité Universitaire de Paris, 
avant de devenir professeur à l’Université de Neuchâtel. Elle l’épousa en 1958. 
Si les trois tomes de son œuvre principale, sur la Somasambhupaddhati (1963- 
1998), ainsi que la traduction qu'elle fit de deux sections du Mrgendrägama 
(1985), parurent sous le nom d'Hélène BRUNNER-LACHAUX, tout le reste de son 
œuvre parut sous son seul nom de femme mariée : c’est ainsi qu’elle est connue 
et c’est sous ce nom que nous l’évoquons, dans le regret de ne plus l'avoir parmi 
nous. Quand elle quitta l’Inde, en 1962, elle s'installa avec son mari en Suisse, 
à Cortaillod, village proche de Neuchâtel, au bord du lac, dans une maison 
qu’ils firent bâtir et où elle vécut désormais tout en retournant souvent, parfois 
longuement, en Inde et notamment à Pondichéry. Elle avait aussi coutume 
d'accompagner son mari dans des congrès philosophiques internationaux et 
notamment dans ceux de l’Association Internationale des Sociétés de Philoso- 
phie de Langue Française (qu’il présida pendant plusieurs années), instances 
où elle présenta parfois des communications (ainsi en 1988). Fernand BRUN- 
NER, éminent historien de la philosophie, esprit très fin, infiniment cultivé, 


Hélène Brunner — Une vie, une œuvre 17 


s’intéressait d’ailleurs au travail d'Hélène, l’aidant de ses conseils. En 1962, elle 
soutint, sous la direction du professeur Jean FiLL1OZAT, un diplôme de l'Ecole 
Pratique des Hautes Etudes, Section des Sciences Historiques et Philologiques 
sur « Le rituel quotidien dans la tradition $ivaïte de l’Inde du Sud selon la So- 
ma$ambhupaddhati. Introduction, traduction et notes », diplôme qui, édité 
en 1963 à Pondichéry, forma le premier volume de son œuvre maîtresse sur 
le rituel saiddhäntika. ( Le résumé de ce diplôme se trouve dans les Annales 
de la 4° Section de l'EPHE, année 1962-63, p.221-224.) En 1963, elle en- 
tra au CNRS où elle resta jusqu’à sa retraite, en 1980 ; retrait administratif qui 
n’interrompit nullement ses travaux, qu’elle poursuivit quasiment jusqu’à la fin 
de sa vie. 

Ce n’est pas ici — pour en venir à l’œuvre d'Hélène BRUNNER — qu’il est 
nécessaire de souligner l'importance des ägamas dans le domaine des pratiques 
et spéculations religieuses non seulement éivaïtes mais indiennes. On peut 
toutefois rappeler que ces textes, à l’étude desquels Hélène BRUNNER allait se 
consacrer, n'avaient jusque dans les années soixante pratiquement jamais fait 
l’objet d’une recherche indianiste approfondie. On les situait mal dans l’espace 
et dans le temps : n'étaient-ils pas du sud de l’Inde ? Quand furent rédigés les 
plus anciens ? Ce sont des points que ses travaux (puis ceux d’autres chercheurs, 
notamment Dominic GoODaALL) ont depuis lors contribué à éclairer. Au mo- 
ment où elle les abordait, l’inventaire de ces textes n’avait pas encore été fait, ni 
leur classification traditionnelle examinée. On ne connaissait guère leur con- 
tenu, non plus que leur structure. Or ce sont des textes essentiels puisque, avec 
leurs commentaires, ils contiennent les éléments de base doctrinaux et surtout 
rituels de la religion éivaïte telle qu’elle a été vécue et pratiquée pendant des siè- 
cles et telle qu’elle existe encore aujourd’hui : le culte privé des hindous éivaïtes, 
ainsi que l’organisation socio-religieuse et l’activité rituelle des temples de Siva 
ou de la Déesse (en particulier des temples du sud de l'Inde), reposent sur eux. 
Même les traditions éivaïtes les plus intensément tantriques, celles de l’ensemble 
du Kula notamment, les reconnaissent comme formant leur enseignement de 
base commun, leur sämänyasästra. Les travaux d'Hélène BRUNNER ont large- 
ment contribué à faire apparaître l’étendue et la richesse de ces textes qui, s'ils 
sont souvent utilisés en Inde comme de simples manuels de rituel, sont en réal- 
ité beaucoup plus que cela, car ils présentent une vision originale, d’ailleurs 
diverse, tant de l’univers et de la divinité que de la condition humaine. (Un de 
ses articles, « Importance de la littérature ägamique pour l’étude des religions 
vivantes de l’Inde », paru en 1975-76, le souligne.) 


18 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


L'œuvre maîtresse d'Hélène BRUNNER est son édition annotée et traduite en 
français de la Somafambhupaddhati, vaste manuel de rituel (paddhati) $ivaïte dû 
à un auteur du XI° siècle, Somasambhu, édition dont l’annotation, qui cite et 
se réfère à divers textes ou traités ultérieurs (dont la paddhati d’Aghoragiva et 
son commentaire par Nirmalamani), est d’une richesse extrême et constitue 
une source incomparable d’information sur le rituel $ivaïte. Le premier volume 
en parut en 1963, le quatrième en 1998. Ils comptent en tout plus de deux 
mille pages ; leur ampleur qui allait croissant reflétait le développement de la 
recherche et l'enrichissement des connaissances au cours des ans. Hélène avait 
conscience des insuffisances des deux premiers volumes, entrepris alors qu’elle 
n’en était encore qu’au début de son étude des igamas. Elle avait le projet de 
les reprendre sur la base de manuscrits dont elle n’avait pas eu connaissance 
en commençant, et en tenant compte de tout ce qu’elle avait appris depuis 
lors : c’eût été un travail d’un grand intérêt. Malheureusement, d’autres obli- 
gations, puis son état de santé, ne lui permirent pas de le réaliser. (Elle eût 
sans doute aussi repris, de ce point de vue, quelques passages de l'introduction 
à la traduction annotée qu’elle fit des sections des rites et du comportement — 
kriyäpäda et caryäpäda — du Mrgendrägama, avec la vriti de Bhattanäräyana- 
kantha, parue en 1985, où elle notait toutefois les similitudes entre ce texte et 
le Svacchandatantra.) Dans le domaine du rituel &ivaïte, on lui doit également 
une traduction présentée et annotée d’une partie de la Parärthanityapüjävidhi, 
« Règle pour le culte quotidien dans un temple », attribuée à Aghorasivacärya, 
maître éivaïte du 12° siècle, qui parut en annexe au tome 3, Rites et Fêtes, de 
la grande étude du temple de Tiruvannamalai entreprise par l'Ecole française 
d’Extrême-Orient sous la direction de Françoise L'HERNAULT et Marie-Louise 
REINICHE. 

Animée toujours par le désir de faire mieux connaître le domaine des äga- 
mas éivaïtes, Hélène BRUNNER fit paraître dans le Journal Asiatique, en 1965 et 
1967, de brèves analyses du Kiranägama, puis du Suprabhedägama. En 1981 
paraissait à Bruxelles une traduction du chapitre sur le éaivadaréana, c’est-à- 
dire le éaivasiddhänta, du Sarvadarsanasamgraha. S’écartant un moment de 
son champ de recherche principal, elle donnait en 1975 au BEFEO une ana- 
lyse détaillée d’un important tantra du Mantrapitha, consacré à Amrteévara et 
provenant sans doute du Cachemire, le Merratantra. L'examen qu’elle en fit 
alors ne laisse pas de marquer une étape dans l’étude de ce tantra : ceux qui tra- 
vaillent dans ce domaine ont souvent l’occasion de s’y reporter. On remarquera 
le titre — « Un tantra du nord, le Netratantra » — sous lequel parut ce travail : il 


Hélène Brunner — Une vie, une œuvre 19 


reflète l’idée courante à cette époque que les ägamas saiddhäntikas provenaient 
du sud de l’Inde, alors que ceux du Mantrapitha, avec la littérature éivaïte essen- 
tiellement non dualiste et restée proche à certains égards d’origines supposées 
käpalika, auraient été composés au nord. La recherche fit apparaître plus tard 
l’inexactitude de cette opposition : il y a eu, en effet, une tradition « cachemi- 
rienne » au sud de l’Inde — dont la Srividyä est le cas le plus connu -, cependant 
que Soma$ambhu, l’auteur de la Paddhati, fut abbé d’un monastère du nord 
de l'Inde et naquit sans doute au Cachemire : Hélène, toujours foncièrement 
droite et honnête, reconnut vite l’inexactitude de sa vision initiale. C’est ainsi 
que, dans l’introduction du 4° volume paru en 1998, de la Somasambhupad- 
dhati, elle revient sur ce sujet, se corrigeant et apportant des éléments nouveaux. 
C’est à cette première vision de la géographie des textes que se référait égale- 
ment le titre de son étude de l’adepte initié $ivaïte, « Le sädhaka, personnage 
oublié du $ivaisme du sud ». Elle faisait là encore, dans le domaine ägamique, 
un travail de pionnier, sur un sujet qui était en effet alors à peu près ignoré, 
travail riche d’informations, toujours extrêmement valable et utile. 

Dans ses divers travaux, Hélène BRUNNER s’est continuellement efforcée 
de faire mieux connaître le contenu ou l'esprit des âgamas. Ainsi ses études 
sur « The four pädas of the Saivägamas » (1992), « Jñäna and kriyä : Relation 
between Theory and Practice in the Saivägamas » (1992), ou « The Place of 
Yoga in the Saivägamas » (1994), ou encore son étude sur « The sexual aspect 
of the frga cult » (1998), où elle démontre de façon convaincante la nature 
originellement phallique de cette image de culte. D’autres travaux sont centrés 
sur des points précis de doctrine, telle son étude sur « Les membres de Siva », 
à ce jour seul travail complet sur le sujet. Il faut rappeler aussi, et surtout, des 
articles portant sur certains aspects du rituel $ivaïte qu’elle connaissait mieux 
que personne. Tel est le cas de « Mandala et yantra dans le éivaïsme âgamique » 
(1990), excellente mise au point sur un sujet souvent mal compris : elle y mon- 
tre quels en sont la signification et l’usage qui est avant tout rituel (et non pas 
essentiellement méditatif, comme on le croit trop souvent). C’est aussi Le cas de 
« L'image divine dans le culte âgamique de $iva. Rapport entre image mentale 
et le support concret du culte » (1992), où elle fait apparaître à quel point le 
culte $ivaïte est une opération mentale d’imagination visionnaire. Dans une de 
ses dernières publications, « Mantra et mantras dans les tantras éivaïtes », elle 
s’est attaquée au problème difficile de la nature des mantras tantriques : plutôt 
que d’admettre leur nature double, divine et de parole — de formes phoniques 
de divinités — qu'ils ont toujours, elle voulait établir que les mantras sont, dans 


20 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


les rites, envisagés soit comme des puissances surnaturelles, des divinités, pour 
lesquelles elle utilise la majuscule, Mantras, soit comme des sons, des énoncés, 
des formes efficaces de la parole — qu’elle écrit en minuscules. Cette façon de 
voir est intéressante. Elle introduit une logique dans ce qui, dans les manuels 
de rituel et les commentaires de textes, peut paraître contradictoire. Elle ne 
m'avait toutefois pas entièrement convaincu, malgré la lumière qu’elle apporte 
sur un sujet difficile. Mais il se pourrait fort bien que j’aie tort. Nous en avions 
parlé plusieurs fois ensemble, sans pouvoir tomber d'accord. C’est une question 
dont, hélas, je ne pourrai plus jamais discuter avec Hélène. 

En 1981-82 et 1982-83, puis en 1983-84, Hélène BRUNNER avait fait à la 
VF Section de l’Ecole Pratique des Hautes Etudes deux séries de conférences, les 
deux premières portant sur les rites du temple $ivaïte, la troisième sur les rites 
$ivaïtes d’apaisement, de protection et de purification. Entre 1982 et 1989, 
quoique étant loin de Paris puisqu’elle habitait en Suisse, elle avait pourtant par- 
ticipé activement aux travaux de l’équipe de recherche « L'Hindouisme, textes, 
doctrines, pratiques » du CNRS, où, par sa science éivaïte, elle apportait tou- 
jours des éléments utiles et intéressants. Dans cette équipe, on avait, entre 
autres choses, en partie à son instigation, entrepris de constituer un fichier de 
la terminologie de l’hindouisme tantrique. Ce projet, d’abord continué dans 
une équipe mixte CNRS-Collège de France (dirigée par M. G. FussMaN), fut 
finalement repris par l’Académie des Sciences d'Autriche, en devenant le Tän- 
trikäbhidhänako$a, Dictionnaire des termes techniques de la littérature hin- 
doue tantrique, ouvrage trilingue, rédigé par un groupe européen de chercheurs 
sous la direction d'Hélène BRUNNER, Gerhard OBERHAMMER et moi-même. La 
mise en œuvre de cet ouvrage et ses premiers développements (rendus possibles 
grâce à l'appui généreux de l’Académie des Sciences d'Autriche) doivent beau- 
coup au travail et au dévouement d'Hélène BRUNNER qui y porta une grande 
attention. On lui doit le plan de l'introduction du premier volume, dont elle 
rédigea la majorité des entrées, et une importante contribution au tome 2 (parus 
l’un en 2000, l’autre en 2004). Au troisième tome, actuellement en cours de 
rédaction, elle ne put malheureusement participer, à cause de son état de santé, 
qu’à la rédaction des tout premiers articles. 

Son état de santé s'était en effet gravement détérioré. Elle se déplaçait dif- 
ficilement et surtout, à partir de la fin de l’année 2000, elle ne put lire qu'avec 
beaucoup de difficulté. Cela ne lui retirait rien de son acuité intellectuelle et 
elle continua à suivre les travaux des autres, mais sans pouvoir faire elle-même 
l'effort exigé par la rédaction d’un article. Il convient aussi de dire que la pro- 


Hélène Brunner — Une vie, une œuvre 21 


duction de ses dernières années ainsi trop tôt interrompue aurait pu être plus 
grande si, alors qu’elle était encore en pleine activité, elle n’avait consacré, après 
le décès (en 1991) de Fernand BRUNNER, qui enseignait encore à l’Université 
de Neuchâtel, pendant plusieurs années le plus clair de son temps à trier les 
papiers de son mari et à veiller à la sauvegarde ou à la publication des travaux 
qu'il avait laissés. 

Ne pouvant plus travailler, elle avait fait don à l’Ecole française d'Extrême- 
Orient de la vaste bibliothèque indianiste qu’elle avait accumulée au cours des 
ans. (Elle en avait aussi donné quelques éléments à l’Université de Lausanne.) 
Fixée en Suisse depuis son mariage, elle vivait à Cortaillod dans une maison 
entourée de vignes et dominant la paisible étendue et le calme paysage du lac 
de Neuchâtel. Elle n’en bougeait plus guère à la fin. Tout déplacement lui 
était devenu difficile et pénible. Elle ne pouvait plus aller l'été dans le châlet 
que son mari et elle-même avaient fait reconstruire avec des éléments anciens 
à Ayer, beau village du val d’Anniviers, dans les Alpes valaisannes, où elle fai- 
sait naguère de longues randonnées dans ces hautes montagnes que domine le 
Cervin. C’est à Ayer, et dans le haut village voisin de Chandolin (où habitait 
son amie l’exploratrice Ella MAILLARD — qui y retrouvait des pentes abruptes lui 
rappelant celles de l'Himalaya), que je la revoyais chaque été, sur un plan qui 
n’était pas professionnel, mais personnel et chaleureusement amical : sous des 
dehors paisibles, un peu froids, Hélène cachait une vive sensibilité, une grande 
richesse intérieure. À Cortaillod, dans les derniers temps, elle demeurait seule 
avec ses deux chats, supportant des douleurs souvent intenses et les difficultés 
du quotidien avec un courage et une sérénité qui frappaient ceux allaient la voir. 
Elle savait qu’à tout moment un accident circulatoire pouvait se produire, qui 
serait fatal, elle n’en laissait rien paraître. Sa longue familiarité avec la pensée 
de l’Inde n’avait pu que la rendre plus paisible, plus détachée. Dans la semaine 
d’avant Pâques 2005, donc à peine avant sa fin, je lui avais téléphoné pour lui 
demander de ses nouvelles. Elles ne laissaient rien présager d’anormal et il avait 
été convenu que ma femme et moi irions passer un moment, peut-être même 
rester un peu, avec elle, en juillet, à notre retour de son cher Val d’Anniviers. 
Mais cela ne devait pas être. Le 27 mars, elle partait de Cortaillod pour Lau- 
sanne, où vivait une soeur de son mari, pour y passer ce jour de Pâques, qui fut 
le dernier qu’elle vécut en ce monde. 


André PApoUx 


22 


Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Liste des publications d'Hélène Brunner 


LIVRES 


1963 Somasambhupaddhati. Première partie : Le rituel quotidien dans la tradition Sivaïte de 
l'Inde du Sud. Introduction, texte, traduction et notes. Publications de l’Institut Francais 
d’Indologie, No. 25.1. Pondichéry : IFI. 


1968a Somasambhupaddhati. Deuxième partie : Rituels Occasionnels dans la tradition Sivaïte de 
l'Inde du sud selon Somasambhu. I : Paviträrohana, Damanapüjä et Präyascitta. Texte, 
Traduction et Notes. PIFI 25.2. Pondichéry : IFI. 


1977a Somasambhupaddhati. Troisième partie : Rituels occasionnels dans la tradition Sivaïte de 
l'Inde du sud selon Somasambhu. IT : diksä, abhiseka, vratoddhära, antyesti, sräddha. Texte 
Traduction et Notes. PIFI 25.3. Pondichéry : IFI. 


1998a Somasambhupaddhati. Rituels dans la tradition Sivaïte selon Somasambhu. Quatrième 
partie : rituels optionnels : pratisthä. Texte, traduction et notes. Publications du départe- 
ment d’indologie 25.4. Pondichéry : IFP/EFEO. 


1985a Mrgendrägama Section des rites et section du comportement avec la vrtti de Bhattanäräyana- 
kantha. Traduction, introduction et notes. PIFI 69. Pondichéry : IFI. 


2000 [en collaboration avec G. OBERHAMMER et A. PADOUx] Täntrikäbhidhänakosa I. Dictio- 
nnaïre des termes techniques de la littérature hindoue tantrique.….sous la direction de H. 
Brunner, G. Oberhammer et À. Padoux. Osterreichische Akademie der Wissenschaften, 
Philosophisch-historische Klasse, Sitzungsberichte, 681. Band. Beiträge zur Kultur- 
und Geistesgeschichte Asiens Nr. 35. Vienne: Verlag der üsterreichischen Akademie 
der Wissenschaften. 


ARTICLES DANS DES REVUES SCIENTIFIQUES 


1964 « Les catégories sociales védiques dans le éivaïsme du sud », Journal Asiatique CCLII 


(1964), p. 451-72. 
1965 « Analyse du Kiranägama », Journal Asiatique CCLII (1965), p. 309-28. 
1967a « Analyse du Suprabhedägama », Journal Asiatique CCLV (1967), p. 31-60. 
1967b « À propos d’un rituel balinais », Journal Asiatique CCLV (1967), p. 409-22. 
1968b « Toujours le niskala-liñga », Journal Asiatique CCLVI (1968), p. 445-7. 


1969a « De la consommation du rirmälya de Siva », Journal Asiatique CCLVII (1969), p.213- 
63. 


24 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


1974 « Un tantra du Nord : le Netra Tantra », Bulletin de l'École française d'Extréme-Orient 
(1974), p.125-97. 


1975 « Le sädhaka, personnage oublié du éivaïsme du Sud », Journal Asiatique CCLXTI 
(1975), p.411-43. 


1976 « Importance de la littérature ägamique pour l'étude des religions vivantes de l’Inde », 
Indologia Taurinensia, vol. HI-IV (1975-76), p. 107-24. 


1977b « Le mysticisme dans les âgamas éivaïtes », Studia Missionalia, vol. 26 (1977), p. 287- 
314. 


1981a « Le Saiva-Siddhänta, « essence » du Véda (Etude d’un fragment du Kämikägama) », 
Indologia Taurinensia, vol. VIII-IX (1980-81), Dr. Ludwik Sternbach Commemoration 
Volume, p. 51-66. 


1986a « Les membres de Siva », Asiatische Studien/Etudes Asiatiques, XL.2. (1986), p. 89-132. 


1988a « Esclavage et libération selon la perspective des âgamas éivaïtes », Philosophie et Culture. 


Actes du XVII Congrès Mondial de Philosophie (1988), p.641-50. 


1988b « L'äcärya $ivaïte : du guru au gurukkal», Bulletin d'Etudes Indiennes 6 (1988), p. 145- 
76. 


1992a « The Four Pädas of Saivägamas », The Journal of Oriental Research, Madras. Dr. S.S. 
Janaki Félicitation Volume, Vols. 56-72. (1986-92), p. 260-78. 


CONTRIBUTIONS À DES OUVRAGES COLLECTIFS 


1981b « Un chapitre du Sarvadarfanasamgraha: le Saivadarsana », dans : Tantric and Taoist 
Studies in honour of R. A. Stein. Vol. I, éd. Michel Strickmann. Mélanges Chinois et 
Bouddhiques Vol. XX, p.96-140. Bruxelles. 


1985b « On the Threefold Classification of Saiva Tantras », dans : R.N. Dandekar and P. D. 
Navathe (éd.) Proceedings of the Fifth World Sanskrit Conference, Varanasi, India: Octo- 
ber 21-21, 1981, p.464-74. New Delhi : Rashtriya Sanskrit Sansthan. 


1986b « Mandala et Yantra dans le $ivaïsme ägamique. Définition, description, usage rituel », 
dans : Mantras et diagrammes rituels dans l'hindouisme ed. André Papoux, p. 12-31. 
Paris : Éditions du Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique. 


1986c « The Päéupatas as seen by the $aivas », dans : Wolfgang Morgenroth (éd.) Sanskrit and 
World Culture. Proceedings of the Fourth World Sanskrit Conference of the International 
Association of Sanskrit Studies Weimar May 23-30, 1979, p. 513-20. Berlin : Schriften 
zur Geschichte und Kultur des Alten Orients 18. 


1988c Article « ÂAgama », dans : Encyclopaedia Universalis, p. 532-33, Paris. 


1990a « L'image divine dans le culte ägamique de $iva. Rapport entre l’image mentale et le 
support du culte », dans : L'image divine. Culte et méditation dans l'hindouisme, éd. 
André Papoux, p.9-29. Paris : Éditions du Centre National de la Recherche Scien- 
tifique. 


Liste des publications d'Hélène Brunner 25 


1990b « Armärthapüja versus Parärthapüja in the Saiva Tradition », dans : 7he Sanskrit Tradi- 
tion and Tantrism éd. Teun GoupriAAN, p. 4-23. Leyde : Brill. 


1992b « Jñäna and Kriyä: Relation between Theory and Practice in the Saivägamas », dans : 
Ritual and Speculation in Early Tantrism: Studies in Honor of André Padoux, éd. Teun 
GoupriaAN, p. 1-59. Albany : State University of New York Press. 


1994 « The Place of Yoga in the Saivägamas », dans : Pandit N. R. Bhatt Felicitation Volume éd. 
PS. Fizu1oZaT, $. P. NaranG, C. P. BHATTA, p. 425-61. Delhi : Motilal Banarsidass. 


1998b « The sexual Aspect of the hriga Cult according to the Saiddhäntika Scriptures », 
dans : Studies in Hinduism IL, Miscellanea to the Phenomenon of Tantras, éd. Gerhard 
OBERHAMMER, p. 87-103. Vienne : Verlag der ôsterreichischen Akademie der Wis- 
senschaften. 


1999 « Le Parärthanityapüjävidhi, Règle pour le culte quotidien dans un temple », dans : 
Tiruvannamalai, un lieu saint Sivaïte du Sud de l'Inde. 3 Rites et fètes., éd. Françoise 
L'HerNauLT et Marie-Louise REINICHE, p.261-340. Publications de l'EFEO 156.3. 
Paris : Ecole Française d’Extrême-Orient. 


2001 « Mantras et mantras dans les Tantras éivaïtes », dans : Le parole e i marmi. Studi in 
onore di Raniero Gnoli nel suo 70° compleanno, éd. Raffaele ToRELLA, en collabora- 
tion avec Claudio CicuzzA, Marino FALIERO, Bruno Lo Turco, Francesco SFERRA, 
Vincenzo VERGIANI et avec la participation d’Alvar GoNZÂLEz-PALACIOS, p. 183-212. 
Serie Orientale Roma 92,1. Rome : Istituto Italiano per lAfrica e l’Oriente. 


2003 « Mandala and Yantra in the Siddhänta School of $aivism: Definitions, Description 
and Ritual Use », dans : Mandalas and Yantras in the Hindu Traditions éd. Gudrun 
BÜHNEMANN, p.153-77. Leyde : Brill. (Réimpression publiée en 2007 par D.K. 
Printworld, New Delhi.) 


COMPTES RENDUS 


1969b Compte rendu de Teun GouDriaAN, Käsyapa book of wisdom (Käsyapa-Jñänakända), 
À Ritual Handbook of the Vaikhänasas (Le Hague: Mouton & Co., 1965), dans /ndo- 
Tranian Journal 11 (1969), p. 293-302. 


1979 Compte rendu de Maria Pia VivanTi (éd.), 1! “Kiranägama”, Testo e traduzione del 
« Vidyäpäda » (Supplemento n.3 agli ANNALI: vol. 35 (1975), fasc. 2. Néaples : Is- 
tituto Orientale di Napoli, 1975), dans {ndo-lranian Journal 21 (1975), p. 13942. 


1981c Compte rendu de Sanjukta Gupra, Dirk Jan Hozns, Teun GoupriAAN, Hindu 
Tantrism (Handbuch der Orientalistik, zweite Abt., 4.Band, 2. Abschnitt). 
Leyde/Cologne : Brill, 1979), dans {ndo-lranian Journal 23 (1981), p. 139-59. 


1988d Compte rendu de Teun GoupriaAN, The Vinäsikhätantra, a Saiva Tantra of the Left 
Current, edited with an Introduction and a Translation (Delhi : Motilal Banarsidas, 
1985), dans /ndo-Tranian Journal 31 (1988), p. 224-50. 


26 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


1990c Compte rendu de Saskia KERSENBOOM-SToRy, Nityasumanñgali, Devadasi Tradition in 
South India (Delhi : Motilal Banarsidas, 1987), dans /ndo-lranian Journal 33 (1990), 
p.121-39. 


1992c Compte rendu de: I. Louise M. FINN, 7he Kulacüdämani Tantra and The Vämakesvara 
Tantra, with the Jayaratha Commentary, — introduced, translated and annotated by Louise 
M. Finn (Wiesbaden: Harrassowitz, 1986), et II. Michael MAGEE, Vamakesvarimatam, 
text with English translation (Tantra Granthamala No. 11. Varanasi, 1986), dans /ndo- 
Tranian Journal 35 (1992), p. 299-313. 


The Samskäravidhi: À Manual on the Transformatory 
Rite of the Lakuli$a-Pasupatas* 


DIWAKAR ACHARYA 


INTRODUCTION 


This text, together with three other vidhis for [purification of] the pot (Pärra- 
vidhi), atonement (Präyascittavidhi) and the last rite (Antestividhi), is preserved 
in a palm-leaf manuscript from the National Archives, Kathmandu. All ofthese 
vidhis, except the Pätravidhi, begin with an invocation to Lakuli$a. The author 
of these texts appears to be a certain Gärgya,! at least of the Präyascittavidhi, in 
which he is mentioned in colophons. A verse quoted in the Rarnatikä and not 
yet traced in any other source has been found in the Antestividhi.? Five verses 
forming part of a long quotation of 21 verses found in Kaundinyas Bhäsya (on 
Päsupatasätra 1.9) have been found in the Pätravidhi.® 


*I would like to express my sincere gratitude to Dr. Peter BisscHor (University of Ed- 
inburgh), Dr. Csaba DEzs6 (Eütvôs Loränd University, Budapest), Dr. Habil. Dominic 
GoopaLz (École Française d’Extrême-Orient in Pondicherry) and and Prof. Harunaga Isaac- 
son (Universität Hamburg) for their critical comments on an earlier draft of this paper. 

lGärgya is also the name of one of the four pupils of Lakuliéa according to the traditional 
account, and a passage in the original Skandapuräna names Jambümärga, a place near Pushkar 
in Rajasthan, as the place of his initiation by Lakuli$a (see Bakker 2000:14). For Lakulï$a and 
his four pupils, see BisscHop 2006:44-50,209. 

2 Ratnatikä on Ganakärikä Scd: uktam hi pürvam darbhäh punar bhasma candanam sûtram 
eva ca| puspäni ca punar dhüpam manträ esah kramah smrtah|| This verse serves as verse 30 in 
the Antestividhi. 

Bhäsarvajña first identifies ‘kusa grass and so on’ (darbhädyäh) as kalä, which he has made 
part of the dravya featuring in Ganakärikä 5; then he quotes the above verse and comments 
that there is no contradiction with the Samskärakärikä, since his interpretation incorporates 
the additional materials and so on (pakaranädi). Our text clearly states this point: ku$a grass 
and so on are the additional materials required for the transformatory rite. So it is quite likely 
that Bhäsarvajña knew our text by this name. It is also notable that he has quoted the above 
verse of the Antestividhi in this context, indicating that the two texts are closely related. 

3 Patravidhi verses 4, 51-54 = Kaundinyaïs quotation verses 4, 6-9: 


28 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The manuscript is registered in the record book under an imaginary ti- 
le, Diksävidhi, but is rightly classified as a Paddhati text. It was given the 
manuscript number 1-736, and microfilmed by the NGMPP as Reel No. B 
32/12. It is written with a neat hand in Mahärästra-style Devanagari script. 
This manuscript is not dated, but resembles a manuscript of the Agastyasamhitä 
copied in NS 455 (1325 AD) by a Maharashtrian brahmin residing in the south 
of the Kathmandu Valley, so I place it around the same period, in the mid- 
dle of the 14th century.“ The leaves have four or five lines per side and about 
sixty aksaras per line, but, because of the scribe*s efforts to spare a blank leaf, 
the last folio has seven lines, each of which squeezes in about 78 4ksaras. In 
a few places the manuscript is sparingly damaged by worms. The first folio is 
damaged on both edges, and a few aksaras are broken away in each line. I have 
attempted to supply these missing #ksaras, basing my conjectures on logical and 
syntactical grounds. ‘The restored text at the broken edge or worm-eaten spot 
is shown inside parentheses () and #ksaras that are partially visible are placed 
inside brackets []. 

The recto of the first folio, which was originally blank, bears syädipvastaka 
in Newari script, prefixed with a siddhi sign. The text of the Samskäravidhi 
begins on the verso of the first folio and ends on the second line of the verso of 
the seventh folio. On the third line the Pärravidhi begins and continues to the 
last line of the 11th folio; the Präyascittavidhi covers folios 12-19. The Anéesti- 
vidhi begins on the recto of the 20th folio and continues to the last line of the 
21st folio. 

Here I present the edited text with translation. I intend to analyse its con- 
tent in the near future, after publishing the other three vidhis, which are closely 


bhaiksasesam samutsriya yatir yamaparäyanah| 

grâse grâse tu kartavyäh pränäyämäs trayas trayah|| 

mädhukaram asamkalpam präkpravrttam ayäcitam| 

tatah kälopapannam ca bhaiksam pañcavidham smrtam|| 

grhäd grham paryatams tu na grham parivarjayet| 

parasya vacanam $rutvà dustavefma vivarjayet|| 

adustäpatitam sädhum bhiksuko yo vyatikramet| 

sa tasya sukriam datvä duskrtam pratipadyate|| 

tathà yadi grhasthasya nirä$o bhiksuko vrajet| 

sa tasyestam ca pürtam ca bhiksur ädäya gacchati|| 
Kaundinyæs quotation reads verse 4ab differently, and has minor variant readings in verses 


Gc and 92. 
#National Archives, Manuscript no. 4-325, NGMPP reel No. B 23/35. 


Diwakar Acharya 29 


related to this one and preserved in the same manuscript. Furthermore, I am 
at the moment not prepared to assign a date to our text and hope to return to 
this issue later. 


SANSKRIT IEXT 


Spañcärthajñanakhadgena cchinnä yena kudrstayah] 
sarvajñänätiriktäyaS tasmai lakuline namabh|| 1|| 
kah kälo tra samskärasya ko väà de\$ah] (prakirtitah|) 
(upakaranam) kim proktam ke ca manträh prakirtitäh|| 2|| 
samskärahetuh” kartä va kena dravyena kriyateÿ| 
samskärasya phalam kim vä samskäryam ca mahämune”|| 3|| 
[kälah] (prâtas tathà deso yatra) mürtis tu daksina"| 
upakaranam darbhädyam manträh sadyädayah smriäh|| 4|| 
samskärakartà äcäryo nimittam käranam smrtam] 
samskäradralvyam ca puna)(r dantadhävanam u)cyate|| 5|| 
samskärasya\* phalam vidhäv adhikärah prakirtitah"?|| 6|| 
päni $iro lalätam ca caksusi näsike tathà ‘| 
karnau vaktram tathà grivä [hrc ca] (samskäryam ucyate)|| 7|| 


athätah sampravaksyämi samskäravidhim uttamam] 
sädhakà vicchede yena te yogyä ca bhavanti vai|| 8|| 


samskrtasyädhikäro smiñ jñeyo nänyasya kasya cit| 
darsito \gurubhih] pürvam sivädyair brähmanasya tu] 9|| 


yo jijñäsati* nänyäni sivenaiva pracoditah]| 


5 At the broken edge of the manuscript [ya]|] is visible; I imagine it begins with an invoca- 
tion: (om namah fivä)[ya]||. 

Gtiriktäya | emend.; °bhiriktäya MS 

7°hetuh |] emend.; °hetu MS 

Sdravyena kriyate ] conj.; mantrena samskryate MS 

’samskäryam ca mahämune ] emend.; samskäryamva mahämuneh MS 

10daksina ] conÿj.; daksinam MS 

llsamskärasya ] MSpc; samskäraphasya MSac 
Pekärah prakirtitah ] conÿ.; °kärah MS 
Bpäni ] emend.; pani MS 
Mjijñäsati | emend.; jijñasyati MS 


30 


upasanno® guroh samyak tam parikseta\® brähmanam|| 10|| 


desajätikulam vrttam $rutam arthitvam eva cal 

indriyänäm patutvam ca Sarirärogyam eva ca]| 11|| 
fraddhästikyam $ive bhaktir dhairyam sthairyam ajihmatà] 
bodhotsähas ca $aktis ca ete fisyagunäh smrtäh|| 12|| 

evam pariksitam vipram äcäryo jñänacaksusä| 

parigrahet\” tatah pascäd yathävad vidhipürvakam]| 13|| 
hiranyavastradärädims tyajasveti yadrcchayä] 

iti brayäd'® gurus tam vai yadi|cchet paramam] padam|| 14|| 


audambaramayam snigdham aviddham dvädasäñgulam| 
rju® savalkalam sardram dantakästham samäharet|| 15|| 


ksirahine* gatotsäho vakre vakramatir bhavet| 
sakïte pratyantavast saroge vyädhitah”\ smrtah|| 16|| 


nakhair na cchindyät tam dantair na°° ca padbhyäm spr$ed budhah| 
ährtya tad guror”® vipro diksyamäno®* nivedayet|| 17|| 

tam grhitvà tadäcäryo dantakästham yathoditam] 

daksinämürtim ä$ritya älabheta vicaksanah|| 18|| 

mantrair älambhanam krtvä vidhivat pürvamürtisu| 
gandhapuspodakaih pascät tato rgham täsu vinyaset|| 19|| 

dhüpam dadyät prayatnena dhyäyita sakalam $ivam] 

tato vijñäpya devesam mantrajñah” prärthayed budhab|| 20|| 
fivadrstinipätena püto ‘yam yadi brähmanah] 

taväjñayà sura$restha samskaromi dvijottamam|| 21|| 


Supasanno ] emend.; upasannor MS 

16barikseta ] emend.; parïksyeta MS 

l’parigrahet ] emend.; parigrahe MS 

18brüyad ] emend.; brüya MS 

Wrju ] emend.; rjum MS 

2ehine ] emend.; °hine MS 

2vasi saroge vyädhitah ] conj.; *väsi ca sarogena vyädhita MS 
Zechindyät tam dantair na ] conj.; chidyät tam na MS 
Beuror ] emend.; guro MS 

24dïksyamäno ] emend.; diksamäno MS 

#%mantrajñah ] emend.; mantrajñam MS 


Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Diwakar Acharya 


anujñätas tu devena äcaryah samsitavratah”"| 

älabhed dantakästham tu vidhinänena mantravit|| 22|| 
pranipatya $ivam mürdhnä manträms cävartayet sakrt| 
vinyased dantakästhe ca manträn pañca vidhänatah”|| 23|| 
sadyojätam nyasen müle vämadevam anantaram) 

aghoram vinyaset pascät tatas tatpurusam nyaset|| 24|| 
pascäd ifänadevesam vinyaseta vicaksanah] 
pañcabrahmajapam kuryät sthäne sthäne sakrt sakrt|| 25|| 
pañcaparväni täny atra vijñeyänihasüribhih| 

dadyät puspäni gandham ca dhüpam caiveha parvasu|| 26|| 
nivedya devadeväya pañcaparvasu samskrtam] 

bhasmanä mantrapütena pascät tam parisodhayet|| 27|| 
tam grhitvà tadäcäryah krtvä caiva pradaksinaml| 
uttaräbhimukhas caiva dadyäc chisyasya hastayoh|| 28|| 


vaktavyam gurunä caiva dattam te dantadhävanam)| 
sampräpyam avikalpena mantrasamnaddhavigraham*|| 29|| 


daksinenaiva hastena grhitvä prägudañmukbhah] 
bhaksayed dantakästham ca $anair näsrk prapätayet|| 30|| 


visriya präñmukhas tena na ca svam cälayec chirah””| 
vastrapülte]na toyena praksälya tam visarjayet|| 31|| 
adhomukham daksinato naïrrtyäm tu samä$ritam] 
aprasastam vijäniyät pra$astam cänyadiñmukham|| 32|| 
patitam laksayet pascäc chubham” và yadi vasubhaml 
sarvasiddhäntatattvajña äcäryah®\ pürvadiñmukhabh|| 33|| 


apramattah®® svaped bhümau gomayenopalipya cal 
svapnam drstvà nivedita äcäryasya tu sädhakah|| 34|| 


26 
2 


samsitavratah | emend.; saméitah vratah MS 

7vinyased dantakästhe ] conj.; vinyase dantakästham MS 
28vigraham ] emend.; *vigrahah MS 

2%svam cälayec chirah ] emend.; $vam cälaye chirah MS 
#0paécäc chubham ] conÿ.; pascä éubham MS 
Slsiddhäntatattvajña äcäryah ] emend.; ‘siddhämtatvajña àcärya MS 


#2apramattah ] emend.; apramatta MS 


31 


32 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


dubsvapnadarsanät tam tu na dikseta kadä cana” | 
mañgalasvapnadarsi tu diksitavyo yathävidhi *|| 35|| 


vapanam kärayet tasya sake$am sanakham tathà| 
upaväsam dine tasmin samyatätmä samäcaret|| 36|| 
snänam krtvä tato viprah®” pitrdevan ksamäpayet| 
ksamantu pitrdeväs te gato ‘ham $aranam $ive|| 37|| 
strifüdram näbhibhäseta na caivädhärmikam janam| 


upaväsaparo vipro na kupyen nänrtam vadet|| 38|| 


sätram candanagandhäms ca dhüpam ca kusumäni ca] 
Sukläny evähared® yatnät saravantiha sarvasah|| 39|| 
mrnmayäny arghapäträni yäjñikatarujäni vä| 

paträny ährtya kurvita nischidranÿ drdhäni cal| 40|| 

da$a dve cärghapäträni kartavyäni prayatnatah] 

bhasma caiva haret tatra udakumbhäms ca samskrtän|| 41|| 
trisültryà] caiva kartavyam $ubham gandhapavitrakaml 
säträbhäve kusaih kuryät puspair väpi Subhägataih|| 42|| 
etat sarvam samährtya punye ‘hani guruh svayaml 
samskrtya pañcabhir mantraih svavidhau tat prayojayet|| 43|| 
prasänto bhasmanä snäto laghvähäro jitendriyah] 
jhänacaksus ca dhïra$ ca tapasä dagdhakilbisah|| 44|| 
apramattah® $ivadhyäyi fästravit karunänvitah]| 
mantradehi sadäcärya älabhec chivam avyayam]| 45|| 


präsädam” codakumbhäms ca vedim yogäsanam tathä| 
paridhäpya brahmasütrena tatah karma samäcaret|| 46|| 


snäpayen mantrapätena devam caiva savedikam)| 
udakena gurub säksäd yogapitham ca fodhayet|| 47|| 


33kadä cana ] emend.; kadä canah MS 
yathävidhi ] emend.; yathävidhih MS 
Sviprah ] emend.; vipra MS 

36hared ] emend.; °hare MS 

37 nischidrani ] emend.; nichidräni MS 
8apramattah ] emend.; apramatta MS 
#prasädam ] emend.; prasidam MS 


Diwakar Acharya 


dadyäc caivärghapäträni sarvamuürtisv anukramät 
D) 8 . : 
päpaghnäsu ca punyäsu® dharmavrddhikaräsu ca|| 48|| 


yämyà aindri tathà saumyà väruni ca tathäparà| 
ägneyi ca tatheäni väyavyà ca tathà smrtä|| 49|| 
nairrti ca dhruvä nägi dasamürtih $ivah smrtah “| 
daksinä procyate yämyä aindrim pürvam pracaksate“?|| 50|| 
saumyä caivottarà mürtih® pascimä väruni smrtä| 
pürvadaksina-m-ägneyi präcyudici tathesäni|| 51|| 
aparottarä tu väyavyà naïrrti daksinäparä| 
dhruvä cordhvä smrtä mürtir näâgim cädhah pracaksate|| 52|| 
sarvayajñavidhänesu punyä hy etäh prakirtitäh] 
sarvamürtisu yatnena arghapäträni vinyaset|| 53|| 
nyaset pañcärthavidyäm ca arghapä j 

yaset pañcärthavidyäm cd” arghapätram ca tatra vai] 
kalpayed arghapätram tu yogapitham ca buddhimän]|| 54|| 
vinyasec cärghapäträni gandhatoyena pürayet| 
dadyäc caiva trisätrim tu äcäryah fivamürdhani|| 55|| 
sarvamürtisu yatnena arghapätresv anukramät| 


tatas tu pär$vatas tam vai mürtisv evälabhec chanaih|| 56|| 


älabheta yathänyäyam arghapäträni mantratah| 
udakumbhäms tatah sarvän yogapitham tathaiva ca|| 57|| 


dhyätvä srilakuliänam mürtau mürtau sa yogavit| 
argham datvä prayatnena pañcabrahmajapänvitam]| 58|| 
puspäni ca yathänyäyam paviträni ca sarvasah] 

datvà tesv arghapätresu tatas täni samälabhet|| 59|| 


älabhya devadevefam mürtimürtisv anukramät]| 


datvä cärgham yathänyäyam täsv eva ivamürtisu|| 60|| 


#0bäpaghnäsu | emend.; päpaghnasu MS 

#mürtih $iväh smrtah ] conj.; mürtti éivah smrtäh MS 

faindrim pürväm ] emend.; aindri pürvä MS e pracaksate ] MSpc; pracacaksate MS 
Smürtih ] emend.; mürti MS 
yatnena ] MSpc; yajetnena MSac 
Svidyäm ca ] emend.; vidyämé ca MS 


46täsv eva ] conÿ.; tas caiva MS 


34 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


snäpayed bhasmanàä pürvam devam pascäc chubhodakaih| 
snäpya punyodakaih kumbhair gandhaïs cälepya-m-ifvaram]| 61 || 


päjäm krivä ubhaih puspair*? dadyäd gandhapavitrakam| 
anena vidhinà yas tu älabhet paramesvaram|| 62|| 


tasyäsu sädhakendrasya Sivayogah"® pravartate| 
evam älabhanam krtvà fivasya paramätmanah|| 63|| 


Sisyasamskärayoge tu° yatnam krtvä prayatnatah)| 
sitäny ädäya puspäni äcäryas tu vicaksanah|| 64|| 


pranipatya $ivam mürdhnà fanaih Sisyäntikam vrajet| 
datvà täni tu puspäni viprasya karasampute|| 65|| 


añgusthäbhyäm tato grhya änayec chivasamnidhau| 
datvà puspäñjalim rudre sädhakam ca nivedayet|| 66|| 


pañcamanträn\ sakrj japtvä tato vijñäpayec chivaml 
vijñäpya devam sarvajñam upavesya varäsane|| 67|| 


añgapratyañgasandhims ca”? tasya-m-àjivabhasmanäl 
tesv evärñgapradesesu gandhän datvà subhän gurub|| 68|| 


puspäni ca yathänyäyam trisätrim câpi sarvatah)] 
Dan sa ones se GO || 


… Skhäsv adho mürdhni lalätäd ürdhva märjayet|| 72|| 


karnau gandau tathäà netrau näsike cibu[kam] tathàl 


#puspair ] MSpc; puspaur MSac 

#8-ogah ] emend.; °yogam MS 

#%yoge tu ] MSpc; yogesya tu MSac 
SVangusthäbhyäm ] emend.; añgustabhyam MS 
Slpañcamanträn | emend.; pamcamamtra MS 
%%%sandhimé ca ] emend.; *sandhié ca MS 

53ikhäsv adho mürdhni ] conÿ.; ikhästadhä mürti MS 


Diwakar Acharya 


Trädyakartari Ÿ grivä ca hrdayam stanasandhayah|| 73|| ** 


amsau kaksau vikaksau ca prstham näbhyudaram katih| 
kuksau ca pär$vasandhis ca sphikkorü jañghajänuni|| 74|| 


pärsvato granthayah sarvah pädau pädägram eva cal 
majjäsukrädi yac cänyat tan mantrair api fodhayet|| 75|| 


tato vijñäpya devesam dadyän mantrodakam tatah) 
pascät pradaksinam kuryäd upalvesya varäjsanel| 76|| 


pürvavac chodhaye”” so ‘pi dravyais caiva vicaksanah] 
älambhanam punah samyak uddhir yena prajäyate|| 77|| 


suddho bhavati pänena bähyadosair upärjitaih] 
suddhäni täni sarväni bhavanti fivabhasmanä|| 78|| 


evam älabhanam krtvà daksinäm mürtim ä$ritah] 
bhasmanä mantrapütena mantrais caiva vidhänavit|| 79|| 


evam älabhya tam vipram dadyäd bhasmodakam punabh| 
antargatänäm dosänäm Suddhyartham bijayonijam|| 80|| 


punar etad vidhänam tu pascäd ärabhy anukramät | 
vidhisamskärayoge smin kartavyam® devasisyayoh|| 81|| 


snätasya bhasmanä samyaksamskrtasya ca $ästratah] 
samnyäsakäle $isyasya Sivahasto vidhiyate|| 82|| 


dhyätvä mürtau fivam bhaktya srilakuladhärinam”” gurum| 
tasya hastam punar dhyäyed dattam sädhakamiürdhani|| 83|| 


dravyabhävägnisamnyäsam krtvä samyag vicaksanah| 
fikhäcchedam tatah kuryäc chivahastena mantratah|| 84|| 


fivamürdhnä trisätrim tu sädhakasya fikhäm nayet| 
pañcabrahmamayo hy esa fivahasto hy udährtah|| 85|| 


dravyabhävägnikarmäni triny etäni cchiyät tribhih] 


Sstanasandhayah ] comÿ.; stanasamdhisu MS 


Sprstham ] conÿ.; prsti MS e katih ] emend.; katih MS 
56sarväh ] emend.; sarve MS 

5”%vac chodhayet ] emend.; °vat sodhayet MS 
‘8kartavyam | emend.; karttavyo MS 

Ylakuladhärinam ] emend.; érilakuladhärinam MS 


35 


36 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


väñmanahkarmabhir nityam bhävayeta fivam padam|| 86|| 


tenaiva cchedayed yatnäc chikhäm®\ sädhakamürdhajäm| 
na lohair na nakhaïr väpi cchindyän notpätayet tathä|| 87|| 


nämadheyam ca kartavyam mañgalam sivacoditam] 
Sisyam puspadvayam dadyän nämatah sivacoditam®? || 88|| 
manträn adhyäpayec® cainam nityam copadised vidhim| 
vidyayà vidhiyogyatvam tasya $aucam vinirdiset|| 89|| 
sädhakasyäbhiseke pi esa eva vidhih smrtah| 

pädanyäso visesah syäd antestyäm cävirodhatah|| 90|| 
codanä caiva jijñnäsà guros cätmanivedanam| 

parigrhya pariksetah samskäro vidhiyogyatä|| 91|| 
vaidusyam saptamam by esäm gurupüjà rahah* padaml 
sädhakasyäbhiseke ‘pi jñeyo yamS vidhivistarah|| 92|| 
saptapadäni evam tu saptalokajayoparil| 93|| 


iti samskäravidhih|| o|| 


TRANSLATION 


[Unvocation:}) Homage to Lakulin, who transcends all knowledge, [and] has cut 
down wrong views with the sword of the pañcärtha knowledge.f7(1) 

[Question:] What is the [appropriate] time for consecration in this [sys- 
tem], and which place is proclaimed [for this rite]? What is declared [in the 
Sästras] as additional materials [needed for this rite], and which mantras are 
commended? (2) 


Sbhävayeta $ivam ] conÿj.; tato bhävayec chivam MS 

6lcchedayed yatnäc chikhäm ] emend.; cchedaye yatnä ikhäm MS 

GZéisyam ] conj.; $isye MS e dadyän nämatah ] conj.; ku dadyä nämatah MSpc; kuryä 
dadyä nämatah MSac e éivacoditam ] conÿ.; $ivacoditah MS 

Gmanträn adhyà° ] emend.; manträn dhyä° MS 
Gérahah ] conÿ.; raham MSac; riham MSpc 
Sjñeyo ’yam ] emend.; jñeyayam MS 
66evam tu ] conj.; evatastu MS 

S Pañcärtha is the technical term for five categories taught in the Lakuliéa Päupata system: 
kärya, kärana, yoga, vidhi and duhkhänta, and thus also for the Päupata doctrine. See also 


below fn. 95. 


Diwakar Acharya 97 


[And what is] the cause of the transformatory rite; and [who] is the agent 
[of it}; with which substances is it performed? What is the result of the trans- 
formatory rite, and, o great ascetic, what has to be purified [at the time of the 
transformatory rite]? (3) 

[Answer:] The [appropriate] time [of the transformatory rite] is the morn- 
ing, and the [appropriate] place is [a place] where the southern face [of the im- 
age (i.e. Éirñga) located].% Materials required are the kuÿa-grass and so on, and 
the mantras [commended for the rite] are Sadyoljäta] and the other brzhma- 
mantras.®(4) 

The teacher is the agent of the transformatory rite; the cause is God. And 
again, the instrument used in this rite is a tooth-cleaning twig./°(5) 

The fruit of the rite is stated/! to be eligibility for the prescribed way [of 
approaching Siva] (vidhi).72(6) 


S8Here the idea is clear: it is a place in the proximity of the /iga. When a devotee or disciple 
approaches a fvalinga facing North while standing at Gods right side, he sees the southern face 
of the friga (For the interpretation of the term dasinämuürti in this sense, see BAkkER 2004). 
Wherever in the text dksinämuürti is used or intended, I have rendered it with ‘the southern 
face’, but I have rendered m#rti in the context of Sivas forms in ten directions with ‘body’ 
keeping the abstract idea intact, even though I am sure that our text is referring to a Érga or 
some similar physical object. See also below fn. 92. 

SVerse 4ab is an answer to the questions concerning the time and place of consecration asked 
in verse 2ab. Kälah is partially visible at the damaged edge, and what followed after the lacuna 
in the next line is mürtis tu daksinäm(!). So, the restored text of eight aksaras in lacuna needs to 
cover a word indicating the appropriate time, another word meaning ‘place’, most likely desa, 
and something to relate the place to ‘the image at the right side. My reconstruction, prätas 
tathà deso yatra, keeps these points in view. As for the morning as the appropriate time, I rely 
on the Ratnatikä (on Ganakärikä Scd) where the forenoon (pärvähna) is accepted as the right 
time for the rite. However, the same term p#rvähna does not fit the metre and I have adopted 
prätas. Likewise, verse 4c is an answer to the question asked in verse 2c, and the restored word 
there, spakaranam, is taken from the question. 

70A tooth-cleaning twig (dantadhävana) plays a very important role in the ritual as an essen- 
tial tool, so the restored text is almost certain. This term, dantadhävana, appears again in verse 
29. 

This half verse, originally a short unmetrical line, is counted as an independent unit. I 
supply praktrtitah to make it a half verse. A section marker (|| o ||) is supplied in the manuscript 
after this line, which is irrelevant here but would be relevant if supplied after verse 7. 

7?T take vidhi here and in verses 81, 89 and 91 as a technical Pä$upata term for the prescribed 
way [of approaching $iva] (cf. Päfupatasñtras 1.1: athäto pasupateh päsupatam yogavidhim vyä- 
khyäsyämah and IV.19: anena vidhinä rudrasamipam gatvä). It is the fourth category of the 
five categories taught in the Lakulisa-Pä$upata system, and, at least according to Kaundinya, a 
large portion of the Päfupatasütras, from the 12th sütra of the second chapter to the end of the 


38 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Hands, head, forehead, eyes, nostrils, ears, mouth, neck and chest are pu- 
rified [during the rite]. (7) 

Now I shall teach the Superlative method of performing the transformatory 
rite, by means of which sädhakas indeed become qualified for the cutting off 
[of bonds]./{(8) 

Only the initiated are eligible to enter this [system], nobody else, which has 
been revealed before only to brahmins by Siva and the other teachers./°(9) 

He who wishes to know no other matter [and] who is impelled by Siva 
himself”f approaches the guru. [The guru] should properly examine that brah- 
min. (10) 

The [birth-]place, caste, clan, behaviour, knowledge, quest, efficiency of 
the senses,/” the physical health, faith, belief, devotion to Siva, patience, perse- 
verance, straightforwardness, and endeavour as well as ability to acquire knowl- 
edge: these are the qualities of a disciple. (11-—2) 

The teacher should then accept the brahmin thus examined with his inner 
eye of knowledge in a proper way following the prescription. (13) 

The teacher should ask him to relinquish gold, clothing, wife and so on 
voluntarily if he would like to attain the ultimate goal. (14) 

[The disciple] should bring a twelve arigulas long smooth tooth-cleaning 
twig from an Udumbara tree, one with sap and bark, not perforated and 


straight. (15) 


fourth chapter, is devoted to this topic. 

The tranformatory rite in the Päsupata system is briefly described by Kaundinya in his 
Bhäsya on the first sätra (for the relevant passage and translation, see Bakker 2004:124 and 
fn. 28 on p.139). The Ganakärikä (5cd) enumerates the elements of the initiation — the ma- 
terials, time, rite, the image and the teacher. Commenting on that passage, Bhäsarvajña shows 
how the additional materials such as £a grass and so on can be covered by the term dravya in 
the Ganakärikä, and à conflict with the Samskärakärikä is avoided. He does not give details of 
the rite but recommends to consult the latter for that purpose. For à possible identity of our 
text as the Samskärakärikä, see above fn. 2. 

74Tc is quite likely that ‘the cutting off in this verse is refers to the ritual of cutting the 
topknot (Skhäccheda) which ultimately stands for the cutting of bonds. See also below verse 
87 and fn. 107. Verse 8c is a striking Mavipula. 

75The manuscript reading pärvam could be emended to pärvaih and related to gurubhib, 
meaning ‘by earlier teachers’. 

76An expression very similar to ‘impelled by Siva himself (svenaiva pracoditah) is found in 
the beginning of Kaundinyas Pañcärthabhasya (1 = p. 4, 11. 5-6): ato rudrapracoditah kusik- 
abhagavän abhyaagatya …. 

77This quality of a pupil is mentioned in the Pañcarthabhasya (1 = p.3, 1.18): 
patvindriyo brähmanah $isyab. 


Diwakar Acharya 39 


I it is lacking in sap he will be dispirited, if curved he will be deceitful. If 
with worms, he will have to live in the frontier [as an outcast], and if affected 
with some disease, he will be diseased. (16) 

He should not slit it with nails or teeth;/ and the wise man should not 
touch it with his legs. The brahmin who is going to have initiation should 
fetch and present it to the teacher. (17) 

Then the learned teacher should take the tooth-cleaning twig described be- 
fore, and, approaching the southern face of the image, he should touch it [to 
the image]. (18) 

He should touch it also to the [other] faces [starting from] the East, reciting 
mantras and following the prescription, and after that he should offer argha 
with sandal paste, flower and water to the faces [of Siva]. (19) 

The learned [teacher], the knower of mantras, should further offer incense 
and diligently meditate on ‘Siva with form’ (Sakala), and beg the supreme 
among the gods, [for permission] and pray [the following way]: (20) 

“Tf this brahmin has been purified by a glance of Siva, o supreme among the 
gods, I will initiate [him], one of the best brahmins, by your permission.” (21) 

When permitted by the God, the teacher, who is strictly keeping the [Pasu- 
pata] vow and knows the mantras, should handle the tooth-cleaning twig the 
[following] way. (22) 

Bowing his head down to Siva he should once recite the mantras, and then 
place the five mantras on the tooth-cleaning twig according to the [following] 
prescription. (23) 

The skilled [teacher] should place Sadyojäta on the bottom, then Vämadeva, 
Aghora, and then Tatpurusa, and finally I$äna. He should recite each of the five 
brahmamantras once at the respective places. (24-5) 

People learned in this tradition’? have to regard those [five mantras as 
forming] five sections of the twig. The teacher should offer flowers, sandal 
paste and incense to [each of] these sections. (26) 

He should offer to the supreme among the gods the [twig] sanctified in five 
sections, and later clean it with ashes purified with mantras. (27) 

Then the teacher should circumambulate [the God] holding that [twig], 
and facing North should give it into the hands of the disciple. (28) 


78 supply dantair, as two aksaras are missing in this pda and logically ‘with teeth” is the 
most fitting thing here. 
TT take ihasüribhih to mean people learned in this tradition; otherwise there would be two 


local adverbs. 


40 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The teacher should also say, “this tooth-cleaning twig has been given to you, 
the body of which has been armed with [brzhma-]mantras should be accepted 
without hesitation.” (29) 

Taking the tooth-cleaning twig with his right hand, the disciple, facing Fast 
or North, should chew it slowly; he should not let blood flow.#°(30) 

Stopping with that, he should face East, yet he should not move [viz. turn] 
his head. He should rinse it with water that has been strained through a cloth 
and throw it. (31) 

If [the twig falls] upside down, [or with the head pointing to the] South or 
Southwest, one should know it to be an inauspicious omen, and if to the other 
directions or corners an auspicious omen. (32) 

Afterwards, facing East, the teacher, who is aware of the essence of all Sid- 
dhäntas, should check the fallen twig [to see] whether [the omen] is good or 
not good. (33) 

Paying attention [lest he should make some slip] he should go to sleep on 
the ground, which is smeared with cow-dung, and tell the teacher what he 
dreamt.$! (34) 

The teacher should never initiate the one who has seen bad dreams,*? but 
the one who has seen auspicious dreams has to be initiated according to the 
prescription. (35) 

He should ask him to shave his hair and cut his nails. (36ab) 

That day the self-controlled disciple should fast. Then the brahmin should 
bathe and beseech the ancestors and gods to pardon him saying, “The ancestors 
and gods, may they pardon me, I have taken refuge in Siva.”# (36cd-37) 

He should not speak with women and Südras,%* and also not to irreligious 


80He should not let blood flow’, with a causative tone, is a smooth expression in Sanskrit and 
other Indian languages. Another way, however, is to take prapätayet as causative for simplex, 
and translate: ‘blood should not flow’, which sounds better in English. 

8INote that rivedita in päda c is an aisa form for nivedayeta. 

82Contrary to this, the canonical versions in the Siddhänta do not deny even those who have 
seen bad dreams. They prescribe some remedy against bad dreams or omens. 

83This verse reminds me of the Päsupatasätras 1.911: tasmäd ubhayathä yastavyah, devavat 
pitrvac ca, ubhayam tu rudre deväh pitaras ca. (Therefore, [Rudra] has to be worshipped in 
both ways, as god and as ancestor. Both the gods and ancestors are united in Rudra.’) 

This is almost a quotation from the Päsupatasütra 1.13: strisädram näbhibhäser, which in 
turn is closely echoing brahminical prescriptions. However, the s#tra has the verb in the active 
voice, while our text has it in the middle, as found in many other places. Cf, e.g., Baudha- 
yanadharmasütra I.8.17 and 4.5.4; Manusmrti X1.223cd. See also BisscHop and GRIFFITHS 
2003:338, fn. 121. 


Diwakar Acharya 41 


people. The fasting brahmin should not be angry or speak untruth.#° (38) 

He should carefully offer thread, sandal paste and incense [sticks] only of 
white colour and always precious ones. (39) 

He should get twelve earthen argha vessels, or should find strong leaves 
with no holes of à tree suitable for use in sacrifices, and prepare them. He 
should also bring there sacred ashes and sanctified water-jars. (4041) 

The auspicious gandhapavitrakaŸ" has to be made from a three-string cord. 
If such cord is not available, one should make it of ku$a grass or flowers acquired 
by auspicious means. (42) 

Having collected all these [materials], the teacher should himself sanctify 
them with the five mantras on an auspicious day and use them in the rite he is 
going to perform (svavidhau). (43) 

A teacher who is calm, bathed in ashes, eating little, with his senses con- 
trolled and an eye of knowledge, patient, having vices burnt with austerity, at- 
tentive, meditating on Siva,®” knowing the scripture, compassionate and having 
mantras placed all over the body may touch the eternal Siva. (44-5) 

He should begin the rite after enclosing the shrine, water-jars, altar and the 


5 Pada d of this verse, na kupyen nänrtam vader, can be found in the Manusmrti as 11.229b. 
S6T interpret daÿa dve as twelve: ten for the ten märtis of $iva, one for the pañcärthavidyà, 
and one for the yogapitha. 
8 Here is a description of the gandhapavitraka from the Siddhäntasekhara (T. 57, p.199- 
200) as quoted in BRUNNER (1968:112-113) with her French translation: 
kastürikäcandanameghajätikarpüratakkolalavañgakostham| 
usram elänavanitaloham phalatrayam kesarakam sanägam|| 
etaih sacürnair vidadhita gandhair liñgam viliptam ivasambarena| 
tenaiva gandhena viliptasätram tad ucyate gandhapavitrakäkhyam|| 


“On oint d’abord le /ñga, tout en récitant le Svamantra, d'un mélange composé de substances 
parfumées réduites en poudre: musc, santal, etc.; et on oint ensuite les pavitra, qui sont dès 
lors appelés gandhapavitra, avec cette pâte reprise au lriga” 

88 For such options for the material of pavirraka, see Somasambhupaddhati, Paviträrohanavi- 
dhi 11-13 (BRUNNER 1968:21). 

® Apramattah $ivadhyäyin could be an allusion to Päfupatasütras V.39-40: ekah ksemï san 
vitasoko pramädi (Alone, being in a condition of fixing his mind in Rudra (semi san), free 
from sorrow, and attentive, ...”). 


42 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


yogäsana (i.e. yogapitha)”® with the brahmasñtra.” (46) 

The teacher should bathe the God together with the altar in water purified 
with #antras and clean the yogapitha. (47) 

He should offer the #rgha vessels in due order to all bodies”? [of Siva men- 
tioned below], which are auspicious, destroy sins and augment virtues. (48) 

Siva is taught to be one who has the ten bodies: Yäamyä, Aindri, Saumyaä, 
Väruni, Âgneyi, Iänt, Väyavyä, Nairrti, Dhruvä and Nägj. (49-50ab) 

The body in the South is called Yämyä, [and] that in the East is called 
Aindri. Saumyà [is] the body in the North, and the body in the West is named 
Väruni. The body in the Southeast [is] Âgneyt and that in the Northeast [is] 
ani.” (50cd-51) 

Väyavya [is] the body in the Northwest and Nairrti is that in the Southwest. 
The body above is named Dhruvä and that below is called Nägr.°*(52) 

These [bodies] of Siva are regarded as auspicious in all rites. [So, the teacher] 
should carefully place argha vessels near all these bodies [of Siva]. (53) 

He should also place the pañcarthavidya,” and [place] an #rgha vessel there. 


For metrical reasons, yogäsana, rather an ambiguous term, is used in this verse. It is, 
however, clear from the following verse that yogäsana here refers to the yogapitha, the throne 
on which a deity is visualised or worshipped. I assume that yogapitha or its substitute in this 
text refers generically to the whole structure of the throne, but not only to a level inside it as 
found in many Siddhänta works. For such a possibility and the difficulty of determining the 
intended meaning of the term in different texts, see GooDaLL et al. 2005:23. 

91] assume the brahmasütra, a cord charged with the brzhmamantras, is the same as pavi- 
tralka], otherwise known as #risütri, but it puzzles me that the author should have chosen this 
term, making the päda hypermetrical, instead of taking other synonyms fitting in metre. 

921 have not yet found these ten bodies or forms of $iva mentioned in any other source. 
However, Kaundinyas statement, ‘the sun divides the directions and the directions differentiate 
the bodies of Siva’ (ädityo difo vibhajati, disasf ca mürtim vibhajanti), could be taken as an 
indication for a possibility of ten bodies of $iva in ten directions. Clearly associated with the 
directions, one might expect these bodies rather to be abstract ones. However, in our text, they 
are touched and offered #rgha, and there is no doubt that they are physical objects. So, it appears 
that in the scheme of this text the main /rga is surrounded by ten other /igas or images, be 
they temporary or permanent, representing the ten bodies of the God in ten directions. 

%Verses 51c, 61d and 68b have a hiatus breaker #1. Verse 51d is unmetrical. 

4Verse 52 is hypermetrical. 

Note that the pañcärthavidya is praised as a personified goddess in the last verse of the so- 
called Rudranämäni attributed to Visuddhamuni: pañcärthavidye nih$ese niravadye fivapriye| 
bhaktänugrähikä(sic) devi mätas tubhyam sadä namah|| 

It is quite probable that the Pañcärthavidyà or Pañcärthajñäna in our text and elsewhere 
in Päéupata and $aiva texts occasionally refers to the text known to us as the Päfupatasütra. 


Diwakar Acharya 43 


The wise one should arrange then [another] argha vessel and the yogapitha. (54) 

The teacher should place the argha vessels and fill them with scented water, 
and offer a three-string cord (srisätri) on Sivas head, on all [ten] bodies [of Siva] 
carefully, and on the #rgha vessels in a successive order. Then he should touch 
that [twig] on these [ten] bodies on their sides without any haste (fanaih). (55— 
56) 

He should touch it in a proper way using mantras to the argha vessels, all 
water-jars, and also the yogapitha. (57) 

Meditating on Srilakuliéa, he, the one cognisant of [the way of] union [with 
Siva], should attentively offer argha to each body of the God muttering the five 
brahmamantras. (58) 

He should put flowers as well as pavitras in all (sarvasah) of these argha 
vessels in a proper way, and then touch those [bodies of Siva]. (59) 

Having touched the supreme among the gods on each body in a proper 
order and having offered argha in a proper way to those bodies of $iva, he 
should bathe the God first in ashes and then in pure water. (60-61ab) 

After bathing the God in jarfuls of sanctified water and besmearing him 
with sandal paste, he should worship the God with auspicious flowers and offer 
the gandhapavitraka. (61cd-62ab) 

Whoever attaches himself to the supreme among the gods following this 


96 


prescription, union with Siva commences for him,”° the best among säd- 


bakas. (62cd-63ab) 

Having attached himself to Siva, the supreme among the gods, this way, 
the learned teacher should put his efforts on the discipless consecration and 
bring white flowers. First he should reverence Siva bowing his head down, and 
slowly go near the disciple. (63cd-65ab) 

He should place those white flowers in the brahmin's hands, and lead him 
near to Siva, holding him in his thumbs. (65cd-66ab) 

Having offered a handful of flowers to Rudra, the teacher should present 
the sädhaka in front of the God. And, after reciting the five mantras, he should 


Kaundinya, the commentator, himself appears to regard the text as Pañcärthalsütral -Sästra] 
when he opens his text with the following expression: 4ha — vaksyati bhagavän pañcärtham| 
athäsyädisätram kim iti. Dr. Peter BisscHor has told me in a personal communication that 
he is also inclined to regard Pañcärtha as another name of the Päsupatasütra, and has made 
some remark to this effect, based on the same opening remark of Kaundinya in his recent book 
(BrsscHor 2006:212). 

%6This appears to be an allusion to the Päsupatasñtra V.23: ato yogah pravartate (‘From here 
the yoga commences.”). 


44 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


request Siva [for his permission]. (66cd-67ab) 

Having requested [permission from] the omniscent God, he should seat 
[the disciple] on a nice seat, and besmear all the major and minor members and 
joints of his body with ashes from a cremation ground (lit. of all creatures?)””, 
and then apply good sandal paste on those body parts. (67cd-68) 

He should take [in his] hand flowers according to the rule, and entirely the 
three string cord, (i.e. pavitraka), and . ... ... ......... ...°8 (69-72ab) 


TI guess djivabhasman to be ashes from the cremation ground. 

*8Not all the verses but a few, verses 53, 74, 75, 80, 90 and 92, are numbered in the 
manuscript itself. Until 53 the numbering is perfect, but the next number 74 is incorrect 
if counted continuously. This means either his numbering is wrong around here or the scribe 
copies the verse numbers faithfully from the exemplar but skips a line or two covering three 
verses. Î am convinced of the second possibility. It appears to me that text is missing after päni 
in päda c of verse 69, and so I have decided to show a lacuna here. 

Concerning the same »ydsa, the Antestividhi, the last of the four vidhis in the manuscript, 
states the following: 


Sivasädhakayoh karma diksäkäle tu niscitam| 

tathà rudre punah kuryät sädhake tu viparyayam|| (verse 22) 

At the time of initiation the [same] rite for Siva and the Sädhaka ([for the sake 
of symbolic union?]) has been determined. Now [the priest] should perform 
that rite in that manner in Rudra [viz. in the /riga], but in case of the [deceased] 


Sädhaka, [he] should do it reversed. 


It is clear that this verse presents an exception to the general prescription made at the time of 
initiation, and such a general prescription is missing in our text. In the light of the information 
obtained from this verse and verse 81 below in the text, we can imagine that some text covering 
a prescription to perform the action on $iva should be there in the proposed lacuna before 
enumeration of body parts begins. Moreover, the Antestividhi, in verse 30 cited below, suggests 
that dhüpa and mantra, too, have to figure there. 

After three more verses, the Antestividhi (verses 26-30) gives a list of the body parts to be 
touched. It is a list of almost the same body parts found in our text but prepared in a reversed 
order to result in an upward movement: 


lakuli$am punar dhyätvà pascät karma samäcaret| 

dravyäny ädäya sarväni haste krtvä pavitrakam|| 

pädägräni tathà pädau tayos corddhvam ca jänuni| 

ârum Sifnam katim caiva gudam näbhyudaram tathä|| 
kuksim kaksau stanau vidyäd dhrdayam prstim eva ca| 

amsau griväm mukham ghränam gandau karnau tathaiva ca|| 
netre lalätam mürdhni tu bähubhyäm sandhayas tathà] 
bastau hastägram evam ca tvak sarvatra niyojayet|| 

pürvam darbhäh punar bhasma candanam sûütram eva ca] 
puspäni ca punar dhüpam manträ esah kramah smrtab|| 


Diwakar Acharya 45 


… He should purify [the places] in the head, below the topknot and above” 
the forehead. (72cd) 

He should further purify with mantras his ears, cheeks, eyes, nostrils, and 
chin; frädyakarttarit,"% neck, chest, breast and joints!°!; shoulders, armpits, 
and near the armpit, the back, navel, belly and waist; cavity of the abdomen, 
hip-joints, buttocks, thighs, shanks and knees; all joints on the back side, feet 
and the toes, and whatever substances in the body, the marrow and semen, and 
the like. (73-75) 

Then he should request [permission from] the supreme among the Gods 
and give the disciple water sanctified with mantras, and after that, he should 
circumambulate [the God]. (76abc) 

Having [the disciple] seated on a nice seat, the learned teacher should purify 
him with objects as before, and [carry out] the touching through which purity 
is generated thoroughly. (76d-77) 

[The disciple] becomes free, by drinking the water, from the external evils 
he has accumulated: all these are purified with the Siva-ashes. (78) 

Having attached himself to the supreme among the gods this way, the 


There can be little doubt that the passage in the Sumskäravidhi and this one are related. 
However, if one compares these two passages, one can detect that there is nothing in the 
Samskäravidhi corresponding to ‘b&hubhyäm sandhayas tathä| hastau hastägram evam ca tvak 
sarve ca niyojayet|| of the Antestividhi. 

So, a very tentative reconstruction of the missing text could be as follows: 


päninà grhya dhüpam tu manträn vai cintayan punah|* 
nyasen mürtau yathänyäyam äcäryas tu vicaksanah| 
anenaiva vidhänena $isyadehe samäcaret| 

yathà deve tathä Sisye kuryäc caiva gurub svayam|** 

tvak sarvatra tatah pascäd hastägräni tathaiva ca| 

bastau caiva yathänyäyam bähubhyäm sandhayas tathä| 
tatah>> $ikhäsv adho mürdhni lalätäd àrdhva’ märjayet| 


*A similar expression is present in the Anéestividhi: sädhakakarmakartä ca manträn vai cin- 
tayet kila| (verse 31ab) 

**T think that the prescription for the sädhaka in the (above-quoted) 22nd verse of the 
Antestividhi is intended as a reversal of this prescription. 

VI regard the reading #rdhva märjayet as a case of metrically required oddity. 

100The transmitted text cannot be interpreted. One could asume that one or two body parts 
between the chin and neck are required. So it could be emended to something like 4syam 
kantham ca. \have noted that muwkha appears in the parallel list of body parts in the Anéestividhi. 

101As all other words are in the nominative, I correct the exceptional case of stanasamdhisu 
in the manuscript. 


46 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


[teacher], conversant with the ritual, should approach the southern face [of 
the linga]. Then, reciting the mantras, he should besmear the brahmin with 
ashes sanctified with mantras, and give again water mixed with ashes, for the 
sake of cleaning the interior evils inherited from the [male and female] seed and 
womb. (79-80) 

Now this rite [should be performed] in due order, starting again after- 
wards!®: in the context of an initiation into the prescribed way [of approaching 
Siva] it should be performed [both] for the God and for the disciple."#(81) 

For the disciple who has bathed properly in ashes and is purified according 
to scriptural [prescription], the rite of fivahasta is performed at the time of 
renunciation. (82) 

Having meditated on Siva in the [southern] face with devotion, he should 
meditate on the teacher who holds à staff, and think that his hand is placed on 
the head of the s4dhaka. (83) 

The experienced teacher should perform the rite of renunciation with re- 
gard to material [possessions] (dravya), mental states (bhäva) and the [sacred] 
fire, and then cut off the topknot by the fwzhasta reciting the mantras lin the 
following way]. (84) 

[The teacher] has to draw a three string cord (srisütri, i.e. pavitraka) from 
Siva's head to the topknot of the disciple. This [above-described rite] is called 
‘the hand of Siva’ (Svahasta) % containing the five brahmamantras.'5(85) 


10The reading 4r4bhy anukramät is obviously yet another example of metrically required 
irregularity. 

Note Ratnatikä on Ganakärikä Scd: käranamürtisisyayoh samskärakarma kriyety ucyate. 
tatkramas ca samskärakärikäyäm drastavyah. 

104 This text identifies a sequence of actions as being part of the rite called $vahasta. It appears 
that this rite covers three major actions: the placing of the teachers hand, empowered with the 
five brahmamantras, on the disciples head, the cutting of the #khä with the mantra power 
following the triple vow of renunciation, and the drawing of a trisätri from the main image or 
liñga to the disciples head. Also the early Siddhänta texts include the rite of fvahasta among 
others to be performed during the initiatory rite. However, they do not mention the last, the 
drawing of a #risätri to the disciples head. This fact is remarkable, particularly because our 
version of the whole transformatory rite is simple compared to the canonical versions in the 
Siddhänta. The cutting of the #khä, though not clearly stated in some of the canonical versions 
of this rite in the Siddhänta, is found in a couple of older ones (e.g. Misväsamüla IV.14-15, 
Nisväsottarasütra W1.21-22; Sväyambhuvasütrasañgraha XUI.10-11). I am very much grateful 
to Dr. Dominic GoopaLL for drawing my attention to these passages. 

105This statement alludes to the fact that the five brzhmamantras are ritually placed on the 
hand of the äcärya at the outset of the Swzhasta rite, which is clearly stated in the Siddhänta 


Diwakar Acharya 47 


He should cut off" the three, material [possessions], mental states and 
[the ritualistic obligation to] the [sacred] fire, with the three: speech, mind and 
action. !°7 He should always meditate on the $iva state. (86) 

He should cut off the topknot on the disciples head with the same [hand]. 
He should not cut it off with iron tools or nails, or pluck it off. (87) 

An auspicious name ordained by $iva has to be coined, and the teacher 
should give two flowers to the disciple who is [now] ordained by $iva, by name 
[itself]. (88) 

He should teach him the mantras and instruct him in the obligatory rules 
(nityam.….vidhim). Through vidyä'® one [acquires] eligibility for the pre- 
scribed way [of approaching Siva]. [Then] he should assign him the [rules of] 
purity. (89) 

The same procedure is prescribed for consecration of a sädhaka also. And, 
[this is true] in the case of the funeral rite as long as no contradiction occurs, 
[however,] the pädanyäsa would be additional [in that case].1°?(90) 

The instigation, desire for knowledge, self-submission to the teacher, ex- 
amination following acceptance, and thence, initiation — eligibility for the pre- 
scribed way [of approaching Siva], learning; and veneration of the teacher, the 
seventh of these, is the secret stage."!° This very detail of the prescription is 


versions of the rite but not in our text. 

1067 take the reading cchiyät as a metrically required oddity chosen by the author in place of 
a regular chindyät. An alternative would be to emend it to grammatically correct ksiyät. 

107The cutting of these three is equivalent to the cutting of the päas (päsakrntana) in the 
Siddhänta versions of the rite. It seems that the cutting of the päas and that of the $khä are 
paired in our text as well as in the Siddhänta versions. Note that in the context of fvahasta the 
Sväyambhuvasütrasañgraha (RUL.11ab: homänte tu Sikhäm chittvà dadyät pürnähutim kramät) 
takes $khä when the Mfväsamuüla (AV.15ab: fvena chindayet päsam hutvä pürnähutim dadet) 
has päfa in the same context. See also above fn. 74. 

1081 might at first sight appear that vidya here refers mainly, but not only, to the knowledge 
of the post-initiatory rules (for the samayas would normally be taught after a tantric initiation). 
I note that a statement to the effect that the section on vidyäjñäna (acquistion of knowledge?) 
has been completed is found after the fifth särra of the fourth chapter in the Kaundinyabhäsya. 
But there is another possibility suggested by the texts of the Miväsatattvasamhitä: these teach a 
muktidiksä, which consists in purifying the levels of the cosmos, but before teaching that they 
also teach what they term a vidyädiksä (Mülasütra 4.16, Uttarasütra 3.22), which is evidently 
intended as a preparation for embarking on sädhana. It is possible, therefore, that the Mifväsa's 
vidyädiksä, or at least its name, is inherited from the samskära of the Pañcärthikas. 

1097 associate pédanyaso visesah syat with the folllowing not with the preceding, in the light 
of the Antestividhi. 

M0This much is clear: that these are the stages in the transformatory rite; but the passage is 


48 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


followed in the rite of a sädhaka’s consecration also. (91-92) 
These seven steps in the rite thus refer to [one*] conquest of the seven 


worlds. (93) 


Thus the manual on consecration of a disciple. 


OTHER MANUSCRIPTS CONSULTED 


NISVASATATTVASAMHITA 
Transcription of the Nifväsatattvasamhitä, from the palm-leaf Nepalese MS No. 
1-227, NGMPP A 41/14 supplemented with readings from its Kathmandu 
apograph MS No. 5-2406, NGMPP A 159/18, by Dominic GoopaLL. [In- 
cludes the Msväsamukha, Nisväsamüla, Nisväsottara, Nisväsanaya and N'isväsa- 
guhyal. The verse and chapter numeration used in footnotes is that of 
GooDaALL's edition in progress. 


rather tricky. I assume that the /yap suffix in parigrhya suggests examination and acceptance 
to be combined as one single stage. Furthermore, I take eligibility for the prescribed way [of 
approaching $iva], which is the result of initiation, as an explanatory remark on intiation but 
not as a separate stage. It is noteworthy that the concluding half-verse speaks of the seven 
stages, and also that the Anéestividhi prescribes to walk seven steps (referred to as pädanyäsa in 
verse 90 above), alluding to these seven stages, around the end of the funeral rite. 

However, one could think of relating saptamam hy esäm to the preceding and translating the 
line with ‘learning is the seventh of these, [and] veneration of the teacher is the secret stage 
[beyond these seven”. In that case, it is necessary to count either examination following accep- 
tance as a combined stage but initiation and eligibility for the prescribed way [of approaching 
Siva] as two different stages, or the opposite. I give this alternative a second priority. 


The description of Sivapura in the early Väyw- and 
Skandapurana” 


PETER BisscHop 


INTRODUCTION 


The closing chapter of the original Skandapuräna (SP;, 183) contains, as I have 
noted elsewhere (BisscHoP 2004:75-76), à major parallel with Väywpuräna 
2.39 (& Brahmändapuräna 3.4.2). Another more extensive parallel exists be- 
tween the Nilakantha myth told in Véyspuräna 1.54 (© Brahmändapuräna 
1.2.25) and Skandapuräna 114. While the latter parallel is relatively straight- 
forward, the former is less obvious and as such may be more rewarding for 
the study of the transmission of Puränic literature. As I hope to show, the 
Skandapuräna has adapted the text in order to bring it in line with the Pasu- 
pata Yoga teaching that precedes it (SP,, 174-182). The passage is concerned 
with an important concept of lay $aivism, in that it consists of a description 
of the City of Siva (Sivapura), the Saiva version of paradise. It also contains 
an intriguing creation account, along Sämkhyàa lines but with the central role 
played by $iva. 

At the outset it should be noted that the passage forms part of the last 
ten chapters of the Skandapuräna, for which there is no testimony in the 
Ambikäkhanda and Reväkhanda recensions because they break off prema- 
turely.? The sole basis for the text of these ten chapters of the Skandapuräna 
are the two early Nepalese palm-leaf manuscripts S, and $,. It is therefore pos- 
sible that not all of this was part of the original composition of the text of the 
Skandapuräna; that part of it or even the entire section was added in the trans- 
mission of the Nepalese recension. However, for the time being I am inclined 


“I thank Prof. Hans BAKKER, Prof. Harunaga IsaACsoN and Prof. Yuko Yokocui for com- 
menting on an earlier draft of this paper. 

lReferences are to the numbering of the Veñkateévara edition of the Väyspuräna throughout 
this paper. In the Ânandä$rama edition this corresponds to chapter 101. 

2C£ Harmoro 2004:187—189. 


50 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


to consider the last ten chapters as an integral part of the original text. 

The paper falls into two parts: 1) a running commentary, and 2) a synoptic 
edition of the parallel. The synoptic edition is mainly to facilitate compari- 
son between the Puränas. For the text of the Väyspuräna 1 have made use of 
two Väyupuräna editions, the Anandä$rama (VäP,;) and the Veñkateévara edi- 
tion (VaP,..), as well as of the Venñkatesvara edition of the Brahmändapuräna 
(BdP). The fact that the chapter also occurs in the Brahmändapuräna indi- 
cates that it formed part of the early Väywpuräna, before the split into Väyw- 
and Brahmändapuräna* 1 have also incorporated readings from an early 
Väyupuräna manuscript held in the British Library in London (VäP,). The 
numbering of the verses follows that of the Venkateévaras Väyspuräna edition. 
The text of the Skandapuräna in general follows the edition and numbering of 
BHATTARA‘S editio princeps, but I have looked at the two Nepalese manuscripts 
available for this chapter and occasionally incorporated readings from them and 
resorted to conjectural emendation. Differences between the two parallels are 
presented in italics. 


Commentary on VäP 2.39 (5 BdP 3.4.2) and SP 183 


À new topic is introduced in VaP 2.39.209 with the question of the Naimi$a 
sages about the respective interval (antara) between the seven worlds, Mahat, 
Jana, Tapas, Satya, Bhüta, Bhavya and Bhava. The sages mention that Vayu has 
already given a description of these worlds, by which they probably refer to the 
teaching given earlier on in the same chapter (VäP 2.39.10-—48). SP 183.1-2 
starts with Sanatkumära* assertion that the World of Sambhu is located above 
these seven worlds. The Skandapuräna itself does not contain any systematic 
account of these worlds, so this remark presupposes knowledge about these 
worlds from some other source, presumably the Véywpuräna. However, there is 
something strange about this list: instead of the traditional triad Bhür, Bhuvar 
and Svar, it includes Bhüta, Bhavya and Bhava, which I have not seen anywhere 
else except in this very passage. Indeed, in the description of the seven worlds 


3 For the relationship of these two Puränas see e.g. KIRFEL 1927: x-xix and, more recently, 
VtELLE 2005. Note, however, that KIRFEL has not included the present passage in his Bhu- 
vanavinyäsa. À substantial part of what precedes it is included in his chapter eight of the 
second textgroup (KIRFEL 1954:191-195). 

#The order and names of the seven worlds are pretty much standard since the time of the 
Taittiryäranyaka; see KirFeL 1920:24*, 55, 128. Cf. also e.g. Bhuvanavinyäsa 1.7 (KIRFEL 
1954:48-55). 


Peter Bisschop 51 


given in VaP 2.39.10-48 the traditional seven form the subject of teaching. 
This could indicate that the present passage is not original to the Väyspuräna, 
but was incorporated from some other, now lost source. 

Naturally VaP 2.39.210 contains no parallel in the Skandapuräna, because 
this verse refers to the frame-story of the Väyspuräna, with the speaker change 
from the Naimiéa sages to their instructor Vayu. Also the following verses (VäP 
2.39.211-214) have no parallel, although SP 183.2-Gab, a passage which in- 
troduces the world of Sambhu, seems to go back to these verses. According to 
the Skandapuräna all the other worlds as well as the Egg of Brahmä are estab- 
lished in Sambhuloka. It is not clear whether Sambhuloka is supposed to be 
identical with Sivapura, although there are some indications that it is; inthere- 
mainder of the text the Skandapuräna only deals with Sivapura. Sanatkumära 
mentions that he (4ham) and various other divine beings and Yogis are wor- 
shipping the Lord in Sambhuloka. This remark seems to have been triggered 
by VaP 2.39.212, where it is said i.a. that Sanatkumära and others reside in 
Brahman, the abode of the Lord (älayam cefvarasya yat VaP 2.39.214d). In the 
Skandapuräna this location is somewhat out of order because according to the 
same text Sanatkumära in fact resides in his vimäna on Mount Meru, where he 
tells the Puräna to Vyäsa (cf. SP 1.17-18). 

The real parallel starts with VäP 2.39.215-216, according to which Îé- 
vara can (only) be conceived by the learned, because he is an infinitesimal 
atom. Ten qualities — Jñäna, Vairaägya, Ai$varya, Tapas, Satya, Ksamä, Dhrti, 
Drastrtva, Âtmasambandha and Adhisthätrtva — are said to reside continuously 
in him. SP 183.6cd-8 identifies this Iévara who is an infinitesimal atom with 
Vigraheévara. This seems to reflect a significant theological development. The 
same figure is mentioned again in SP 183.19a (sthänam vigrahesasya), but he 
does not play a role in the Väyupuräna; in fact he is known mainly from Saiva 
Tantric literature, where he is located in various spots of the $aiva universe, but 
never in Sivaloka.® Rather he is assigned a relatively low position, which may 


SThe inhabitants of Sambhuloka and Sivapura seem to be the same. Thus e.g. Vigraheévara 
(SP 183.7b; 183.19a), and Sanaka and other sons of Brahmaä (183.4c; 183.43ab), are said to 
reside in both places. 

6Cf. Hsüan Tsang, Cheng wei shih lun (Vijñaptimätratäsiddhisästra): “Pour les Päsupatas, 
Parivräjakas, etc., l’Atman, éternel, est subtil comme un atome, réside secrètement dans le 
corps, fait les actions” (transl. DE LA VALLÉE Poussin 1929:12). 

Note, however, the reference to vigrahavat isvara in VaP 2.39.231 below. 

SNivasamukha 41204 (Vigrahesa above Gahana who is himself above the twenty-five 
Tattvas), Mväsaguhya 1.118a (Vigraheéa located at the granthi), Kiranatantra 8.132c (Vigra- 


52 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


point to his being a remnant of an earlier form of $Saivism, presumably a kind 
of post-Pañcärthika Atimärga,” which was superseded by the Saivasiddhänta.!° 
The name Vigraheévara indicates that he is intended to be identical with the 
sakala form of Siva, mentioned at the start of this passage (SP 183.2b).!! 

At first sight the ten qualities attributed to Iévara in VäP 2.39.215cd-216 
seem to be reduced to eight in SP 183.7cd-8: Ksamä, Satya, Dhrti, Tapas, 
Vairägya, Srastrtva, Atmabodha and Mahesatä. Lacking are Jñäna and Aiévarya, 
while Drastrtva is replaced by Srastrtva,!? Atmasambandha by Âtmabodha, and 
Adhisthätrtva by Mahe$atä. This may be due to textual corruption on the part 
of the Skandapuräna: Jhäna is in fact present in the awkward ablative com- 
pound jñänavairägyät, which repeats the item Vairagya. To retrieve ten items 
jhänavairägyät may be emended to j#änam aifvaryam. The list of ten attributes 
also occurs elsewhere in the Väyspuräna, with some noteworthy variants. In- 
stead of Drastrtva we find Srastrtva, the same item conjectured by BHATTARAI 
in SP 183.8a, and instead of Atmasambandha we find Atmasambodha, ! which 


he$a located in Kalätattva), Matañgapäramesvarägama V'idyäpäda 8.83 (Vigrahesäna located 
at the granthi), Sväyambhuvasütrasamgraha 4.18a (Vigrahe$vara). À seventh-century inscrip- 
tion from Malhar refers to the eight forms of $iva as ‘Vigraheévaras’: fvasya mürtinäm astau 
vigrahesvaränäm (BAKKER 2000!:8). 

*With the term ‘post-Pañcärthika Atimärga’ I refer to a form of Pasupata theology that does 
not find expression in Kaundinya’s Pañcärthabhäsya on the Päfupatasütra; one ofits distinguish- 
ing features is the teaching of a hierarchy of worlds (bhuvanädhvan) which is purified at the 
initiation of the practitioner. Cf. SANDERSON 2001:29 and in particular SANDERSON 2006. 

10The figure of Gahana, with which he seems to be associated (cf. Misväsaguhya and 
Nisväsamukha above), is “the lowest in a group of Rudras in the cosmography of the Päsu- 
pata Pramänasästras” (GoopaLL in: BRUNNER, OBERHAMMER & Papoux 2004:184). After its 
reference to the eight forms of Siva as Vigraheévaras the inscription from Malhar mentioned 
in n.8 on p. 52 continues to say that gzhanesasya mürtayo rudräh satsasty anugrähakäà yuge yuge 
parivartamänà “the embodiments of Gahanefa are the sixty-six Rudras who bestow grace (ini- 
tiation) and who roam about in each yuga” (tr. BAkkER 2000:10). 

lIC£. also SP 183.9. 

The reading of this item is insecure, being a conjecture by BHATTARAI. S, reads samskrtam, 
S; according to BHATTARATS apparatus sastitam. The first syllable reported by BHATTARAI is 
illegible in the photograph of $, available to me. 

BVaP 1.10.60 jñanam vairagyam aïisvaryam tapah satyam ksamä dhrtih| srastrivam àt- 
masambodhas tv adhisthätrtvam eva ca | atha yäni dasaitäni nityam tisthanti $amkare || (& BdP 
1.2.9.89cd-90ab jñänam tapas ca satyam ca hy aifvaryam dharma eva ca || vairägyam ätma- 
sambodhah krisnäny etäni $amkare |); VäP 1.30.136 jñänam vairägyam aisvaryam tapah satyam 
ksamä dhrtih| prabhutvam ätmasambodho hy adhisthänagunair yutah ||. C£. also KüP 1.10.39— 
40ab jñänam vairägyam aïsvaryam tapah satyam ksamä dhrtih\ srastrtvam ätmasambodho hy 
adhisthätrtvam eva ca || avyayäni dasaitäni nityam tisthanti $amkare | . The list calls to mind the 


Peter Bisschop 25 


may have been the original reading of VaP 2.39.216a as well, for SP 183.8b has 
the equivalent ÂAtmabodha. 

In both sources the Lord is identified with the (inner) fire of Yoga and is 
said to assume physical form (VaP 2.39.217 & SP 183.9). His magical abode 
(mäyämaya sthäna | mäyädhäman) is the eighth world (beyond the seven worlds 
of Mahat etc.) and is beyond misfortune (awpasargika). It is noteworthy that 
here (SP 183.10) and in SP 183.1Gb the Skandapuräna has a word meaning 
‘causing final release” (muktikärana, äpavargika) instead of the Väyupuränas 
‘beyond misfortune’ (awpasargika).* Two verses follow in VaP 2.39.219-220 
that have no parallel in the Skandapuräna. The first dwells on the subject of 
Mäyà, identifying Mahesvara as the magician (Mäyin).!* Next Väyu requests 
the sages to listen as he will recount in detail the measure (pramäna) of creation. 
The distance from Bhürloka to Brahmaloka is calculated to one hundred and 
forty-five million Yojanas.!® There are said to be sixty million Yojanas more 
beyond Brahmaloka in the upper part of the Egg of Brahmä (VäP 2.39.221).!7 
The latter statement is adapted in SP 183.11 to accomodate the City of Sthänu, 
which is situated two hundred million Yojanas above Brahmaloka.!# While the 
Väyupuräna has dealt with Brahmaloka earlier on in the same chapter (e.g. VaP 
2.39.141-143), identifying it with Satyaloka, nothing has been said about it in 
SP 183 so far, which makes the reference to it here somewhat awkward.!? 

The said places, respectively the upper part of the Egg of Brahmä and the 
City of Sthänu, are identified with the highest point in the universe in VäP 


set of Dharma, Jñäna, Viräga (/Vairägya) and Aï$varya in Sämkhyakärikä 23 and 44-45. Note 
that it does not occur elsewhere in the Skandapuräna. 

Vlr is certainly possible, however, that aupasargika in the Väyu- and Brahmändapuräna is 
just a corruption of an original gpavargika. Note in this connection that the British Library 
manuscript reads dpasargikam in VaP 2.39.218b. 

SVäP 3.29.219 clearly alludes to the teaching of Svetäsvatara-Upanisad 4.910 chandämsi 
yajñäh kratavo vratäni bhätam bhavyam yac ca vedà vadanti| asmän mäyï srjate vifvam etat 
tasmims cänyo mäyayà samniruddhah || mäyäm tu prakrtim vidyän mäyinam tu mahesvaram | 
tasyävayavabhüätais tu vyäptam sarvam idam jagat || (OBEerLIES 1998:84). 

6]n this and the following I reckon a Koti as ten million and a Niyuta as one million. 
7This verse is almost a repetition of VaP 2.39.142cd-143ab ekakotir yojanänäm pañcasan 
utäni tu || ärdhvam bhägas tato ‘ndasya brahmalokät parah smrtab | . 

8For references to the location of Siva in Saiddhäntika literature see the annotation by 
GoopaLL ad Paräkhyatantra 5.136 (p.311, n. 612). 

?Cf., however, Sanatkumäras announcement in the last verse of the preceding chapter: 
sakalasyäspadam divyam brahmalokät pare sthitam | mahädevasya vaksyämi tadbhaktäà yatra yänti 
te || (SPyn 182.54). 


n 


S- 


54 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


2.39.222 and SP 183.12. It is here that the innumerable,” eternal, subtle 
Prakrtis are. According to VaP 2.39.223a these Prakrtis have the property of 
procreation (prasavadharmin), while according to SP 183.13ab they have the 
properties of knowledge and authority (j%änädhikäradharmin) and are called 
Saiva Prakrtis. Possibly they are specified as such in order to distinguish them 
from the regular set of eight Prakrtis —- Mahat, Buddhi, Ahamkära and the 
five Tanmätras - mentioned several times in the preceding section on Pä$upata 
Yoga”! ‘Procreation’ is certainly the more natural attribute of the Prakrtis; in 
fact the compound prasavadharmini echoes Sämkhyakärikä 11, which indicates 
that it is most probably original.?? It is interesting to notice that the property 
of authority (4dhikära) comes into play in VaP 2.39.223cd, where the knower 
of the field (ksesrajña), the superintendent (adhikartr), designated as Brahmä, 
is said to originate from the Prakrtis. By contrast, in SP 183.13cd the two Pra- 
jäpatis, Brahmaä and Visnu, are produced from them. Through this reference 
to the two Prajäpatis the instruction is connected with the preceding Pä$upata 
Yoga teaching, in which it is taught that Brahmä and Visnu are the two Prajä- 
patis brought forth in the beginning to do the job of creation. They consist of 
and are dependent on Prakrti (singular), who is identified with Dev.” 

In VaP 2.39.224-225 various qualities are attributed to the Prakrtis. The 
parallel is condensed to four pädas in SP 183.14 and connected with the first 


20For the doctrine of innumerable Prakrtis in the Väyupuräna cf. also VäP 1.49.185 (& 
BdP 1.19.195-196ab) sapéa prakrtayas tv età dhärayanti parasparam| täsv alpaparimänena 
prasamkhyätum ihocyate| asamkhyeyäh prakrtayas tiryag ärdhvam adhastäc ca || . 

21Cf SPy 174.63cd astau prakrtayo nityà vikäräs caiva sodasa ||; SP 175.2c avyaktam 
prakrtis caiva tathähamkära eva ca| astau prakrtayo hy etäs tanmaätrair pañcabhih saha || ; SPa 
179.2cd-3ab mahän buddhir ahamkäras tanmäträni ca pañca hi || imäh prakrtayo vyäsa deham 
astau samä$ritäh | . Cf. also SP Vol. [: 65, n. 14. 

2C£. Sämkhyakärika 11, which attributes prasavadharmin to Pradhäna. Many more pas- 
sages can be cited, e.g. MBh 13 App. 3, L. 152 nityäm tu prakrtim ähur yäsau prasavadharmini, 
and VäP 1.14.11 (& LiP 1.88.42) 4m ähur munayah sarve loke prasavadharminim | prakrtim 
sarvabhütänäm yuktäh pasyanti cetasä || . 

SP, 173.31 brahmavisnü smrtau yau tau rajahsattvagunätmakau | äväbhyäm tau prajäyete 
srstikäle prajäpati || (here äväbhyäm ‘from us’ refers to Devi = Prakrti and $Siva = Purusa; 
cf. SP 173.30cd prakrtis tvam samäkhyätä purusah paramo hy aham |); SP, 174.1 1cd-13ab yo 
Srjat srstikäle tu devau sarvajagatsrjau || prajäpati mahätmanau dhyätvà visnupitämahau | tam 
pranamya mahädevam tryaksam varadam isvaram || pravaksyämi matam tasya yogasiddhänta- 
nifcayam ||; SPy, 180.36-38cd ävarän nirgatà sa hi prakrtir gunabandhanä| tasyäh srastä 
mahädevo yato visnupitämahau || prajäpati samutpannau gunatrayanibandhanau| täv äkramya 
mabhesas tu prakrtisthau gunätmakau || makärastho vibhur bhütvä bhuñkte samcarate ca hi| ; SPa, 
182.2ab $amkarat prakrtir jätà brahmavisnä tadätmakau | . 


Peter Bisschop 55 


hemistich of the following verse (SP 183.15ab), teaching that the undecaying, 
pure [Iévara], who is both niskala and sakala and is situated in the place of the 
most subtle atom, gave the two Prajäpatis, as Prakrti(s), the power to create. 
This seems to refer again to the aforementioned Vigraheévara. In päda c of the 
same verse the reading manasab is highly doubtful. In the light of the parallel in 
VäP 2.39.226 it seems probable that the text originally read samasah,* and so 
SP 183.15cd may be translated: ‘First (4dau) His rejas irradiates the primordial 
(präktana) darkness (amas). In other words, Siva expells the primordial dark- 
ness before the actual process of creation can take place, which is the subject of 
the following verses (up to SP 183.184). 

VaP 2.39.227 and SP 183.16 embark on a new topic with the Golden Egg 
that was produced from I$vara. A revision on the part of the Skandapuräna is 
revealed by the unsmooth repetition of # in pädas ab, possibly due to rewrit- 
ing a Ma-vipulä to a regular Pathyä Sloka. VäP 2.39.228 contains a highly 
condensed doctrine, attributing the sprouting (nirbheda?) of a seed to I$vara. 
The Knower of the field (kserrajña) is identified with this seed and Prakrti with 
the womb, whose essence is Näräyana. ‘The doctrine in the Skandapuräna is 
less clear: instead of the Véyupuräna’s ifvaräd we find tasmäd, which could ei- 
ther mean that the seed sprouts from Iévara — as in the Väywpuräna — or from 
the golden egg mentioned in the previous verse. As in the Väyspuräna, the 
Knower of the field is identified with this seed (kseérajñah sa vibhubh smrtah). It 
is from this (asmäd), viz. from the seed which is another form of Iévara, that 
the Prakrti called Vaisnavi originates (SP 183cd). This statement again seems 
to refer to the Pä$upata Yoga doctrine in the Skandapuräna mentioned above, 
namely that Iévara produces Prakrti, who in turn produces Brahmä and Visnu. 
Here the doctrine is somewhat different: Visnu is the first Prakrti to appear. 
The following verse in the Véyspuräna (VaP 2.39.229) is largely incomprehen- 
sible because the sentence seems to be incomplete; I hypothesize the loss of 
one or two lines. ‘The parallel in SP 183.18, however, continues with the 


The corruption of tamasah may have happened due to metaphesis of #4 and m4, creating 
matasah, and confusion of #4 and #4 or ‘improvement of #4 to na, yielding manasah. Tam 
indebted to Prof. Yuko Yokoci for the proposed conjecture and interpretation as well as for 
the conjecture präktanasya adopted in the edition below. 

#The translation of the Ancient Indian Tradition & Mythology Series makes up for this 
lacuna in the free rendering of VaäP 2.39.229: “The creator of the worlds, the noble souled 
omnipresent lord £# contact with Prakrti creates Brahmaloka and Brahmända through his body, 
for the purpose of the creation and maintenance of the worlds.” (TAGarE 1987:866; italics 
mine). The translation of BdP 3.4.2.232 in the same series is more faithful to the text, but 


56 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


teaching of the two Prajäpatis, stating that the first Prakrti turns into a second 
Prakrti, which might be called Brähmi (brzhmatvam punar ästhitä) for the sake 
of convenience. This second Prakrti takes its place on the lotus (padme)? of the 
egg of Brahman, which is Samkara himself. What we have here then is a Saiva 
rendering of the well-known image of Brahmä appearing on the lotus which 
springs from Näräyanas navel. Both Brahmaä and Visnu ultimately owe their 
powers as Prakrtis to Siva. 

With VaP 2.39.230 we turn to the main topic of the next section, viz. the 
description of Sivapura itself, which is situated above Brahmaloka and below 
the shell of the cosmic egg. The Skandapuräna omits the latter location. VäP 
2.39.231 and SP 183.19 both identify Sivapura as the residence of Vigraheéa 
(VaP: vigrahavatah ifvarasya). It is surrounded by a great and luminous wall 
with four golden doors adorned with jewels and pearls. There are variants in 
the use of words but in principle the description that follows is more or less the 
same. À remainder of the description (VaP 2.39.235-301ab) is missing in the 
Brahmändapuräna version, but the testimony of the Skzndapuräna indicates 
that this is an omission by the Brahmändapuräna rather than an addition by 
the Väyupuräna. In VaP 2.39.235ab the parallel with SP 183.22cd, which has 
fusubhe, allows us to reconstruct cakäse instead of the editions’ cakäse.?? Siva- 
pura is described as a place where there is no death, no torment, no old age, no 
exertion (VäP 2.39.235cd-236ab).% According to VäP 2.39.237cd, the earth 
in Sivapura is golden, while according to SP 183.25ab, it is emerald-coloured 
or made of emeralds (SP 183.25a). Although this may seem a trivial variant it 
is noteworthy that this agrees with a similar description of Sivapura in an earlier 
passage of the Skandapuräna (SP 13.65a).?” 


The text continues to describe the marvellous lotuses to be seen in Siva- 


obscure: “The lord is for the purpose of creation of the worlds. He is the support and sustenance 
of the worlds. The creation of the noble-souled Lokadhätr (Creator of the worlds) is excellent 
on account of correlation of Tattvas (Primary substances). (TAGARE 1984:999). 

26This conjecture was suggested to me by Prof. Yuko Yokocur. In a note BHATTARAT suggests 
emending padma to padmam, but this does not solve the problems which these two pädas 
present. 

27This emendation was suggested to me by Prof. Harunaga Isaacson. Note that it is partly 
suppported by the British Library manuscript, which has cakose. 

28The parallel in SP 183.23 has a slightly different list: old age, death, exertion, sickness, 
anger, delusion, madness. 

2Compare SPy, 13.65a citrä märakati bhümih - where incidently S, likewise reads marakati 
— and SP 183.25a divyä märakati bhümih. 


Peter Bisschop 57 


pura. In VaP 2.39.242cd-244 and SP 183.29-31ab we are informed about 
seven rivers flowing there: the Varä, Varenyä, Varadä, Varärha (SP,;: Varesä), 
Varavarnini, Varamä (SP,,: Varähi) and Varabhadrä (SP: Väribhadrä).%° In 
the middle of the city is a palace (präsäda), whose magnificent ornamenta- 
tions are listed in a couple of verses in which the Skandapuräna follows the 
Väyupuräna’s topics but uses different expressions throughout. Incidently it 
may be pointed out that in a number of cases the Skandapuräna bears testi- 
mony to the originality of the reading of the British Library manuscript (VaP,,): 
thus e.g. the presence of pädapair in SP 183.37d suggests that hemapuspopagair 
drumaih in VaP 2.39.253b is original. Of particular interest in this passage 
is SP 183.39: instead of VaP 2.39.254cd-255ab, which is once again about 


$l are sporting in Tryambaka’s 


the palace and mentions that unequalled women 
dwelling, SP 183.39 contains yet another cross-reference to the Pa$upata Yoga 
teaching, the subject of the preceding chapters (SP,, 174-182). It repeats one of 
the central doctrines of those chapters, namely that Iévara is the supreme 26th 
principle.*? Clearly building upon the Väyspuräna's assertion that unequalled 
women are sporting in Tryambakas dwelling, the Skandapuräna informs us 
that the Lord of AII (Viéveévara), this 26th principle, continually resides in $i- 
vapura together with his wife. The last verse in this section in the Väypuräna 
gives the names of the women: Laksmi, Sri, Vapus (?), Maya, Kirti, Sobhà 
(2) and Sarasvati together with Devi. ‘The Skandapuräna has à different list, 
Laksmï, Medhä, Dhrti, Hri, Sri, Kirti and Sarasvati, and calls them ‘Mothers 


of the world. Because of the re-composition of the preceding verse, the com- 


30The seven rivers are also mentioned in a description of Sivapura in Nisväsaguhya 7.69-80, 
where only the names Varä, Varenyä, Varadä, Varisthä and Varavarninï are legible (Niväsaguhya 
7.73). From the parallel passage of the Svacchandabhairavatantra (10.550cd-551ab) we get the 
two remaining names as Varähä and Varärohä. 

31] adopt the reading of the British Library MS (ramanty apratimä). The reading of the two 
editions (vasantapratimä ‘image of Spring?) seems implausible. 

32 For this doctrine cf. especially SP, 179. Other passages in these chapters referring to 
the 26th principle are SP, 174.11; SPy, 175.36; SPys 175.38; SPyn 176.41; SPy 178.2; SP 
181.52; SPy 182.3; SP 182.111; SPy, 182.45. Only two other references to the 26th prin- 
ciple occur in other parts of the Skandapuräna: SP 1.2 and SP, 69.5. It is not found in the 
extant Véyupuräna as far as I am aware. 

33As YokocHi (*2004:50, n. 32) observes, “[tJhe expression ‘Mothers of the world’ is fre- 
quently used in the Skandapuräna and, in all cases but one (SP, 171.134d), denotes a group 
of Brahmanical goddesses, which is a completely different group from the Mothers who are 
said to have emerged from Kaugikï.” In SP3, 111.2-6 some of the goddesses mentioned in SP 
183.40 (Laksmï, Dhrti, $ri, Kirti and Sarasvati) are grouped together with other goddesses, 


58 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


poser(s) of SP 183.40 also had to add the verb modante, which equals ramanti 
in VäP 2.39.255a.% 

Here the parallel between SP 183 and VäP 2.39 ends. The Viyspuräna 
continues with an extensive passage of about 120 verses without parallel in the 
Skandapuräna. After this, however, a few more verses are once again shared with 
the Skandapuräna. The relevant passage is introduced in the Skandapuräna by 
two verses in which Sanatkumära mentions that Rudra* devotees reach Siva- 
pura wherever they die and he requests Vyäsa to pay attention to the names 
of the sages, devoted to Samkara, who live in his abode.% In the following 
verses the names of these sages are given, starting with Brahmä’s mind-born 
sons Sanandana, Sanaka and Sanätana. It is noteworthy that the Väyspuräna 
omits Sanatkumära, the fourth of Brahmä*%s sons, while the Skandapuräna has 
Sanatkumära refer to himself in the first person (aham) as befits the storyline.*” 
The Väyupuräna continues with the names of other celebrated sages residing 
in Sivapura: Vodhu, Kapila, Âsuri, Pañcasikha and others. The Skandapuräna 
has a different list: Rbhu, Brahmaä, Nara, Näräyana, Pañcasikha, Hayaëiras, Ya- 
jñavalka and others. According to the Väyupuräna innumerable Rudras go 
there at the end of a Kalpa cycle, crossing ‘the river whose waters are birth and 


such as Mälini, Sucavati, Sävitri, and are designated as ‘Mothers of the world.’ 

The presence of modante in the Skandapuräna is a clear sign that the reading ramanty 
apratimà in VaP 2.39.255a in the British Library MS is original (see above). 

This also forms the end of the synoptic edition. ‘The remaining passages from the 
Skandapuräna are quoted in the footnotes below. 

36SP 183.41—42 Sivabhävärpitätmano (corr., ° bhävarpitätmäno SP ) ye narä rudratatparäh | 
yatra tatra mrtà vatsa tesäm taträspadam smrtam || ye ca mähesvarä vyäsa tisthante $amkarälaye | 
munayah Samkaram bhaktäs tän $rnusva samähitah ||. Pädas 41ab are omitted in S, and the 
same manuscript ends with 41cd, so that for the remainder of the text only $, is available. 

S7VaP 2.39.337-338 & BdP 3.4.2.272cd-274ab yatra pürvagatas tesu (VäPio; Jatra pürvam 
gatäs te tu BdP tatra pürvagatäs tesu VaPyaax) kumärà brahmanah sutäh|\ sanandanas ca 
sanakas (Bd?, sanakas ca sanandas ca VäP) trtiyas ca sanätanah|| vodhus (BdP VéPuuix 
bodhas$ VäP;o) ca kapilas tesäm äsuris ca mahäyasäh| munih pañcasikhas caiva ye cänye py 
evamädayah ||. SP 183.43-44 aham sanandanas caiva sanakah sasanätanah| rbhur brahmä 
surajyestho naranäräyanäv api || -—---- $isyah siddhah pañcasikhas tathà | munir hayasirä yas 
ca yajñavalkädayas tathä || (the missing syllables possibly hide some reference to Asuri being 
the pupil of Kapila: cf. SP, 172.59cd säksät bhagavatah Sisyam kapilasyäsurim munim). 

38 That the Véywpuräna’s list of sages is more traditional is indicated by a very similar passage 
in KIRFEL* reconstruction of the Bhuvanavinyäsa (1.7.9), where these sages are however located 
in Janaloka: dve kotyau tu janaloko yatra te brahmanah sutäh | sanakas ca sanandas ca trtiyas ca 
sanätanah | kapilas cäsuris caiva vodhuh pañcasikhas tathà || (Kirrez 1954:50). 


Peter Bisschop 59 


death. * The Skandapuräna has a similar passage, mentioning that three-eyed 
mumuksus, possessed of supreme lordship, enter Iévara when the great destruc- 
tion has arrived, and reach a state leading to final release.“ 

The Skandapuräna adds à list of various people who go to Sivapura. First 
of all they who have seen the /rigas at the main $aiva pilgrimage sites go to Si- 
vapura when they die (SP,, 183.47-50ab).#! Also practitioners of the Päsupata 
observance and devotees of Bhava reach Sivapura at death and become Rudras 
(SP 183.50cd-53ab). Sanatkumära requests Vyäsa to practise the Pasupata 
observance as well, after which Vyäsa pays his respects to his guru, Sanatkumaära, 
and wanders the earth to see Sarva’s sanctuaries (SP,, 183.53cd-62). At this 
point a speaker indication väyur uväca follows, which is out of place, because 
according to the frame story this should be the s#r4 who tells the Puräna to 
the Naimi$a sages. It seems likely that the wrong speaker indication was trig- 
gered by the passage which formed the subject of the present paper, in which 
the Skandapuräna redactor has adopted material from the Véyspuräna, thus 
accidently causing him to write v4yu instead of sta? 

In conclusion it can be reasonably assumed that, even in the absence of 
a critical edition of the Väyupuräna,? it is more likely that the Skandapuräna 
has borrowed from the Väyspuräna in the present passage than vice versa. In a 
number of respects the Skandapuräna’s doctrine is more advanced; e.g. in its ref- 


SVaP 2.39.339-342 & Bd? 3.4.2.294cd-278ab ratah käle vyatikrante kalpänäm paryaye 
gate| mahäbhütavinäsänte (Bd? VaP sax °vinäsänäm VäP0) pralaye pratyupasthite || anekaru- 
drakotyas tu yäh prasannä mahesvarim (BdP; mahesvari VäP) | $abdädin vividhän (VaPo; visayän 
BdP VaPxx) bhogän samtyajyästavidhäfrayat (BdP; satyasyästavidhasrayät Val ax satyasyä- 
stavidhasrayät VäP0) | pravisya sarvabhütäni jhänayuktena tejasà | vaihäyapadam (Va®, vihäya 
padam Bd?) avyagram bhütänäm anukampayä || tatra yänti mahätmänah paramänum mahesva- 
ram| taranti sumahävartäm janmamrtyñdakäm nadim || . 

10SP,, 183.45—46 rryaksäh Samkaravarsmänah paramaïsvaryasamyutäh || tisthantisvaramüla- 
sthà gunätità mumuksavah || utpanne jagato nä$e mahäpralayasamiñake| Kvaram te samävisya 
prâäpnuvanty apavargikam ||. Note again the use of the word apavargika (see above, p. 53). 

# Most of the sites mentioned in this list (Kedära, Madhyama, Mahälaya, Catuhérñgeévara, 
Srigiri, Kärohana, Gañgädvära, Bhadreéa, Sankukarneévara, Mahäkäleévara, the two Gokarnas 
and Avimukte$vara) are familiar from other parts of the Skandapuräna, in particular the topo- 
graphical chapter 167, for which see BisscHor 2006. They indicate the hand of the redactor 
of the Skandapuräna. 

#The incongruity of the speaker indication was noted by BHATTARA‘ who adds a note: süta 
uväca (?). 

Cf. the cautious remark by the editors of SP Vol. I: “In the absence of a reliable, not to 
speak of a critical edition of the Väyupuräna, à text critical analysis of the passages common to 
both Puränas cannot yield results that can be called conclusive” (introduction, p.21). 


60 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


erences to such theological concepts as Vigrahe$vara, the two Prajäpatis Visnu 
and Brahmä, and Iévara being the 26th principle. With the exception of the fig- 
ure of Vigrahe$vara, these concepts form part of the Pä$upata Yoga teaching that 
precedes it. In quite a few cases it could be shown that the Skendapuräna has 
reformulated the wording of the Väywpuräna. The redactor has skillfully inte- 
grated the passage within the larger framework of the Skandapuräna, by placing 
it at the end, thus granting the lay Saivas, the potential audience of the text, a 
vision of heaven. In the Väywpuräna it forms part of the texts Bhuvanavinyäsa, 
a general account of the different worlds constituting the cosmos starting with 
Mabharloka and ending with Sivapura on top. As an aside, it may be noted that 
the passage attests to the $aiva character of the early Väyupuräna.“ 


SYNOPTIC EDITION 


Väyupuräna 2.39 Skandapuräna 183 

rsaya ñcub | sanatkumära uväca | 

mah4r janas tapah satyam satyasya mahañas caiva 

bhüto bhavyo bhavas tathà | janasya tapasas tathà | 

uktà hy ete tvayä lokà bhavyzbhützbhavänäm ca 
lokänäm antarena ca | saptänäm ürdhvatah sthitah || 1 


lokäntaram ca yädrg vai 

tan no brühi yathätatham || 209 

— VäP 2.39.209-256ab & BdP 3.4.2.211- 
238ab. 

a mahän] BdP VäPs, maho Val 
e satyam | BdP VäP,;sax, satyo VaP,,; 
b bhavyo ] BdP, bhävyo VäP; f yatha- 
tatham ] VäP, yathä tathä BdP 

tesäm tad vacanam $rutvà 

rsinäm ürdhvaretasäm | 

sa vâyur drstatativärtha 

idam tattvam uväca ha || 210 

ad ] BdP Vaux om. VäPo 


#T have addressed the issue of the $aiva character of the early Väywpuräna in connection 
with the relationship to the Skandapuräna in general in a paper presented at the Puräna panel 
of the 13th World Sanskrit Conference in Edinburgh (forthcoming B). 


Peter Bisschop 


väyur uväca | 

vyaktam tarkena pasyanti 
yogät pratyaksadarsinah | 
pratyähärena dhyänena 
tapasà ca kriyätmanah || 211 
d ca kriyätmanah ] VaP, ax 


kriyayätmanah VäP,,, ksayam ätmanah BdP 


rbbub sanatkumärädyäh 
sambuddhäh $uddhabuddhayabh | 
vyapetasokäà virajäh 

santo brahmeva sattamäh || 212 


aksayäh pritisamyuktä 

brahme tisthanti yoginab | 

rsinäm välikhilyänäm 

tair yathährtam i$varaih || 213 

b brahme ] VäP brähme BdP; 

c välikhilyänäm Va, välakhilyänäm 
BdP VaPuaxs d yathährtam ] Val, 
yathäkrtam BdP VaP, 


yathà caiva mayà drstam 
sämnidhyam tatra kurvatà | 
agrähyam akrtärthänäm 

älayam cesvarasya yat || 214 

a yathä caiva] VäP, yathätraiva BdP; 
b kurvatä] BdP VäP,sss  kurvatah 
VaP,0; c agrähyam  akrtärthänäm 
BdP anahyasatkrtärthänäm Val, 


annahyasatkrtärthänäm VaP 


loko bhagavatah $ambhor 
yaträste sakalah Sivah | 
näsau tarkavinirdesyo 

lokäs tasmin pratisthitäh || 2 


ärdhvam tiryag adhastäc ca 
lokäs tadvinibandhanäb | 


brahmändam sakalam tasmiñ 


chivaloke pratisthitam || 3 


61 


62 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Kvarah paramänutväd 
bhävagrähyo manisinäm | 


Jhänam vairagyam aisvaryam 

tapah satyam ksamä dhrtib || 215 

a] BdP VaäPyixx  ifvaräparamänutväd 
VäPo 


drastrtvam ätmasambandham 
adhisthätrtvam eva ca | 

avyayäni da$aitani 

tasmi/ns tisthanti añkare || 216 

b adhisthätrtvam ] VäP,,, adhisthänatvam 
BdP VäP,sax d tisthanti] BdP tisthati 
VaP 


vibhutvät khalu yogägnir 

brahmano nugrahe ratah | 

sa lokavigraho bhütvä 

sähäyyam upatisthate || 217 

b yogägnir] VaäPy;ax yogägni VaPi, 
yogädhyo BdP; d  upatisthate | BdP 
VäPyaar, upatisthati VäPo 


näsau na$yati samhäre 
dhruvah sthänub surälayah | 
yaträham sanakädyäs ca 
brahmä caiva pitämahah || 4 


välikhilyapurogäs ca 

siddhäs ca kapilädayah | 
Sivayogaparipräptäh 
sattvädigunavarjitäh || 5 

a välikhilya® ] S;,, (va) = = Iya° $,, 
bälakhilya® SP ; € °paripräptäh ] em., 
pariprapta S;, paripraptyà S>SPpn 


tisthämo nirvrtä vyäsa 
sevamänäs tam 1$varam | 


paramänur asäv 1$o 
bhävagamyo manisinäm || 6 


paramaïsvaryasamyuktas 
taträste vigrahesvarab | 


ksamaä satyam dhrtis caiva 
tapo vairägyam eva ca || 7 


srastrtvam /#4navairägyät 
ätmabodho mahesatà | 

nityam etäni tisthanti 

tasmin deve mahesvare || 8 

a srastrtvam ] conj. SP ; samskrtamS,, 


= (stitvam) S, 


yogavabhnir asäv ätmä 
brahmasrk paramesvarah | 
säkalyän mürtim ästhäya 
karoti jagatah sthitim || 9 


Peter Bisschop 


aksaram dhruvam avyagram 
astamam # aupasargikam | 
tasyefvarasya cinmätram 

sthänam mâyämayam param || 218 
b aupasargikam ] BdP Vilar 
äpasargikam VäP4; © cinmätram] 
BdP yanmatra VaP 


mäyayà krtam äcaste 

mäyi devo mahesvarab | 
devänäm upasamhäras 
tatpramänam bi kirtyate || 219 


vistarenänupürvyà ca 

bruvato me nibodhata | 
trayodasaiva kotyas tu 

niyutà dasa pañca ca | 

bhürlokäd brahmaloko vai 
yojanaih samprakirtyate || 220 

d niyutä daéa pañca ca ] VäP niyutäni 
da$esavah BdP 


ekayojanakoti tu 

pañcäsan niyutäni ca | 

ürdhvar bhagavato ndam tu 
brahmalokäf param smrtam || 221 

a ekayojanakoti ] VäP, ekä yojanakoti 
BdP; c bhagavato ’ndam ] BdP VaPs, 


bhägavatändam Va 


63 


astamam dhruvam adhyeyam 
aksaram muktikäranam | 
mäyädhäma tad ï$asya 
jagatsamhärahetumat || 10 


ürdhvaso brahmalokasya 
yojanänäm mahätmanab | 
vimsatinäm tu kotinäm 

puram sthänoh samästhitam || 11 


G4 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


esordhvagah pracäras tu 
gatyantas ca tatah smrtah | 
nityà hy aparisamkhyätah 
parasparagunä$rayäh || 222 
a esordhvagah pracäras ] BdP 
esordhvagapracäras VaP,,;11, esoddhamgah 
pracäras VäP; b gatyanta ca tatah 
smrtah ] BdP gatyantam ca tatah smrtam 
VäPyaaa, gatyamtas ca tah smrtah VaPo; c 
aparisamkhyaätäh ] VäPs, aparisamjñätäh 
BdP aparisamkhyeyäh VaP 


süksmäh prasavadharminyas 

tatah prakrtayah smrtäh | 

yebhyo Whikartä samjajñe 
ksetrajño brahmasamÿñitah || 223 
süksmäh ] BdP VäP,.xx, süksmaät VaP 


täs prakrtimat süksmam 
adhisthätrtvam avyayam | 


anutpädyam param dhäma 
paramänu pare$ayam || 224 


aksayas cäpy anühyas ca 
amärtir mürtimän asau | 


prädurbhävas tirobhävah 

sthitis caiväpy anugrahabh || 225 

b amürtir ] VäP tv amürtir BdP e asau ] 
RAP Vis. a Vas 


vidhir anyair anaupamyah 
paramänur mahesvarah | 

satejä esa tamaso 

Jah purastät prakä$akah || 226 

b paramänur ] VäP, paramänu° BdP; d 
purastät |] VäPiiro, parastät BdP VaP,, 


etävän ürdhvasamcaäro 
gatyantas ca tatah smrtah | 
asamkhyätäh pure tasmin 
nityah säksmäs tathävyayäh || 12 


jhänädhikäradharminyah 
faiviprakrtayah sthitäh | 
yäbhyo jajñe mahesänau 
brahmavisnü prajäpati || 13 

a jñan4° ] S;S,, jñana° SPpn (#yp0) 


tabhyäm prakrtibhätäbhyäm 
srashtvam paramam dadau | 


aksayo vimalah sûüksmo 


niskalah sakalo bi ca || 14 


sthire mürte pare divye 
paramänupade sthitah | 

tamassh präktanasyädau 

tattejah samprakä$anam || 15 

€  tamasah  präktanasyädau ] con. 
manasah präptamasyädau S;, manasah 
präptanasyädau $,, manasah präk tamasy 


ädau SPen (con) 


Peter Bisschop 


yad andays äsit sauvarnam 
prathamam tv aupasargikan | 
brhantam sarvato vritam 

i$varät tad vyajäyata || 227 

a yad andam ] BdP VäP,;x, yad damdam 
VäP,0; c brhantam ] VäP,,, brhat tu BdP 
brhatam VaP ax d tad vyajäyata ] em., 
vyavajäyata VaP, tad vyajäyate BdP 


Kvaräd bijanirbhedah 
ksetrajño bijam isyate | 
yonim prakrtim äcaste 

sà ca näräyanätmikä || 228 
bbijam ] BdP bija VaP 


vibhur lokasya srstyartham 
lokasamsthänam eva ca | 

sannisargah satanvä ca 

lokadhätur mahätmanah || 229 

b srstyartham ] BdP VaPax, vrstyartham 
VäPio; © satanva | VäPy;ax  satanväc 
VaP, satattvac BdP 


purastäd brahmalokasya 
hy andäd arväk ca brahmanab | 


tayor madhye puram divyam 
manomayam anämayam || 230 

b hy andäd ] VäP,.; BdP andäd VäPi os 
d manomayam anämayam ] BdP sthänam 
yasya manomayam VaPyax — — — — 


manomayam VäP,, (lacuna indicated) 


65 


yad äsid dhaimam andam tu 
laukikam tv äpavargikan | 
mahäntam sarvato nityam 
i$varät tad abhüt tadä || 16 


c mahäntam ] $,$;, mahat tat SPpx 


tasmäd. bijasya nirbhedah 
ksetrajñah sa vibhuh smrtah | 
prakrtir vaisnavi proktà 

sà ca tasmäd vinirgatà || 17 


suräsurädisrstyartham 
brahmatvam punar ästhitä | 
andasya bhedatah padme 


brahmanah famkarätmanabh | 


brahmalokapurastäc ca 

puram fejomayam mabhat || 18 

— Folio containing vss. 18-40 lostinS, 
b ] con, SPpn, brahmatve punar 
ästhitäh S;; © padme] conj, padma 
S:SPBh 


66 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


tad vigrahavatah sthänam 
i$varasyämitaujasah | 

$ivam näma puram fatra 

faranam janmabhirunäm || 231 

d ©°bhirunäm |] VäP,, BdP °bhiränäam 
Va 


sahasränäm éatam pärnam 
yojanänäm dvijottamäh | 
abhyantare tu vistirnam 
mahimandalasamsthzam || 232 


madhyähnärkaprakäsena 
paratejobhimardinä | 
fätakumbhena mahatä 
präkärenärkavarcasà || 233 


dväraif caturbhih sauvarnair 
muktädämavibhüsitaih | 


tapantyanibhaih fubhrair 

gädham sukriavestanam || 234 

d °vestanam | BdP VäP4sax °cestanam 
VäPo 


tac cakä$e puram ramyam 

divyam ghantädinäditam | 

— VäP2.39.235-255 omitted in BdP 

a cakä$e] em., cäkäée VäPysax, cakoée 
VaPs 


yat sthänam vigrahesasya 
i$varasya parätmanah | 
nämyd $ivapuram vydsa 
gatir ifvarayoginäm || 19 


$atam fatasahasränäm 
yojanänäm #4d ucyate | 
mahimandalasamsthäram 
tanmadhye vistrtam smrtam || 20 


d vistrtam ] em. SPpn, vistritams$, 


färadädityarüpena 

vahner adhikatejasä | 

mahatä jétahaimena 

präkärens suvestitam || 21 

a éäradäditya° ] $,, sphuradäditya® SPpp 
(conj.); c jätahaimena ] S$,, haimajätena 


SPph (conÿ.) 


caturbhir hemajair dvärair 
manimuktävibhüsitaih | 


Sobhitam tat puram ramyam 
fusubhe siddhasevitam || 22 


Peter Bisschop 67 


na fatra kramate mrtyur jarämrtyu$ramavyädhi- 

na tapo na jarà $raméh || 235 kopamohamadädayab | 

na hi tasya purasyänyair na kramanty asubhäs tasmin 
upamäm kartum arhati | bhäväh fivapure mune || 23 
235d] VäPyiix nätapo na jaräérayäh c asubhäs ] em. SP, , aéubhäS$, 


VäP,05  236ab] VäP,,,  nadadanyair 
puräcäram rüpam äsautum arhati VaPA, 


nadadanyaih puräcäram rüpam äsodhum 


arhati VäP5 
sahasränäm $atam pärnam $atam fatasahasränäm 
yojanänäm diso dasa || 236 yojanänäm yathädisam | 
tat puram govrsänkasya tat puram vrszbhänkasya 
tejasà Vyàpya tisthati | sarvavyàpi samrddhimat || 24 
ctat puram ] em. SP, 
= tpuram $, 
bhävena manaso bhümir divyä märakati bhümih 
vinyastà kanakämayi || 237 sparsamätrasukhävahä | 


a bhävena manaso | VäP,ax bhavena 


manasa VaP, 


ratnavälukayà tatra 
vinyastä Susubhe dhikam | 


färadenduprakäsäni vai————— yäni 
bälasäryanibhäni ca || 238 bälärkasadrsäni ca || 25 
a märakati | em. SPpn, marakati S;; c ] 


S;, vaidüryamanikalpäni SPps (conj.) 


ardha$vetärdharaktäni kvacid raktäni padmäni 
sauvarnäni tathaiva ca | kvacic chvetäni rejire | 
rathacakrapramänäni mahähradapramänäni 

nälair marakataprabhaih || 239 nälair vaidüryasamnibhaih || 26 
saukumärena rüpena gandhavanti mahärhäni 
gandhinäpratimena ca | vinyastäni mahitale | 


tatra divyäni padmäni 
vanesv upavanesu ca || 240 
b gandhinäpratimena ] VaPyo, gandhinä 


pratibhena VäPi 


68 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


bhrigapatranikäsäni 
tapaniyäni yäni ca | 
ardhakrsnärdharaktäni 
sukumäräntaräni ca || 241 


ätapatrapramänäni 
pañkajaih samvrtäni ca | 


bhüyah sapta mahänadyas 

täsäm nämäni bodhafa || 242 

nämäni bodhata ] VäP,,;xx, näma nibod- 
hata VaP, 


varä varenya varadà 

varärhä varavarnini | 

varamà varabhadrä ca 

ramyäs tasmin purottame || 243 


varärhä | VäPax, varahä VäP, 


padmotpaladalonmisram 
phenädyävarttavigraham | 


jalam manidalaprakhyam 
tà vahanti saridvaräh || 244 


tà vahanti ] VäP,, ävahanti VaPysaa 


na £u brahmarsayo deva 

näsuräh pitaras tathà | 

na #halv anye brameyasya 

vidur I$asya tat puram || 245 

ab] VäPy;ax na brahmarsayo na devä 


näma suräh pitaras tathà VäP, 


indranilanikäa$äni 
mahämaninibhäni ca || 27 
kvacit krsnärdharaktäni 
divyagandhavahäni ca | 


See tatra 
utpaläni samantatah || 28 
ab ] con. SPBh ; kvacit 


krsnärdha = = (ni) 


(divyaga(ndhavahäni = $, 


pravahanti mahänadyo 
yäs tasminn amrtodakam | 


pure bhagavatah $ambhoh 
päräsarya nibodha th || 29 
d'täh ] em. SPgn, tahS, 


varadä ca varenyà ca 

varesä varavarnini | 

varähi väribhadrä ca 

varà caiva mahäpagäh || 30 
c varähi] S,, värähi SPen (conÿ.) 


nänäkusumasammisram 
tà vahanti jalämrtam | 


na devà na munindräs ca 
näsuräh pitaro na ca || 31 

na caivänye mahesasya 
jhâtum tat puram adbhutam | 


Peter Bisschop 


tatra ye dhyänam avyagräh 
suyuktà vijitendriyäh | 
pasyantiha mahätmänah 
puram tad govrsätmanah || 246 


madhye puravarendrasya 
tasyäpratimatejasah | 

sumahän merusamkaä$o 

divyo bhadrasriyä vrtah || 247 

d] Val, disà bhadragriyänvitah VäP, 


sahasrapädah prasädas 
tapaniyamayah fubhab | 
anupameyai ratnais ca 

sarvatah sa vibhüsitah || 248 

— With VaP 2.39.248-249 compare VaP 
2.39.307-308 (= BdP 3.4.2.244-245). 


c] VäPyias anüpamyamayai ratnai VaPs 


sphatikai$ candrasamkäsair 
vaidüryaih somasaprabhaih | 
bälasüryaprabhais caiva 
sauvarnais cägnisaprabhaih || 249 
b  somasaprabhaih ] em., 
prabhaih Va, 
VaP,6; d  cägnisaprabhaih ] VaPs, 


cägnisamprabhaih VaPa 


somasam- 


somasuprabhaih 


râjatais cäpi susubhe 
indranïlamayaih subhaih | 

drdhair vajramayais caiva 

ity evam susamähitaih || 250 

ab] VäPy;ax  râjatais cäpi é$usub- 
hair imdraniïlair aneka$ah VäP,; d 
susamähitaih ] VaP,, sumahähitaih 


VaP aa 


69 


antarmanasi buddhä ye 

sarvato bhaktibhävitäh | 
fivaikamanaso vyäsa 

tasmin modanti te naräh || 32 

a mahe$asya |] S;, samarthäh syur SP» 
(conj..) 


tasya madhye purendrasya 
säryajvalanavarcasah | 
merusrñgapratikä$o | 


digbhadras sapanaprabhah || 33 


präsädo laksapädas tu 

kämagah kanakämayab | 
aniriksyair mahäratnaih 

samantät parisobhitah || 34 

c aniriksyair ] em. SPRn, aniriksair S;; 
d parisobhitah ] S;, parisobhitam SPph 
(typo?) 


vaidüryair vyomasamkä$aih 
sphätikai$ candrasaprabhaih | 
prabälair arkasamkäsair 
indranïlamayaih paraih || 35 

b candra° | em. SP, cendra° S,; d 
paraih ] em. SP, puraihS, 


70 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


jälais ca vividhäkärair 
dipyadbhir adhiväsitam | 


candraramiprakä$abhih 
patäkäbhir alamkriam || 251 


a jälais ] em., jalais VaP 


rukmaghantäninädais ca 
nityapramuditotsavah | 
kimnaränäm adhiväsaih 
sandhyäbhräkäraräjitaih || 252 


b °tsavah ] VaPsax, tsavam VaP, 


parivärasamantät tu 
hemapuspopagair drumaih | 
b] VäPs, 


VaP aa 


hemapuspodakaprabhaih 


yathä hi merusailendro 
hemarñgair viräjate || 253 
cämikaramayibhis tu 
patäkäbhis tathä puram | 


evam präsädaräjo au 

bhümikäbhir viräjate || 254 

ramanty apratimä yatra 
tryambakasya nivesane | 

255a ramanty apratimä ] VaPsx, vasan- 


tapratima VaP xx 


laksmiïh érif ca vapur mäyà 
kirtih fobhä sarasvati || 255 
devyä vai sahità hy età 
räpagandhasamanvitäh | 

256a devyà ] VaPy;xx, devyo VaP 


Sasiraémiprakäsäbhih 
kvacit arkämsurüpibhih | 


Sobhitam tat patäkäbhir 
viraräja sukhänilam || 36 


sarvartukusumais citrair 
icchäratnaphalair api | 
Susubhe tat puram kirnam 


pädapair girisamnibhaih || 37 


mabidhränäm yathä meruh 
sarvesäm pravaro mahän | 
tathaiva tat puram reje 
sarvalokopari sthitam || 38 


tatra visvesvarah säksän 
mahäbhütapatir harah | 
sadäste sahitah patnyä 
sadvimsah paramesvarah || 39 


c sadäste | em. SPy, sa stes, 


laksmir medhà dhrtis caiva 
brih $rih kirtih sarasvati | 
umayä sahitäs tatra 
modante lokamätaras || 40 


b ] em., hri éri kirtih S,, hrih érib kirttih 


SPgh (#7po) 


Peter Bisschop 71 


MANUSCRIPTS CONSULTED 


SKANDAPURANA 


(Si) 


National Archives, Kathmandu, MS 2-229. Rotographs Bodleian Library Ox- 
ford, MS Max Müller 22. Microfilm NGMPP Reel No. B 11/4. Palm-leaf, 
early Nepalese ‘Licchavi script. Dated [Mänadeva Samvat] 234 = 810 AD. 
C£. SP I: 32-33. 


(S;) National Archives, Kathmandu, MS 1-831. Microfilm NGMPP Reel No. B 
12/3. Palm-leaf, early Nepalese ‘Licchavi script. Cf. SP I: 33. 
VAYUPURANA 
(VaäP,) British Library, London, Sanskrit MS I.O. 2102-03. Paper, Devanägarti script. 
Dated Samvat 1540 = ca. 1483 AD. 
NISVASATATTVASAMHITA 


Transcription of the Nifväsatattvasamhitä, from the palm-leaf Nepalese MS No. 
1-227, NGMPP A 41/14 supplemented with readings from its Kathmandu 
apograph MS No. 5-2406, NGMPP A 159/18, by Dominic GoopaLL. [In- 
cludes the Msväsamukha, Nisväsamuüla, Nisväsottara, Nisväsanaya and Nisväsa- 
guhya]. 


12 


Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


People of the festival 


RicHxaARrD H. Davis AND LESLIE C. ORR 


INTRODUCTION 


Along with her unparalleled translation work on the textual corpus of Saiva 
Âgamas, Hélène BRUNNER has always maintained a lively concern with the 
historical and practical significance of this literature. To what extent can the 
ritual guidelines and teachings embodied in the Âgamas provide us with useful 
information about the society and religious culture of medieval and modern 
India? To what degree were the prescriptions of Somasambhu or other medieval 
preceptors actually put into practice by pious worshipers of $iva? Or, to put 
it as broadly as BRUNNER did in an article title, what is the importance of the 
Âgama literature for the study of the living religions of India (BRUNNER 1976)? 

One of BRUNNER's more basic questions has been: who are the people who 
perform or participate in the various ritual actions spelled out in the Agamas? 
From her early article on the Vedic social categories (BRUNNER 1964), through 
her study of the Saiva adept or sädhaka (BRUNNER 1975), to her discussion 
of Saiva priests (BRUNNER 1988b), she has repeatedly sought in her scholar- 
ship to identify and locate the various human agents and groups who appear 
in the literature of the Âgama tradition. In this essay we have tried to follow 
BRUNNER‘'S path in identifying ritual actors, through the juxtaposition of two 
types of sources: Saiva Âgamas and medieval inscriptions. To limit our topic 
we begin with one Sanskrit Âgamic text that has an accepted date, the Ma- 
hotsavavidhi completed by Aghorasiva in 1157 CE.' The Mahotsavavidhi sets 


lThe Mahotsavavidhi (MV) of Aghorasiva has been published twice. In 1910 the first edi- 
tion, edited by M. Alagappa MUDALIYAR, was printed in Grantha script by the Sivajnanabodha 
Press in Chintadripet, Chennaï; the second was published in 1974, also in Grantha, by the 
South Indian Archakar Association also in Chennai, edited by C. Swaminatha Srvacarya. The 
1974 edition follows the 1910 one quite closely. In both editions Aghoragiva's original text 
takes up the first 60 or so pages, ending with a colophon identifying it as the Mahotsavavidhi, 
a portion of the author's larger Kriyäkramadyotikä. Both editions supplement the MV with a 
lengthy digest that includes copious quotations from other Âgamas. This digest, identified as 


74 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


out general recommendations for a nine day Saiva temple festival (mahotsava), 
and in the course of his exposition Aghoragiva refers to various persons who 
contribute to the performance of the festival. Aghoragiva also briefly discusses 
weekly, fortnightly, monthly, and seasonal festivals, but does not include any 
detail pertaining to personnel for these smaller w#savas. We attempt to corre- 
late these with the various types of persons who are mentioned in association 
with festivals in the Tamil temple inscriptions of the tenth through thirteenth 
centuries. 

Of course, neither Âgamas nor inscriptions offer a transparent window on 
the Tamil past. In neither case did these types of texts intend to provide descrip- 
tive representations of their world, and those who seek to find such a record will 
inevitably be disappointed.? However, we hope that the systematic juxtaposi- 
tion of these two types of sources, around the shared topic of festival personnel, 
can help towards a more complete reconstruction of the temple festival as an 
important cultural performance of early medieval South India. We hope also 
that the juxtaposition will provide some insight into the character of the sources 
themselves, their strengths as well as their respective weaknesses and omissions 
as forms of historical evidence. 

Who are the people of the festival? Neither Mahotsavavidhi nor temple 
inscriptions list or directly address the varied human resources needed to con- 
duct a mahotsava. Aghoraëiva focuses on the ritual actions that priests ought 
to perform for the proper unfolding of a festival. Most inscriptions are more 
concerned with the arrangements for material resources needed for the festival, 
such as the land needed to grow flowers for garlands or the provision of food for 
offerings on a grand festival scale. However, both sources do provide valuable 


the Mahotsavavidhikrama Agamasekhara (MAS), is of uncertain authorship. Some scholars ap- 
pear to have assumed that this portion of the published editions is also the work of Aghoragiva, 
but this is extremely unlikely. The introductory verses of the MAS, however, refer to the au- 
thor's preceptor Sadäsiva of Kanchipuram. ‘The same two verses appear in the commentary to 
an earlier portion of Aghoraëiva's Kriyäkramadyotikä composed by Kacchapesvara. We do not 
know exactly when Kacchapeévara lived, but Dominic GooDaALL suggests the range between 
the fourteenth and seventeenth centuries. (We are grateful to T. GANESAN for first pointing 
us to these verses, and to Dominic GoopaLL for further correspondence on Kacchapesvara.) 
AÎl page references in this article refer to the 1974 edition of Aghoragiva's MV. One of us 
(Richard Davis) has completed a translation of Aghoragiva's Mahotsavavidhi, annotated with 
information from the MÂS and other Âgama sources. It is currently under consideration for 
publication. 

See Orr 2006 for a more detailed consideration of the roles and rhetoric of medieval 
South Indian inscriptions 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 75 


and intriguing glances at some of the people involved in of the medieval South 
Indian festival. Our aim here is to collect and compare that evidence from 
ritual and inscriptional sources. For each category of person, we begin with 
the Mahotsavavidhi and other Âgama texts, and then go on to inscriptional 
references. 


SAIVA PRIESTS 


In Mabotsavavidhi, Aghoraëiva sets out the procedures he considers ideal for the 
conduct of a nine-day wæhotsava in a Saiva temple. The mahotsava is a large 
and complex ceremonial activity and requires the contributions of many ritual 
actors. However, in Aghorasiva's view, initiated Saiva priests act as the primary 
agents in conducting the festival. In particular, Aghora$iva addresses his advice 
to a single person, the chief priest who acts as master of ceremonies throughout 
the festival. 

In contrast to the Mahotsavavidhi's focus on priests as the central actors, 
the inscriptions recording arrangements for festival observances mention these 
figures only rarely. Inscriptions referring to the roles of priests in daily worship 
are more commonly met with, but nowhere are we informed of the qualifi- 
cations of priests, and in fact a variety of different types of people are charged 
with the performance of pücai, ärätanai, ärâti, and arccanai in the temple (ORR 
*2004a). When they are referred to in the festival context — in inscriptions 
that date for the most part to the eleventh century — priests are ordinarily one 
group among many whose services are mobilized to carry out various duties in 
connection with the festival celebration. 


À. CHIEF PRIEST 


Aghoraëiva refers to the chief priest as the Zcärya (master), and also as guru 
(preceptor) and deska (guide), always in the singular. While Aghoraëiva uses 
the three terms interchangably, some Âgama texts suggest that they may point 
to different aspects of the priest's role (SAM 1502; SP3:xxvii-xxix). The chief 
priest is necessarily a male $aiva brahmin or Âdisaiva by birth, and he must 
have undergone the sequence of ritual initiations (4ksä) and priestly conse- 
cration (äcäryäbhiseka) that cumulatively confer upon the recipient the ritual 
competence (adhikära) to perform Saiva ritual on behalf of others (parärtha) 
(BRUNNER 1988b). Some Âgamas provide additional qualifications to consider 


76 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


in choosing an äcärya for a public ritual. Says Rauravägama (57.12-14), one 
should select as äcärya “one born in an Âdiéaiva lineage, learned in the mean- 
ings of the Âgamas, calm, patient, with all his anger subdued, a householder, 
healthy, conversant with the words of the Vedas and Sästras, and wise in the 
ways of the world.” In Mahotsavavidhi, Aghoraëiva views the chief priest as the 
implicit agent of all festival activities, much as $iva is the underlying agent of 
all cosmic action. 

During the course of the festival the chief priest is called upon to observe 
a special regimen. He should eat only one meal per day, sleep on the ground, 
abstain from sexual intercourse, and maintain in general an ascetic lifestyle. 
Moreoever, within the festival the chief priest repeatedly performs the com- 
mon rite of self-purification (äémafuddhi), which reiterates his state of ritual 
readiness or Siva-ness (vatva) (Davis 1991:47-60). Throughout the festival 
the chief priest officiates, either directly or indirectly, at all the principal rites. 
Aghoraëiva often uses causitive verb forms to indicate that the chief priest di- 
rects actions even when he does not personally carry them out. His principal 
role is acknowledged at the conclusion of the festival, in the form of an honorar- 
ium (daksinä) and even more in the special “festival of the priest” (äcäryotsava), 
where the chief priest is placed on a palanquin, just as Siva has been throughout 
the festival, and carried in procession around the city (MV pp. 37-8). 

It is particularly striking that the Zcärya does not appear as the director and 
main ritual specialist in the inscriptions’ accounts of festival services. If such a 
person did bear primary responsibility for the conduct of festivals, he did not 
appear to have received any special remuneration or recognition. Only in the 
case of a single twelth-century inscription (from Siddhalingamadam) do we find 
a reference to äcärya daksinai in connection with the celebration of festivals in 
a Siva temple (SIT 19.250).% Here the priest who is the recipient of payment for 
his services remains anonymous, and this is the case for all of the priests involved 
in festival activities — in contrast, as we shall see, to other participants who may 
be named in the inscriptions. At Dadapuram, an eleventh-century inscription 
(ARE 14 of 1919) employs the term pañcäcärya, in the plural, possibly to refer 


3C£ ARE 501 of 1921 from nearby Tiruvennainallur, which makes a similar provision in 
the context of Vaisnava festival observances. In a damaged twelfth-century inscription from 
Elvanasur (SIT 22.140), again in the same area, which lists the requirements for an annual 
festival, we can make out the word caiväcäryar, but the role of this person is unknown; in any 
case, he is not particularly prominent, appearing somewhere between the provisions for four 
thousand garlands and those for food offerings. 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 77 


to priests in the festival context, but these figures bear little if any resemblance 
to the 4cärya of the Âgamas: they, together with the drummers, singers and 
dancers of the Siva temple built by the princess Kuntavai (the sister of Rajaraja 
D, are required to participate in the festivals of the Visnu temple in the same 
village, in addition to serving Lord Siva. 


B. OTHER SAIVA PRIESTS 


For a multifaceted ceremony such as the mahotsava, the chief priest requires 
ritual assistance. Aghoragiva refers to the assisting priests in the festival collec- 
tively as the r#vijs, always in the plural. The term r#vij derives from the Vedic 
system, where it is used as the general category of sacrificial priests, subdivided 
into four subdivisions according to Vedic training and ritual function. In Ma- 
hotsavavidhi and Âgama usage, rtvij is a general term for assisting priests who 
are, like the chief priests, initiated and consecrated Saiva brahmin äcäryas, and 
who act within the festival as extensions of the chief priest. They too should 
observe an ascetic regimen over the course of the festival, and they also receive 
an honorarium at the festival's close, though it may be less than that of the chief 
priest. 

Aghorasiva does single out one special category of assisting priests, the m#r- 
tipas or “image-protectors’. ‘The image-protectors carry out several distinct 
functions: they assist in the ceremonial raising and lowering of the flag that 
mark the beginning and conclusion of the festival, and they perform the fire- 
oblations in the sacrificial pavilion (y4gafälä) throughout the festival. Agho- 
ra$iva does not specify the number of image-protectors nor their special signifi- 
cance in the mahotsava. However, the image-protectors play an important role 
in another major $aiva ritual, the establishment of the linga (Xrigapratisthà), 
where eight wärtipas incarnate the eight forms of Siva disposed around the 
linga (SP4: ix-x). 

In several inscriptions, we find priests performing #ruvärätanai for annual, 
monthly or weekly festivals (SIT 14.192; ARE 234 of 1962; ARE 137 of 1912; 
ARE 128 of 1912), in all but one case as members of groups of two or more. 
In another inscription (ARE 608 of 1920), from Udaiyargudi, the Siva brah- 
mins (Ta. civappirämanar) offered worship during the annual festival in Vaikäci 
month. Elsewhere, at Tirunaraiyur, provision is made for a brahmin to perform 
dräti as part of the festival observances on szmkränti days, and another brahmin 
is charged with carrying out punyäkam, a Vedic or purificatory observance (SIT 


78 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


3.149). Two other inscriptions (SIT 19.380 and SII 22.140) refer to brahmin 
performers of punyäkam, one again in the context of the ritual bath of the deity 
on samkränti days and the other providing for five brahmins to do the sacrifice 
during the festival in the month of Pankuni. 


RECITERS 


A Saiva temple festival necessarily draws upon the specialized skills and contri- 
butions of many actors. One dramatic illustration of this lies in the multiplicity 
of sounds that accompany the processions and other principal rites of the m"4- 
hotsava. In addition to instrumental music, Aghoragiva refers to three different 
types of recitations that may also surround the processions of the gods: recita- 
tions of Saiva mantras (japa), Vedic recitations (vedaghosa, brahmaghosa), and 
devotional hymns (bhaktastotra). In Mahotsavavidhi Aghorasiva does not dis- 
cuss the identities of those who do the reciting. 

The inscriptions also clearly indicate the importance of recitation and 
singing as part of the conduct of festivals, and particularly the singing of devo- 
tional hymns in Tamil. 


À. RECITERS OF SAIVA AND VEDIC MANTRAS 


Within the Âgama system, the recitation of $Saiva mantras is considered the 
most efficacious form of verbal activity, and in festivals the continuous recita- 
tion of certain mantras serves important ritual ends (SP1: xxx-xxxvi). Accord- 
ing to Aghoragiva, the chief priest himself recites key mantras continuously as 
he accompanies the principal deities during processions. In other ritual con- 
texts, a priest referred to as the mantra-reciter (jäpin) may recite the protective 
“weapon” mantra, astra (SP4: x). The recitation of $aiva mantras within the 
setting of a public ritual such as #4hotsava requires an initiated Saiva brahmin. 

The sounds of the Vedas likewise form part of the aural surrounding of pro- 
cessions and other festival activities, though the Saiva Âgamas consider them 
to be auspicious adjuncts, rather than ritually efficacious. Aghoraëiva does not 
specify what Vedic texts are to be recited, nor does he say anything about the 
identity of the Veda-reciters. Presumably this was the special province of Vedic 
brahmins, who had undergone their own procedures of ritual training and qual- 
ification, and who contributed their own specialized knowledge to the overar- 
ching festival program. 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 79 


We find only à single inscriptional reference to the recitation of mantras in 
the festival context, and this is in an eleventh-century inscription from Tiru- 
vorriyur in Chingleput district (ARE 128 of 1912), which records the order 
of the Chola king Virarajendra. Among the various provisions made is the as- 
signment to a particular individual of a certain amount of gold and paddy as 
käni, for the recitation or singing of mantras at the time of the awakening ser- 
vice (which is named after the king) during the annual festival in the month of 
Vaikäci.* 

Having participated in the awakening of the Lord, it is probable that this 
mantra reciter would have accompanied the moveable image of the deity in His 
procession from the temple “bedchamber” to His main abode in the central 
shrine. Other examples of Vedic recitation on festival occasions seem similarly 
to have been associated with processions. For example, two thirteenth-century 
inscriptions from the great Saiva temple at Chidambaram (SII 8.43, SIT 12.245) 
record a land grant to the brahmins of the agaram who do Vedic recitation 
(adhyayanam) next to the Lord's sacred parasol, who say auspicious words (svasti 
colli) when the Lord enters the flower-garden on festival days including the 
spring festival, and who do Vedic recitation in this garden as the Lord takes his 
sacred bath. It seems likely that the bhartar at nearby Udaiyargudi who, over 
two hundred and fifty years earlier, were charged with “various services” in the 
festival chariot (#rutter) were responsible for Vedic recitation in this context 
(ARE 608 of 1920). The term #ruväykelvi is most often translated as “royal 
order”, but there are two inscriptions where it almost certainly refers to the 
récitation of the Veda — these are the inscription of 1046 from Tiruvorriyur 
(ARE 137 of 1912) and the inscription from Sivapuram (ARE 234 of 1961-62) 
of the preceding year. In the case of both of these records, the one responsible 
for tiruväykelvi finds his place among numerous other festival participants who 
are provided for — to serve at a festival in the month of Pankuni at Tiruvorriyur 
and for a weekly procession at Sivapuram. 


#On käni — a term that connotes position, pay, and perquisites — see Orr 2000:127-8. 
The person who was to recite mantras (mantra geyam vinnappañ ceyyum) was Tillaivitankan, a 
name that provides no clues about his caste or initiation status. It seems very likely that the 
mantras involved in this case are Vedic utterances rather than $Saiva mantras. 


80 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


B. SINGERS oF D'EVOTIONAL HYMNS 


Less frequently Aghoraëiva calls for devotional hymns. For the regular proces- 
sions Aghoraëiva speaks simply of “the sounds of the Vedas, etc.” (vedaghosädi), 
and other Âgama texts indicate that the 44; here may well be filled out with 
the sounds of bhaktastotra. As the teachings of Siva himself, the ÀAgamas do not 
generally cite specific human works, but Kämikägama does suggest that “songs 
in the Dravidian languages or in pure Sanskrit” be performed to please Siva as 
part of daily temple worship (PKÀ 4.438-9). The most unambiguous refer- 
ence to devotional hymns in Mahotsavavidhi, however, comes in the “festival 
of the devotees” (bhaktotsava), which takes place after the completion of the 
regular nine-day festival (MV pp. 46-7). In this ceremony, icons of the Devo- 
tees are honoured and praised with devotional hymns, though Aghoragiva does 
not specify what those hymns are. Further, “those who know the $aiva songs” 
receive cloth and other special gifts at this festival event. Perhaps Aghoraëiva 
has in mind specialist singers of the Tamil Saiva hymns of the Æväram. 

At both Tiruvorriyur and Sivapuram, there are provisions for singers of 
devotional hymns: just one man at Sivapuram, but a number of singers — re- 
ferred to as käntarvar and as tiruppatiyam pätuvär at Tiruvorriyur. In fact, the 
Tiruvorriyur inscription of 1046 describes the arrangements made for a proces- 
sion at the conclusion of the Pankuni annual festival in which the bhaktas (Ta. 
pattarkal), including presumably the authors of the #ruppatiyam hymns, were 
honoured — resonating with Aghoraëiva's account of the bhaktotsava. An in- 
scription from Chidambaram dated 1039 (SIT 4.223) provides for the recitation 
or singing of “Tiruttontattokai”, the poem by Cuntaramürtti that praises the 
Tamil Saiva saints, as part of the celebrations during the festival in the month 
of Mäci. That the singing of the Tamil hymns was a regular part of daily temple 
worship is clear from the evidence of the inscriptions. When one looks specifi- 
cally at festival observances it is interesting to note that one hymn comes in for 
particular mention in temples dedicated to Siva — Mänikkaväcakar's “Tiru- 
vempävai”, which was sung during festivals in Märkali month.” In thirteenth- 
century Madurai, ascetics (kovanavar) were charged with the performance of 
“Tiruvempävai” (ARE 192 of 1943-44), but in several other cases — also of 
the thirteenth century — temple women (sevaratiyär) were given the responsi- 


5In a twelfth-century inscription from Valuvur, arrangements are made for the singing of 
“Tiruvempävai” before the image of Mänikkaväcakar (Vätavüräli näyanar) during the Märkali 
Tiruvätirai festival (ARE 421 of 1912). 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 81 


bility of singing this hymn. These women, who are mentioned by name, seem 
either to have purchased this right from the temple authorities, as at Nallur 
(ARE 143, 144, 149, 160 and 161 of 1940-41), or to have been granted this 
privilege, among others, following a substantial donation to the temple, as at 
Tiruppampuram (NK 139). Apart from the special negotiations that individual 
women made with respect to this particular hymn, we find anonymous groups 
of temple women given the duty of festival hymn-singing in the eleventh cen- 


tury at Dadapuram (ARE 14 of 1919) and Tiruvorriyur (ARE 128 of 1912). 


DANCERS, MUSICIANS, AND ENTERTAINERS 


In addition to those who carry out specific ritual activities and recitations, there 
are many more who perform during the temple festival. These performers in- 
clude dancers, musicians, singers, and other entertainers. Each category of per- 
former would contribute their own specialized skills and training to the overall 
celebration of the mahotsava. By and large Aghoraëiva does not provide de- 
tailed information about these festival performers. Often the Mahotsavavidhi 
simply gives formulaic recommendations that an activity should be “accom- 
panied by song, music, and dance”, or by the “triple symphony” (#uryatrika) 
of vocal music, instrumental music, and dance, without further specification 
(MV, p. 4). We need to refer to other Âgama texts to learn about the qualifica- 
tions expected of these performers. Urrarakämikägama specifies that masters of 
music may be born in any of the four varnas or in a mixed caste, and that they 
have dedicated themselves to the knowledge of dance. They should be knowl- 
edgeable about musical instruments, as well as composition, song, recitation, 
and the like, and they should know the nine moods of drama. Further, says 
Siva, who is the speaker in this Âgama, they should be devoted to me, and be 
without moral failings.° 


À. DANCERS 


In many contexts Aghoragiva refers to dancers without indication of any special 
status or role, as nrttakis and nartakas. Such dancers accompany every proces- 
sion of the gods during the festival. However, there are several rites within the 
festival where the Mahotsavavidhi specifies a special group of dancers. 


SUKÀ, quoted in SAM 5.180-185, p. 2445. 


82 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Of all performers the ones who play the most prominent role in the fes- 
tival, in the view of Aghoraëiva, are the Rudraganikäs, “Giva's female troops” 
or “$iva's courtesans,” the female temple dancers. The Rudraganikäs occupy 
a position in Âgama texts parallel to that of the Devadäsis in later South In- 
dian temple culture, but the historical relation between the two categories of 
temple women remains uncertain (KERSENBOOM 1987, ORR 2000). Pürvaka- 
mikägama (PKÀA 4.390) speaks of the Rudraganikäs as “endowed with beauty 
and youth”, and specifies that from ten up to 216 (PKÀ 4.397) may dance in 
the more elaborate temples, during daily services. Rauravägama (19.2-3) adds 
that they should be pure, calm, beautiful, young, not covetous, and well-trained 
in dance. Specifically, they perform the form of dance known as f#ddhanrtta, 
the “pure dance” based on movements coordinated with rhythmic phrases but 
not mimetic gestures (JANAKI 1988:52-5). According to Mahotsavavidhi, the 
Rudraganikäs participate throughout the festival and often carry out key ac- 
tions. ‘They dance in front of the deity during the daily processions, they wave 
lamps before the deity in niräjana, they grind substances for the powder fes- 
tival (cärnotsava), and during the drum-beating ceremony (bherïtädana, also 
called ravasandhinrita) they perform distinct dance-patterns (#rtta) in coordi- 
nation with the drummer's rhythms at each of the eight directions. For this 
rite Aghoragiva lists the dance patterns for each direction, but gives no further 
information on how they were to be performed (MV pp. 14-18). 

The inscriptions describe the performers of festival dance in several ways. 
Sometimes a general provision is made for groups of “dancers and singers”, as 
at the tenth-century Chola temple at Tondaimanad (SIT 8.529), or for groups 
of temple women, as at eleventh-century Dadapuram and Tiruvorriyur (ARE 
14 of 1919, ARE 128 of 1912). More often, however, the inscriptions record 
the appointment of specific individuals as performers of dance at festival times, 
and in many cases these seem not to be regular members of the temple's staff, 
but professionals drawn from the surrounding community. In the tenth and 
eleventh centuries, these are for the most part men — for example, those who 
were contracted to perform the cäkkai dance at Tiruvidaimarudur (SII 3.202), 
at Kamarasavalli (ARE 65 of 1914), and at Kilappaluvur (SIT 19.171), or per- 
formers of the 4riya küttu at Tiruvaduturai and at Tirunallaru (ARE 120 of 
1925, PI 455 = ARE 437 of 1965-66). Two twelfth-century inscriptions 


7It is interesting to note that three of these five inscriptions specify that dances were to be 
performed at the annual festival in the month of Vaikäci; festivals in Mäci, Märkali, Aippaci, 
and Purattäci are also mentioned. There is one relatively early (mid tenth century) inscrip- 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 83 


from Tiruvengavasal, record that individual women were assigned the task of 
performing the cänti küttu at the time of festivals in the months of Cittirai and 
Vaikäci (IPS 128, IPS 139).$ And by the thirteenth century, women seem to 
have altogether displaced men as festival dancers, performing the cäkkai küttu 
at Nallur (ARE 160 of 1940-41) and at Dalapatisamudram (ARE 8 of 1929), 
and a dance form called 4kamarkam at Tiruvorriyur (SITI 520, ARE 196 of 
1912). 


B. DRUMMERS AND MUSICIANS 


The festival requires instrumental music, as well as vocal recitations and song. 
Aghoraëiva often refers to the musicians as a collectivity, as vädyakas or su- 
vädikäras, and for processions and other festival activities specifies simply 
that “all the instruments” (sarvavädya) should be played. In some instances 
Aghoragiva does name specific instruments, including the conch ($zrikha), lute 
(vinä), flute (venu), and three kinds of drums (bherï, mardala, and dundubhi). 
Other Âgama texts provide longer lists of suitable instruments, and Ajitägama 
(27.128-131) recommends that instruments of four categories be employed 
in the festival: skin-percussion drums, stringed instruments, metal percussion, 
and hollow wind instruments. According to Ajitägama these four instrument 
types plus the human voice make up the “five great sounds” (pañcamahäsabda), 
and this totality of sound brings pleasure to Siva. 

Rhythms of the drum play a major role throughout the festival. They ac- 
company all processions and tribute-offerings, as well as the raising and lower- 
ing of the festival banner. However, in one important rite at the commence- 
ment of the festival, the chief drummer (called bheritädaka or simply vädyaka) 
is singled out (MV pp. 14-18). During the drum-beating rite that follows the 
raising of the festival flag, the chief priest ritually consecrates the bherï drum 
and calls upon the chief drummer to play a series of distinct rhythms (44/), as 
the Rudraganikäs dance, at each of the eight directions. The Mahotsavavidhi 
gives the names of the individual rhythms for each location, but it required 
the drummer's special expertise to give musical form to these rhythms. During 


tion recording the appointment of a woman as a festival dancer, from Siddhalingamadam (SIT 
26.391); there are no details given about either the type of dances she was to perform or the 
occasions for their performance. 

8Although it has been suggested by KERSENBOOM (1987:29) that the cénri kürtu mentioned 
in the inscriptions is identical with the navasandhi nrtta of the Âgamas (JANAKkI 1988:167-75), 
this does not seem likely. See the discussion in Orr 2000:104-7, 2345. 


84 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


this rite the chief drummer receives the sacrificial thread that marks him as a 
temporary brahmin, along with sandalpaste, garlands, and other adornments. 

Drummers were among the most prominent participants in festivals, ac- 
cording to the evidence of the inscriptions. They seem to have been essential 
for the proper conduct of processions, whether these were carried out as part of 
the daily temple routine — especially in the case of the tribute-offering (rbali) 
procession around the temple compound — or as part of weekly, monthly or 
annual observances. There are several inscriptions that indicate that temple ser- 
vices had to be suspended in the absence of drummers, including one of the 
eleventh or twelfth century from Sendalai which records the restoration of the 
daily $rZbali procession as well as drumming at the time of the festivals in the 
months of Mäci and Cittirai following the appointment of a drummer (wvac- 
car) for temple service (ARE 201 of 1926; cf. IPS 89, Orr 2004b). It seems 
that in some cases the drummers who performed at festivals were brought into 
town especially for these occasions — particularly when we find groups com- 
posed of as many as seventeen or twenty men — or that the several temples of 
a locality shared the services of these performers, as in the case of the wuwkkaï 
player of Dadapuram, who, together with other personnel belonging to the 
Siva temple, was required to participate in the festivals at the Visnu temple of 
the village (ARE 14 of 1919). In addition to the wrukkai (hour-glass drum), 
other percussion instruments such as the #ttali are specifically mentioned in 
the context of festival performances; very occasionally one finds references to 
wind and string instruments — the trumpet (kälam) and the vinä (ARE 353 
of 1972-73; ARE 234 of 1961-62). One inscription, from the great temple 
at Tanjavur, records arrangements to support five drummers (karikaiyär) who 
were to sound the sacred drum (#irwpparaï) at the time when the festival flag was 
raised (SIX 2.25); this seems to resonate with Aghoragiva's account of festival 
proceedings, although there is no mention in the inscription of the consecra- 
tion of the drum or the chief drummer, nor of special rhythms for the eight 
directions or the involvement of dancers. 


C. ENTERTAINERS 


At several points during the mahotsava, including the festival of dancing Siva 
and the festival of the goddess, Aghorasiva recommends that entertainment 
(vinoda) be provided for an audience that would include Siva and the Goddess 
(in image forms) along with select human invitees (MV p.41). He does not 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 85 


specify what these entertaining performances might be, but other Âgama texts 
suggest they be concerts of dance, music, and anything pleasing to the gods. 
We might postulate that this is the context within which drama performances 
might be incorporated into the mahotsava, as they seem to have been in later 
South Indian practice. 

In an eleventh-century inscription from the Tanjavur temple (SII 2.67H), 
provision is made for a male dancer (a cänti küttan) to perform the Räjarä- 
jesvara nätakam during the annual festival in the month of Vaikäci. This was 
presumably a drama in honour of the deity enshrined in the temple. The only 
other two inscriptional references to dramatic performances in the festival con- 
text come from thirteenth-century Tirunelveli district; in both cases, a temple 
woman is assigned the duty of performing the “sacred drama” (#runätakam) at 


the time of the festival (ARE 557 of 1916, ARE 444 of 1929-30). 


OTHER SPECIALISTS 


Still other specialists are required to insure the proper conduct of the festival. 
Among these Aghorasiva refers to an artisan and an astrologer. 


À. ARTISANS 


During the festival the work of artisans (S/pin) is crucial. They must select and 
prepare the wooden flagpole, they design and create the festival banner, they 
construct the altars and firepits of the sacrificial pavilion, and they prepare the 
many vehicles and especially the great wooden chariot for processions. The 
filpins have their own textualized bodies of specialist knowledge in the form of 
Silpasästras, such as the Chola-period Mayamata, which also set forth qualifi- 
cations for the various categories of artisans.” Aghoraëiva refers to the Silpin 
in the singular, no doubt referring to a head artisan who acts as supervisor of 
his own ranked group of artisans, assistants, and labourers. Important as the 
Silpin would be to the proper conduct of the festival, Aghoragiva's prescriptions 
insure that the master artisan is ritually subordinate to the chief priest, during 
such rites as the opening of the eyes (erronmilana) of the Nandi banner (MV 


p. 8). 


 Mayamata 5.13-25 distinguishes four categories of artisans (S/pin), starting with the ar- 
chitect (sthapati). Other artisans are explicitly subordinated to the sthapati. 


86 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The inscriptions of medieval Tamil Nadu have surprisingly little to say 
about the skilled craftsmen whose skills and labours were responsible for the 
permanent and temporary constructions that constituted the ritual space of 
the temple. In the context of preparations for festivals, there are only two in- 
scriptions that provide a glimpse of the personnel involved in such work. These 
are both tenth-century inscriptions that refer to the support of a carpenter (#ac- 
can), who is in one case to build an archway or bower (soranam) for the bathing 
ritual on samkränti days (SIX 19.380) and in the other to contribute in some 
way to the celebration of a festival dedicated to Indra, at the Siva temple of 
Tondaimanad (SIT 8.529). Although there are a few inscriptional references 
to festival chariots (Ta. #er), these vehicles seem to have been less common 
a feature of temple processions in medieval times than they were later to be- 
come, and the inscriptions are completely silent about their fabrication (see 


OR 2004b). 


B. ASTRONOMER 


Aghoraëiva speaks of a kartr (literally, “agent”) who is assigned to fix the proper 
time for the festival, based on a calculation of naksatras. ‘The term could re- 
fer to the chief priest as kartr of the entire festival, but it seems more likely 
that Aghoragiva here denotes a specialist known elsewhere in the Âgamas as 
the daivajña, “astronomer” or prognosticator. According to BRUNNER (SP4: 
x-xi), the daivajña is necessary to all occasional and optional $aiva rituals for 
determining favorable times to conduct important actions. During the festival, 
this person must reckon a variety of timings, such as the “auspicious moment” 
(mubhürta) for commencing the chariot procession (MV pp.40-1). Trained as- 
tronomers brought to their ritual task a large body of specialized knowledge, in 
the form of Jyotihéästras. 

The inscriptions rarely mention the figure of the astronomer (Ta. #iru). 
When he is referred to — for example, in two inscriptions of the late tenth and 
early eleventh century (SI 3.151, SII 2.66) — it is outside the festival context, 
and he is simply listed as a regular member of the temple staff. It is very likely 
that in the usual situation where the corps of temple personnel was relatively 
small, the calculations for fixing the auspicious date and time for festivals were 
made by local specialists who were not necessarily attached to the temple. 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 87 


FESTIVAL WORKERS 


À. LABOURERS, COOKS, AND CLEANERS 


Beyond the ritual labour requiring specialized knowledge and skill, there are 
countless additional tasks that need to be accomplished in preparation for and 
during a nine-day temple festival. Before the festival, says Aghoragiva, “one 
should renovate all the festival conveyances . . , one should decorate all festi- 
val locations,starting with the homes of the deities and ending with the roads, 
with stalks of banana and areca trees, with seasonal fruits, sprouts, and flower 
garlands gathered from the coconut, lime, and other trees, and with mirrors, 
gateways, canopies, banners, garlands, and the like (MV p. 4) During the fes- 
tival, someone must fetch provisions and clean paraphernalia, cook food offer- 
ings, prepare flower garlands and unguents, carry poles and pots in processions, 
transport icons from place to place and lift them onto vehicles and into palan- 
quins, pull and push and carry all sorts of things. For the most part Aghoraëiva 
does not mention the categories of menial labourers necessary to the conduct 
of a festival, since he directs his comments to a chief priest and largely confines 
his recommendations to those tasks he considers ritually significant. 

By contrast, there is frequent mention in the inscriptions of the person- 
nel required to carry out menial labour in connection with festivals. This is 
particularly so for the tasks associated with feeding the brahmins, ascetics, and 
devotees who attend the festival. These food workers are referred to particularly 
in inscriptions of the tenth and eleventh centuries and typically include a potter 
(kucuvan), a man to bring firewood (virakituvan), and a person to cleanse the 
floor where food was served (melukituvan); occasionally mention is also made 
of a man to bring water or of a cook. Another important type of festival worker 
is the weaver of garlands (tiruppallittämam), who had special duties at the time 
of weekly, monthly, and annual festivals (ARE 234 of 1961-62, SIT 14.192). 
And while most of those who took part in festival processions were regarded as 
having a certain ritual status or receiving the right to particate as a special privi- 
lege, as we shall soon see, there is at least one case, at Chidambaram, where the 


task of dragging of the temple chariot was assigned to temple labourers (koyir 
kutimai) (SI 12.245). 


88 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


B. PARICARAKAS, ÂTTENDANTS, AND BEARERS 


The Mahotsavavidhi and other Âgama texts do specify one group of temple 
workers: the paricärakas or temple “attendants”. The paricärakas directly assist 
the priests throughout the festival, through such physical actions as transport- 
ing pots, raising images onto vehicles, and carrying tribute offerings during 
balidäna. They play an especially important role during the raising of the festi- 
val banner. During this rite the paricärakas wear the turban (wsnïsa) and upper 
cloth (wrtariya) that signify ritual status, and they pull the ropes that hoist the 
flag high onto the pole (MV p.11). However, they are never called upon to 
recite mantras or perform any ritual action that requires full priestly compe- 
tence. Aghoraëiva says nothing about the qualifications or initiatory status of 
the paricärakas in Mahotsavavidhi, but other Âgamas indicate that they should 
have received the first level of common $aiva initiation (samayadiksä) (UKÀ 
24.53-5, SP3: 418). 

We find in the inscriptions the exact equivalents to the paricärakas described 
by Aghoragiva, who serve as assistants to the priests; these temple servants are 
often identified as mänis (Skt. brahmacärins). They are present in a number of 
cases in the festival context, although their precise duties are not clear (ARE 
137 of 1912; ARE 234 of 1962; SIT 7.525); in inscriptions providing for daily 
worship, however, we find them assigned such tasks as bringing water for the 
sacred bath, assisting in the anointing of the deity, and holding the canopy over 
the image of the deity (SIT 13.386). Inscriptions concerned with festival obser- 
vances frequently mention the performers of such services without referring to 
them as paricärakas or mänis, and in some cases they list them in addition to 
the priestly assistants. So, for example, at Tiruvorriyur the arrangements for the 
annual Pankuni festival made in the mid eleventh century involved not only a 
paricäraka mäni, but a man to bring bath water and men to serve as palanquin 
carriers (#iruppallicivikaiyär) and bearers of garlands (#ruppallittoñkal ituvaär) 
(ARE 137 of 1912).!° That carrying the god's image was regarded as a relatively 
prestigious function, rather than à menial one, is indicated by an inscription 
from Tiruvadavur, where this task was carried out by eight specially designated 


devotees (antarkal) (ARE 483 of 1962-63).!! Bearers of garlands in festival 


10Other references to people assisting in the sacred bath on festival occasions include a ninth- 
century inscription from Tiruccennampundi (SIT 7.525) and an eleventh-century inscription 
from Tiruvannamalai (TAM 47). 

This inscription dates from the late thirteenth century, and may reflect the trend toward 
assigning such ritual roles as privileges; there is even an indication in this inscription that the 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 89 


processions are frequently mentioned, and are clearly distinguished from those 
responsible for cultivating the flower-gardens or weaving the garlands.!? There 
are also several inscriptional references to those who bear lamps in the pro- 
cession and one case where à man is assigned the task of bringing the conse- 
crated offerings (#irmäniyam pokam) (SII 19.380). À number of thirteenth- 
and fourteenth-century inscriptions provide an indication that participating in 
processions could be a purely honorary role, with no real functional dimension: 
from different parts of the Tamil country, all of these involve temple women 
who were granted the right of proximity to the deity and precedence in the 
procession as a result of a gift they had made to the temple, or the outright 
purchase of this privilege.!* Finally there is at least one reference to the men 
who assisted in the raising of the festival flag — again corresponding, perhaps, 
to the paricärakas of Mahotsavavidhi — from thirteenth-century Chidambaram 
(ARE 325 of 1959). 


VIPs 


À. YAJAMANA 


Every festival requires provisions and it needs people to supply those special re- 
sources. As in the Vedic sacrificial system, so in Saiva public rituals one person 
is designated as yajamäna, literally the “sacrificer” or the patron, in the sin- 
gular. However, while the y4jamäna plays a key ritual role in Vedic sacrifice, 
Aghoraëiva does not grant this figure a great deal of ceremonial prominence in 
his prescriptions for the mahotsava.Ÿ* The yajamäna does appear in processions 
and assemblies, and carries out a few special ritual tasks. During the astrayäga, 


actual labour involved in carrying the festival image was the responsibility of a group of twelve 
or sixteen — unnamed — workmen (4/). Perhaps there was a similar division of labour between 
honoured devotees and lower status workers in the case of an inscription of about the same 
time from Tirukkalakkudi (ARE 108 of 1916), where the residents of the region are given the 
privilege of precedence in the holding of the ropes of the temple car and the receipt of sacred 
ash. 

2The one case where this distinction is not so obvious is in a twelfth-century inscription 
from Tiruvarur (SIT 7.485), where the four people given the task of carrying garlands in the 
procession are also charged with taking care of the garden. 

3ARE 143 and 144 of 1940-41 from Nallur; ARE 29 of 1941 from Sakkaramallur; NK 134 
from Tiruppampuram; ARE 210 of 1923 from Tiruppulivanam. In the last case, the temple 
woman carries the flywhisk (cämara) as the Lord's attendant. 

#On the Vedic yajamäna, see MaLaMoUD 1976:156-7. 


90 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


for example, he should perform a set of daily rites along with the priests (MV 
p.20). His most important ritual role, however, comes at the end of the festi- 
val, when he honours the chief priest and other officiants by presenting them 
with honoraria (daksinä). In the Vedic system the yajamäna receives the full 
benefits of the ritual performance, but Aghoraëiva makes no mention of this. 
When Aghorasiva does include statements about the fruits of festival actions, 
these generally speak of benefits to the entire community, not just to the patron 
(MV p. 14). 

The inscriptions scarcely ever identify particular persons as the primary 
sponsors of festivals, but typically describe donations allowing for the insti- 
tution of new services, in perpetuity, within the framework of existing festival 
arrangements — which may be supported by earlier gifts from various indi- 
viduals or other temple resources earmarked for this purpose. The inscription 
from Siddhalingamadam that mentions 4cärya daksinai specifies that it is to be 
provided for from a gift of land donated by a local chief, who has also given 
gold so that the sacred bath and food offerings can be made on the days of Ut- 
tirayana, Daksinäyana, eclipses, and in the month of Aippaci (SIT 19.250). This 
arrangement, however, seems very different from the ceremonial presentation 
of daksinä at the conclusion of the festival described by Aghora$iva. Here and 
in other inscriptions that describe the direct patronage of festival celebrations 
— as in the case of two royal gifts for festivals at Uyyakontan Tirumalai (ARE 
462 of 1908, ARE 383 of 1939-40) or the establishment of a ten-day festival 
in the temple at Kattarimangalam by a local chief (ARE 373 of 1929-30) — 
donors appear to have had no ritual functions. As for the temple women whose 
donations resulted in their receiving special privileges in attending the Lord in 
procession, their gifts were not ones which supported the festival itself. 


B. RULER 


Another shadowy presence in Aghoragiva's festival guide is the ruler, referred to 
as räjan, nrpa, and bhüpa. Aghora$iva does not qualify this term any further, so 
it could refer to the highest level of imperial lordship, such as the Chola king 
during Aghoragiva's time, or to some intermediate political authority or local 
chief. The ruler is distinct from the yajamäna; there is no sense here that the 
ruler need be the festival patron either directly or symbolically. The king does 
not appear to have any ritual responsibility in the festival, as far as Aghoraëiva is 
concerned. However, in processions the ruler should march with his entourage 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 91 


of attendants (bhrtya) on the left side of the deity, while the chief priest walks 
with his underlings on the god's right side (MV p.27). In the procession of 
the priest, likewise, both yzjamäna and ruler acknowledge his preeminence, in 
the domain of this ritual, by walking behind the palanquin in which the priest 
is carried. 

Kings and chiefs had roles to play as temple builders and temple patrons, 
but during the Chola period they shared these roles with many other kinds 
of people — including royal women, merchants, and local landlords — and 
with local corporate groups referred to in the inscriptions as sabhaïiyär, ürär, 
nakarattär, and nättär. All of these types of people had a hand in shaping 
temple festivals, as well, although, as we have just seen, their contributions in 
this connection may not have received ritual acknowledgement in the course 
of the festival. There is no correspondence between Aghoraëiva's provision for 
a place for the ruler in festival processions and what the inscriptions have to tell 
us. 

There is, however, another way in which the persona of the king enters 
into festival arrangements, and this is in connection with the timing of the 
celebration to coincide with the birthday or natal asterism (naksatra) of the 
ruler. Aghora$iva mentions this as an alternative possibility in calculating the 
time to perform a nine-day festival (MV p. 3). An early inscriptional example of 
this pattern comes from tenth-century Tondaimanad, where a seven-day annual 
festival was scheduled so that its last day was the birth star of the Chola king 
Aditya I, at the temple which had been built as a memorial (pallippatai) to 
him (SII 8.529). In some cases, the king himself sponsored such festivals — 
for example, Rajendra I made a gift for a seven-day festival for the goddess 
at Singalantapuram, coordinated with his own naksatra (ARE 233 of 1943- 
44) — but at other temples where the Chola king's birthday was celebrated, 
the temple officials or non-royal donors were responsible for instituting these 
observances (ARE 464 of 1908, ARE 285 of 1912). The kings of the Pandya 
dynasty, on the other hand, were very much implicated in the establishment of 
festivals on the occasion of their own or their relatives’ birthdays — for example, 
at Tiruvanaikkaval (ARE 28 and 201 of 1937-38) and at Madurai (ARE 326 
of 1961-62). 


15At Chidambaram, in 1258, a local official seems to have been responsible for donating 
land to support a number of services named for King Jatavarman Sundara Pandya I, including 
monthly and annual processions and bathing ceremonies at the time of the king's natal star. 
This king is extraordinarily active as a temple patron throughout the Tamil country, beginning 


92 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


OTHER PARTICIPANTS 


All those who attend the mahotsava become participants in a temporary Saiva 
world that is enacted and extended throughout the community during fes- 
tival time. Some, we have seen, are ritual agents and performers who help 
through their actions to create that world. Others participate simply by being 
there. Some festival events are relatively restrictive, but the most important 
ceremonies of the festival—the raising and lowering of the banner, the daily 
processions, the final bath—are intended to be open affairs accommodating 
large congregations of people. 

Aghorasiva often signals the comprehensive openness of festival events with 
terms like sarvajana (all people). Just as the priests summon all deities to take 
part in the festival, so the high-raised festival banner and the resounding clamor 
of drums and conches broadcast an invitation to all humans in the surround- 
ing area. Elsewhere Aghoraëiva refers broadly to sarvabhakta (all devotees) or 
bhaktajana (the devotees). Here bhakta refers to an open-ended group, with 
no limits based on initiation, training, gender, or class status. AI devotees, he 
says, may march along with the deities in procession, or bathe at the #r#ha, or 
receive gifts. 

Participation in the festival world is sometimes graded or ranked. Through- 
out the ceremonies Aghoragiva calls for actions that single out some partici- 
pants. For example, at the onset he instructs important festival participants 
to tie on a special raksasütra, a protective wristlet. First the priest ties a cord 
around the central Siva-liñga, around the ceremonial Trident, and on the wrists 
of all the processional icons. After protecting the deities, Aghoraëiva contin- 
ues, the priest ties wristlets on himself, on the assisting priests, on the tribute- 
carrier (balivähaka), and on the chief drummer (MV p. 24). In effect, the rite of 
raksabandhana articulates an inner group of deities and important ritual actors 
at the center of the festival. 

Likewise processions have their own spatial hierarchies, in Aghoraëiva's 
view. While it encourages all devotees to join the festival processions, the 4- 
hotsavavidhi also sets out a spatial organization for the processors. ‘The deities 
march in a definite order, of course, with the central Somäskanda icon ($iva 
with Umä and Skanda) both preceded and followed by Siva's family and clos- 
est relations: Nandin, Gane$a, Skanda, Devi, and Candeéa. Humans should 
also arrange themselves around the deities in a definite order. Closest to Siva 


with his accession in 1251 (see OrR *2005). 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 93 


on the right hand side is the officiating priest. On Siva's left is the räjan, the 
ruler, along with his entourage. In front of the deity are musicians, dancers, 
and singers. Rudraganikäs dance along both sides of the processing deities. 
Mahä$aivas should march in front of the parade, and behind come brahmins 
who recite the Vedas. After them come Mähesvaras (MV p.27). The proces- 
sional party constitutes a mobile assembly, with proximity to the central Siva 
an index of festival status. 

In Mahotsavavidhi Aghora$iva mentions several special categories of per- 
sons who do not carry out any definite ritual action, but who may march in 
processions, receive things, or simply be present. Aghoragiva assigns a special 
place at the front of processions to those he calls Mahäéaivas. Other Âgama 
texts identify Mahäsaivas as brahmins not of the five Âdiéaiva gotras, but who 
have undergone $aiva initiation. Because they are not Saiva brahmins, they are 
not eligible to undergo äcäryäbhiseka and become temple priests performing 
services on behalf of others. However, at least in the processions they are wor- 
thy of some distinction within the Saiva community. Mäheévaras also march 
in processions, but behind the Mahä$aivas and Vedic brahmins. In Âgama us- 
age Mähesvara refers to members of any varna who have undergone at least the 
first level of Saiva initiation, samayadiksä (SP3, p.416, fn. 457). In the Mahot- 
savavidhi they are assigned one optional ritual task: in the gathering of earth 
(mrisañgrahana) they may carry the pots of earth after it has been collected for 
the sprouting rite of añkurärpana (MV p. 6). 

Within the Saiva system, the Sädhakas constitute a special category of reli- 
gious virtuosi who practice a renunciatory discipline centered on mantra recita- 
tion. To become a Sädhaka, one must undergo the sequence of $aivainitiations, 
and then a special consecration, the sädhakäbhiseka, that confers that status 
(BrUNNER 1975). They are not qualified to perform $aiva ritual on behalf of 
others, and Aghorasiva gives them no ritual assignment during the mahotsava. 
However, Sädhakas apparently do attend temple festivals, and at several mo- 
ments they receive powder or paste to smear on themselves, as do other partic- 
ipants. For example, in the festival of Dancing Siva, the priest prepares a black 
balm and smears it on the images of the deities, then on himself. ‘The black 
balm is then distributed to the m#rtipas, to the Sädhakas, and to all devotees 
present (MV p. 44). 

Aghorasiva assigns at least one ritual task, optionally, to those he calls sw- 
väsints, married women of good homes, in the plural. During the rite ofillumi- 
nation (#/räjana), either married women or Rudraganikäs may wave the lamp 


94 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


in front of the deity. Other Âgamas sometimes give these virtuous women ad- 
ditional festival roles. For example, in the wedding festival (which Aghoraëiva 
merely mentions without giving any procedural details), married women pre- 
pare the image of the goddess and honour her before she is taken to the wedding 
pavilion. 

Finally, some groups are mentioned in Mahotsavavidhi only as recipients 
of festival largess. So at several points Aghoraëiva directs that gifts of gold, 
food, and other valuables be given to brahmins, without specifying which brah- 
mins. Î presume here that all brahmins, regardless of gotra or initiatory status, 
could partake of these presentations. At the conclusion of the Ganeéa festi- 
val, which precedes the main nine-day Siva mahotsava, gifts should be given 
to the wretched (na), the poor (krpana), and the blind (ardha) (MV p. 4). 
Giving to these worthy and needy recipients is an inherently auspicious action, 
appropriate to the world of the festival. 

In the medieval Tamil inscriptions, by far the most commonly encountered 
people of the festival are those honoured devotees who are provided with meals 
at the temple during the festival. Sometimes they are said to have come to the 
temple to serve or worship the god — or in one instance to participate in the 
raising of the festival flag (ARE 430 of 1961-62) — but these are not people 
who are assigned ritual roles. The food they receive has not been offered to the 
deity, but is prepared especially for them, although occasionally they are fed at 
the same time or immediately following the time that the Lord receives food 
offerings.!° Providing for such festival feeding seems to have been an attractive 
option for donors who wished to contribute to the auspiciousness of the fes- 
tival occasion, perhaps because their gift could have an impact even if it were 
relatively modest. For example, in the eleventh century a man donated gold, 
for the merit of himself and his mother, to provide for a perpetual lamp and for 
the feeding of five brahmins during the seven days of the festival in the month 


16There are a few references to the distribution of consecrated food as a temple honour be- 
ginning in the thirteenth century, including in temples dedicated to Siva (cf. BRUNNER 19694, 
Davis *1986:234-39), but none of these occur in the festival context. The only form of festival 
prasädam that we encounter in Chola period inscriptions is the parivattam, the cloth that has 
been worn by the images of the deities which is given to certain worshipers to wear on their 
heads, and only in one case is the recipient mentioned — à temple woman who had set up 
an image of the goddess and provided for its worship (TAS 6.15 = KK 256, translated in Orr 
2000, see pp. 75-6 and 228 n. 24). As we have already seen, temple women also received prece- 
dence in festival processions as a consequence of having made donations or having purchased 
the rights to this privilege. 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 95 


of Pankuni, at the Siva temple of Kudumiyamalai (SIT 17.349). In other cases, 
the number of devotees receiving food was huge: a thousand people fed during 
the seven-day festival at Tondaimanad (SIT 8.529), a thousand pots of rice pre- 
pared for feeding the Mäheévaras in the month of Âni at Chidambaram (SII 
4.223), a thousand devotees fed at the Pankuni festival at Tirumananjeri (ARE 
2 of 1914), and a thousand pilgrim ascetics (defäntri tavasiyar) fed in the course 
of the ten-day festival of Âvani at Madurai (ARE 278 of 1941-42). These ar- 
rangements, however, were not meant to provide for the requirements of all 
the people who attended the festival nor as charity for the needy. Although 
of various identities, all of the recipients of food were particularly worthy, and 
providing them with food was a meritorious act. Among them there were brah- 
mins, ‘ivayogis, Mäheévaras, and ascetics (apasvis) — some of whom were also 
identified as devotees (4riyär) or pilgrims (desäntri, apürvi). 

From the tenth to the thirteenth centuries, there is a shift in the types of 
recipients who were most often provided for. In the tenth century, the majority 
of inscriptions recording arrangements for festival feeding mention brahmins, 
while in the twelfth and thirteenth centuries, brahmins had altogether disap- 
peared from this context. Meanwhile, Svayogis were quite prominent in the 
eleventh century but faded from view by the thirteenth century, and Mähes- 
varas and ascetics became increasingly dominant. The term mähefvara in the 
inscriptions most often designates Siva devotees in a very general sense, so it is 
difficult to determine whether the Mäheévaras who received food at the times 
of festivals are a special category of Saivas, corresponding to the Âgama defini- 
tion. In any case, neither they nor any other actors referred to in the inscrip- 
tions (such as the fvayogis) who might be identified with the Mahäsaivas or 
Sädhakas mentioned by Aghoragiva have particular roles to play in the context 
of the festival. 


CONCLUSION 


Together these two types of sources provide a fuller approximation of what a 
Saiva temple festival of the late Chola period might have involved. We see a mo- 
bilization of many resources, and many human actors, to perform an extended 
community act of devotion. This event involves not just ritual specialists, but 
also musicians (especially drummers) and reciters, dancers, and many assistants 
to carry out the great variety of tasks needed to complete the mahotsava. I is 
also an event that attracts masses of people to participate, and one that therefore 


96 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


requires feeding on a grand scale. 

Yet the differences in orientation of the two types of texts, and the per- 
spectives they offer on the medieval temple festival, also become clearer in this 
juxtaposition. Aghoraëiva's concern with providing guidelines for priests' ac- 
tivities grants us one kind of insider view of the festival. We see in the Mahor- 
savavidhi the importance of priestly recitation of Sanskrit mantras, especially 
$aiva ones, and other core ritual acts, as essential to the activation of the festi- 
val. In the view of the Mahotsavavidhi, the priest is the agent of transformation 
in the temple festival. Yet the centrality of the priest does not appear in the 
inscriptions. 

Inscriptions as legal-like texts recording arrangements made for the per- 
formance of the festival provide à different insider view. We see the detailed 
records of various categories of individual persons who sponsor many of the ac- 
tivities of the festival, or become recipients of festival largess. These individuals 
may have no particular ritual role or ongoing association with the temple, yet 
within the festival they are transformed into participants in the world of the 
Siva temple, and their actions come to have ritual significance within it. 

Both perspectives recognize a hierarchy among those who participate, but 
they articulate their ranking through different means. Aghorasiva envisions a 
scale of involvement and capacity based on ritual status, as calculated princi- 
pally by birth and initiatory level. Yet he also admits implicitly the value of 
other forms of specialist knowledge, such as that of Silpin or chief drummer, 
and other grounds of status or authority, in figures such as the ruler or pa- 
tron. In the Mahotsavavidhi we see the hierarchy of festival people expressed 
most directly in the spatial organization of persons during processions and other 
congregational groupings. In the inscriptions ritual recognition is primarily ex- 
pressed through the feeding of persons whose status results from their identities 
as brahmins, ascetics, or devotees of Siva. 

Finally, the two types of texts seem to reflect two distinct but overlapping 
worlds of value, which roughly correspond to the terms kriyä (ritual) and bhakti 
(devotion). The Âgama ethos of Aghoragiva is one of ritual, similar to (but 
certainly not based on) the Vedic sacrificial ethos. From the $aiva priestly per- 
spective the powers of ritual action grounded in the recitation of mantras is 
fundamental, though devotion to $Siva may also be an important secondary 
value. The ethos of the inscriptions appears closer to the devotional world of 
values as articulated in the hymns of the Tamil Saiva saints. While these hymns 
emphasize the superior efficacy of emotional attachment to $iva, they also rec- 


Richard H. Davis & Leslie C. Orr 97 


ognize and value the role of properly directed ritual action. In the festival these 
two worlds of value join together. 


INSCRIPTIONAL SOURCES 


ARE Annual Reports on Indian Epigraphy. 1905-. Delhi: Manager of Pub- 
lications. Transcripts of the inscriptions abstracted in the ARE were 
graciously made available to Leslie OrR at the Office of the Chief 
Epigraphist, Archaeological Survey of India, Mysore. 


EI Epigraphia Indica. 1892-—. Calcutta/ Delhi: Director General, Archaeolog- 
ical Survey of India. 


IPS /nscriptions (Texts) of the Pudukkottai State arranged according to Dynasties. 
1929. Pudukkottai. 


KK Kanniyakumari kalvettukal. 1972. Ed. N. Kacinatan. Madras: Tamil 
Nadu State Department of Archaeology. 


NK ÂMannilam kalvettukal. 1979-80. 3 volumes. Ed. A. Patmavati. Madras: 
Tamil Nadu State Department of Archaeology. 


PI Pondicherry Inscriptions. Putuccéri Mänilak Kalvëttukkal. Part I: Introduc- 
tion and texts with notes, compiled by Bahour $S. Kuppusamy, ed. G. 
Vijayavenugopal. Collection Indologie 83.1 Pondicherry: IFP/EFEO. 


SIT South Indian Inscriptions. 1891-1990. volumes 2-26. Delhi: Director- 
General, Archaeological Survey of India. 


SITI South Indian Temple Inscriptions. 1953-57. Ed. T.N. Subrahmaniam. 


Madras: Government Oriental Manuscripts Library. 


TAM Tiruvannamalai: À Saiva Sacred Complex of South India, volumes 1.1 
and 1.2: Inscriptions, introduction, edition, translation by P.R. Srini- 
vasan. Publications de l’Institut Français d’Indologie 75. Pondicherry: 
IFP, 1990. 


TAS Travancore Archaeological Series. 1910-1938. Volumes 1-8. Trivandrum. 


98 


Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Note sur les modes de représentation de Sadäsiva dans 
l'ordonnance iconographique et architecturale du temple 


PIERRE-SYLVAIN FILLIOZAT 


Gopinath Rao en son temps avait jugé bon de faire un exposé de la philoso- 
phie du $saivasiddhänta pour introduire la section qu’il consacrait aux images 
de Sadäsiva dans ses Elements of Hindu Iconography'. I] avait pressenti que 
les représentations plastiques qui peuplent les temples hindous peuvent, le cas 
échéant, représenter des concepts théologiques de la plus haute abstraction. Il 
avait extrait du Värulasuddhägama la matière de son exposé sur cette doctrine. 
Cette démarche de pionnier peut être poursuivie aujourd’hui où un plus grand 
nombre de textes, mieux édités, nous sont accessibles, où les travaux d'Hélène 
BRUNNER ont apporté beaucoup de clarté, où ce qui à l’époque héroïque des 
années 50 a été une spécialité rare, est devenu en ce début de siècle un do- 
maine de recherche international promettant de prendre une place de choix 
dans l’indianisme du XXI° siècle. Le but de cet article est d'examiner comment 
les grands imagiers et architectes des temples de Siva ont cherché à lier des con- 
cepts aussi abstraits que le bindu, les brahma-mantra ou visages de Sadäsiva, les 
trente-six fattva ou essences composant l’univers, etc., aux monuments et élé- 
ments plastiques qu’ils avaient charge de créer. Un premier lien est la représen- 
tation plastique directe. Ce n’est pas ce que l’on observe le plus souvent dans 
les temples de Siva. Il existe des images de Sadäsiva. Mais elles sont très peu 
nombreuses. D'ailleurs les textes descriptifs des traits de Sadäsiva, eux-mêmes, 
visent le plus souvent la représentation mentale et non pas directement visuelle. 
Cependant le temple est le lieu de la présence de cette entité. Il est probable 
que les maîtres d'œuvre l’ont conçu comme tel, non pas comme un support 
neutre sans rapport avec l’essence de l’être destiné à y résider, mais comme un 
véritable corps de cet être, qui procure à l’officiant l’outil nécessaire du rituel 
et donne à voir aux fidèles ce qu'est l’essence profonde de l’être suprême qu’ils 
viennent vénérer. 


lGopinatha Rao T. AÀ., Elements of Hindu Iconography, 1e édition, Madras, 1914 ; réim- 
pression, Motilal Banarsidass, Delhi, 1997. Voir Volume Two Part IL, p.361 sqq. 


100 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Comprendre Sadäsiva et comprendre le temple, c’est comprendre le fonds 
de la doctrine éivaïte. Le concept qui commande toute la théologie éivaïte est 
celui de Pati, « Seigneur ». Etant donné sa transcendance qui le place au-delà 
des capacités humaines de conception et d’expression par la parole, il ne sup- 
porterait ni définition de son essence, ni analyse de caractères, ni représentation 
plastique, s’il ne se donnait la faculté de prendre plusieurs états dans lesquels 
il se rend accessible à ses fidèles, sinon d'emblée, du moins par des hypostases 
intermédiaires à de multiples niveaux. Le vidyäpäda du Matañgapäramesvara 
commence sa description de l’univers $ivaïte par cette catégorie en lui recon- 
naissant trois états. Nous le traduisons en suivant la Matañgavrtti de Bhatta 
Rämakantha’ : 


layabhogädhikärähvas tritattvoktinidarsanät 
padärthah patinämaäsau prathamah parikirtitah 2.14 


« La première catégorie, Pati de nom, est bien connue comme ayant cette appel- 
lation par l’état de la résorption, l’état de l'expérience, l’état de l’action, parce 
qu’elle montre sous forme verbale cette triple essence. » 

Bhatta Rämakantha explicite la distinction intéressante faite ici entre des 
noms comme Vyomavyäpin et autres issus d’attributs (#p4dhi), qui sont à la fois 
des qualifications et des noms personnels, et le nom propre qui révèle l’essence 
profonde de son porteur. En l'occurrence Pati est un nom propre fondé sur un 
ensemble de trois tattva « essences ». Bhatta Rämakantha développe donc ce 
que sont ces trois essences ou « états » (avasthà) de l'essence fondamentale. 

Le laya est l’état dans lequel Pati est ce en quoi tous les objets d’action 
sont résorbés ; c’est Siva miskala « sans kalä ». Le bhoga est l’état adopté en 
quittant le précédent, où Pati est simplement disposé à agir vis-à-vis des objets 
d'action (käryam praty udyuktatämäträ), état où il y a relation avec la matière 
pure appelée Bindu ; c’est Siva szkalaniskala « avec et sans kalä ». L'adhikära est 
l’état adopté en quittant le précédent, dans lequel Pati a un corps et accomplit 
les objets d'action (käryasampattisariratä) ; c’est Sadäsiva sakala ; en lui sont 
incluses les puissances ($zkri) et les Vidyeévara « Seigneurs des Mantra ». 

Cette triade d’essences est le sujet principal des troisième et quatrième 
patala. L'on a tout d’abord un développement relatif aux deux premiers sattva, 
laya et bhoga. L'adhikära, beaucoup plus diversifié, est réservé pour le qua- 


?Matañgapäramesvarägama (Vidyäpäda) avec le commentaire de Bhatta Rämakantha, édition 
critique pqr N.R. BHaTT, PIFI 56, Pondichéry, IFI, 1977. 


Pierre-Sylvain Filliozat 101 


trième patala. Le laya par son caractère transcendant est présenté dans une 
seule strophe : 


tasmäd eva param tattvam acalam sarvatomukham 20 
Jasmin präptasya na punarjanmehästi kadäcana (214) 


« Donc il y a une essence suprême, non changeante, faisant face à tout. Pour 
celui qui l’a atteinte, il n’y a jamais plus de renaissance ici-bas. » 

Cette srophe évoque la nature de cif, « conscience » qui fait que le sujet 
est capable de connaissance et d’action (4rkkriyä), du principe suprême et sa 
propriété fondamentale de ne pas être sujet à transformation. La transforma- 
tion est, en effet, le critère principal distinguant la matière acit « inconsciente 
et inanimée » du sujet fait de cit. La qualification sarvatomukha fait entendre la 
présence, la nature de témoin, universelles et perpétuelles du principe suprême. 
Bhatta Rämakantha insiste sur l’idée de sa présence sans l’intermédiaire d’un 
support, corps ou autre. Le principe suprême se distingue ainsi du yogin qui 
se rend omniprésent en habitant divers supports, mais n’est pas éternellement, 
universellement présent, sans aucun obstacle à sa puissance. 

L'hypostase en la deuxième essence du bhoga qui est en relation avec des 
supports (adhistheya) différenciant, conduit à traiter des premières formes de 
matière. 


itthamgunavatas tasmät tattvät tattvam aninditam 21 
sphuradra$misahasrädhyam adhastäd vyäpakam mahat 
paribhäsitam ity etannämnä bindur ihocyate 22 
caturdhävasthitam vedyam prerakam jagato vyayam (234) 


« De cette essence douée de telles propriétés dérive, à un niveau en-dessous, 
une essence irréprochable, riche de milliers de rayons brillants, présente [en 
toute transformation], puissante, sujette à dénominations ; on en parle donc 
ici sous le nom de bindu. Elle doit être connue comme établie en quatre parties, 
incitatrice de l’univers, sans déclin. » 

Le bhogatattva est en fait défini non pas par des propriétés ou fonctions, 
mais par ce en quoi il réside (adhistheya). Bhatta Rämakantha souligne que 
de nature il ne diffère pas du layatattva et que la différence qui le sépare de 
l'essence d’origine vient de ce qu’il réside dans une matière, à la définition 
de laquelle sont consacrées les deux strophes. Il ajoute que c’est cette matière 
qui peut donner prise à la vénération du fidèle, car elle donne une forme au 


102 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


principe qui l’habite (adhisthatr). Sous le nom de bindu est donc présentée 
une matière qualifiée par son irréprochabilité en raison de son caractère tou- 
jours bénéfique (f#bhatva), de nature lumineuse, sujette à transformations en 
restant présente dans la totalité du produit issu d’elle, potentialité de multi- 
ples produits. Le bindu se divise en quatre parties, donnant chaque fois une 
forme différente à son résident : /bhagavän] prati sthänam adhisthätrtayä bhin- 
näkära evopäsyas tattatpadapräptikämair iti (p.71, dern. 1.) « [le Seigneur] pour 
chaque résidence, en sa qualité de résident, sous une forme différente est objet 
de culte par ceux qui désirent atteindre tel ou tel de ces domaines ». Bhatta 
Rämakantha en parle ici comme objet d’upäsana, plus loin comme objet de 
dhyäna « représentation mentale ». C’est donc une mise en relation du principe 
divin avec l'acte rituel ou mystique : #ac ca na kevalam bindvätmanaiva yä- 
vacchäntyädibhedena caturdhävasthitamapi dhyeyam fäntyädipadapräptikämaih 
(p.72) «et ce [rattva] n’est pas seulement objet de méditation en son corps de 
bindu, pour autant qu’il est établi en quatre parties par sa division en “ni etc., 
par ceux qui désirent atteindre le domaine de fnti etc. » Bhatta Rämakantha 
conclut sur cette idée d’une matière du bhogatattva donnant une forme acces- 
sible à l’action du fidèle, à la différence du layatattva qui reste inaccessible : 
evam bindvätmakädhistheyabhedatah samyojanopäsanäbhedasiddher layatattväd 
bhedena bhogäkhyam tattvam pratipäditam (p.72) « ainsi a été exposée l'essence 
appelée ‘expérience’ par différenciation d’avec l'essence de résorption, d’après 
la différenciation de ce en quoi elle réside, à savoir le bindu, par la réalisation 
[par cela] de différents [actes], imposition et culte] ». Ici est introduite la men- 
tion d’un autre rite de grande importance dans le $ivaïsme, le samyojana, plus 
communément appelé #yäsa, imposition d’un principe sur le corps du fidèle, 
sur un objet du culte, la cordelette de la #ksä et autre support du rituel. 

L'Agama explicite ensuite quelles sont ces quatre parties du bindu, dont 
la première est fänti. Bhatta Rämakantha l’introduit comme la première dans 
l’ordre de la création. Ces parties se succèdent donc comme transformations de 
la matière bindu dans un ordre consacré. Cela suggère une première hiérarchie, 
la précédence dans le temps donnant une supériorité en qualité. D’autre part 
Bhatta Rämakantha les présente comme constituant des bhuvana « mondes ». 
Elles apparaissent ainsi encore comme une matière, celle des mondes dont on 
connait par ailleurs le concept, le nombre élevé et la classification sous le chef 
des cinq entités, les quatre kalä englobantes, änti etc. avec leur dépassement 
fäntyatita. 


fäntibhedah sthitah pürvam yaträsau paramesvarah 23 


Pierre-Sylvain Filliozat 103 


fäntamürtir iti khyäto vrtah Säntair mahätmabhih 
sahasrädityasamkäsair visphuradbhih samantatah 24 
kotisatasahasrais tu svaviryagunasälibhih (25a) 


« La variété finti est établie en premier, dans laquelle le Seigneur suprême est 
connu comme $Säntamürti ‘au corps fnt4’, entouré de grandes âmes fra, à 
l'éclat de mille soleils, rayonnantes de toutes parts, au nombre de dix millions 
cent mille (?), douées de qualités de puissance qui leur sont propres ». 

Le nom fnti, que nous ne traduisons pas en raison de son caractère tech- 
nique, signifie « paix », ce qui est déjà une caractérisation. La définition du texte 
porte plus sur les entités résidentes que sur la nature de la résidence. Ces en- 
tités apparaissent en nombre élevé, le Seigneur suprême et une catégorie d’âmes 
délivrées, de qualité égale. Bhatta Rämakantha situe la nti dans le cadre de 
l’activité rituelle, comme objet de dhyäna en la mettant en relation avec un 
visage de Sadäsiva, Tatpurusa isolé : yaträsau bhogatattväbhidhänah Säntamür- 
titayà kevalatatpurusäkäratvena tatpadadhyäyinäm khyätah « [la variété Sänti] 
dans laquelle ce [Seigneur suprême] dénommé par son essence d’expérience, 
est connu de ceux qui méditent sur son domaine, comme ayant pour forme 
Tatpurusa isolé par sa propriété d’avoir un corps santa … ». Ceci est important 
comme établissant un lien entre la conception théologique et le rituel, car l’on 
sait que Sadäsiva est le destinataire fondamental du culte du Liñga. C’est lui 
dont l’Ajitägama prescrit l'évocation mentale et l’invitation sur le trône préparé 
pour le culte (Ajitamahätantra XX.158-165). Sadaäsiva est une figure com- 
plexe, constituée des cinq principaux antra du rituel. Chaque destinataire 
de l’hommage formulé dans le mantra est l’objet d’une représentation mentale, 
éventuellement visuelle, d’un visage sur une face du Linga. Chaque visage a une 
caractérisation distinctive. Les variétés du bindu ici évoquées sont les matières 
du corps de chacune de ces entités, prise isolée des autres. La nature de chaque 
variété définit le caractère de la forme de chaque visage. Le « corps Sänta » du 
Seigneur ici défini indique la forme apaisée, sereine, majestueuse de Tatpurusa. 

La partie, essence ou monde, suivante du bindu est appelée vidyä. 


vidyäkhyam aparam tasmät tejomürter mahätmanah 25 
sthänam tattejasä diptam kotyagrena samantatah 
vyäptam bhuvanapälänäm visvarñpakriätmanäm 26 


« Après, il y a l'entité appelée vidyä, établissement de l’âme suprême au corps 
de lumière, illuminé par cette lumière de toutes parts, pénétré par plus de dix 
millions de protecteurs de mondes au corps fait de toute forme. » 


104 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Bhatta Rämakantha précise que c’est cette même essence d’expérience du 
Seigneur « qui est objet de méditation en tant que résident sous la forme 
d’Aghora isolé par sa propriété d’avoir un corps de lumière, de la part des s4d- 
haka qui désirent atteindre ce domaine » (tattvam tejomürtitayàä kevaläghorä- 
kärenädhisthätrtayàä dhyeyam tatpadapräptikämaih sädhakaih). Les notions de 
vidyä « connaissance » et de rejas « lumière » sont ici associées, la première 
dénommant le type de matière, la seconde le caractère du corps du Seigneur. 
Téjas réfère à la fois à l'éclat de la lumière et l’ardeur de la chaleur. Cela fait 
une caractérisation de cette entité. Bhatta Rämakantha en développe la présen- 
tation dans la même ligne. $’y rattache le visage d’Aghora qui a en partage 
cette nature éclatante. Les êtres faits de cette matière sont des « protecteurs des 
mondes » en nombre élevé, une conception royale sur le plan théologique. La 
qualification qui leur est donnée, vifvarñpakrtätman, fait ressortir leur égalité de 
nature avec cet aspect du Seigneur suprême. Si elle apparaît peu précise, Bhatta 
Rämakantha comble l'attente en glosant vi$va « tout » par vicitra « varié, éton- 
nant » et vicitra par bhairaväkära « de forme terrifiante », glissement de sens 
par lequel il conduit à un caractère frappant de l'aspect Aghora de Sadaäsiva. 
Enfin il met la méditation sur cette figure dans le personnage du sädhaka qui 
est un fidèle visant l’entrée dans un domaine supérieur, distingué de ce fait de 
l’aspirant à la délivrance des liens du monde. 

L'entité suivante est la pratistha. 


tato dhastät pratisthäkhyam sthänam atyadbhutodayam 
taträpy amrtamuürtes tu pariväro mriätmakah 27 
laksäyutasahasräni yaträmrtavapusmatäm 

fivänäm fivamärge Smin vyäkhyätam paramärthatah 28 


« En-dessous de cette entité il y a celle appelée pratisthä, établissement de la plus 
merveilleuse élévation ; [le Seigneur] au corps d’ambroisie y a un entourage fait 
d’ambroisie, dans lequel il y a cent onze milliers de Siva au corps d’ambroisie, 
est-il expliqué dans cette voie de $iva au titre de la plus haute réalité ». 

Bhatta Rämakantha reconnaît l’aspect Vämadeva de Sadäéiva : kevalavä- 
madevamürtyätmakam tatpadam abhidhyeyam tatpadasädhakaih « ce domaine 
constitué en le corps de Vimadeva, est l’objet de méditation par les aspirants 
à ce domaine ». L'ambroisie caractérise cet aspect. L’entourage (parivära) est 
celui des sädhaka arrivés à leur but et qui ont acquis un corps de cette même 
matière. 


Pierre-Sylvain Filliozat 105 


Du point de vue de l’ordre d’apparition dans la création (srs#i) qui a 
été adopté jusqu’à présent, la dernière entité à apparaître dans la carrière 
du bhogatattva est la nivrtti. L’'Agama à son propos adopte le point de vue 
de la résorption (samhära) ce qui lui donne une priorité de résorption du 
bhogatattva, la fait donc succéder à l’action de résorption, terme de la carrière 
de l’adhikäratattva et la met sur le chemin de la marche du Seigneur vers son 
layatattva ultime. 


vinivrttädhikärasya pañcamantramahätanoh 

gacchatah paramäm kästhäm visrämo yatra dhimatah 29 
tan nivritir iti khyätam sthänam sthänavatäm varam 
sthiramürtir amoghätmä yaträsau parame$varah 30 


« Lentité dans laquelle il y a latence de l’Être fait de conscience, qui a pour 
grand corps les cinq "antra, qui a déjà cessé toute action et va vers son état 
suprême, est appelée nivrtti ; c’est l'établissement de choix des Âmes qui y ont 
accédé, dans lequel le Seigneur suprême de nature infaillible a un corps stable ». 

L'Être au corps de cinq mantra est Sadäsiva, ici nommé pour la première 
fois. Le terme ivriti signifie « arrêt ». Il désigne ici un monde (bhuvana) 
dernier des mondes créés. Son nom le caractérise, c’est un lieu de repos 
(vifräma). Lors de la résorption, à la fin d’un cycle de vie de l'univers, ces 
mondes apparus dans le bhogatattva se résorbent les uns dans les autres dans 
l'ordre inverse de la création, donc à partir de nivrtti. La cessation d’action 
est déjà accomplie dans l’état d’action (4dhikära) et il y a marche vers l’état 
de repos (layatattva). On voit ici une conception non pas d’un cycle dans 
lequel l’ordre « création, vie, dissolution » se renouvellerait, mais d’un re- 
tour sur soi par inversion de cet ordre. La résorption accomplie dans l’état 
d'action, conduit à un retour dans l’état d'expérience qui à son tour conduit 
à l’état de repos. L'aspect ivriti du bindu est ici présenté dans ce mouve- 
ment de retour sur soi du Seigneur. Dans ce mouvement il est un premier lieu 
d'étape. Bhatta Rämakantha glose vifrämah par prathamah vilambah « première 
latence ». Comme il l’a fait pour les autres variétés du bindu, il indique sa rela- 
tion avec un visage de Sadä$iva : yaträsau bhogäkhyatativarüpah paramesvarah 
sthiramürtih kevalasadyojätäkäro ‘dhisthätriayäbhidhyeyas tatpadapräptikämais 
tan nivrttibhuvanam « le monde nivrtti est ce dans quoi le Seigneur suprême 
sous la forme de l’essence appelée expérience, étant de corps stable, a pour 
forme Sadyojäta isolé, est objet de méditation en tant que résident, par ceux 
qui désirent atteindre ce domaine ». 


106 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Dans les strophes suivantes le Matañgapäramesvara montre le retour suc- 
cessif aux mondes pratisthä, vidyä et änti. I] aboutit à un cinquième monde 
au-delà de cette série : 


fäntyatitam param tattvam avinäsy avyayätmakam 32 
yenonmilitasadbhäväh pasavah ivatäm gatäh (33a) 


« L'entité suprême est ntyatita, indestructible, de nature éternelle ; les âmes 
liées chez qui la conscience pure est éveillée par elle acquièrent la qualité de 
Siva. » 

Bhatta Rimakantha glose intyatita par bindubhuvana « monde de bindu » ; 
c’est l’aspect pur de la matière du bindu éternel, les quatre autres en étant des 
transformations. Il le marque bien comme le sommet et le terme de l’évolution 
en retour : tadanupasamhärena kevalam tatkäryabhütam iänabhuvanam saha 
tanniväsibhir upasamhrtya param tattvam layäbhidhänam yäti « en raison de 
l'absence de résorption de cette entité, après résorption [des précédents mon- 
des] dans le monde d’I$äna qui est le produit [du même fntyatita|, isolé, [le 
Seigneur] va dans l'essence suprême appelée /aya ». 

Ce texte intéresse la recherche du lien entre le concept de Sadäsiva et le con- 
cept du temple. Il traite non pas de l’essence spirituelle (cis) du dieu, mais d’une 
matière lui donnant le corps lui permettant de prendre ses états d’expérience 
et d’action (bhogävasthä, adhikärävasthä). Cette matière est le bindu doué de 
quatre aspects, que le texte qualifie principalement d’essence, réalité fondamen- 
tale (#attva), dont Bhatta Rämakantha rappelle l'identité spatiale de monde 
(bhuvana) et de corps (mwrti) de Sadäsiva. Les quatre corps sont en fait les 
corps de quatre des cinq parties de Sadäéiva. Une caractérisation plus détail- 
lée de ces corps est faite dans de nombreux textes, notamment dans d’autres 
passages du Matañgapäramesvara, en rapport étroit avec le rituel, donc dans le 
kriyäpäda (par exemple l’imposition (y4sa) dans les points cardinaux des vis- 
ages de Sadaäsiva dans le culte du cercle interne de la divinité (garbhävarana), 
14.83b-91). Le texte le plus instructif en cette matière est certes le Prñcäva- 
ranastava d’Aghorasiväcärya dont on possède dorénavant une édition critique 
fournissant non seulement un texte sûr, mais aussi une présentation détaillée 
des sources de l’auteur et de nombreux textes parallèles. Nous renvoyons à cette 
étude désormais fondamentale*. Nous nous contenterons ici de proposer une 


Sche Pañcävaranastava of Aghorasiväcärya: À twelfih-century South Indian prescription for the 
visualisation of Sadäsiva and his retinue. An annotated critical edition by: Dominic GoopaLi, 


Pierre-Sylvain Filliozat 107 


compréhension du temple comme représentant la matière bindu et ses quatre 
aspects, voire les corps correspondants des aspects de Sadäsiva. 

Nous prenons comme base de comparaison les traits suivants, apparaissant 
dans le texte cité ici du Matañgapäramesvara à partir des noms des cinq mon- 
des du bindu et dans le Visnudharmottara 3.48, afin de suggérer le caractère 
unanime de cette classification dans un éventail de textes plus large que ceux 
de l’école du saivasiddhänta : 


nivrtti Sadyojata | terre | blanc ouest 
pratisthà | Vamadeva | eau | rouge nord 
vidyä Aghora feu | noir sud 
$anti Tatpurusa | air | doré est 
£intyatita | Iéäna vide | translucide | zénith 


Nous montrons dans un tableau distinct les caractères que nous font entrevoir 
le Matañgapäramesvara d'une part pour les mondes nivriti etc. et le Visnudha- 
rmottara pour les visages Sadyojäta etc. 


Matañgapäramesvara Visnudharmottara 
nivrtti cessation d’action Sadyojäta | Nandi, félicité 
pratisthä | stabilité Vämadeva | Uma 
vidyà lumière, connaissance | Aghora Bhairava, terrifiant 
$anti apaisement, majesté | Tatpurusa | Mahädeva 
$äntyatita | transcendance I$äna Sadäsiva 


Nous avons cru pouvoir montrer comment, dans le temple de Kadambesvara 
à Rattihalli au Karnätaka, objet d’une rénovation quasi-complète en 1238, 
sous le patronage d’un personnage considérable, Homnabommisetti, vice-roi 
de l’empereur Sevuna, sous la direction d’un religieux du nom de Mürujävideva 
appartenant au mouvement Kälämukha, un maître d'œuvre et sculpteur de 
génie a conçu et réalisé une série d’images de Siva dont les traits sont les carac- 
tères distinctifs des visages de Sadäéiva, en les répartissant dans les directions qui 
leur sont assignées“, figures de majesté à l’est, figures violentes au sud, figures 
de paix et félicité à l’ouest, figures féminines au nord. Ce cas est un exemple 


Nibedita RouT, R. SATHYANARAYANAN, S. A. S. SARMA, T. GANESAN, S. SAMBANDHASIVACARYA, 
Collection Indologie 102, Pondicherry : IFP/EFEO, 2005 

ÉPierre-Sylvain FizzroZaAT, « Structures architecturales et iconographiques de temples de 
Siva au Karnätaka du XI° au XIII° siècle », dans Comptes rendus de l'Académie des inscriptions 
et belles-lettres, Paris, 2001. 


108 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


ponctuel d’une recherche qui gagnerait à être conduite sur un grand nombre de 
temples où l’on observe une régularité de disposition des images. On retrou- 
vera, par exemple, une semblable répartition des icônes entre les différentes 
façades, à Pattadakkal dans les quatre temples aux murs couverts de sculptures, 
Lokeévara, Trailokyeévara, Samgamesvara, Papanätha. La diversité infinie de 
l’iconographie rend la tâche longue et difficile. Il y a aussi du côté des textes 
une certaine diversité des traits des différents visages selon Les points cardinaux. 
L'examen du tableau d’iconographie tiré du Pañcävaranastava laisse voir pour 
chaque point cardinal une caractérisation générale semblable à celle des vis- 
ages de Sadäsiva. Ce texte nous révèle aussi quelques points particuliers. On 
y voit deux caractérisations d’Aghora l’une par des traits terrifiants, l’autre par 
des traits de douceur, comme une réponse à la lettre du nom antiphrastique 
Aghora « Non-terrible » de l’entité terrifiante par excellence. On peut voir sur 
certaines sculptures un sourire sur une bouche armée de crocs, par exemple un 
Bhairava dansant, dans le temple de Kadambe$vara à Rattihalli, tour sud, façade 
sud, niveau 2 (FIGURE 1). La littérature évoque de temps à autre le rire écla- 
tant de Siva, appelé à l’aide d’une onomatopée attahäsa, rire qui laisse voir les 
dents blanches, d’autant plus frappant sur le visage noir aux cheveux rougeoy- 
ants d’Aghora. Ce rire est un concept grandiose du éivaïsme. Il semble être le 
propre des formes violentes du dieu, celle de l’acteur du pralaya par exemple, 
comme le glorifie cette épithète de K%/abhairava tirée d’un hymne populaire 
dans le mètre #inaka, Kälabhairavästaka, placé sous le nom de Samkara’ : 


attahäsabhinnapadmajändakosasamtatim … 
käsikäpurädhinäthakälabhairavam bhaje 7 


« Je vénère Kälabhairava, Seigneur de la ville de Käëï, .…., qui, avec un éclat de 
rire, brise la série des coques des œufs de Brahman. » 

Bänabhatta nous laisse entendre que le rire est un trait du visage sud de Siva. 
Dans sa longue description de Mahäévetä engagée dans le päfupatavrata, il se 
concentre sur la couleur blanche dont la personne de son héroïne est empreinte, 
à l’aide d’une fascinante série d’utpreksä, cette figure où le poète déclare surim- 
poser le produit de son imagination sur la réalité, #épreksä parmi lesquelles® : 


SSriämkaragranthävalih, samputah 11, Stoträni, laghuprakaranäni ca, Vanivilas Press, Shri- 
rangam, s. d. 

6Bänabhatta & Bhüsanabhatta, Kädambarï, avec le commentaire de Bhänucandra et Siddha- 
candra, édité par Kashinath Pandurang Parab & révisé par Wasudeva Laxmana Shastri Pansikar, 
Nag Publishers, Delhi, 1985 (reprint), p.278. 


Pierre-Sylvain Filliozat 109 


pasupatidaksinamukhahäsacchavim iva bahir ägatya krtävasthänäm ..…. « 
comme si la couleur du rire du visage sud de Paéupati, venue à l'extérieur, s'était 
établie en elle, ... » 

Le commentaire ajoute : atra daksinagrahanam präyasas tatra häsa eveti tada- 
rtham « il y a principalement le rire sur ce visage ; c’est pour cela que la mention 
du sud est faite ici ». 

Les représentations de l’aftahäsa, du rire laissant voir les dents, sont rares 
dans la sculpture. Nous proposons de le reconnaître dans une belle pièce du 
temple de Loke$vara à Pattadakkal, un Mahäkäla occupant la niche axiale du 
mur sud du vimäna, face au sud (FIGURE 2). 

Si pour comparer la structure iconographique du temple avec la matière 
théologique des Agama, l'on se contentait de ces remarques sur la répartition 
des caractères généraux des entités, selon l'orientation, l’on prendrait le risque 
de tomber rapidement dans des approximations subjectives, lors de l’estimation 
de traits particuliers sur une sculpture. Tout au plus on conclura que la cul- 
ture âgamique et puränique des maîtres d’œuvre pouvait influer sur leur choix. 
Et leur choix a quelquefois été pour une représentation directe des caractères 
de Sadäsiva. En fait ils devaient être surtout dépendants des besoins et désirs 
des praticiens du rituel et des fidèles. Plusieurs rites pouvaient établir un lien 
étroit entre la structure du temple et le système théologique. Nous avons vu ci- 
dessus Bhatta Rimakantha lier Le concept des mondes du bindu à la méditation 
(dhyäna) et à l'imposition (nyäsa). On retrouve ces deux rites dans un rituel de 
consécration du temple. 

La Somasambhupaddhati achève son exposé de l’installation du Linga, par 
des rites d’installation de la même figure divine sur trois objets « mobiles » : 
le cälaka à structure de Linga, le mât et l’étendard destinés à être placés au 
sommet du temple. Notons qu'il prescrit de placer les visages de Sadäéiva, en 
commençant par Sadyojäta, sur l’étendard en même temps que l'imposition du 
fivatattva. Hélène BRUNNER s'est étonnée de cette insertion de l'entité Sadäsiva 
dans ce rite pour seulement le cas du dhvaja. En fait cette insertion s'inscrit 
dans une imposition des trois sattva englobant, deux, 4tma- puis vidyä-, sur le 
mât, et #va- sur l’étendard même, ce qui place le cosmos entier sur cet élément 
sommital du temple et comprend donc le sadäfivatattva. Or l’étendard flottant 
n'est pas un support d'orientation fixe, ne comporte pas comme le monument 
des façades orientées. La seule imposition du sattva sur l’étendard ne situerait 
pas ces visages. La paddhati en prescrit donc un rappel. Ce rappel montre 
l'importance de l'orientation dans le concept du corps de Sadäsiva. 


110 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Après le rite d'installation du dhvaja, Soma$ambhu décrit une pratisthä du 
präsäda. Elle se fait par le nyäsa de l’ensemble des mêmes trois #tttva en- 
globant, des Seigneurs des sattva, des mürti et de leurs seigneurs (BRUNNER 
n. 36), jañghäveditadürdhvesu « sur le mur, la plate-forme du couronnement 
et au-dessus ». Vient ensuite un homa et rites afférents, une adoration de 
Siva et sarvatattvamayam dhyätvä fivam ca vyäpakam nyaset « [le guru] fera une 
représentation mentale [du temple] comme fait de tous les s4#tva et déposera 
Siva l'occupant tout entier ». Ensuite le gwrz doit faire une nouvelle représen- 
tation mentale du monument comme fait de tous les composants du cosmos, 
un par un, sur chacun des principaux éléments architecturaux. Somasambhu 
emploie une terminologie architecturale réunissant des termes courants dans le 
nord et des termes courants dans le sud. /arighä désigne le mur au niveau des 
pilastres. La plate-forme qui supporte le tambour de soutien de l’élément de 
couronnement appelé 4malaka « emblique », sa forme imitant celle de ce fruit, 
est appelée couramment vedï dans les textes du sud, le tambour qui est toujours 
un étranglement dans le profil est appelé kantha. Nous pensons devoir illustrer 
ce texte de Somasambhu par un monument qui lui soit contemporain ou plus 
ancien, ce qui restreint beaucoup la recherche, les éléments sommitaux ayant 
généralement disparu dans les monuments ruinés, surtout dans le nord du pays. 
Un des mieux conservés, bien qu’il ait perdu son 4malaka et une partie de sa 
fukanäsi, est le temple dit de Galagnath à Pattadakkal dans un style proche 
du nord (FiGuRE 3). Khajuraho offre des exemples de ce que Somasambhu 
aurait pu voir fin XIe siècle et qui peuvent illustrer son exposé, avec cette re- 
striction qu’on y voit mal la plate-forme supportant le tambour. Somasambhu 
prescrit donc de se représenter dans les différentes parties de la disposition ar- 
chitecturale, successivement de bas en haut, les entités qui portent le cosmos, 
Ananta etc. padämbuje, terme que l’on peut interpréter comme un seul élé- 
ment, la première plinthe du temple, ou comme les deux premières moulures 
du soubassement, plinthe et lotus dans un dvandva singulier. Le padma est 
une moulure en forme de doucine conçue comme une assise du monument à 
l'instar du padmäsana pour le yogin. Sur le pitha ici partie moulurée supérieure 
du soubassement viennent les mondes souterrains et leurs seigneurs. Sur le 
corps du mur sont contemplés l’œuf de Brahman, les Cent Rudra etc. En- 
suite, vraisemblablement sur la tour, näsävadhi « jusqu’au niveau de la näsa 
inclus] », on doit voir les sattva jusqu’à l’ahamkära — en adoptant la correction 
proposée par Hélène BRUNNER, et jusqu'aux trois gwna. On peut reconnaître 
ici la $wkanäst, projection axiale d’une ou plusieurs faces de la tour, le plus sou- 


Pierre-Sylvain Filliozat 111 


vent d’une seule au-dessus de la porte du sanctuaire, généralement surmontée 
de l'effigie d’un lion. Le niveau de ce lion est ensuite celui de la méditation 
sur le rägatattva, la vedï est pour les quatre kañcuka, le kantha pour la mäyaä, 
l’ämalaka pour la suddhavidyä. L’ämalaka, équivalent du #khara des temples 
dans le style du sud, est en fait le support du motif sommital en forme d’un 
vase (kalasa), dont le rituel nous fait voir toute l’importance. Sur ce vase le 
guru se représente le bindu avec I$vara accompagné des Vidyeévara. C’est ce 
niveau de l’Ævaratattva qui donne un corps à Sadäéiva dans son état d’action 
(adhikärävasthä). L'on a vu Sadäsiva placé sur l’étendard et son mât. Le gwru 
contemple ensuite sur le mât le 7444, en lequel on peut probablement recon- 
naître le corps encore plus subtil de la bhogävasthä de Sadäsiva. Enfin il doit 
contempler la kundalifakti sur l’étendard. On retrouve avec ce terme le concept 
de la mahämäyä, en fait autre nom du bindu indifférencié et qui est le Szktitattva, 
l’avant-dernier en dessous du Svatattva inaccessible, non représentable. Vient 
ensuite une opération de jonction du temple avec la jagatï sur le modèle du rite 
d'union du liñga à la pindikä. Le terme jagatï dans les textes du sud désigne 
la plinthe la plus basse du soubassement. Ce terme peut peut-être s’étendre à 
l’ensemble du soubassement. Le rite final est une circumambulation du cxlaka, 
de l’étendard et son mât, conduite en grande pompe, puis leur fixation finale 
au sommet du monument. 

Au terme de ce rite, le temple apparaît bien comme une représentation 
du corps de $iva, l'être omniprésent dans le cosmos, et dont la pureté se fait 
une résidence privilégiée dans une matière pure, le bindu. La conception 
théologique que nous avons examinée en détail ci-dessus, est bien présente dans 
le monument. Toute la religion est présente dans le temple. Il offre plusieurs 
niveaux de lecture. La mythologie s’y lit dans des panneaux narratifs, sur les 
quatre faces des piliers, voire dans les grandes figures sculptées. Les entités à 
qui s'adressent les gestes du rituel ne sont pas pour la plupart visualisées. Le 
geste d’offrande fait par l’officiant, le mantra qu’il prononce sont accompagnés 
d’une représentation mentale de l'entité. Et cette représentation mentale est 
localisée matériellement à un endroit du temple. La multiplicité des édicules 
architecturés en miniature sur toutes Les faces du temple, souvent vides de toute 
icône, s'explique par le fait que le but est d’offrir des points d’appui pour lo- 
caliser les objets de représentation intérieure et de méditation. La doctrine se 
découvre par le rituel d'imposition, mais aussi par l’examen de l’ordonnance 
des éléments architecturaux et iconographiques, reflet en quelque mesure de 
l'ordonnance des concepts. 


112 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


FiqurE 1. Bhairava dansant, temple de Kadambe$vara à Rattihalli, tour sud, 
façade sud, niveau 2. 


Fiqure 2. Temple de Loke$vara à Pattadakkal, Mahäkäla, niche axiale du mur 
sud du vimäna, façade sud. 


Fiqure 3. Temple dit de Galagnath à Pattadakkal, vue depuis l'angle sud-est. 


Analyses of the Vijayagama and Svayambhuvagama 
T. GANESAN 


This is a continuation of my previous paper published in Agamasusamä,' which 
focussed on the contents of five unpublished Agamas (Yogaja, Cintya, Süksma, 
Sahasra and Amsumän) belonging to the fivabheda.? 

Here I would like to give a slightly detailed summary (which is not exhaus- 
tive) of two Saivägama texts belonging to the rwdrabheda group? My analysis 
is mainly based on the available transcripts belonging to the collections of the 
French Institute, Pondichery. 


THE ViAYAGAMA 


To take up first the Vijayägama (IFP T. 625, 320 and 124): 

Almost all the available transcripts deal elaborately with the festival of Durgä 
(Durgotsava); from the description of the ritual sequences it is clear that the text 
speaks of a full-fledged temple with deities in the enclosures (pariväradevatä) 
and a flag-post (dhvajastambha). Further all the rituals beginning from the flag- 
hoisting (dhvajärohana) are mostly modelled on those which are prescribed for 
Siva.‘ At the outset (opening chapter of T 625), the Vijayägama divides utsava 
into three types: that which is celebrated for 9 days as the best (###ama); the 
one for 7 days is the medium (madhyama) and the lowest type (adhama) is 
celebrated for 5 days.® Also there are other benefits listed in the Vijayagama 


IGANESAN (2005). 

2The fundamental Agamas (mülägama) of the Saivasiddhänta system, traditionally held to 
be 28 in number are broadly divided into two groups: the fivabheda, comprising 10 Agamas, 
and the rudrabheda, comprising 18 of them. 

3 Analysis of the contents of other Agamas that belong to this group, such as the Virigama, 
will be the subject-matter of a future article. 

{To cite a few examples of published ones: the grand festival (mahotsava) of Siva is treated 
in a very detailed fashion in the 6th chapter of the Kämikägama (uttara) and in the 18th chapter 
of the Rauravägama, vol. I. 

SThe Viayottarägama, one of the upägamas of the Vijayagama, classifies wtsava into various 
kinds such as $ziva, gauna, vibhüti, bhauvana, daivika, paitrka, vijaya, etc. 


114 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


for different beings by the wr#sava.f As a general rule, the text prescribes the 
day with the star of the month as the last day of the festival (#rtha); but other 
auspicious and important days of the month such as the birthday of the king, 
newmoon (4mäväsyä), sasthï, etc. can also fixed as the last day of the festival 
(trtha). As the Vijayägama mentions collecting the right wood” for the flag- 
post (dhvajastambha), it may mean that it is newly prepared every year for the 
festival. The festival commences with the cleaning and decorating of the entire 
village. Corresponding to the 8 märtipas who represent the eight forms of 
Sivaÿ and who help the main priest (äcärya) in the performance of fire-ritual 
that form part of the w#sava rites, we have in the Vijayägama 8 female mürtipas. 
They are: 

dhärikà diptimaty ugrä jyotsnà $vetà balotkatä | 

dhätri bailviti vijñeyä mürtipäs ca yathäkramam || 
An important feature of the text of the Wijayägama is that for every major rite, 
such as dhvajärohana, fire-ritual (agnikärya), it gives a list of minor ritual se- 
quences that constitute the major one. 

Just as the figure of the bull (vrsabha) is drawn on the flag to be hoisted in 
the Siva temple the figure of lion (siha) the vehicle of Durga, is to be drawn on 
the flag; the text gives the details of the colours, the proportion of the limbs of 
the lion, etc. Then the #y4s4 on the figure; here one comes across prescription 
of many Vedic mantras to be recited for each one of them: 

brahmajajñänamantrena tatah pädesu vinyaset | 

idam visnviti mantrena simhasyodaramadhyatab | 

triyambaketi mantrena . .. prsthadesatah| etc. 

Then follows the #y4sa of the sattvas to be done on the body of the lion and the 
dhyäna of simha.” Interestingly the text also has smhavidyesvaras numbering 
eight as in the case of Siva. In the rite of beating the drums (bherttädana, T. 625, 
chapter 32), among other things the 4cärya should mentally remember and 
recite the pranavamantra and the astramantra while beating it for the first time. 
The person who beats the drum is supposed to have a good knowledge of music 


Snaväham daivikam jñeyam devatäpritikärakam | saptäham utsavam jñeyam bhauvanam 
jantupälanam | pañcäham utsavam jñeyam bhautikam bhütaraksakam. 

7candanam khadiram caiva karmakam \kramukam em.] vainavam tathà | madhükam deva- 
därum ca sälam ca bakulam tathä || 

Sksmägniyajamänärkavärirananisäkaräh | vyomäntä mürtayas castau… | 

pañcäsyam ca mrgädhisam damstrinam gajamardanam | piñgaläksam vajranakham teji- 
stham ca mahäbalam. 


T. Ganesan 115 


as he is advised to begin the beating with the gändhärisvara. In this connection 
the Vijayägama also gives à list of different types of musical instruments, such 
as patahadhvaja, maddala, Sañkha, tälavädya, ürdhvakädhvani, tvaksäravädya, 
vinä, Srñgavädya, etc. to be played during the festival. A detailed description of 
drawing the mandala in the yägamandapa is given in the chapter that follows 
the amkurärpana. The chapter on the fire-ritual (zgnikärya, chapter 35) is very 
elaborate and comprises 30 minor rites. The purification of the fire-pit (kwnda) 
is also an elaborate one containing eighteen purificatory rites (samskära). At 
many points, recitation of Vedic mantras is prescribed. ‘The offering of bal to 
various subsidiary deities (balidäna, chapter 36) consists, among other things, 
in making a /riga of cooked rice (annaliñga), worshipping it along with the 
astraräja in the same manner as done in daily festival (nityotsava). The bal is to 
be offered to ten groups each consisting of eight goddesses for each direction; 
the text gives the names of each of them; then b/i is to be offered to nine 
goddesses for each one of whom each day is allotted; eight dhvajadevatäs receive 
bali on all the nine days for three times a day.!° Incidentally, we get a brief 


10Here it may be interesting to note the definition given by the Vijayottarägama (T. 63, 
pp. 38-74) for the word wésava: 


ajñänamalasamlagnän jantün uddhrtya bandhanät 
prasütim kurute tesäm jñänasyety utsavo matah 


“That is called wtsava as it lifts up the selves submerged in the ocean of mala, which is ignorance, 
and produces [in them] the awakening of [true] knowledge.” 

Another interesting fact concerning the history of $aiva religious practices is given in this 
ägama: when the chariot comes round the town on the day ofthe car-festival, persons belonging 
to different religious systems, such as the vzidika, vedänta (adhyätmavädi), and to various Saiva 
schools, such as the bhairava, väma, gäruda, and even those belonging to the kulamärga follow 
the chariot singing the praise of Siva according to their doctrinal systems (svasvasiddhäntamä- 
rgena). The text, unfortunately corrupt, reads thus: 


kvacit so ntimake Saive kvacid bhairavatäntrikaih 
vämasthaih kulamärgasthaih vitatanträrthavedibhih 
gärusaih … adhyätmavädibhih 

vaidikair laukikair anyaih paralokätmavädibhih 


svasvasiddhäntamärgena stavänais cänusevitam. 


That such a practice actually existed is mentioned by no less a person than Appar (Tirunä- 
vukkaracar), the great seventh-century Saiva devotee, in one of his decades sung at one of the 
greatest Saiva holy places, Tiruvärür: 


arumanittatam pün mulai arampaiyarotu arulippätiyar 


116 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


discourse on the pronunciation of different mantras for different deities. 

For the procession of the deity (chapter 37) a vehicle is prescribed for each 
day of the festival. They are: #bikä, Sikhi, doläyäna, puspamandapa, vrsayäna, 
gajayäna, simhayäna, rathayäna, asvayäna. In the procession the decorated im- 
age of Durgä is accompanied by that of Siva. After the procession the ritual 
called parivesa, which consists in offering large quantities of food, flowers and 
incense, etc., is performed. Procession of the deity kept in the chariot (rathot- 
sava) is treated in a detailed way in the Vijzyägama (chapter 38). Detailed in- 
structions for constructing the chariot and decorating it are given; then follows 
the worship of various deities that are said to be present in different parts of the 
chariot. Here also the Durga image is accompanied by that of $iva during pro- 
cession. For the rite of #rtha on the last day of the festival the image of cakra is 
to be taken to the holy water — either a pond, river or sea — as the representative 
of Durgä. A special abhiseka with 108 pitchers (astottarakalasasnapana) is to be 
performed for the Goddess the next day (chapter 40). 

One text of the Vijayägama (T..124, pp. 1-14) interestingly deals with the 
festival of the god Ganesa — vighnesotsava. As in the previous text, here also 
we find the ritual scheme mostly based on that for Siva: the special worship of 
mouse (4khuyäga), the vehicle of Vighnesvara, who is surrounded by 8 vidyes- 
varas, drawing the figure of mouse on the flag and hoisting it, the rite of beating 
the drum (bheritädana), etc. The text also specifies different vehicles!! for the 
procession of the deity during each day of the festival. 

Another chapter in T 124 (pp. 71-7) deals briefly with the special festival 
with a large quantity of offerings on the day of the star 4rdrä. This star is said to 
be very auspicious and it the star of Siva. But in this chapter of the Vijayägama 
we find a special festival for the Goddess is prescribed on this day, consisting, 
among other things, of placing the decorated image of the Goddess along with 
that of Siva on the swing (dolä) accompanied by music and dance.!? 

The daily obligatory rites for an initiated Saiva are treated in another chapter 


urimaiyil toluvär uruttira palkanattär 
viricatai viratikal antanar caivar päcupatar kapälikal 
teruvinil poliyum tiruvärür ammäne. (Téväram 6:20.3.) 


See GANESAN 2006 for a detailed survey of the treatment of festivals in many ofthe unpublished 
Saivägamas. 
ÎlEe. the citramañca, which seems to be rare, is the vehicle for procession on the last day. 
l2The text mentions different types and shapes of swing: rathadolä, cakradolä, väjidolä, 
stambhadolä, mahädolä, yugmadolä, etc. 


T. Ganesan 117 


of the Wijayägama (T.320, chapter 1). This begins with the act of defecation, 
cleaning, ritual bath, etc., and ends with the worship of the Sun, who is the vi- 
sual representative of Goddess Durgä,* where the worshipper meditates upon 
his oneness with the Goddess!* (faucasnänädisaurapüjavidhi). This seems to be 
a special feature of this Agama.\ Furthermore, the Vijayägama also prescribes 
the worship of Durgä on the Linga (T. 320, chapter 2); in the worship many 
vedic mantras such as the pävamänt and the durgäsükta, along with the mxüla- 
mantra of Durgä, are to be recited. Then follows (T.320, chapter 3) the ritual 
of offering bali to various gods and goddesses such as Candikä and Dikpälakas 
who are invoked in diferent parts of the temple precincts; for this rite a sepa- 
rate image of the Goddess (balimürti) is taken around on which is invoked the 
power and presence of Durgä from the mülaliñnga. The text prescribes separate 
mudräs to be shown to each deity during bali-offering. 


THE SVAYAMBHUVAGAMA 


Coming next to the Suäyambhuvägama, we see that it has a large section on 
rituals.!5 We find a detailed description of the rites of installation in the temple 
of the image of one of the arms (assra) of Siva, the aghorästra (T. 142, pp. 1-5). 
The chapter called vighnesotsavavidhi (T. 142, chapter 5-18) deals elaborately 
with the rites of the festival of Vighnesvara: the hoisting of the flag preceded 
by the rites of its worship, ritual beating of the drum to announce the festival 
(bheritädana), etc. The text also provides a list of various vehicles (v%hana) for 
each day of the festival. The santrävatärapatala (T. 39, chapter 1), as in many 
other Agamas, briefly outlines the origin of the 28 Agamas of the Saivasiddhänta 
system: !” the mälabhedas as well as the pabhedas, which are said to be many. 


Säcamya sakalikrtya devim ädityamandale|  dhyätvä tadaikyacittas tu raktapuspäksatädi- 


bhih| .…bhävayed bhäskaräbhinnäm devim ävaranänvitäm | ….anyonyakäntisamsargàt tayor 
aikyam dhiyä smaran. Even the deities that encircle the Sun are goddesses (f4kri) here. 
Ésvayam devyätmakam dhyäyan bähyapüjämärabher. 

5In almost all other Agamas the Sun (Sürya) is taken to be the visual representative of Siva 
and its worship precedes that of all else in the obligatory section. 


6Many of the transcripts of the Svayambhuvägama are highly corrupt. I refer here to IFP 
T.39, 40 and 142. Four chapters of the section on doctrines — vidyäpäda — have been com- 
mented upon by Sadyojyoti, and this section of text, together with the commentary, has been 
published by P-S. FizLrozar (1994). 

Vekam eva Sivajñänam vibhinnam dasadhä punab | 

18The list of the Agamas provided here (and reproduced in GoobaLz 1998:412-—13) varies 
from that found in the introduction to volume 1 of the Rauravägama. 


118 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The chapter that follows, called mantroddhära, describes the ritual extraction 
of various mantras such as the añigamantra and the brahmamantra. Different 
types of bath — mähendra, väyavya, mäntra, bhasma — are also briefly explained 
in the chapter on sräna rites. In the rite of worship of $iva (rityapüja) Siva 
is to be meditated upon as accompanied by Manonmaniï, His Sakti and all- 
pervasive at the centre of the heart-lotus; in this rite the vyomavyäpimantra 
is to be recited!? and while offering various ingredients — water, sandal paste, 
cloth, jewels, food — the five brzhmamantras are to be recited. At the end of 
the worship the worshipper has to offer all the fruits of worship as well as that 
of the recitation of the mantras at the lotus feet of Siva with a humble prayer 
secking His forgiveness for any lapse in these rituals.° Also one concludes by 
contemplating on the fact that it is Siva who does everything and activates all 
by being their inner-controller, as well as on the oneness of Siva and the self. 2! 

The ritual of srapana — giving a ritual bath to the main deity, Siva, with 
many pitchers — is treated in chapter 10.77 The occasions for performing this 
rite are the coronation of the king, the beginning of a battle, the birthday of the 
king or the donor who spends money for this rite, etc., where the performance 
of this rite ensures victory and prosperity. Moreover, according to the Sväyamb- 
huvägama, performing snapana also brings forth final liberation.?* The pitchers 
are to be placed on the surface of the ground, on which paddy, rice and other 
grains are spread (sthandila); each of the syllables (m4trkäksara) are written on 
each square on the sthandila and worshipped. Various ingredients, such as milk, 
curd, honey, fruits, precious jewels, perfumes and sand, taken from eight differ- 
ent holy places and flowers are placed on each square with due worship. At the 
end the Sivaliñga is given a bath with each of the pitchers. In chapter12, which 
treats the lighting of many lamps on the day ofthe star Xr#tikä (krttikädipa), the 
text prescribes that one may worship $iva either in the form accompanied by 
Umä or Tripuräntaka or as the twilight dancer (sandhyänrita) or as Gañngädhara 
or Daksinämürti.* An interesting chapter (14) called satsamayabheda briefly 


1 dalesu Saktayah sthäpya sarvavyäpipadena ca| sthäpayed vyomarüpena karnikäyäm manon- 
manim| tatra sarvagatam devam fivam pranavasamsthitam | . . . fivam ävähayet tatah | 

20yat kiñcit karma he deva sadä sukrtaduskrtam| tan me ivapadasthasya bhuñksva ksapaya 
Samkara | 

21 fivo data sivo bhoktä Sivah sarvam idam jagat | Sivo yajati sarvatra yah ivah soham eva tu | 

22 Rauravägama, vol. 1 treats this ritual of snapana with 9, 25, 49, 108 and 1009 kalasas. 

Bathänte moksasiddhyartham vaksyate snapanam mahat | 

2% caturbhujam samabhyarcya umayä sahitam tu vä| tripuräntakarüpam vä sandhyänrttäkrtim 
tu vä| gañgädharäkrtim caiva daksinämürtim eva va | 


T. Ganesan 119 


explains important concepts, the number of means of knowledge (pramäna), 
the number of Agamas and the conducts (äcära) held by six schools of philos- 
ophy: Bauddha, Ârhata, Käpälika, Päñcarätra, Saiva and Päsupata. 

There is a brief discussion on the essential qualities of a spiritual preceptor 
(acärya) in chapter 39, named äcaryalaksana.? Among other things, an ideal 
äcärya by his spiritual practices and aquiring of special powers— siddhis — should 
be able to ward off fear from the minds of gods, humans and demons. Chapters 
20, 22 and 23, devoted to description of the rite of initiation, deal elaborately 
with the ksädhiväsa and with different types of dzksä, such as sadadhvadi- 
ksä. Also we get a description of drawing mandalas, such as the 4nantavijaya, 
in this chapter. Another chapter (31), called antyestividhi, gives an idea of a 
procedure of leaving one’ body through severe yogic practices and meditation:; 
as the text is very corrupt, one is not clear as to the exact meaning of some 
passages. For example, at the beginning there is a verse advising against suicide 
under any circumstance in a general way, but the subsequent passages seem 
to talk about self-mortification and the procedure of leaving the physical body 
by one who has developed intense non attachment towards worldly pleasures 
or by one who has had his fill of worldly pleasure. He should control all his 
sense-organs and be fully aware that his body completely belongs to Siva. He is 
advised to maintain the Æ*nadhäranä (which seems to be a type of méditation 
and about which there is no further information, at least, in this text) and leave 
his vital airs through the centre of his head (k4päla). In all these crucial acts he 
should be fully aware of his identity with Siva.?’ Then the chapter deals briefly 
with the ritual of antyesti for the departed self. Here also we find that the ritual 
is brief and the period of ritual impurity (4fauca) varies from the regular one. 

In chapter 34, which deals with the doctrinal aspects of the Saivasiddhänta, 
there is a brief description of the jzv4nmukta and the liberated self. One may 
notice here that in the Sväyambhuvägama, as in some other Agamas, the chap- 


ters dealing with doctrines — vidyäpäda — is found in the midst of those treating 
the rituals.?# 


5éraddadhänah sucir daksah tridiksädiksitah sudhih\ deväsuramanusyänäm bhayäbhayaniro- 
dhakabh | 

Xathätmano vadham mantri na kuryät phalaväñchayä| na ca duhkhasamutpattau kämato 
deham utsrjet | 

27This passage, among others relating to yogic suicide, are discussed by VAsuDEvA 
(2004:437-45). 

28The unpublished Cintyägama also contains a chapter dealing with the satrvas and another 


with the r4dis and various meditation techniques; for a detailed summary of this and four other 


120 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


À comparatively large chapter (36) referred to as the yogapäda deals elab- 
orately with some of the important yogic practices of the faiva system such as 
various dhäranäs”” and other méditation techniques. In order to obtain various 
siddhis one is advised to meditate on Siva in different ways. The basic form in 
which Siva appears to the meditator is as follows: 

bindunädätmakatvena nirupäkhyovyayah $ivah | 

äbhäti yogayuktänäm Saktyambuksälitätmanäm | 

The padärthapatala (chapter 37) expounds the special logic of the Sväyamb- 
huvägama.* As the text is very corrupt, it is very difficult to identify correctly 
the seven basic categories that are special to this Agama. A tentative list of them 
may be as follows: bandha, avidya, vidhi, jiva, avyaya, kärana and $asvata. 

The 42nd chapter, called mantrasädhanavidhi, gives important directions 
for proper recitation of mantras for attaining desired results. Again, another 
chapter called yogapäda (chapter 45), which is again quite long, discusses the 


unpublished ägamas — the Yogaja, Süksma and Amsumän, see GANESAN 2004. As correctly re- 
marked and well argued by Dominic GoopaLz (1998:xlix-li, fn. 111), the Svéyambhuvasütra- 
sañgraha, which is found mixed along with other chapters of the so-called Sväyambhuvägama, 
thus forming a hybrid text, in transcripts T. 39 and 40, may be a redaction of a different, ear- 
lier and larger text of the Sväyambhuva. For the Sväyambhuvasütrasañgraha (as printed in the 
Mysore edition) contains chapters pertaining to the kriyäpäda (mudrä, diksä, abhiseka, etc.) and 
to the yogapäda (dhäranä, samädhi, etc.) and not just the four chapters pertaining to the vidya- 
päda for which we have the commentary of Sadyojyoti. Whether one accepts this position or 
not, it has the merit of explaining why a number of the later chapters examined below contain 
material that occurs at the beginning of the text commented upon by Sadyojyoti. While T. 39 
has 58 chapters and T. 40 has 47, the Mysore edition ofthe Sväyambhuvasütrasanñgraha contains 
23 chapters. In fact, one is disappointed by the absence of a detailed review of the relationship 
between these different versions of the Sväyambhuva and the four chapters variously transmit- 
ted within them on which Sadyojyoti has commented in the introduction to the edition of that 
commentary (FILLIOZAT 1994). As an aside, existence of these redactions (samgraha) such as 
the Sväyambhuvasätrasañgraha and Rauravasütrasañgraha strengthens the traditional view that 
there have been such redactions and abridgements of many of the 4gama texts in the course of 
many centuries, deriving from orginals traditionally held to be very voluminous, containing 
thousands of verses. 

2The text speaks about 4gneya-, väruna-, saumyädhäranä, etc., which confer on the prac- 
tioner various attainments (s/dhi). 

30 sarkam sväyambhuvam vaksye… 

31There is a popular verse cited by the great 16th-century $aivasiddhänta philosopher of 
the south, $Sivägrayogin in his Saivaparibhäsä, 2nd chapter: sapta sväyambhuve proktäh sat 
pauskaramatañgayoh | $rimatparäkhye pañcoktäh padärthä raurave trayah | Names of some of 
the padärthas, such as vidhi and kärana, resemble those of the Pañcärtha — five categories — of 
the Nakulïi$a Päsupata system, which is also known as Paäñcärthikanaya. 


T. Ganesan 121 


nature of Siva, mantra, vidyesvara, käranesvara, etc. It has a few verses that 
interestingly characterise the transmigratory as well as the world beyond.*? A 
detailed procedure of mental worship of Siva with all the paraphernalia is found 
in chapter 46, called mänasayoga. 

A few chapters (49, 50 and 53) deal with the rituals concerning the tem- 
ple: laying the foundation stone (prathamestakävidhi), different types of tem- 
ple (präsädalaksana), installation of the #valiñga, various types of fivaliñga 
(liñgalaksana) such as those made of precious stones, wood and metals and 
the fruits accrued by their worship etc. The text also gives procedures for the 
installation of the image of Durgä (chapter 53). Chapter 54, called ayutas- 
napanavidhi, deals with the rite of giving bath to the Sivalinga with 10,000 
pitchers. Chapter 57, dealing with the procedure of the annual grand festival 
in the temple (mahotsava), is very elaborate and has more than 400 verses. A 
chapter by name wmahävratavidhi (T.40, pp. 22-9) explains the rite in which 
twenty-one pitchers and various arms (Zy#dhas) are installed in a special pavil- 
ion (mandapa or prapä), twenty-one brahmins® are invited and worshipped 
along with young maidens and dancing girls (rwdraganikä); an elaborate fire- 
ritual follows and the pitchers are worshipped with recitation of different Vedic 
mantras, about which the text is very specific. Each of the äywdhas is given a 
bath (abhiseka) and then worshipped with flowers and special mantras.%* At the 
end the brahmins and rudraganikäs are presented with new clothes, umbrella, 
etc. 

Jayapäjä (T. 40, pp. 41-3) is a special worship that is performed for welfare 
and victory in battle of the king; #rtyuñjayavidhi (pp. 29-33) is another one 
to ward off death at a young age. The Sväyambhuvägama has à long chapter 
(pp. 82-105) on the daily worship of $Siva (nityapüjà). 

Special worship in each of the 12 months (m4sapüjà) beginning from the 
month of märgastrsa is treated in 12 chapters (pp. 131-61). In each of them the 
text specifies the musical tune (r4ga), the säla and the type of dance (rrtfa), etc. 
Offering of woollen cloth soaked in ghee (ghrézkambala) is the special worship 


32 dve koti jagatas tasya parä caiväparä matà | aparä vyavasäyena bhoktrbhogyopapäditä| parä 
parärthasadbhäväd asadbhävaprakäsikä | madhyà vedanarüpätmä tanmaätragunavartint | 

3These 21 brahmins repersent 21 forms with separate names of Siva. They are: #ivah pasu- 
patis caiva Sambhur Kakapardinau | mabhesah fülapänis ca kirito vikramas tathä | pinäki dhürjatis 
caiva trinetro nilalohitah| $amkaras caiva bhüteso vrsavähanavikramah | kälahäri pramardas ca 
vainateyah khagesvarah | 

34e have one such specific bäjamantra in this text, which is $RIM HRIM KkLiM. 


122 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


in the month of mägha; in the month of phälguna is offered à large quantity 
of curd kept in a special clay-pot; in the month of vaifäkha à large quantity of 
perfumes such as scented water and bakula flowers are offered, which is called 
gandhapüjä. Annapüjà in the month of #wlä consists in decorating the Liñga 
with a large quantity of cooked rice with vegetables. The treatment and the de- 
tails of mäsapüjà vary in different Agama texts. That worshipping Siva in each 
month with special ingredient(s) is an ancient tradition is attested by references 
to it in the ancient Tamil devotional classic Ævaram.* 

A relatively long chapter (pp. 161-9), präyascittavidhi, deals with many rites 
of expiation; for each of the omissions committed in the conduct of daily wor- 
ship or the annual festival and for other forms of transgressions of rules (for 
example, entry of untouchables or of persons of low caste inside the temple or 
in the kitchen) one finds an expiatory rite. Most of them are in the form of 
fire-rituals or recitation, for the most part, of one of the five brzhmamantras for 


SThe Urtarakäranägama and the Pärvakäranägama describe the monthly festivals with slight 
differences. In the former, worship of honey in the month of pusya, that of curd in the month 
of phälguna, offering of various perfumes in the month of caîtra, offering of sandal paste in 
vaisäkha are prescribed, while the latter prescribes offering of sandal paste in the month of 
pusya, offering of flowers in phälguna, celebrating the float festival in the month of caitra, 
celebrating the pavitrotsava and offering of cooked rice from newly harvested paddy in the 
month of äsädha, offering of sesame in the month of frävana and the offering of ghee in the 
month of 4fvayuja. 

36Tiruñänacampantar in his decade (patikam) on the Mayilai (modern Mylapore, a part 
of Chennai city) Siva temple called in his time Kapäliccaram, mentions the monthly festivals 
celebrated there: 1. He begins with the special worship and festival (w#sava) on the tiruvônam 
star in the Tamil month of #ippaci. 2. Then the very popular kärttikaï utsava with the lighting 
of the lamps in the temple as well as in the houses (kärétikai fipam), which is nothing but the 
krttikädipärohana described in many Agama texts. 3. The #iruvätirai uisava in the Tamil month 
of märkali is mentioned, which is the same as the 4rdrotsava specially pleasing to Nrttamürti, 
that is, Nataräja. 4. Taippücam as it is even now celebrated in the Tamil month of #i is the 
pusyotsava, when some of the temples celebrate the annual festival (mahotsava). 5. Bathing in 
the sea in the month of #äci on the day of the full moon by taking the decorated image of Siva 
to the sea is mentioned. 6. In the month of pañkuni on the full moon day and asterism wétara 
there is celebration in the temple. 7. Tiruñänacampantar then mentions the aftami utsava in 
the month of cittirai. 8. Keeping the decorated image of $iva along with the Goddess on the 
swing (dolä) accompanied by music and dance in the month of vaikäci, which is the spring 
festival (vasantotsava) is referred to as pontäppu, gold swing, in the Ævaram and in the Agamas. 
9. Saint Appar refers to the great festival of 4rdrotsava celebrated with pomp in the holy city 
of Tiruvärür. 10. Finally there is the great worship for pacifying the gods (perum cänti) which 
is of the form of snapana — giving bath to the deity — with many pitchers (kzlasa), numbering 
25 or 1000, which are described in the Agamas. 


T. Ganesan 123 


1000 or 10,000 times.Ÿ” Arunapñjävidhi (pp. 33-7) is the chapter that deals 
with the special worship of Siva approximately one hour before sunrise in the 
temple; along with various offerings, there is a small hymn to be recited be- 
fore the God which form part of this worship. There is a chapter (pp. 192-8) 
exclusively dealing with the special festivals for the Goddess”# and another, 
vaivähyavidhi (pp. 199-205), treating the celebration of the marriage festival 
of Siva and the Goddess in the temple. The mudrälaksanavidhi (pp. 212-14) 
deals with the forms and methods of showing various mudräs in daily worship. 

To conclude, this brief survey of the contents of two unpublished Agama 
texts of the Saivasiddhänta tradition gives an insight into the rich variety of rit- 
uals, mostly in the context of the temple. It also strengthens the view that, al- 
though one finds a general form of the ritual that is common to the Saivägama, 
they are not monotonously and uninterestingly uniform. Comparing these 
theoretical presentations of the rituals as ordained in the canonical texts with 
contemporary practice one finds substantial changes ranging from modifica- 
tion of the rituals to addition of new ones. Another fact to be noted about the 
rituals treated in these Agamas is that, though belonging to the Saivasiddhänta 
system, we have seen that the Wijayägama, as it is available to us,” deals ex- 
clusively with the rituals and festivals connected with the Goddess Durgä and 
Gane$a, and one does not find any rite, major or minor, concerning Siva. As 
another example we have the Xumaäratantra, which is exclusively devoted to the 
rites — daily worship, installation and festivals — of Kumära and nothing else. 
This text is traditionally held to be the wpägama of the Käranägama or of the 
Lalitägama. 


37 Other Agama texts also have chapters devoted to expiatory rites. In almost all of them one 
finds expiations for the wrongs or for transgression of rules related to the temple. À medieval 
(circa 12th-century) compilation by one Trilocanaëiva called the Präyascittasamuccaya (the text 
is unpublished but is currently being edited by R. SATHYANARAYANAN (EFEO)) deals exclusively 
with the expiatory rites that an initiated individual has to perform at his personal level for 
various sins, pollutions and other transgressions of rules of conduct. 

38In the Siksmägama also there is a separate chapter, the fktyutsavavidhi (T.38A, pp. 189- 
207), dealing with the festivals for the Goddess; there is a difference here (as in the Wiayägama, 
which we have seen above) in that in the flag to be hoisted the image of the lion, the vehicle of 
the Goddess, is to be drawn in place of the bull (vrs4bha). 

#Perhaps the available text of the Vijayägama on which our brief study is based, is the 
upägama of that possessing the same name. For we find a Wijayägama as an upägama of the 
mülägama Vijayägama in the traditional list. 


124 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


À first edition of the [Satika-]Kälajñana, the shortest of 
the non-eclectic recensions of the Kälottara 


Dominic GOODALL 


with particular help from 
S. A. S. SARMA AND HARUNAGA ISAACSON* 


In a richly detailed and wide-ranging section headed ‘Scripture and Paddhatiÿ 
(2004:353-377) in his recent monumental half-article on ‘The Saiva Religion 
among the Khmers’, SANDERSON makes the illuminating observation that sur- 
viving Saiddhäntika ritual manuals are based upon a small and still unedited 
tantra that has received little attention to date: the two-hundred-verse recen- 
sion of the Kälottara. It therefore seemed to me appropriate, in a volume that 
honours the memory of one who devoted much of her life to elucidating one of 
the best known manuals of this tradition, to offer something that would throw 
light on this still shadowy corner of the Saiddhäntika scriptural canon. As is 
well-known, the Kälottara features in all lists of the 28 principal scriptures, usu- 
ally at the bottom, and usually under one of its other names, such as Agneya, 
Väthula or Vätula. We also know, from different pieces of evidence (one of 
which is cited by SANDERSON 2001:6, fn. 3), that a Kälottara existed from at 
least the ninth-century. But we now know of or find preserved several texts 
known by that name (see the table of GoopaLz 2004:xxv, which lists eight 
pre-twelfth-century recensions, and omits at least two: the Sardhasatika and 
the /ñänatilaka) and it is not clear which is the original or whether it still sur- 
vives. Ît seems clear, however, that there is a group of recensions that contain a 
common core of material, which we may refer to as the non-eclectic recensions 
(thus GoopaLL 1998:xlv-xlvi, fn. 103, quoting SANDERSON), and it seems rea- 
sonable to assume that these, even if none of them may with any confidence be 


*Aside from these, I am grateful to Ralph Hopcson, who came to Pondicherry to read 
$aiva texts in the summer of 2005 and for whose benefit I therefore attempted to expound 
the text. This effort revealed how many passages were only patchily comprehensible, and his 
questions, as well as those of the others who participated in those Saiva Reading Group sessions, 
were an important stimulus. I should also like to thank the Institutions who allowed me to 
consult and take copies of their manuscripts, in this case particularly the NAK, the NGMPP 
and the Oriental Research Institute in Mysore. 


126 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


said to be the earliest, contain the earliest Kälottara material." 

Most of these non-eclectic recensions were known to N.R. BHATT at the 
time when he produced his edition of the only fully published recension, 
the Sardhatrisatikälottara, and his list of shared verses in that volume show 
how closely related the recensions are. He was not aware, however, of the 
shortest recensions, those in 50, 100 and 150 verses. One could argue at 
length without reaching certainties about their relative chronology. Even 
about the Dvisatikälottara, We can say no more than that it must be earlier 
than Brahmasambhu, whose Naimittikakriyänusandhäna is dated to 937/8 AD 
(SANDERSON 2004:358, fn. 24). One certainty is that the Särdhasatika recen- 
sion’ is later than the Duisatikälottara, to which it refers in its 4th verse (N,, 
f 1*of 2nd foliation): 


astabhedam tvayà deva pürvam bi kathitam mama 
säcanût sütramätrena dvisate kälasamjñake 


This 150-verse recension is transmitted only in our Nepalese paper MS (for 
descriptions of the MSS see below) in what is perhaps slightly more regular 
Sanskrit than are the other recensions and it does not appear to share Kälottara 
formulae. We can be reasonably sure that it is earlier than the eleventh cen- 
tury, for it is almost certainly this Särdhasatika that Somasambhu drew on for 
his account of the asträbhiseka, for which BRUNNER was unable to find a scrip- 
tural source (SP3:526#). Särdhasatika 83-93 (N, f. 4”) appear to have been 
adapted (notably by being purged of aifa peculiarities of language) to become 
SP3 asträbhisekavidhi 3-13. 

It seems to us probable that the 100-verse recension too is not among the 
earliest: it is unique among them in not teaching the distinctive Kälottara yäga 
of mantras, which is arguably both the hallmark and the heart of the Xä/ottara 
teaching. Its elevation of the pranava to the level of supreme and only mantra 
has the air of a substitution that simplifies to the point beyond which reduc- 
tion seems impossible the already simplified mantra-system of the Xä%/ottara 


IWhat of the others? The eclecticism and lateness of the Brhatkälottara is demonstrated by 
SANDERSON (2001:17 and 38-41). Some others indicate their relative lateness in their frame- 
stories by mentioning that they were composed after ‘the’ Kälottara: see, e.g., the opening of 
the Sarvajñänottara (quoted by GoopaLz 1998:xlvi, fn. 105). 

2This recension in 150 verses, though, as indicated above, unaccountably not included in 
the table of GoopaLz 2004:xxv, is mentioned on p. xcvi, fn. 151. 


Dominic Goodall 127 


tradition? 


Another recension that is not among the earliest is the /#änapañcäsikä, 
which begins (see below) with what appears to be an allusion to the existence of 
many versions of the Värhulä (sic). Indeed, this very short text, as it now seems 
to me, not only should not be included among the non-eclectic recensions, 
with which it appears not to share any verses,* it should not even be classified 
as strictly Saiddhäntika: Kärttikeya’s opening question (N,, £ 3"), which is not 
entirely clear to me, implies that it claims to present teachings of the Bhairava- 
(daksina) and Väma- streams.” 


ativistarayogena nâtha jñätum na Sakyate 

väthuläyäm mahädeva bahudhä samprakäsitam 1 
kevalam hy ürddhamärgastham avatäresu coditam 
gopitam daksinam märgam vämamärgam tathaiva ca 2 
samksepät tattvasadbhävam yathärthe moksasädhanam 
bhütipradam siddhikaram kathayasva mahesvara 


This claim is borne out by the practices enjoined towards the end of the text, 
in which prasäda is used as the name for mantras of other forms of Siva (N,;, 


PE CE 


ekakhandam kapälam tu purusasya yathä bhavet 46 
grhitvä tu japet tasmin prasädam bhairavätmakam 
sanmäsäd utpated vatsa tasya yogaprabhävatah 47 
râtrau paryatanam käryam patahikäm tu haneta vai 
catuspathe naditire devasyäyatane subhe 48 
hähäkäram tu kartavyam tatra vai devatänvitam 
dar$anam tu bhaved vatsa nätra kärya vicäranà 49 
madyam mämsam tiläm krsnän Ÿ= ktam nf homayeta vai 
fmasänäkhyà tu vats esà äkrstih paramottamä 50 
atha vä tumburum devam caturvaktradharam gurum 
astabähum mahäviram caturbhir yoginir vrtam 51 


$For further details of the anomalous ‘mantrayäga of the text, see 24-8 and our notes 
thereon. 

fT have not checked every half-line of every recension, but it certainly does not contain any 
of the common stock of Kälottara formulations. 

SAS I have recently been informed by Diwakar AcHARYA (GoopaLz 2004:xxxviii, fn. 53), 
the discussion of the canon that I presented as belonging to the beginning of this text in 
GoopaLL (1998:412) does not in fact belong to it. 


128 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


mätrkäsanasamstham tu sodasena tu vestitam 
madhye prasäda vinyastam yaje tanmätrimandale 52 
siddhyate mäsamätrena yadi tattvaparo bhavet 


e 4Gc ekakhandam ] N%; ekakhamdam N?° e 47a grhitva tu 
japet ] N?°; pragrhiya yajet N°° e 47c° tpated ] conj.; ° tpatted N; 
e 48b tu haneta ] N**(wnmetrical); haneta N°° e 50c $masänakhya 
tu vats’ esa | conj.; smasänäkhye tu vatsesa N, 


Discussing all the problems of constitution and interpretation that this passage 
of text presents would take us too far from our subject, but I offer the following 
uncommented translation to suggest one way in which it might be understood. 


[Making sure] that it is such that it is in one piece (?), he should 
take the skull of a man and recite over it the prasäda-mantra, whose 
nature is Bhairava. After six months he will fly up because of the 
power of the yoga connected with this [skull]. He should wan- 
der at night, beating a little drum. At crossroads, at confluences, 
at pure temples he should wail ‘Hä, H4 and there, my child, he 
will see [Bhairava] accompanied by [other] deities—of this you 
need not doubt. He should perform oblation with alcohol, meat, 
sesamum ff. This, my child, is the ultra-supreme rite of Attrac- 
tion called ‘Cremation-ground”. Or he should worship (yaje) the 
God Tumburu, who is the guru with four faces and eight arms, 
the great hero, surrounded by four Voginis, having placed [Him 
there as] the prasäda-mantra, seated upon a seat of seed-syllables 
(), wrapped with the sixteenth (?), in the middle of His mandala 
of Mothers. If he is focussed on Truth, he will obtain power in 
just a month. 


Now I considered offering, as a contribution to this volume, an article just dis- 
cussing these various shorter recensions of the K%/ottara; but the need of the 
moment, as it seems to me, is more edited Kälottara material. This is there- 
fore instead a rudimentary edition of one of the shortest recensions based on 
three manuscripts. À huge number of parallels with various Kälottaras could 
have been given, but we have stuck to attempting to give parallels from the 
one printed recension, with just occasional references to the others. Similarly, 
a huge amount of discursive annotation would have been possible, but for this 
we look forward to an edition of what may have been, and certainly became, 


Dominic Goodall 129 


the central recension, the Dufatikälottara, which is currently being prepared by 
Mei YANG. Our annotation therefore focusses on what is really particular to the 
Kälottara in 100 verses. We have also drawn attention in notes to peculiarities 
of its language, many of which are shared with other recensions of the Xälo- 
tara, including the Särdhatrisatikälottara (also referred to as the Adhyustasata-), 
although, as indicated elsewhere (GoopaLz 1998:lxvi Æ, drawing on SANDER- 
sON), this fact is obscured in BHATTs edition. 


SOURCES 


Three manuscript sources have been drawn on, all of which I have referred to 
in earlier works. 


N; National Archives, Kathmandu, MS pra 1114, NGMPP Reel No. B 25/7. 
Palm-leaf, Nägari. This gives, in sequence, the recensions in 50, 100, 
200, 350, 700 and 1300 verses. The recension in 150 verses found in 
N, is not transmitted, and N,% foliation, which appears to be old, sug- 
gests that it was never included: the 100-verse recension ends on f. 12”, 
the verso is left blank, and the Dvifatikälottara begins on f. 13". Ofthe 
known non-eclectic recensions, only this 150-verse recension and the 
400-verse recension,® which may prove to be lost, is missing. 


N, National Archives, Kathmandu, MS 5-4632, NGMPP Reel No. B 118/7. 
Paper, Devanägari. This gives the same texts in the same sequence, except 
that it inserts the text of the 150-verse recension between those of 100 
and 200 verses. Fresh pagination is given for each text from the 150-verse 
recension onwards. N, appears to be largely an apograph of N,, but its 
readings are worth recording, for it contains corrections and transmits 
variants that are probably intended as improvements, and some of these 
may derive from another source, as does, we assume, N,'s text of the 
150-verse recension. 


M” University of Mysore, Oriental Research Institute MS P 258. This is 
a palm-leaf manuscript in Nandinägari script. For the most detailed 
acount of this extraordinary codex, the most important in South India 
for the reconstruction of the early Saiddhäntika canon, see GOODALL 


SVaktrasambhus opening verses to his Mrgendrapaddhatitikä (Goonarz 2000:210, fn. 18) 
refer to Aghoragiva having composed à commentary on this work. 


130 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


2004:xcv-ci. Only a single side of a single damaged leaf, f. 22°, provides 
testimony to our text. Ît covers verses 1-57. 


Editing without producing a translation—and particularly editing this sort 
of text, in which one is conscious that not all the riddles can be solved and that 
the language is full of anomalies—there is a heightened risk that one will leave 
impossible things in the text, without taking the trouble to think through and 
beyond them to plausible solutions. When recollating, I often found myself 
rushing ahead with the feeling that the wording settled upon was as satisfac- 
tory (and as satisfactorily interpreted) as could reasonably be hoped, and then 
returning shortly afterwards to find that just a little more thought yielded a 
much more believable result. But for all the times that I did this, there were 
doubtless many others when I did not and should have. 


SANSKRIT ÎEXT 
[S$ATIKA-]KALAJNANA 


I$vara uväca 
atah param pravaksyämi imäm” istim anuttamäm 
nämnä kälottare tantre* dadhno ghrtam ivoddhrtam 1 
madhuvac ca yathäà puspät särät särataram $ubham” 
nädäkhyam yat param bijam sarvabhütesv avasthitam 2 
tam viditvä mahäsena desikah päsahä bhavet!° 
älabdhäs tena pasavas!! éivam yänti anämayam!? 3 
kim anyair bahubhir bijaié cittavyäkulakärakaih! 
bijenaikena tat sarvam bahünäm präpyate phalam!# 4 
prayogena tu süksmena!* yogadrstena mantravit 


Jatah param pravaksyämi imäm ] N,N,;---ksyämi i = m M 
8kalottare tantre ] N,N;; cottaratamtre tu MY 

?särataram éubham ] N,N;; säram idam éubham M 

tam viditva mahäsena desikah pasahä bhavet ] NN; om. MY 

lälabdhäs tena pasavah ] M”; alabdhä päsavas tena N°°; älabdhä pä$avas tena N°‘; alabdhä 
pasavas tena N, 

Zyanti anämayam ] conj. Csaba DEzs6; yätyamanämayam N,N,; yamti nirämayam M" 
Svyakula® ] MY; ‘vyäsañga® NN: 

#präpyate phalam ] N:N:; prà --- M" 

Sprayogena tu säksme° ] N,N,; --- MY 


Dominic Goodall 131 


mudräbijasamäyogäc cintayed bijam!® uttamam 5 


pa tithir na/7 


ca naksatram nopaväso vidhiyate 
devägnigurubhaktäya mätsaryarahitaya ca 6 
anugrhnäti tat tattvam $ivam yastva!® vidhänatah 
mänase sthandile väpi yatra va!” rocate manah 7 
dvihprakäram”® mayäà proktam idam samskäram uttamam 
sthandile upasobhärtham mänase*? moksadam param 8 
hamsabijam kare nyasya mudräm bandhed”* vicaksanah 
yogamudräm tato baddhvä karanena?* tu sädhakah 9 
hastäbhyäm samspréet pädau dvau hastau yävamastakam?” 


21 


esà mudräa samaäakhyätä $ivasya paramätmanah 10 
kärtikeya uvaca 
kathayasva mahädeva yena mokso dhruvam bhavet 
säpeksam?f tyaja devesa nirapeksam kathayasva me?” 11 
yena vijñätamätrena paéum”* mocayate ksanät 
I$vara uväca 
$rnu sanmukha tattvena prayogam tu sudurlabham 12 
sakrd uccärayed bijam Ÿparäparavyavasthitam}*” 
yathätmani tathä éisye yojayeta vidhänatah 13 
pascäd dhomam prayuñjita® prasädena tu buddhimän 


16%5amäyogäc cintayed bijam ] N,N;; *samakhyätä ccimtayetattvam MY 


lithir na ] N2M*; tithi na N, (wnmetrical); tithir na N°° 

18yastva ] NiN;; paéva® MY 

va] NN; te M" 

2dvihprakäram ] NM”; dvihprakära N, 

2lemam ] N,N,; ---M" 

22sthandile upasobhärtham ma° ] N, N°‘; sthandile tu pasobhärtham ma° N;; ---à M 

23bandhed ] N,N,; baddhvàä M* 

24karanena | NM; karenena N, 

2hastau yävamastakam ] conÿ.; hastau yävanmastakam N,N,(wnmetrical); hasto yävanma- 
stakah M” (wnmetrical) 

26säpeksam J NiN;; sädhakam M” 

27 devesa nirapeksam kathayasva me ] NN, (wnmetrical); UM*Y 

28pasum J NN; pasur MY 

2%vwyavasthitam ] M; °mavasthitam N°°?N,; = vasthitam N°° 

30prayuñjita ] N,N;; prakurvita MY 


132 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


$atam astottaram hutvä dadyät*! pürnähutim tatah°? 14 
sthandile tu vidhir hy esa*? mänase mänasam** bhavet 

ajñätvä tu param tattvam diksäm kurvanti mänaväh 15 
vrthä pariéramas tesäm naiva tatphalam äpnuyat”” 

märgatrayam viditva tu vibhägena*f vicaksanah 16 
guruh sarvasya jagatah so ’nugrhnäti®” mänavän 

yam yam spréati hastena yam yam paéyati caksusä 17 
&ivibhavati tat sarvam éivendukiranähatam 18° 


iti kälajñäne”” prathamah patalah 

ivara uväca*? 
atah! param pravaksyämi präsädasya tu laksanam 

hrasvam dirgham“? plutam caiva laksayen mantravit sada 19 
hrasvo dahati päpäni dirgho moksaprado bhavet 

äpyäyane plutah prokto mürdhni bindusamanvitah 20 
jape dhyäne tathä home äyatam“? cintayed budhah 

$äntikarmasu“* 


pranavädiprayuktäs tu 


sarvesu vasyärthe paustimärane“” 21 


#namaskärantayojitäh * 


5ldadyat J NYN;; datva N?°M” 
2tatah ] N,N;; ta--- MY 
#sthandile tu vidhir hy esa ] N;; sthandile +tu+ vidhi X vaX hy esa N,; --- MY 
3mänase mänasam ] N,N:; mänaso mänaso MY 
#tesäm naiva tatphalam äpnuyät ] N,N,; tesäm äpnuvamti na tatphalam M" 
3 Svibhägena ] NM”; vibhäge+na+ N, 
37 jagatah so’nu ] M”; jagato’nu N,N,(wnmetrical) 
38°hatam |] N,N:; --- M” 
#iti kälajñane ] NN; -— re MY 
#0jévara uväca ] N,N,: om. MY 
atah ] NN; atha MY 
#hrasvam dirgham ] NN; hrasvadirgha® MY 
äyatam J Ni; cäyatam M” 
#4°karmasu |] M”; °karmani N,N, 
Svaéyärthe paustimärane ] N?°; vaéyärthe paurstimärane N%°; vasyärthe caiva yujyate N°; 
vaéyärthe caiva yojate N°'; vaéyäécaiva - yujyate N5°; vasya --- M" 
#6pranavädiprayuktäs tu ] conÿ.; pranavädiprayuktas tu N?<N°°; pranavädiprayuktena N*° 
N°5; ---prayuktäs tu MY 
#eyojitäh ] M”; °yojitah N°‘; °yojitam NN, 


Dominic Goodall 133 


karmakäle prayoktavyä anyathä $äntirüpinah* 22 
siddhyanti*” sarvakarmäni yathestam sädhakasya tu 
evam vidhividhänajñah siddhyate nätra saméayah 23 


iti kälajñäne”° dvitiyah patalah 


yajanam sampravaksyämi yathävad anupürvaéah 
omkäram karnikä padmam dharmajñänädim eva”! ca 24 
vairägyam caiva ai$varyam”? kesaraih $aktayas® tathä 
astatriméatkalopetam pranavam parikirtitam®* 25 
ävähayet tato® devam pranavena vicaksanah 
säannaidhyam cärghapädyam * ca snänam ca pranavena tu 26 
gandhapuspäksatam dhüpam dipam ca pranavena tu°” 
balim caiva tu naïvedyam hemam ca katisütrakam®® 27 
vasträlañkäradänais ca”? pranavena pradäpayet®° 
pranavena tu sarvam syäad yat kiñcid vidhicoditam 28 
evam yastva vidhänena sädhakas tu samähitah°! 
brahmaghno ‘pi labhet siddhim vidhim etat samärabhet®? 29 
prasädam ye na budhyanti na te budhyanti $ülinam? 
jñatamäatrena bijena na punarjanmatäm vrajet 30 


iti kalajñane trtiyah patalah 


#8&änti° ] M; santi N2°; sämta° N°°; sämti° N?©N2°; éänta° N°! 

#siddhyanti ] NNYN,M"; sidhyamte N?° 

50kälajñäne ] N:N:; érikälottare M” 

5l°kä padmam dharmajñänädimeva ] NN; °kä padmam dharmajña+änädimeva Nj; --- 
M 

*?caiva aiévaryam ] MY; caiva cai$varyam N,; caivamaiévaryam N, 
53kesaraih $aktayas ] M”; kesarai saktayas N,; kesare saktayas N°‘; kesare $aktayas N?° 
Spetam pranavam parikirtitam ] NN; ‘petah pranavah parikirtitah MY 
Stato |] NN: tadà MY 
*6sännaidhyam cärgha° ] N;; sännidhyam cärgha° N,; simnaidhyamarghya® MY 

57 gandhapuspäksatam dhüpam dipam ca pranavena tu ] N,; om. N°°(eyeskip); gandhapu- 
puspäksatam dhüpam dipam ca pranavena tu N?*; gandham puspam ca dhüpam ca pranavena 
tu LM 

8hemam ca katisütrakam ] N;; haimam ca katisütrakam N,; ho --- M" 

Syasträlankäradänaié ca ] NN; --- dänäni tu M” (wnmetrical) 

S0bradäpayet ] NiN;; tu däpayet M” 

6lsädhakastu samähitah ] N,N;; sädhakah susamähitah M” 

Gsamärabhet ] N,N,; samäcaret MY 

Géülinam ] N,M”; éülinah N, 


134 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


iévara uväca* 


agnikäryam pravaksyämi tan me nigadatah® érnu 
ullikhyäbhyuksya kundam tu® pranavena vicaksanah 31 
garbhädhänädikam krtvä niskrtim” cäpy apascimäm 
pranavena bhavet sarvam yac cäanyam® vidhicoditam 32 
paécät padmavidhänam tu prâg uktam parikalpayet 
ya evam juhuyän mantri® sadakälam”° samähitah 33 
labhate sarvakämitvam éivalokam ca”! gacchati 
japahomena samyuktäh siddhyante’? nätra saméayah 34 


iti kälajñäne agnikäryapatalas caturthah”* 


atah param mahäbhütadhäranälaksanam”/* param 
sampravaksyämi te skanda sarvakarmävabhäsakam 35 

parthivärnavasamyuktäm”* paräparavibhägasah”6 
pañcodghätaprayuktäm tu/” pärthivim dhärayet sadä 36 


8 nagaräyatanasamkuläm”” 


vanopavanasamyuktäm” 
desakhetapuragrämatoranättälasamyutäm®° 37 


kathinäm acaläm dhyäyed®! väyvagnyambhovivarjitäm®? 


Géiévara uvaca ] NN; om. MY 


Snigadatah ] N,M*; nigaditah N, 

S6ekhyäbhyuksya kundam tu ] M”; *khyäbhyuksyata kumdam N,; khyä---kundam N, 
Sniskrtim ] N,M”; nihkrtim N, 

SByac cänyam ] NN; yac cänyad M'Y N°° 

ya evam juhuyän mantri ] N,N;; evam kuryyät tu mamtrajñah M" 

70kälam ] N,N;; ‘jälam MY 

Tca] M';saN,N, 

7samyuktäh siddhyante ] N,N;; samyuktah sidhyate M 

agnikäryapatalas caturthah ] NiN:; caturthah patalah MY 

7#bhüta° ] N°N,M”; bhütäm N°° 

7parthivärnavasamyuktäm ] N?°; pärthivärnnavasambhütäm N°‘; pärthivärnnavasamyu- 


ktä N?°; parthivävarnabhütänäm N°'; pärthivävarnasamyuktä N°'; pärthivävarnasamyuktäm 
NS; pärthivävarnasambhütä M" 

76bhägasah ] NEN,M"; °bhägajam N, 

7'tu ] NN; — N°; täm M” 

78vanopavanasamyuktäm J Ni; va LI pathanasamyuktä MY 
7nagaräyatana® ] NN (unmetrical); nagäyatana® N'N°°; nägäyatana® MY 
80desakhetapura® ] M”; desänvitapura® N;; desaksetrapura® N?°; desaksetrapura° N4° 
8lkathinam acaläm dhyäyed ] N,N:; kanomacaläddhyäyed M* (#nmetrical) 
8vayvagnyambhovivarjitäm ] N2°MY;  väyvagni+ma+bhovivarjiitim  N,(#rmerrical); 
väyvagnimbhovivarjitam N5° 


Dominic Goodall 135 


nimnonnatäm samäm caiva vallibhih sampravestitäm®? 38 
sarvastambhaprayogesu paustikesu prayojayet 


bhütasuddhim ca kurute diksakäle suniscitam® 39 
ägarjitamahämeghadhärämuéalavarsini®5"86 

plävitämaralokäntä*” värijämbarakhetalät*® 40 
visänalamahäjväläkälapäsäntanäéant*??0 

$intikarmakari hy esä värunärnavayojitä”! 41 
kälänalasikhätopajvälitäsesakhetalam”? 


nirdagdham toyasamghätam bhasmakütam iva sthitam?® 42 
ägneyäksarabhüyisthä®* dhäranä-m-agnisamjnita”” 

nagoddhäre® ripütsäde himapäpapranäsane?” 43 
pracandamärutoddhütavighattitadigantaram”®?? 


100 sarvam äpüritanabhastalam!°! 44 


102 


rajasä cintaye 
cintayet svabhävasünyam ätmänam tadvyavasthitam 


Svallibhih sampravestitäm ] N°‘; valibhih sampravestitam N'°N;; vallibhih parivestitam 
M 

8ksuniécitäm ] M; suniécitam N,N, 
8°meghadhära® |] MY‘; °’meghadhäräm N,N;; °meghadhära’ MY° 
86muéalavarsini ] N?°; °’musalavarsinim N,; °’muéalavarsinah N°; °’musalavarsinah MY 
87elokänta ] conÿ.; °lokäntam N?°N;; ’lokämtam N°°M* 
Svarijambarakhetalat ] con; väryamvaraXdaXkhetalam N?°; va -— khetalam N°‘; 
väryamvara - khetalam N;; värijà svarakhetalät MY 

Svisanalamahajvala” ] N°; visänalamahajvala® N°°N,; visanalam mahäjvälà M” 

90päsäntanäsani ] NiN;; *päsavinäéant MY 

’lvärunärnavayoijita ] N;; varunärnavayojita M”; värunärnavayojitäm N, 

Vjvalitasesa® ] NN; ‘jvalita XkhaX $eçsa°® MY 

%#kütam iva sthitam ] N®N,M°; ‘kütavyavasthitam N?° 

%yäksara° ] NN; °yäksura® MY 

#dhäranämagnisamjñita ] N?°N;; dhäranägni - samjñita N°‘; dhäranäm agnisamjñitam 
M 

’6nagoddhäre ] conj.; nägoddhäre N°N,M*; nämoddhäre N?° 

%himapäpapranäane ] con; himabädhävinäsint N°; himapapavinägint N?°; +hima+ 
XpäpaX +bädhä+ vinäsini N,; himayäyapranä$ane MY 

8ddhüta° ] M”; ‘ddhütam N,N, 

%vighattitadigantaram ] N,N;; ‘digamtaravighattitam MY 

100 Cintaye ] N:; cintayet N,M” 

101ñabhastalam ] N,N:; digamtaram MY 

1023rmänanam tadvyavasthitam ] N?°M”; ätma ---vyavasthitam N°; ätmäntavyavasthitam 
N°5; ätmä+ta+ntavyavasthitam N?° 


136 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


103 tattvam sakalaniskalam 45 


varsantam tam abhidhyäyed amrtam!* sidhakottamah 


äpüritam tatas tena äyogakamaläntikam!® 46 
106 


tatrastham bhagavam devam 


tadyogakamaläntastho ° ätmänam lingarüpinam 
susäksmam yat param dhäma!°” prasädasya mahätmanah 47 


esà mrtyumjayäl® näma dhäranä yoginäm sadà!°° 48 


iti kälajñäne pañcamah patalah 


I$vara uvaca 
atah pratilomam vaksye tan me nigadatah érnu! 
ahamkärena ksubdhänäm!!! tanmätränäm prthak prthak 49 
kham väyur agnir udakam ksitié caiva hi jäyate!!? 
ksiteh kathinadhäritvam!!° 
115 


10 


äpe tu dravasamgraham!!# 50 


pacanam proktam prakä$akaranam param! !$ 


M7 proktam tathä caiva tu $osanam 51 
119 


teje tu 
anile vyähanam 


vyomne!'# tathävakäsitvam avikäritvam eva ca 


103 
104 


tatrastham bhagavam devam ] N;,N;; tatra LI vaddevam M” 

varsantam tam abhidhyäyed amrtam ] N,;5 varsantanabhidhäyeda LI mrtam N°‘; 

varsantam abhidhyäyeda +a+mrtam N?°; pravarsam tam abhidhyäyed amrtam M 
15äyogakamalantikam ] N?°N,; äyoge kamalämtikam N°; äyogakamalanvitam MY 

106]äntastho ] N,N,; läntastha MY 

107dhäma ] N,N;; vyoma M" 

108esa mrtyuñjaya | N?°M°; esa mrtyuñjayo N°‘; eso mrtyuñjayo N; 

109 dhärana yoginam sadä ] N;; yoginäm dhäranä sa XmaX da MY 

Monigadatah $rnu ] N°N°°; nigaditah $rnu N?°N£°; nigadata $runu MY 

Uksubdhänäm ] NN; lubdhänäm M 

Zhi jàyate ] N:N:; tu jayate MY 

1Bedhäritvam ] N,N;; °käritvan MY 

fäpe tu dravasamgraham ] N°‘; âpe tu drava+tva+samgraham N°(wnmetrical); apäm dra- 

vatvam samgrahah N°'(unmetrical); apäm dravatvasamgrahah N,; äpe dravatvasamgraham 

M 

Iteje tu ] NN; tejasah MY 

6ekaranam param] N;; ‘karanaparam N,(wnmetrical); ‘karanam param LI X 

bhekamenaikaika$ah punah $adalaksanamäkäsamx MY 

7anile vyühanam ] N?°N£2°; anile = hanam N°; ani+le+ vyühanam N;; LI MY 


em 


= 


Svyomne ] M"; vyomni N,N,(#metrical) 
’avikäritvam ] N°‘; adhikaritvam N,N°°M* 


em 


Dominic Goodall 137 


evambhütä pratisthäà tu! 


ekaikam pañcadhä punah 52 
$ariresv api!?! bhidyante präninäm dehasambhave!? 

medo mämsas!'# tathasthini tvacah!2{ snäyüni caiva hi 53 
prthivi pañcadhä bhinnä!# éariresu $aririnäm 

ahamkäräd dhi jäyante!?f kramenaikaikasah punah 54 
7 tathänile 


28 rüpam ca ftejasyaite trayo gunähf 7? 55 
130 


$abdalaksanam äkä$am $abdam spar$am 
$abdah sparéas ca! 
rasas ca salile gunäh 
1 raso gandha$ ca!*? pañcamah 56 
gunais ca! pañcabhir yuktä prthivi paripathyate 
prthivyä dhäranam karmam! 


$abdah sparéa$ ca räpam ca 
LA LA pe _ 
$abdah spar$aé ca rüpam ca 


3% osadhinäm ca raksanam 57 
äpyäyanam éariranäm amrtikaranam param 
15 vasa élesma tathaiva ca 58 


salilam pañcadhä bhinnam éariresu éaririnäm 


sveda$onitamaÿjjà ca 


kämah krodha$ ca usmaä ca!%6 ksudhä teja$ ca!*7 pañcamah 59 
agnis tu pañcadhä bhinnah éariresu éaririnäm 


120 bhüta pratistha tu ] N°‘; ° bhütäh pratisthäs tu N°°N,; bhütapratistha = N“‘; 


bhütapratisthä ca MY 

lléariresv api ] N?°N,M”; éariresv api XhiX N°° 

lpräninäm dehasambhave ] N°‘; präninam dehasambhavat N°; präninà dehasambhave 
M”; pränino dehasambhaväa N; 

H5maämsas |] MY; mämsams° NN, 

lAtvacah ] N2°; tvaca NN: tvacà M” 

MSbhinna ] NiN,M°°; bhimna X 4x MY 

12604 dhi jäyante ] N;; ‘dvijäyante N;; ‘di käyam te MY 


127éabdam spar$am ] N:; éabdasparéa N;; éabdasparsam M” 


128éabdah sparéas ca ] N°‘; éabdasparéas ca N,; éabdasparéas ca N°°; éabdaspar$am ca MY 

tejasyaite trayo gunäh ] N;; tejaécaiva trayo guna N°"; teja -— N°; taijasam guna ucyate 
M 

1304 


$abdah spar$a$ ca rüpam ca ] N?‘; éabdaspar$am ca rüpam ca N°?°; éabdasparsam — 
rüpam ca N°; éabdasparéas ca rüpam ca N5°; éabdaspar$am svarüpam ca M” 

Bléabdah sparsa$ca rüpam ca ] N?°; éabda$paréaéca rüpam ca NN‘; éabdasparsam ca 
rüpam ca M” 

2gandhas ca ] N,N:; gamdhas tu MY 

5gunais ca ] M”; gunais tu NN; 

4karmam ] NN; karma N°°MY 

15 svedasonitamajjà ca ] N;; évedasoni+ta+majja X tuX +ca+ N, 

Béusmä ca ] N°‘; usmä ca ca N°‘; üsmä ca N, 
17ksudhà tejaéca ] N?°N;; caksudhä teja N°° 


138 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


präno ’pänah samänas ca udäno vyäna eva ca!** 60 
anilam pañcadhä bhinnam éariresu éaririnäm *? 


mukham érotram ca näsäà ca hrdayam udaram tatha! 61 


akä$am pañcadhä bhinnam éariresu $aririnäm *! 


142 tu süksmam tanmätrasambhavam 62 


etat sthülaéariram 
tanmäträs tu ime jñeyä visayaäs caiva kirtitaäh 

jivayonim abuddhvä!# tu antaryämi sa ucyate 63 
sarvabhütaprado bhüto jivah ksetrajña ucyate 

sa nandati sadä ksetre visayänandalaksane 64 
tadäväsah!## smrto yasmät tadbhävagunarañjitah!# 

cchinnam bhinnam api éastrair vyädhibhié ca prapiditam 65 
duhkhena tyajate deham na virägam kathañcana 

virâgam ca punar gacchet jñäna$aktyä pracoditah 66 


146 mäyasumohitah 


drstva deham jugupse ’ham aho 
; , ee Eu 
yo ‘ham asmin maläkirne ramämi ksanabhañgure 67 
nänävyädhisamakirne visaye! * râgadüsite 
madonmädair vimuhyante visayoragataskaraih 68 
kämakrodhamayais täpair muhur muhuh sutäpite!* 
atyantakle$abahule!* jaräamrtyusamäkule!* 69 


cintaäokasusampürne aho dehe suduhkhite 


B8bräno ’pänah samänas ca udäno vyäna eva ca ] N°‘; om. N°°; pränopana$amänas ca udäno 
vyänam eva ca N°‘; präno päna$amänaé ca däno vyäna eva ca N°“(wnmetrical) 

139 

1 


anilam pañcadhä bhinnam éariresu éaririnäm ] N?°N,; om. N°° 
#0mukham érotram ca näsä ca hrdayam udaram tathä ] N?“(#rmetrical); om. N*°; mukham 
srotram ca näsà ca hrdayam mudaram tathä N°°; mukhai srotram näsä ca hrayamudram tathä 
N° (unmetrical) 

läkäsam pañcadhä bhinnam éariresu éaririnäm ] N?°N,; om. N°° 
etatsthüla® ] N,; etasthüla® N°°; etasthülam(?) N*° 
18°,onim abuddhvä ] conÿ.; °yonim abuddhä N,N, 
I#tadäväsah ] N?°; tadäväsa N°°N°°; tadävasa N°° 
1#tadbhäva® ] N?°N;; tadbhäve N°° 
16ham aho ] N,; ‘ham maho N, 
Wvisaye ] N°; visayo N,N£° 
148°bair muhur muhuh sutäpite ] N,;*pai muhur muhum sutäpite N°‘; *pai muhur muhum 
sutäpitoh N°° 

atyantakleéabahule ] N?°‘; atyamtaklesabahulair N°‘; atyamtaklesabahuler N°‘; atyamta- 
klesabahuler N°° 


150kule ] N,; °kuleh N°°; °kulaih N°° 


Dominic Goodall 


151 


carmabandhe"?" sudurgandhe $ukra$onitasambhave 70 


152 


vinmütraretahsamkirne ?* katham näma ramämy aham 


darpanesu yathä cchäyä citre räpam yathä sthitam 71 


anarthäni manojñäni 


tadvad etac charirakam 
evam virägam äpanno jñänasiddhim samihate 72 
jñänasiddhir vimoksäya vinayäya nayäya ca 


ubhayärtham idam $ästram kälajñänam $ivodbhavam 73 
iti kälottare sasthamah patalah 


atah param bhavet präno da$adhä samvyavasthitah 
pränädyäh väyavah pañca nägädyäs ca tathaiva ca 74 
präno ’pänah!** samänas ca udäno vyäna eva ca 
nâgah kürmo ’tha krkaro devadatto dhanamjayah 75 
mätrjam pitrjam caiva éariram dvividham smrtam 
éukra$onitasamyogat!* satkausikam udährtam 76 
romakotyo!* bhavet tisrah ardhakotis!*? tathottarä 
dvätriméad dasanäh proktä!*® nakhä viméat!® prakirtitäh 77 


160 


mämsam * palasahasraikam raktam palasatam smrtam 


paläni daéa medasya tvacam caiva tu tatsamam 78 
161 palatrayam 


$ukram dvikudavam jñeyam pittasya kudavam smrtam 79 


maÿjjà ca dväda$apalä mahäraktam 


arddhädhakam!®? ca élesmasya vinmütram cäpramänatah 
väyavah pamca ye proktäh $rnu tesäm pravistaram 80 
pränas tu prathamo väyur navänäm api sa prabhuh 


151 
152 
153 


carmabandhe ] N,; carmmavadhe N, 
vinmütra® | N:; vinmütra N, 
manonjñaäni ] N2°; manodyäni N,N°° 
I54präno ’pänah ] N?°; pränopäna N,N£° 
1550 


pc, ©. 


yogät ] N2°; ‘yoga N,N5° 
I56romakotyo ] N;; roma kotyä N, 
157tisrah ardhakoti° ] N,; tisro ‘rddhakoti° N,(#rmetrical) 


139 


I58dvätriméad da$anah proktaà ] em.; dvätrméad da$anä proktäh N;; dvatriméad dasana+h+ 


proktä N, 
15?nakhä viméat ] N,; nakhäh viméa+t+ N, 
160mämsam ] N,; mämsa° N, 
161mahäraktam ] N,; mahärakta° N, 
162ardhädhakam ] N,; arddhätakam N, 


140 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


pränah pränamayah präno visargäpüranam !% prati 81 
nityam äpürayaty esa präninäm urasi sthitah 

nicchväsocchväsakäsais tu 1% präno jivasamägritah!55 82 
prayänam kurute yasmät tasmat pränah prakirtitah 

apänayaty!% apänas tu ähäram!” manujäm adhah 83 
$ukramütravaho väyur apänas tena kirtitah 

pitam bhaksitam äghrätam !% raktapittakaphänilam 84 
samam nayati gâtresu samäno näma märutah 

spandayaty adharam!%° vaktram netragätraprakopanah!”° 85 


udvejayati marmäni!”! 


udäno näma märutah 
vyäno vinämayaty añgam vyäno vyädhiprakopanah 86 
priter vinäsah kathito!”* värddhikyam!” vyäna ucyate 
pränädyà väyavah prokta nägädyäh procyate ‘dhunä 87 
udgäre näga ity uktah kürmas conmilane sthitah 
krkarah ksudhite!7# caiva devadatto vijrmbhake!”* 88 
dhanañjayah sthito ghose mrtasyäpi na muñocati 
väyuvrmdam samäkhyätam samäsena tu sanmukha 89 


iti kälottare saptamah patalah 


dehacäram pravaksyämi ahoräträyanani ca 


176 caiva ünarätro!/” ‘dhimäsakam 90 
178 


samkräntim visuvam 
$aktisamarasam jñeyam idäyäm daksinäyanam 


163bräno visargäpüranam ] conj. Diwakar ACHARYA; pränah visarggäh püranam N;; prä- 
na+h+ visargäh püranam N; 
164oLäsais tu ] N?N;; käsaustu N°° 
16°samasritah |] e.; *samäsrtah N,N, 
166apänaya® ] N:; apaäm naya° N, 
167ähäram ] e.; ähära° NN, 
168bhaksitam ägrhätam ] N?°; bhaktitam äghrätam N;; bhaktim tam äghrätam N°° 
1spandayaty adharam ] N2°; spamdayaty avaram N, N° 
170kopanah ] conÿ.; °kopanam NN, 
l7Imarmaäni ] N?°N2°; gäträni N:°N°° 
l’priter vinäsah kathito ] conÿ.; pritir vinäsakathito N,N, 
1värddhikyam ] N:N°°; varddhakyam N?° 
174ksudhite ] N2°; ksubhite N°; ksudite N°°; ksu X== X te N°° 
15vijrmbhake ] N%°; vijrmbhane N°°N, 
176samkräntim visuvam ] N2‘; samkrätim visuvac N°; samkrätim visuvam N°‘; samkrä- 
ntimXrXvisuvam N; 
177üna° ] N;; jana° N, 


lBidayam ] N°; idayam N°°; idaya N, 


Dominic Goodall 141 


madhyadese yada hy ätmä visuvam tam vidur budhäh 91 
calate gacchate caiva!/” madhyadeée yadä pumaän 

uttare daksine cäpi samkräntih'®° sä vidhiyate 92 
ksudhite ünarätram!#! tu adhimäso vijrmbhake 

ürdhvapräno aha$ caiva apäno rätrir eva ca 93 
vyäpini sarvabhütaänäm éakti$ caiva nibodha me 

trtiye caiva äyäme dvipürvam sasthavindukam 94 
érüyate ca yadä $aktih $rutva budhvä ca mänavah 

liyate ca éive deve bhinne dehe $ivam vrajet!®? 95 
na $aktirahitä mantra diksänugrahakärinah 

$aktihinä na siddhyanti na te yänti paräm gatim 96 


183 


$ivah sarvagato jñeyo *” nämarüpavivarjitah 


cinmätrapuruso jñeyah éivo vyäpya vyavasthitah 97 


184 


bhävaye ** samarasatvena $ivena saha samyutah 


evam samaraso bhütvä gacchate $ivam avyayam 98 


athavätra! 5° 


nirälambam mürdhnim älambya yatnatah 

yägam yogam japam dhyänam sarvakarmäni kärayet 99 
$ivam ädhäya karmäni kurvann api na lipyate 

yogasiddhim aväpnoti $ivasäyojyatäm!6 vrajet 100 
jñänayogam mayà proktam aklesat!#” siddhimoksadam 

apariksya na dâtavyam abdatrayaniväsine 101 
brähmane vrttasampanne ksatriye dharmakiline 

vaiéye caiva dayäyukte $üdre éu$rüsatatpare 102 
anyathä dustamartyänäm nindätarkänuvartinäm 

na deyam éivasadbhävam anyäyapathavartinäm 103 
$ivabhaktivihinäya gurubhaktivivarjite 

jijñäsakautukärthibhyo na deyam tattvam uttamam 104 


iti kälajñäne ’stamah patalah 


17calate gacchate caiva ] conj.; calito gacchate caiva N?°N,; calato gacchato(?) = va N°° 
180samkrantih ] N?°N;; samkranti N«° 

I81ksudhite üna° ] N°4‘; ksubhite üna° N°‘; ksudhite jana° N?°; ksudhite jana° N£° 
182Lhinne dehe $ivam vrajet ] N?°N;; bhitite N4° 

185ivah sarvagato jñeyo ] N?°N,; éiva sarvagato jñeye N°° 
I84bhävaye ] N,; bhävayet N, 

185athavatra ] N?°N£°; athava tu N°‘; athava = N°° 
186%ävojyatam ] N;; ‘säyujyatäm N, 

187aklesät ] NN; ---t N°° 


142 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


I$vara uväca 
dehasthah sakalo jñeyo niskalo dehavarjitah 
äptopade$agamyo ’sau sarvatah kim api sthitah 105 
prapañcarahitam $äntam nigüdham ca param guha'Ÿs 
käryakäranabhävena sarvatraiva vyavasthitam 106 
sa eva bhagavän vyäpi tile tailam iva sthitam 
guruvakträt tu!%? labhyeta pratyaksam sarvatomukham 107 
svayam uccarate yasmät svadehävasthitah éivah °° 
tasmat tattvavidäm pumsäm tad eva japam ucyate 108 


PT viditva tu tadantam dvädasämgulam 


pranasyante 

taträntastham vijäniyat sarvavyäpi niramjanam 109 
niyate $aktinä jivas tasmin präpya nivarttate 

gamägamam viditva tu mucyate nätra saméayah 110 
evam vyäpi sa bhagavän karisyati gamägamam 

vyäpitväd gamanam nästi tatrastho vyäpayet prabhuh 111 
hamsahamseti yo brüyad dhamso devah sadäivah 

mätrmodakanyäyena grhitavyam!”? vicaksanaih 112 
devayänasya pürve tu pitryänasya cottare 

madhye tu setubandhasya gatva bhüyo na jäyate 113 
mano ’py anyatra niksiptam drstir anyatra patita 

tathäpi yoginäm!” yogo avyucchinnah pravartate 114 
avicchinnena samyuktam devam tam viddhi tattvatah 

kathitam tu mayä vatsa!** nihsamdigdham avistaram 115% 
atah parataram nâsti ivät parataram éivam 

brahmahatyädikaih päpair na ca lipyati tattvavit 116 


asiddhau!% tattvavic caiva dehapäte $iväntikam 117 


ac, 


188nigüdham ca param guha ] NPN;; saprapamcam X= X param gurum N°; -- N°! 
18 ouruvaktrat tu | N,; guruvaktra tu N, 
10esthitah $ivah ] N?°N£°; °sthitam $ivam N°; ‘sthitasivah N°° 
Mlpränasyante ] N%°; pränasyamta N°‘; pränasyämtar N, 
grhitavyam ] N?°; grahitavyam NN, 
13yoginam ] N;; yoginäm N, 
éyatsa ] N,; vaccha N, 

15{n N, this is the last line in the old hand. The following 6 pädas are written in a later hand 
in the margin. 


6asiddhau |] conj.; asiddho NN, 


Dominic Goodall 143 


NOTES 
1 Cf Sardhatrisatikälotiara 1.4: 


athätah sampravaksyämi fästram paramadurlabham 
nämnä tu vätulät tanträd dadhno ghrtam ivoddhrtam 


The parallel reveals that we should understand the locative kälottare as 
having the same sense as an ablative would here. The last p#da is an old 
cliché to be found, for instance, in Mahäbhärata 13.17.13, 12.306.32;: 
Vinäsikhätantra 317. 


2ab Cf. the Nepalese and South Indian texts of the opening of the Sarva- 
jhänottara (GooDaALL 1998:x and fns. 145 and 146). The hypermetrical 
South Indian opening verse reads: 


vrksänäm säratamam puspam samudränäm ksirasägaram 
tathà ca sarvasästränäm särabhütam Sivägamam. 


The fifth verse in the Nepalese opening reads: 


madhuvat sarvapuspesu säram uddhrtya nirmitam 
tac cedam sarvasästresu säram uddhrtya $ambhunä. 


2cd Identical to Sérdhatrisatikälottara 1.5ab. 


3ab Identical to Särdhatrisatikälottara 1.Gab, except that BHATT% edition has 
tad for tam. ‘The latter is perhaps intended as a neuter accusative. 


3d Ms text could have been preferred, but it seems more likely that the con- 
jectured reading, with a problematic hiatus in the middle of the päda, 
gave rise to the variants we find. 


3c-5 These lines are closely paralleled in the Brahmayämala (. 326", new nu- 
meration 331, lines 3—4): 


sakalo niskalah prokto devadevo nadätmanah 

etad bijam samäkhyätam sarvvamantraprasädhakam 
mantram ekan tu nädäkhyam smaranäsmaranocyate 
kim anyair bahubhir devi vibhägais tu malätmakaih 
jhätvà nädefvaran devam tyajet sarvvam palälavat 


144 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


etat te tantrasarvvasvam jnänamustim varänane 
älabdhä tena pasavah $ivam yänti anämayam 

kim anyair bahubhir bbijai cittavyäkulakärakaih 
bijenaikena tat sarvvam bahudä phaladäyakam 
prayogena tu süksmena yogadrstena mantravit 
mudrämantraprayogais ca svadhyänädipitam drutam 
prayacchati mahäsiddhih vidhinä sädhakasya tu 


This shared passage—we are not sure of the direction of borrowing—has 
inclined us to accept the readings of M” in 3c and 4b. 


Gab This is evidently an old tantric cliché, found in exactly the same form 
in, e.g., Misväsa Guhyasütra 14.101, Tanträloka 29.65ab, Tantrasadb- 
häva 15.56ab, Kaulajñänanirnaya 21.10ab, Atharvavedaparisista 2.5.5, 
35.1.4, Guhyasiddhi 1.66ab, and with small differences in formulation 
in, e.g., Bhairavamañgala 252cd. 


7b Does this mean: ‘That reality bestows compassion if one venerates Siva 
according to prescription. ? 


yastvä |] We would expect samprasärana here, yielding the form ss#v4. 
The same form is found in 29. It appears to be common in a range of 
tantric scripture from various periods. It is not recorded by OBERLIES 
2003 as occuring in the epics. 


8 dvihprakäram | dvih by itself would mean twice, as would dviprakäram. 
What we have may not be correct Sanskrit but it may be authorial: cf. 
trihprakäram in Kubjikämata 20.23. 


Note that there is no mention of the /iga as the primary substrate of 
worship. Since this is a Siddhäntatantra, such an assertion might be ex- 
pected. Here, in keeping with the reductionist spirit of the text, ‘mental 
(i.e. internal) worship is presented as being superior to exterior worship. 


9 bandhet ] This is an aifa optative for badhniyät. 


The first half-line does not mention which mudrä is intended. It is pos- 
sible that the second half-line is intended to expand on the first, and that 
the mudrä is the yogamudrä: ‘The wise person should place the hamsa 
in his hand and make the mwdrä: holding then [this] yogamudrä, with a 
correct posture, the sädhaka..….” For the interpretation ‘correct posture’, 


Dominic Goodall 145 


10 ‘.. 


see TAK IL, s.v. karana. But since what immediately follows is the mwdrä 
widely known as the mahämudrä, which cannot be performed in a static 
posture, perhaps the text rather means to refer to three separate mudräs: 
‘The wise person should place the hamsa in his hand and make its mudrä. 
Then, after making the yogamudrä by [adopting] a correct posture, the 
sädhaka..? 


.with his hands he should touch his legs and his arms [and all the way up 
the body] up to his head.” yävamastakam ] The sense here is of course 
that of yävan mastakam, which would be unmetrical here, and further- 
more it would be unmetrical in the cadence of the even-numbered päda, 
the place in which we least expect an infringement of the metre. We 
have therefore emended away the final letter of y4vat against grammar 
and against the evidence of the manuscripts. Final # is relatively fre- 
quently omitted from the end of third person optatives in -ef in early 
Saiva literature: see note on 98a below. There are a few instances of y4- 
vat whose final # has been jettisoned for the sake of the metre preserved in 


the printed text of the Suzcchanda: 4.234d, 7.90d, 7.136c and 11.73b. 
BHarTs text of Sérdhatrisatikälottara 1.15—16b reads as follows: 
asya mudräm pravaksyämi sädhakänäm hitäya vai 


hastäbhyäm samspr$et pädäd ürdhvam yävat tu mastakam 
esä mudrà mahämudrä sarvakämärthasädhikä. 


11c—12b Cf. Särdhatrisatikälottara 8.33c—-34b, which in BHATT'S text reads as 


follows: 


vistaram tyaja devesa samksepät kathayasva me 
yena vijñänamätrena pasün mocayate ksanät 


Our text is hypermetrical, but probably authorially so. We might inter- 
pret thus: ‘Leave aside, o Lord of the gods, [methods] which depend 
on other factors and teach me [a method] which is independent—[a 
method] through which, as soon as it is known, [the guru] may liber- 
ate a bound soul [through initiation]? 


13b paräparavyavasthitam | ‘This expression may not actually be corrupt: it is 


not clear to me what it means. 


146 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


14 prasädena |] On the identity of the prasäda-mantra (or präsäda-), see note 
on 30 below. 


15c-16b The awkward syntax here is avoided in BHATT'S text of Särdhatrisati- 
kälottara 8.5: 


ajñätvaitäni tattväni yo diksäm kartum icchati 
vrthà pariframas tasya naiva tatphalam äpnuyät. 


16c märgatrayam ] The three paths are presumably the three tubes best known 
(see note on 113) by the names #44, pingalä and susumnä. 


17ab jagatah so ‘nugrhnäti | Instead of this reading of M”, one could adapt 
that of the Nepalese MSS either to yield a hiatus between the pädas or a 
frozen sandhi: jagato anugrhnäti. (For such frozen sandhis, see OBERLIES 
2003:21-4 and cf. 47ab, 92c 113cd.) 


17c-18b This is another mismatched relative sentence: the correlative of y4m 
Jam must be fat sarvam. 


19-20 This pair of verses is the same as Särdhatrisatikälottara 16.1-2, except 
for the last half-line, 16.2cd, which BHATT prints thus: äpyäyane plutas 
caiva bindunä mürdhni bhüsitah. 


22 What is the plural subject in this verse? Are plural instances of the präsäda 
referred to? If the präsäda is in this text the pranava (see note on 30 
below), then could one describe instances of it as pranavädiprayuktäh? 


23d siddhyate | The anomalous 4tmanepada is required here to fill the metre 
(otherwise both the 2nd and the 3rd syllables of the päda would be short); 
but cf. note on 34d. 


24-25b This is how BHATT prints Särdhatrisatikälottara 5.\ab, 2c-3b: 


Jajanam sampravaksyämi yathävidhy anupürvasah… 
hrdayam karnikà padmam dharmam jñänädim eva ca 
vairägyam ca tathaisvaryam ifäntam vahnito nyaset 
faktibhih kesaravyüham hrdayena tu kalpayet. 


Dominic Goodall 147 


In that text, the heart-mantra is used to generate each part of the throne 
of worship. In ours it is simply om. The legs in the SE, SW, NW and 
NE are, as usual, entities with the names of the four positive qualities of 
the buddhi. From the distribution of readings, it seems likely to us that 
the perplexingly nonsensical formulation dharmajñänädi-m-eva ca was 
original to whichever text was the source of the non-eclectic recensions. 
We guess that the element 44 was at first intended to stand in place of 
the other members of the familiar list, which the redactor then after all 
supplied. As for its apparently masculine accusative ending, it could be 
supposed to have been intended as a mistaken neuter ending, or it could 
be assumed to be a euphonic ‘glide’ consonant introduced to obviate 
hiatus. 


The last half-line quoted could be interpreted to mean: ‘He should pro- 
duce the group of filaments, together with [the nine] powers [of Vamä, 
etc.] using the heart-mantræ. Our text might be parallel: ‘so too [one 
should produce with the mantra oM] the powers [of Vämä, etc.(?)] to- 
gether with the stamens [on which they are to be installed]. 


25c It is unusual for oM to be divided up into so many kaläs. The reason for 
doing so here is presumably that it is used as the mälamantra, in other 
words as Sadäsiva himself, whose mantric body in other contexts is the 
five brahmamantras, which are quite regularly subdivided into 38 units 
(see TAK 2, s.v. kalä 3 and 4). 


26-28 Särdhatrisatikälottara 5.4-5 in BHATT'S edition read: 


ävähayet tato devam hrdayena tu sanmukha 
sthäpanam pädyam arghyam ca tathäcamanam eva ca 
snapanam püjanam caiva hrdayena tu kärayet 
uktänuktam ca yat kiñcit tat sarvam hrdayena tu 


This insistence on the use of the heart-mantra for all manner of named 
contexts and whenever in doubt is also to be found in the Dvisati- 
kälottara, and it should therefore be no surprise, since that text is the 
base for the surviving paddhati-literature, that we find HAM, the heart- 
syllable, to be a ubiquitous constituent of mantras given in the paddhatis 
injunctions. In our text, it is the pranava which is used for all purposes, 


148 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


in fact for even more, since it appears to replace even the #älamantra 
and the vñgamantras. 


The distribution of variants suggests that the odd double-vrddhi form 
sännaidhyam is original. (It is found as a variant, which should proba- 
bly be adopted, in 59.3d in the old Skandapuräna and it occurs in early 
manuscripts of other tantric works, but in passages which appear not to 
have been published: an exception is Sväyambhuvasütrasañgraha 4.67.) 
The variation between #rgha and arghya, which is to be found in the 
transmission of many texts, appears to be regionally determined: the 
former is typical of Northern sources and the latter of Southern ones. 
We hesitated whether to emend 28a to vasträlañnkäradänäni, but decided 
that the Nepalese text was construable. We could translate 27d-28b as 
follows: ‘He should give a golden thread for the waist, together with 
the gifts of clothes and ornaments, using the pranava 


29 yastvä ] See note on 7b. We would expect samprasärana here, yielding the 
form istva. 


30 Cf. Särdhatrisatikälottara 15.4cd: präsädam ye na budhyanti te na budhyanti 
Sañkaram and 8.41b: na punarjanmatäm vrajet In our context, it is odd 
to find praise of the präsäda (of which prasäda is a synonym) at the end 
of a chapter in which only pranava has been used and in which pranava 
even serves as the root-mantra, in other words as Siva. Now it could be 
argued that this is an instance of clumsy scissors-and-paste editing: the 
redactor stuck in here a stock Kälottara half-line that didn't happen to 
fit. But it seems rather more likely that the term präsäda refers here not 
to the usual root-mantra of the non-eclectic recensions of the Kälottara, 
but rather to the root-mantra of this text: in other words, präsädal prasäda 
must be a synonym for pranava in our tantra. 


32-33b 32ab and 33ab are identical to Särdhatrisatikälottara 6.3ab and 
6.4ab. The intervening line in the Särdhatrisatikälottara is: hrdayenaiva 
mantrajñnah sarvakarmäni kärayet. Cf. note on 26-28. 


yac cänyam ] Note the #i$a use of the non-pronominal neuter ending on 
a pronoun. While OBERLIES records of epic usage that anya and other 
pronouns ‘sporadically do not inflect as pronominal adjectives’, his ex- 
amples of nominal inflections are of the oblique cases (2003:111). 


Dominic Goodall 149 


34d Here the anomalous 4tmanepada is not metrically required (cf. note on 
23d), unless we assume that M reading is original; but the phrase is 
an old and widespread cliché, both with siddhyante (e.g. Mahäbhärata 
5.35.34) and with siddhyate (e.g. Mahäbhärata 13.109.35). 


35d sarvakarmävabhäsakam | Presumably the idea intended is that the prac- 
tice of yogic dhäranäs (and not their laksana) help to make all ritual 
actions work. 


36 pärthivärnavasamyuktäm ] In $aiva works, the meditative exercise 
(dhäranä) that focusses on the element ‘earth’ is be practised with a 
mantra containing the semi-vowel /4 (cf., e.g., GoopaLz 2004:360), 
which is therefore the seed-syllable (v4rna or arna) belonging to earth 
(pärthiva). The redactor of our text appears to have intended the 
word 4rnava, ‘ocean’, to mean ‘seed-syllable’, doubtless in part because 
of having confused the words varna and arna. The variant readings 
recorded at this point reflect various attempts to normalise this anomaly. 
That the anomaly is authorial is suggested by its repetition in 41d. 


37 nagaräyatanasamkuläm | Instead of this hypermetrical reading, we could 
have adopted nagäyatanasamkuläm, ‘full of mountains and dwelling 
places’; but it bears a feature shared by authorially hypermetrical read- 
ings in other works: it begins with two short syllables than can be read 
together rapidly (cf. GoopaLL [quoting ToKUNAGA] 1998:lvii, fn. 132 
and 2004:Ixxxvi). 


40 I interpret this reconstructed verse thus: ‘The water-[fixation] (värijà) is 
one which rains down club-like floods from roaring great clouds, which 
floods, down from the surface of the sky, [everything] up to the world of 
the gods.’ 


I assume that the -ÿ3 in vérijä is loosely used to mean ‘connected with? 
and without its original sense of ‘born from’ (cf. the prevalence of se- 
mantically diluted, one-syllable, adjective-forming tags in the Paräkhya: 
GoopaLL 2004:Ixxxi—Ixxxii). 


khetala is an anomalous form, but we may believe it to be intended 
because it is repeated in 42. (It also occurs in, e.g. Xrsnayamäritantra 
4.61d). We assume that it means ‘the “surface” of the sky’ and has 
been formed as a counterpart to bhätala on the mistaken analogy of such 


150 


41cd 


Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


aluk-samäsas as khecara, ‘which moves in the sky”. Here it seems doubly 
awkard because it occurs in a tautologous compound with ambara. 


Perhaps interpret: ‘which destroys [everything] up to the noose of death 
that is the great flame from the fire of the poison [that emerged from the 


milk-ocean] 


41d värunärnavayojitä ] See note on 36. 


42ab 


42cd 


Whether or not one emends to a feminine ending at the end of this 
compound, one is inclined to interpret this as a bahuvrihi describing the 
fire-fixation: ‘By which the whole extent of the sky is set ablaze in a tur- 
moil of flames [like those] of the fire [at the end a cycle] of time.” Two 
considerations have prompted me not to emend to -khetalä. The first is 
that there appear to be other instances of such unmoored adjectives, e.g. 
in 44. The second is that there are neuter(?) endings in the following 
half-line, which intervenes between this compound and the mention of 
the fixation it should describe, and which makes the impression of be- 
ing a prose analysis of a bahuvrihi from which the relative pronoun has 
anomalously been dropped. For khetala, see note on 40. 


Perhaps interpret: ‘[by which] a mass of water [may be] burned and al- 
most (iv4) be reduced to a heap of ash.” sarighäta has been treated as a 
neuter noun. 


43b dhäranä-m-agnisamjnitä | Intended, presumably, are two nominatives: it 


43cd 


is to be assumed then that the #7 at the end of dhäranä functions as a 
euphonic glide. (There are of course other possibilities: that an accusative 
was intended, as in M”, or that there was originally a hiatus.) 


nagoddhäre ripñtsäde himapäpapranäsane ] ‘lit is good for] uprooting 
mountains, extirpating enemies, destroying the evil(?) of snow’. ‘The 
reading himabädhävinäfini is also possible: it would leave the preceding 
locatives seeming even more untethered. It is that reading which sug- 
gests that päpa should be taken as an ‘evil’ or obstacle. We could, how- 
ever, interpret ‘destroying snow and evil creatures’, for cf. the bhtras, 
räksasas and pifäcas that the fixation of väyu sweeps away in Paräkhya 
14.46. Both the Parkhya and Mälinivijayottara 13.37 to some extent 
support the emendation to ragoddhäre, but neither passage uses the verb 


Dominic Goodall 151 


uddhr, and it is possible that r4goddhäre should be left unchanged and in- 
terpreted to mean ‘drawing up snakel[-person]s (or perhaps just conceiv- 
ably ‘attracting elephants”?). Would the heat draw snake-folk up from 
the underworld? Cf. Sväyambhuvasütrasañgraha 20.14: 


nirbijikarane caiva himasya ca vinä$ane 
nägoddhäre ripütsäde dhäranäm dhärayed imäm 


nirbiji° ] conj.; niviji® M”; nivici° Ed. 


44 Perhaps interpret: ‘The fierce-wind-fixation: he should visualise the uni- 
verse as having the extent of the sky filled with dust, such that the di- 
rections are churned up and broken apart.” The second half of the verse 
appears to contain à bahuvrihi that has been half dismantled and which 
should perhaps be understood as though it read raja-äpüritanabhastalam. 
(It seems conceivable, however, that szrvam was intended to qualify r4b- 
bastalam.) The first half-line I have taken as a bahuvrihi adverb, but, in 
spite of its ending, it might have been intended as an adjective describing 
the väyudhäranä (cf. 42ab). And it is possible that the ending is corrupt 
and should be emended to a feminine nominative. It is assumed that 
pracandamärutà is given as the name of the fixation. 


cintaye ] N;'s cintaye has been retained, but treated as a third singular 
optative (cintayet). The final # in such optative forms seems often to drop 
off in Nepalese sources for early Saiddhäntika texts. Of course in many 
cases we cannot know whether this is not just because the sound was 
softened or suppressed in the pronunciation of some Nepalese scribes, 
but we can be reasonably certain that this is at least in some places an 
authorial feature. Consider, for instance, Nisväsa Mülasütra 4.5: catur- 
the püjaye Sträni gandhapuspair yathäkramam, ‘In the fourth [circuit] he 
should venerate the weapons in due order with incense and flowers.’ 


In our passage, however, we are not forced by the metre to accept the 
anomalous cintaye. Furthermore, it may be noted that N,% graph for #4 
is sometimes rather close to its graph for s7, which might have been so of 
other manuscripts of its period, and so cintaye here is perhaps as likely to 
be a graphic confusion as an authorial anomaly. Verse 97 below presents 
us with the same difficulty. 


152 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


45 Perhaps interpret: ‘He should contemplate [everything?] as essentially 
empty, and situated in that [he should see] his self, and in that [in turn] 
the Lord God, the reality which is both Formed and Formless.’ 


Here the accusative masculine devam is put in apposition to the neuter 
tattvam and also to bhagavam, which must be intended as an accusative 
masculine singular. ‘The qualification sakalaniskala is presumably in- 
tended to convey that it is Sadäsiva who is to be visualised. 


46-47 ‘The best of sädhakas should meditate on Him as raining down nectar, 
and then [he should see everything] as filled with that [nectar|, right up 
to the top of the yoga-lotus[-throne]. Then, seated on the top of the 
yoga-lotus[-throne], he should see himself as the image//nga, which is 
the extremely subtle supreme glory of the great prasädal-mantra] 

The worshipper should, as is usual in tantric visualisation, see himself as 

God. The lotus is clearly the lotus-throne that is imagined in daily wor- 

ship. This throne is sometimes referred to as the yogapitha (see GOODALL 

et al., 2005:23), which probably explains its being referred to here as 
yogakamala. The sense of liñga here is not certain, but it might indeed 
be the so-called aniconic (avyakta) liriga that is intended. Cf. Sivadhar- 

mottara 10.85-86: 


añgusthamätram acalam dhyäyed oùkäram Kvaram 
kadambagolakäkäram tärärüpam iva sthitam 
dhyäyed vä rafmijälena dipyamänam samantatah 
dhyäyed va satanum $äntam vaksyamänakarüpakam 


The frozen sandhi transmitted in the Nepalese text has been adopted, but 
Ms more correct yogakamaläntastha would also be possible. 


48a Here one could defend N,'s pre-correction reading on the grounds that 
the redactor might sometimes be treating these dhäranäs as masculine 
and sometimes as feminine. 


49a À ma-vipulä, but without the normal preamble. From context we may 
assume that pratilomam is intended to mean ‘[the sequence of rattvas 
given in] reverse order. 


50c-52b äpe appears to be intended to be à locative singular of a masculine or 
neuter noun, though the noun in question is usually treated as feminine 


Dominic Goodall 153 


52cd 


and plural. The variants attest to transmitters' attempts to improve this 
oddity away. Similarly seje is intended to mean the same as fejasi, and 
vyomne stands for vyomni. Adopting the grammatically correct Nepalese 
reading vyomni would entail assuming a päda in which both the 2nd and 
the 3rd syllables were short; Ms vyomne is more likely to be authorial. 
The functions assigned to the elements are unsurprising, with the excep- 
tion of adhikäritvam, which we have accordingly corrected, following 
N?°, to avikäritvam. 


evambhütà pratisthä tu |] One could perhaps instead read with M” 
thus: evam bhütapratisthä ca, and accordingly understand the half- 
line to mean: ‘The anchoring [in living beings] of these elements 
[takes place] accordingly, but with each being split five ways.” For this 
sense of pratisthä, cf. perhaps Kvarapratyabhijnäkärikä 1.4ab: tathä hi 
jadabhütänäm pratisthä jivadä$raya. 


55b One could defend N,'s reading here, assuming that the redactor some- 


times used prätipadikas in place of inflected forms. 


55d This seems to be a päda whose formulation provoked the wish to alter it, 


but what that formulation was is difficult to determine. N?°s fejasyaite 
assumes an irregular genitive ejasya, which could easily have been altered 
to the correct £ejasy ete, and so it is perhaps not convincing as the reading 
that has given rise to the others. But I am not sure what would be. 


57c The final » of karmam, which the scribe of N, has copied and then cor- 


rected away, could be regarded either as a wrongly regularised ending, or 
as a euphonic glide sound that obviates hiatus (see note on 99b below). 


60c-62b These lines were first omitted by N; and then added in its margin 


by a later hand. But there is no strong reason to suspect them of being 
secondary; in fact they seem required. The päda 61d is metrically awkard 
because both its second and third syllables are short. Perhaps one is in- 
tended to read the final syllable of hrdayam as a nasalised, and therefore 
slightly lengthened, vowel sound, such as might be considered by some 
to be notated with an anusvära, in spite of the following vowel. It is 
possible, however, that the redactor was not disturbed by the metrical 
irregularity of having both second and third syllables short. 


154 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


63 Apart from the hiatus within the päda, the treatment of anmätra as mascu- 
line plural is irregular. The verse may mean: ‘These are to be understood 
to be the subtle elements, and they have been declared to be objects. 
Those who do not understand the [true] origin of the soul call this [sub- 
tle body made up of subtle elements] the “inner controler”. Antaryämin 
is not a typically Saiva usage, and it is possible that Vedänta-influenced 
thinkers are the people alluded to here. 


64 The first quarter of this verse is obscure to me. The attribute visayänanda- 
laksana is à cliché usually applied to räga (eg. Niväsa Guhyasñtra 
7.224, Rauravasütrasañgraha 1.9ab, Svacchanda 11.98cd, Tantrasad- 
bhäva 11.96); but cf. Rauravasñtrasañgraha 2.19cd: so 5rjad bhagavän 
Ko visayänandabhümayah (in which we must take -bhümayah as femi- 
nine accusative plural). 


67b Also conceivable would be mäyäsu mohitah, but an allusion to the cosmic 
matter mäyä seems more likely. 


68c Context suggests that vimuhyante is to be understood as the locative sin- 
gular of a perfect passive participle (vimohite would here have been un- 
metrical). 


69b This päda is metrically anomalous in being entirely iambic (cf. GooDALL 
2004:Ixxxvi). 


72a If N,'s manodyäni is correct (instead of N,'s plausible restitution mano- 
22 P 

jñhäni), then perhaps it could be an 4i$a form with the sense of mana- 
udyänäni, ‘the pleasure-gardens of the mind’. 


73 For the use of wbhayärtham, cf. Svacchanda 5.52ab: samayän pälayen nityam 
ubhayärthaphalepsayä, which Ksemaräja glosses as follows: #bhayärtham 
aihikam ämusmikam ca phalam: bhogo moksas ca. We may interpret our 
verse to mean: ‘The mastery of knowledge is [of use] for liberation and 
for good behaviour and prudent conduct: this teaching, the Kälajñana, 
which emanates from $iva is [thus] for [success in] both [this world and 
the next]. 


Colophon after 73 The irregular ordinal sasthama is perhaps formed on the 
analogy of astama. 


Dominic Goodall 155 


74 Identical to Särdhatrisatikälottara 10.6. 


76 $ariram...satkausikam | The body is often said to be made up of six ‘en- 
velopes’ (ko$a) in both tantric sources (e.g. Svacchanda 4.159 and 7.5 and 
Netratantra 3.12) and non-tantric ones (e.g., by implication, Haracari- 
tacintämani 6.15-16, quoted in GoopaLz et al. 2005:170-1).1?7 These 
are not to be confused with the five upanishadic ko$as. Three of these en- 
velopes come from the mother and three from the father, as is explained 


in the Niväsa Guhyasütra 7.161c-163b (f. 65v): 


snäyvasthisukrasamghätam paitrkam trikam ucyate 
tvañ mâämsäm caiva raktam ca mätrkam trkam ucyate 
etad annena satatam pänena ca vivardhitam 
sarvayonyäm $ariram tu satkausikam udährtam. 


(A corrupt version of this passage is to be found as Raurava- 
sätrasañgraha 4.22-3. Cf. also Suprabheda, yogapäda 1.21-22c (- 
Saivägamaparibhäsämañjari 6.41-42c).) As BHATTACHARYA remarks 
(1966:13), there are some variations in the list: These are skin (or, ac- 
cording to another tradition, hairs), blood, flesh, tendons (or, according 
to another tradition, fat), bones, and marrow.’ What he does not men- 
tion is that fwkra may replace majjä. Ksemaräja, in his commentary on 
the above mentioned passages of the Suzcchanda, gives two different lists: 
sat kosäni tvañmämsaraktamaÿjästhisukräni (thus ad 7.5 and also in his 
commentary on Netratantra 3.12); asrimämsalomamajjästhisnäyväkhyäh 
sat kosäh süksmadehopari ko$äkäratayä sthitäh (thus ad 4.159). Accord- 
ing to the Mitäksarä on Yäjñavalkyasmrti 3.84, which explains a different 
conception, each of these elements cooks itself in its own envelope (ko$a), 
and the next element on the list is produced as a result. The last element, 
semen, is held to be the first £o$a.!°8 


I9T am grateful to M. Gerdi GERSCHHEIMER for stimulating reflection on this subject. We 
had once intended to produce together (as signalled in GRriFriTHs 2005:19, fn. 29) a note 
on the use of ko$a as a so-called bhütasamkhyä with the meaning ‘6’. (This note was to have 
formed part of the annotation on the date given in the Sanskrit verse at the beginning of the 
pre-Angkorian inscription K. 1214.) 

18Commenting on Yijñavalkyasmrti 3.84a (tasya sodhà sariräni), Vijñanesvara explains: t4- 
syätmano yäni jaräyujändajasarträni täni pratyekam satprakäräni raktädisaddhätuparipäkahetu- 
bhütasadagnisthänayogitvena; tathà hi—annaraso jätharägninà pacyamäno raktatäm pratipady- 
ate; raktam ca svako$asthenägninà pacyamänam mämsatvam; mämsam ca svakosänalaparipakvam 


156 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


77ab The morphology (kotyah for kotayah) and syntax (singular verb with plu- 
ral subject) are irregular; we should probably translate: ‘There is (sic) 
three crores of hairs, plus half a crore on top [of that number]J’. But per- 
haps one could instead adopt N,°s roma kotyä bhavet tisrah: ‘the hair, in 
terms of crores, is three... These thirty-five million hairs constitute the 
first of the three ko$as that are the father’s legacy, the other two being 
those of the teeth and nails. Thirty-five million is probably the num- 
ber intended in the embryological account in the Sarvajñänottara, but 
the formulation in the Tanjore edition is unclear (2.52): #sro rdham 
romakotayah. In the old Nepalese manuscript of that text, this appears as 
tisro romakotyäh, which might be evidence for after all taking romakotyäh 
as a nominative plural in N;% reading of our text. For some observations 
on the wildly different versions of this part of the Survajñänottara, see 
GoopaLL 2004:244-5) and see the note on 78 below. 


77b The usual ordinal would be vimsati rather than vimsat (OBERLIES 
2003:113), which is formed on the analogy of the ordinals srimsat and 
catvärimsat, and which may, if N,'s precorrection reading is correct, have 
been further reduced to vimsa here. 


78 palasahasraikam is irregular usage for ekam palasahasram; medas and tvac are 
here treated as 4-stem nouns, the first by cutting off the final consonant, 
the second by adding the final 4. Whereas the numbers given above for 
hair, teeth and naïls were the same as those of the old (prose) version 
of this part of the Survajñänottara, these other measurements are widely 
divergent, for see Sarvajñaänottara 30.51-62 (thus the numeration of my 
complete transcription of the text; in the Tanjore edition [E,] this unit 


is 2.50-60; T. 334, pp. 15-16): 


triny asthisatäni 51 

nava snäyusatäni nava dväräni 52 

majjà pañcaprasthà medah prasthadvayam 53 
tisro rdham romakotayah 54 

ckädasottaram marmasatam 55 

dravasya palänyastau rudhirasyädhakadvayam 56 


medastvam; medo pi svakosavahninà pakvam asthitäm; asthy api svakosasikhiparipakvam ma- 
jjätvam; majjäpi svako$apävakaparipacyamänas caramadhätutayä parinamate. caramadhätos tu 
parinatir nästi iti sa evätmanah prathamah ko$ab. 


Dominic Goodall 157 


dvädasa paläni inajihvä 57 

vrsanam särdhapalapañcakam 58 

fukrasya kuduvatrayam 59 

pittasyädhakam, sapta $iräfatäni ca 60 

aniyatam mütrapurisam ähärasyäniyatabhäväd vijñeyam 61 
evamvidho ‘yam bhütätmä purusa iti 62 


e 51 triny asthisatäni ] Er; striny asthi$atani N,; triny astisatani 
334 e 53 pañcaprasthà medah ] ew.;  pamcaprastho 
meda N;; pamcaprastà medah 334; pañcaprasthà meda Er 
e 54 tisro rdham romakotayah | Ey; tisro romakotyäh N;; 
tisrordhvam romakotyah 334 e 55 ekädasottaram mar- 
masatam ] Er; ekäda$ottaramarmmasatam N;,; ekädasottaram 
rmasita 334 e 57 dvädasa paläni $iénajihva ] Er; dvädasapala 
jihva N;; dvädasapalänimnajihva 334 e 58 vrsanam särd- 
hapalapañcakam ] Er; vrsanorddhapalam palam N;; vrksanam 
särdhapalapañcakam 334 59 $ukrasya kudu° ] N;; $uklasya kuda° 
334; Suklasya kudu° Er e GO pittasyädhakam, sapta $irasatani 
ca | 334E7; pittasyädhakasaptakam éirasatani N;; sapta $inaéatani 
ca 334 e GI aniyatam mütrapurisam ähärasyäniyatabhäaväd vi- 
jñeyam ] Er; aniyatam mütrapurisasya// ähärasyänyonyakarmäni 
aniyatabhät vijñeyatvad N;; aniyatamütrapurisam ähärasyänitab- 
häväd vijñeyam 334 eG2iti] N:iti cocyate 334E7r 


The measurements are rather closer to those given in the verse re-write 
printed in the Devakottai edition (E,,) of the Sarvajñaänottara (and there- 
fore copied into the Adyar edition (E,)), which I have found transmitted 
in no manuscript to date (E,, 3.58c-62; E, 170-3):!°° 


dvätrimsad dasanäh proktäh vim$atis ca nakhäh smrtäh 58 
pittasya kudavam jñeyam kaphasyärdhädhakam smrtam 
vasäyäs ca palam trim$at tadardham kalalasya ca 59 
pañcärbudah palä jñeyäh paläni da$a medasah 

palatrayam mahäraktam majjà syàt taccaturgunam 60 
ardham ca kudavam $ukram tadviryam präninäm balam 
mämsasya caikapindena sahasrapalam ucyate 61 


19 For a discussion of the three editions of a small part of the Sarvajñaänottara and their wide 
discrepancies, se GoopaLL 2006 and 2004:238, fn. 332. 


158 


Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


raktam palasatam jñeyam vinmütram cäpramänatah 
iti dehas tv abhihito nityasyänitya ätmanah 62 


e 59b° dhakam ] E,; ° dakam E,, e GOc pañcärbudah ] 
conj.; pañcärbuda® E,E, e Gla éukram ] em.; $uklam 
ESE: e 62b cäpramänatah ] E,,; ca pramänatah E, 


We expect our text to give measurements just of the three maternal 
ko$as—flesh, blood and fat—but the list continues. 


We apologise to readers interested in knowing what the units of mea- 
sure correspond to in some current scale: we are unable to supply this 
information. 


81-89c This unit is part of the common stock of the non-eclectic recensions 


of the Kälottara: à slightly cleaned up version is to be found as Särdha- 
trisatikälottara 10.6c-13. 


81-82b This is perhaps to be interpreted as follows: ‘präna is the first wind; 


82cd 


it is the overlord of all the [other] nine. It is [called] prépa because it is 
the breath (pränah) which consists of the life-force (pränamayah).°® TIt 
serves] to expel and to fill up.” 


The unit 81c-82b is virtually identical to Svacchanda 7.25 (which has 
äpürayann eva) and very close to Tantrasadbhäva 24.19: 


pränah pränamayah präno visargäpüranam prati 
nityam äâpürayaty esa tasmät pränah prakirtitah 


e pranah | conj.; prana° DyczKkowski e esa] em.; esa Dy- 
CZKOWSKI 


Perhaps interpret: ‘präna is present in people in such phenomena as in- 
haling, exhaling [or perhaps ‘sighing, panting] and coughing’. The word 
nicchväsa is not standard Sanskrit and has been retained on the assump- 
tion that it is a back-formation calqued upon wcchväsa (with the same 
senses as #/h$vdsa, which appears in BHATT'S text of Särdhatrisatikälottara 
10.8a). 


200Cf. Paräkhya 4.115c. 


Dominic Goodall 159 


83ab Almost identical to Svacchanda 7.26ab, but there pränanam appears in- 
stead of prayänam. The latter is shared by BHATTS text (Särdhatrisati- 
kälottara 10.8c) and is confirmed by Rämakantha commentary ad loc. 
Cf. the nirvacanas cited in GoopaLL 2004:266, fn. 419. 


83d manujäm adhah | The correct form would be manujänäm (‘of men’), 
but this has been contracted to suit the metre (perhaps on the anal- 
ogy of pronominal genitives, such as #esäm, or of those of consonantal 
nouns/adjectives, e.g. yogayujäm). The cleaned up text that BHATT prints 
obviates the ‘problem’ by reading ca nrnäm adhah (Särdhatrisatikälottara 
10.9b). For the rirvacana, cf. Paräkhya 4.115d. 


84 BHATT* less satisfactory text reads mütrasuklamalän väyur (Särdhatrisati- 
kälottara 10.9c) and raktapittakaphädikam (10.10b). 


85d One could perhaps retain “prakopanam and take it in apposition to 
samänah, or treat it as an adjective to szmänah whose ending has become 
attracted to the neuter endings of the other words in the line, rather than 
emending it (following BHATT'S text) to make the compound more reg- 
ularly adjectival. 


87ab BHATT'S text here reads instead: priter vinäfakarano vyäpanäd vyäna ucy- 
ate, ‘It is that which destroys pleasure: it is called vyäna because it fils.” 
Our text, if correctly constituted, means ‘Ît is taught to be the destruction 
of pleasure; vyäna is said to be [the cause of] senility. We assume that 
värddhikya (also to be found in the Mañjusrimülakalpa, e.g. in 24.920) 
is an anomalous form of värddhakya. 


87cd This half-line, which has à singular verb for a plural subject, has been 
omitted from BHaTT's text. The anomaly probably belonged to the com- 
mon source of the non-eclectic recensions: note that in N.'s version of 
the same passage of the Särdhatrisatikälottara (£. 6°), the half-line is re- 
tained, but procyate dhunä is there replaced by kathayämi te, even though 
the preceding words remain in the nominative. 


88cd BHarT's text (of Särdhatrisatikälottara 10.13ab) reads: krkaras tu ksute 
caiva devadatto vijrmbhane. This makes krkara responsible for sneezing, 
whereas our text, as now consituted, appears to make it responsible for 
hunger. Of course, if one retained kswbhite, one could strain to interpret 


160 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


it to mean ‘shaking [produced by sneezing]”. But it is even possible that 
ksudhite is intended to mean ‘sneezing here, for the word recurs below 
in 92 (where again BHATT'S text has kswra) as the first in a sequence of ac- 
tivities which continues with yawning, coughing and sighing. Sneezing 
would clearly fit better in such a sequence. It is, however, hunger with 
which krkara is associated in in Gherandasamhitä 5.65c (..ksuttrsam 
krkara caiva) and in some minor wpanisats: e.g. Jäbäladarsanopanisat 
4.34; Sändilyopanisat, adhyäya 1, prose section 4; Yogacüdämanyupanisat 
25. Confusion on the point probably goes back some centuries, and 
we find that a few other texts do indeed make krkara responsible for 
sneezing: e.g. Pädmasamhitä yogapäda 2.37 and Gherandasamhitä 5 .Gäc 
(krkarah ksutkrte jñeyah). The associations of these five breaths with bod- 
ily functions in Svacchanda 7.311f do not appear to help with interpret- 
ing our text. 


90cd C£ Särdhatrisatikälottara 11.3: 


samkräntim visuvam caiva ahoräträyanäni ca 
adhimäsam rnam cäpi ünarätram dhanam tathäà 


91-104 This notion of saktisamarasa does not occur in the Szrdhatrisati- 
kälottara, but we find it in a damaged parallel passage in the Msväsa 
Uttarasütra (£. 28°-29"): 


sañkränti visuvañ caiva Saktisamarasam $rnu 5.36 
ärdhvapräno hy aha$ caiva apäno rätrir eva ca 

susumnä uttaram jñeyam idà vai daksinäyanam 5.37 
madhyadese yadä hy ätmä visu[{[vam]] tam vidur budhäh 
calate gacchate caiva madhyadese yadà pumän 5.38 
sañkräntir iti vikhyätà Saktis caiva nibodha me 

trtiye caiva äyäme dvipürvam sasthabindukam 5.39 
früyate ca yadà Saktih $rutvä budhvä ca mänavah 

liyate ca $ive devi bhinnadehe na sam$ayah 5.40 

na Saktirahitä manträ diksänugrahakärakäh 
[f$akti]]binà na siddhyanti na ca yänti paräñ gatim 5.41 
éivam sarvagatam viddhi nämarüpavivarjitam 
cinmätrah purusas caiva $ivo vyäpya vyavasthitah 5.42 
väsayet samarasas cäham $ivena saha samyutah 


Dominic Goodall 161 


evam samaraso bhütvä gacchate fivam avyayam 5.43 
athavä tu nirälambam mürdhni-m-älambya yatnatah 
Jâgam yogam japam dhyänam sarvakarmäni kärayet 5.44 
fivam ädhäya karmmäni kurvann api na lipyate 
yogasiddhim aväpnoti fivasäyojyatäm vrajet 5.45 
jñänayogo mayä khyäta aklesät siddhimoksadah 
supariksya pradätavyam abdatrayaniväsine 5.46 
brähmane vrttisampanne ksatriye dharmmasiline 
vaisye caiva dayäyukte füdre susrüsatatpare 5.47 
anyathà dustamarttyänäm nimdätarkkänuvarttinäm 
na deyam $ivasadbhävam anyäyapathavarttinäm 5.48 
fivabhaktivihinà ye gurubhaktivivarjitäh 
jüñäsäkautukälinà na deyan tattvam uttamam 5.49 


e 38ab hy ätma visuvam ] em.; hy --- m N;; hy Li vam K L 

W e 41b mantra diksanugrahakärakäh ] W; marttyà diksa--- 
N;; martya diksanugraha LI K e 42c cinmätrah purusas caiva ] 
conj.; cimnätram purusañ caiva N;; vi$vantam purusam caiva 

KP‘; visvantam purusam viddhi K*; vighnätram purusam caiva 
W e 43a väsayet | NW; väsayan K e 44ab nirälam- 
bam mürdhni-m-älambya ] conj.; niralambam muürdhnim älab- 
hya N;; niraälamba LI maälabhya K; niraälamba LI vim älabhya 

W e 4äcd yägam yogam japam homam sarvakarmani ] conj.; 
yogayoga --- ni N;; yoge yoge LI ni K; yogayogam japahoma LI 
ni W(unmetrical) e 46b °moksadah ] K; °’moksadam NW 
e 47d $uérüsatatpare ] em.; --- re N;; LI K; su re W e 49c 
‘ina ] K; °linän N,W 


With the help of the above, we may translate part of our passage (90-98) 
as follows: 


I shall teach you of the movement [of the breath around] the 
body, of days, nights and the [Northern and Southern] turn- 
ings [of the sun], of transition [from one planetary house 
to another], of the equinox, of the suppression of calendri- 
cal nights and of intercalary months, of a equal mixture of 
power. The ‘southward turning [of the sun] is to be under- 


stood to be [when the life-breath is] in [the tube called] :43. 


162 


Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


When the [life-breath that in some sense carries and is there- 
fore identified with the] ‘soul’ is in the centre, then the wise 
know this to be ‘equinox. When the ‘soul’ comes and goes 
into the centre, or also into the North or South [tubes], then 
this is taught to be ‘transition’. The ‘suppression of a night 
[takes place] where one sneezes(?); when one yawns, [this is] 
an ‘intercalary month’. The upward breath is ‘day’ and the 
downward breath is ‘night’. Power pervades all beings: hear 
[about her] from me: in the third stretching [of the breath, 
viz. recaka] when the sakti is heard, [which is] the second of 
the first [group of letters viz. K, followed by] the sixth [vowel, 
namely ü, with] the anusvära, and when, upon hearing it the 
man understands, then he is merged in God $iva, o God- 
dess, and, upon his body being destroyed, he goes to va. 
Mantras, if devoid of power, do not bestow the grace that 
is initiation. Those without power do not succeed and do 
not reach the supreme destiny. $iva should be understood to 
be omnipresent, devoid of name and form. Siva is soul that 
is pure consciousness; he rests pervading everything. One 
should meditate, linked with Siva, on [everything as] being 
of the same flavour. Having thus become of the same flavour 
[as everything else], one goes to indestructible #14. 


There are three possible explanations of there being shared material here: 
our text could be borrowing from the Misväsa; the Nisväsa could be bor- 
rowing from our text; both texts could be drawing on a third source. 
We are inclined to favour the first of these, for we expect the Mäla- and 
Uttara-sütras of the Nisväsa to be amongst the earliest surviving Said- 
dhäntika writing. There is also a small detail that suggests this direction 
of borrowing: the Msvdsa’s vocative devi (in 5.40c) seems natural in that 
context; our texts deve in the same place (94c) has to be taken in appo- 
sition with #ve, which is not especially awkward, but it seems likely to 
be a secondary alteration made necessary because our text is addressed to 


Skanda. 


In dualist works, sämarasya is not common, but a yogic sämarasya may be 
induced in the initiand’s soul before it is extracted from his body by the 
initiating guru (Mrgendravritti ad kriyäpäda 8.66-8). This is the context 


Dominic Goodall 163 


in which such a yogic sämarasya is preached in the Svacchanda (4.297c- 
315). There it is divided into seven sequential levels, the fourth of which 
is a Saktisämarasya (4.297d): $aktau kuryät caturthakam. 


93c Note the frozen sandhi of rdhvapräno before an initial vowel; the Msväsa 
here has a hiatus-blocking particle hi. 


97cd One could consider emending to cinmätrah puruso and making this into 
two statements: ‘the soul should be understood to be purely of con- 
sciousness; Siva pervades [everything] .” 


98a Although we have retained N,'s bhävaye, the sense is of course that of N,'s 
bhävayet, cf. note on 44 above. 


99b mürdhni-m-älambya | The m following the locative mürdhni is assumed 
to be a euphonic glide to obviate hiatus with the following vowel (cf. 


OBERLIES 2003:5; 90, fn. 3; 116, fn. 4). 


100a Given the parallel, we are reluctant to emend to fivam ädhyäya; under- 
stand perhaps: ‘If one places [one's mind in] Siva.….? 


101c-104 Locatives, genitives and datives are used interchangeably with da- 
tive sense (OBERLIES 2003:348), and, what is more, here the dative dhar- 
masïline qualifies the locative ksatriye. In this case the dative form ends 
in -e, the thematic locative ending; but other early Saiddhäntika litera- 
ture also furnishes instances of thematic datives (in -4ya) made to agree 
with thematic locatives, e.g. Nifväsa Nayasütra 4.47: 


samsärabhayavitraste dharmaÿñe priyavädine 
japaliñgärcanisthäya dätavyam tu jitendriye. 


The reading supariksya pradätavyam abdatrayaniväsine in our parallel is 
more logical than what we have, which must be understood to be el- 
liptical: “Without examining [the candidate] one should not give [this 
knowledge; but one may give it] to one who has dwelt in the gwrukula 
for three years’. Our text's jÿñaäsakautukärthibhyo is perhaps a secondary 
correction of the Vsväsa's anacoluthic jijñäsakautukälina, ‘those sunk in 
curiosity and thirst for knowledge’. 


105 Identical to Sérdhatrisatikälottara 23.2. 


164 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


106-7 The passage continues differently in the Särdhatrisatikälottara (23.3- 
4b): 


hamsa hamseti yo brüyäd dhamso devah sadäsivah 
guruvakträt tu labhyeta pratyaksam sarvatomukhah 
tilesu ca yathà tailam puspe gandha iva sthitah 


The first of these half-lines occurs below in our text as 111ab. What is 
being described is of course the notion that breathing can be treated as 
the repetition of HAMSA, a notion referred to in later texts as 4japäjapa 
(q.v. in TAK 1; see also s.v. gamägama in TAK 2). 


108-10 ‘Because Siva residing in one’ body utters himself, men who know the 
truth call this same [practice of breathing] “recitation”. Knowing [Him 
to be] inside the [course of the] breath, [one should know that] the end of 
that [course] is the [place] twelve finger-breadths [beyond the nose-tip]. 
One should know that there inside that [place] is the all-pervading, the 
spotless. By means of the szkri the [life-breath that in some sense carries 
and is therefore identified with the] “soul” is led to that point and, once 
it has reached there, it returns. Once one knows this to-and-fro, one is 
liberated; of this there is no doubt.” 


Verse 108 = Dvisatikälottara 7.36c-37b. Cf. also Svacchanda 7.56cd 
(casyäyam japa uddistah siddhimuktiphalapradah) and 7.59cd (svayam uc- 
carate hamsah präninäm urasi sthitah). 


ante ] We are assuming that this pre-correction reading of N, was used 
in the sense of antah. 


sarvavyäpt nirañjanam | We are assuming that the masculine nominative 
singular, perhaps in part because it is in apposition with a form that could 
be nominative (in the neuter) or accusative, is treated as though it were 
accusative here. Of course it would be easy enough to avoid the problem 
here by emending to the neuter sarvavyäpi. 


faktinä | ‘This is of course intended as an instrumental singular, of which 
the correct form would be fzktyä. Cf. OBERLIES 2003:86, who records 
one epic use of Sakti (a masculine proper name) declined as though it 
were a noun in -#. ‘The line appears in BHATT'S text of the Sardhatrisati- 
kälottara thus (23.13cd): faktyä tu niyate jivas tasmin präpya nivartate. 


Dominic Goodall 165 


111 vyäpayet | This could be treated as an instance of the causative with the 
sense of the simplex, or as an irregular simplification of the optative vyäp- 
nuyät. 


112cd ‘[This practice of “japa”] should be taken up by wise persons in the same 
manner that [a child takes] a sweet from its mother. Cf. Vijÿñänabhairava 
13cd: mätrmodakavat sarvam pravrityartham udährtam. Xn that passage, 
it is descriptions of Bhairava that are compared to sweets: they are not 
ultimately true but serve as inducements to motivate meditators. 


113 The association of two of the three principal tubes with ancestors and with 
gods is unsurprising, but I am not sure how to interpret pérve and uttare. 
In a passage of the Msvasakärikä (32.85#, T. 17, pp.236M) we find the 
pitryäna associated with the moon and with the tube 43, while the de- 
vayäna is assocated with the sun and with swsumnä, which is there not the 
central tube, but the one on the right. (The naming of the three principal 
tubes varies in early tantric literature: see TAK 2, s.v. 4mä, among the 
Corrigenda and Addenda.) This is essentially the same in the Suaccha- 
nda (7.148-9) and in the Sarvajñänottara (4.46, T. 334, p. 32; Nepalese 
MS, f. 5°), except that the right-hand tube there is, as eventually became 
normal, called piñgalä. In Sämbapañcäsikä 49, however, the positions 
appear to be reversed. 


C£. Svacchanda 4.303-304b, which describe sämarasya at the level of the 


tubes: 


mantra âtmä tathä nädi evam samarasibhavet 
vämadaksinamadhye tu tato nädam pramocayet 
setubandham ca tam märgam yatra gatvä na jàyate 


This might seem to suggest that seéwbandha is simply the name for 
the central tube; but Ksemaräja begins a new sentence with #50 and 
seems to understand setubandha to refer rather to à path formed by the 
subtler levels of sound in the enunciation of the mantra (Sakrivyäpini- 
samanonmanäräpasetubandhätmakam märgam sarvädhvapäravartisiva- 
padapräpakam panthänam nädam mocayed gamayet). Something similar 
might be intended in Sämbapañcäsikä 50. 


114 For the frozen sandhi between pädas c and d, see note on 17ab. Again, 


166 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


the problem has been obviated by the insertion of a particle in BHATT's 
text of the parallel section in the Särdhatrisatikälottara (23.15-16b): 


tadantam tad vijäniyät tatrastho vyäpayet prabhuh 
mano py anyatra niksiptam caksur anyatra pätitam” 
tathäpi yoginäm yogo hy avicchinnah pravartate 


116cd Cf. Msväsakärikä 15.98cd (T.17, p.84): brahmabhatyädibhih päpaih 
naiva lipyeta yogavit. The form lipyari is of course intended as a passive 
(cf. OBERLIES 2003:191, fn. 4). 


MANUSCRIPTS CONSULTED 


JNANAPANCASIKA. NAK 5-4632. NGMPP Reel No. B 118/7. Paper, Nägarï script. 


TANTRASADBHAVA. Electronic edition of Mark Dyczkowsxr based on NGMPP Reel Nos. 
À 188/22, À 44/1, and A 44/2. 


DVISATIKALOTTARA. NAK 5-4632. NGMPP Reel No. B 118/7. Paper, Nägari script. The 
verse and chapter numeration used in our annotation is that of Mei YANG*% edition in 
progress. 


NISVASAKARIKA IFP MSS T. 17 and T. 127. Paper transcripts in Devanägari. 


NISVASATATTVASAMHITA. NAK MS 1-227, NGMPP Reel No.A 41/14. Palm-leaf, early 
Nepalese ‘Licchavi script. Two apographs, both in Devanägari and on paper: NAK 
MS 5-2401, NGMPP Reel No. A 159/18, and Wellcome Institute for the History of 
Medicine, London, Sanskrit MS 1.33. 


BRHATKALOTTARA. NAK MS pra 89. NGMPP B 24/59. Palm-leaf, hooked Newari. NAK 
MS pam 779. NGMPP B 25/2. Palm-leaf, Nägarï with prsthamätra vowel-notation. 


BRAHMAYAMALA. NAK MS 3-370. NGMPP A 42/6. Palm-leaf, Newari. 


BHAIRAVAMANGALA. NAK MS pam 687. NGMPP B27/21. Numeration is that of the elec- 
tronic edition of Somadeva VASUDEVA. 


$IVADHARMOTTARA. Cambridge MSS Add. 1645 and Add. 1694. Palm-leaf, twelfth-century 
Newari script. Also IFP T. Nos. 75, 281 and 510, paper transcripts in Devanägari. 


SARVAJNANOTTARATANTRA. NAK MS 1-1692. NGMPP Reel No. À 43/12. Palm-leaf, early 
Nepalese ‘Licchavi script. Also GOML MS D 5550 and IFP T. Nos. 334, 760, paper 
transcripts in Devanägari. The verse and chapter numeration used in our annotation is 
that of Dominic GooDaLL* edition in progress. 


SARDHASATIKAKALOTTARA. NAK 5-4632. NGMPP Reel No. B 118/7. Paper, Nägari script. 


201 This half-line is also to be found as Svacchanda 7.58ab. 


Bharadväjas Nyäsopade$ah: Bemerkungen zu Bhaära- 
dväjasamhita 1,1-70 


GERHARD OBERHAMMER 


Im vorliegenden Beitrag sollen einige Gedanken zum ersten Adhyäya der Bha- 
radväjasamhita dargelegt werden, die nicht eine Studie zu diesem Text, der 
bisher kaum Beachtung gefunden hat, ersetzen, sondern vielmehr darauf hin- 
weisen môchten, dass dieser, auch wenn er kein alter Text des Päñcarätra ist, 
für ein Studium der Geschichte dieser Tradition von Interesse sein kann. Es 
handelt sich um jenen Text, den D. SmrrH in seinem Descriptive Bibliography 
of the Printed Texts of the Päñcaräträgama als Bhäradväjasamhita II (im Folgen- 
den NyäsU) bezeichnet. Dieser ist, auch wenn er, jedenfalls in einem weiteren 
Sinne, als Päñcarätra-Text bezeichnet werden kann, als literarisches Werk dieser 
Tradition zunächst befremdlich. Schon D. Smrrx hat darauf hingewiesen, dass 
er wegen seiner Beschränkung auf die Lehre von der prapattih für eine Pañca- 
râtrasamhita atypisch sei: 

» Hhere is no doubt that it is the product of the Päñcarätra school although 
it is obviously from a period well after Rämänuja's time. A suggestion is made 
in the opening lines that this work may once have formed part of a larger, more 
comprehensive text. But there is no proof that the work was ever essentially 
other than what we now have.“! 

Die Vermutung des Autors ist überzeugend. Der Text ist eine in sich 
geschlossene Darstellung der prapattih | des nyäsah, die durchaus den Eindruck 
eines eigenständigen Werkes macht, zeigt aber eindeutige Bezüge zum Päñcara- 
tra, auch wenn der Text selbst sich nicht als ein Werk der Schule gibt: Er ist 
entweder ein Pañcarätra-Werk zur Praxis des Zufluchtnehmens bei Gott, ohne 
Berücksichtigung der tantrischen Praxis dieser Tradition, das in der Spiritual- 
ität der Rämänuja-Schule verfasst ist, oder ein Werk der Räimänuja-Schule, das 
sich jedoch der Tradition des Päñcarätra verpflichtet weif. Dass es sich um ein 
selbständiges Werk handeln muss, wird auch dadurch nahegelegt, dass ihm im 
Laufe der Überlieferungsgeschichte ein Parisistam in vier Adhyäyas hinzugefügt 


ISmirx 1975:316f. 


168 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


wurde, was bei einem Teilabschnitt einer Samhitä wohl nicht denkbar wäre, es 
sei denn, dass dieser lange Zeit selbständig überliefert worden wäre und nicht 
mehr als Teil einer Samhitä empfunden wurde. Der Hinweis D. Smrrx's auf 
die Einleitungsverse des Textes ist zwar berechtigt, aber so wie für D. Smirx 
selbst, nicht überzeugend. Die Verse selbst lauten: 

»Nachdem die Maharsis alle Dharmas und die durch sie bleibend [zu er- 
langende] Vollendung vernommen hatten, sagten sie noch Folgendes zu dem 
treffichsten der Munis. (1) ‘Durch welches Mittel, Ehrwürdiger, kôünnen selbst 
alle Menschen hier sogleich die hôchste Vollendung erlangen, wenn deren Un- 
reinheit geschwunden ist? (2) Als Bharadväja, der Grofimütige, diese ihre Rede 
vernommen hatte, gedachte er dieses überaus gro$en Geheimnisses und sagte 
lihnen] erwidernd folgendes: (3) ‘Hôrt! Ich will euch den hôchsten Yoga, der 
nyäsah genannt wird, und die [durch ihn] bleibend [zu erlangende] Vollendung 
verkünden. Beides wurde von mir [in jener Zeit] vernommen. (4) Dieser Yoga 
wird in den Veden und in den Upanisaden gefeiert und ebenso auch in den 
Dharmagastren und [allen] gôttlichen Lehren [der Offenbarung]. (5) Denn 
durch diesen erlangen die Bemühungen (yog&h) der Yogins wie Ritualwerk usw. 
libre] Vollendung. Ihm [selbst] kommt Vollendung zu, unabhängig von diesen 
[Bemühungen der Yogins]. Daher betrachten sie ihn als den hôchsten. (6)“? 

Der Text gewinnt im Kontext seiner Zeit, die jedenfalls durch den 
Visistädvaita nach Rämänuja und die Spiritualität der Srivaisnavas geprägt ist, 
trotz der Trivialität seiner Aussagen seine eigentliche Bedeutung. Zunächst 
fällt auf, dass er sich selbst nicht als gôttliche Ofenbarung gibt, sondern als 
alt überkommene Lehre, die von Bharadväja erinnert und verkündet wird, 
auch wenn sie letztlich auf die Autorität der vedischen Ofenbarung, der Dhar- 
masästren und auf die Tradition des Pañcarätra zurückgeführt wird, die vermut- 
lich mit den ,gôttlichen Lehren“ (divyasästräni) gemeint ist. Bemerkenswert 
ist, dass der Verfasser des Textes, der von sich selbst nicht spricht, auch die 
Fiktion, dass es sich um eine Offenbarung Bharadväjas handle, gelegentlich 
aufRer Acht lässt. Dies zeigt sich nicht nur darin, dass die Dialogstruktur, die 


2NyasU 1,16: $rutva tu sakalän dharmän siddhim esäm ca Sasvatim| bhüya eva muni- 
$restham idam ücur maharsayah|| 1|| kenopäyena bhagavan iha sarve ‘hi jantavah| pra- 
pruyuh paramäm siddhim sadyo vigatakalmasäh || 2|| tesäm tad vacanam $rutvä bharadväjo 
mahämanäh| sasmära paramam guhyam punas cedam abhäsata || 3 || $räyatäm sampravaksya- 
mi nyäsäkhyam yogam uttamam| siddhim caiväsya paramäm dvayam etac chrutam yathä || 4 | 
ayam ca yogo vedesu vedäntesu ca giyate| tathaivam dharmasästresu divyasastraganesu ca || 5 | 
anenaiva hi karmädyä yogäh sidhyanti yoginäm | siddhir na tadvyapeksäsya tasmäd enam param 


viduh || 6]. 


Gerhard Oberhammer 169 


sonst in einer Samhitä begegnet, in den Hintergrund tritt und praktisch in 
eine erzählte Belehrung übergeht, sondern beispielsweise auch in einem Zi- 
tat, das dem ,Muni“, offenbar Bharadväja selbst, zugeschrieben wird. In Vers 
1,51 heiftes: ,Mit der Hand den Kôrper [des Schülers] berührend, môge der 
Mantrenkundige (mantravit) [den Schüler], dadurch dass er [ihn] anblickt, [zu 
einem Zuflucht Nehmenden] machen. Sagt [doch] der Muni selbst, dass dies 
die Diksä für alle Varnas ist“,® wodurch deutlich wird, dass hier der Verfasser 
des Textes spricht und nicht Bharadväja. Man muss wohl daraus schlieRen, dass 
der Text selbst sich nicht als einen ursprünglichen ,Offenbarungstext"“ versteht, 
sondern als einen in der Tradition eines solchen stehenden Traktat, selbst wenn 
dieser als ,Belehrung Bharadväjas über die prapattih" stilisiert ist. 

Dieser Eindruck bestätigt sich, wenn der Text in Vers 1,5 von der prapattih 
sagt: ,Und diese [spirituelle] Praxis (yog4h) wird in den Veden und Upanisaden 
gepriesen; ebenso auch in den Dharmasästren und den güttlichen Lehren.* 
Dies ist bemerkenswert. Denn hier beruft sich der Verfasser auf die allge- 
mein anerkannten Autoritäten der Orthodoxie und nicht auf eine spezielle 
Offenbarung des Pañcarätra, auch wenn er dieses mit der Rede von den gôt- 
tlichen Lehren (divyasästräni) mit einschlieRt.* Dies ist das gleiche Verfahren 
wie in Varadagurus Prapannaparijätam, wo dieser, wenn auch wesentlich aus- 
führlicher, das gleiche tut.® Die Parallelität des Vorgehens, nicht der Inhalt 
des Verses selbst, der einfach nur ein inklusivistisches Zurückführen tantrischer 
Praxis auf Autoritäten der Orthodoxien sein kônnte, legt den Gedanken nahe, 
dass es sich um einen Topos gelehrter Inhalte handeln kônnte. 

Tatsächlich geht diese Parallelität aber auch noch weiter. Versucht man 
nämlich diesen 1. Adhyäya seinem Inhalt nach zu analysieren, so folgt an- 
schlieRend an die Aufzählung der Autoritäten eine allgemeine Definition der 
prapattih: ,Das totale Hingeben seiner selbst (ätmabharanyasah)S, wenn man 
entschlossen ist, das im Jenseits Erwünschte zu verwirklichen, und dieses durch 
nichts anderes verwirklicht werden kann, wird prapattih genannt. (7) Diese, 
die überall von den Menschen im allgemeinen aufgrund der Wirksamkeit der 
Gunas praktiziert wird, lässt allen das von ihnen jeweils Erwünschte Wirk- 


$karena spar$ayan gätram mantravid bhävayed dr$ä. esà va sarvavarnänäm diksety äha munih 
svayam. 

Dieselben Autoritäten werden auch in NyäsU 3,36. erwähnt. 

Vel. PraP 1, das im Kolophon als pramänapaddhatih bezeichnet wird. 

6Der Terminus 4tmabharanyäsah ist meines Wissens erst für eine spätere Entwicklung der 
Rämänuja-Schule, etwa für Veñkatanätha, belegt. 


170 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


lichkeit werden. (8)“’7 Auch Varadaguru schlieft an sein Kapitel des Prapan- 
naparijätam über die Autoritäten, welche die prapattih lehren, ein Kapitel über 
das Wesen der prapattih (svarñpam) an, das er mit einer Definition beginnt, 
die dem erwähnten Vers NyäsU 1,7 voll entspricht: ,Die aus dem Vertrauen 
kommende Bitte als dem einzigen Mittel, das [zu erlangen], was man erwün- 
scht hat und durch nichts anderes erlangen kann, ist prapattih, das Zuflucht- 
nehmen. Mit dem Wort ‘Zufluchtnehmen’ ist die prapattih näher bestimmt.“® 
Auch wenn Varadagurus Darlegung des Wesens der prapattih wesentlich aus- 
führlicher ist als NyasU 1,7, folgt die an diesen anschlieRiende Darlegung der 
Lehre von der prapattih im Grunde einer ähnlichen Anordnung. 

Tatsächlich ist die Definition in NyäsU 1,7 im Sinne des theologischen Ver- 
ständnisses weiter entwickelt als die vom Herausgeber des Prapannaparijätam 
einem Bharatamuni zugeschriebene Definition in PraP 2,2, auch wenn sie sich 
dem Wortlaut nach kaum von jener unterscheidet. Sie ist nämlich nicht mehr 
wie bei Varadaguru so allgemein, dass sie auch das profane Verständnis der 
prapattih in den Dharmasästren mit einschliefit, sondern scheint nur im Sinne 
eines Strebens nach Emanzipation (vel. paratrestasya sädhane) gemeint zu sein, 
wie man auch aufgrund von NyäsU 1,8 annehmen môchte, dessen Hinweis auf 
die ,Macht der Gunas“ (gunavasät) sonst kaum verständlich ist. Denn das Zu- 
fluchtnehmen im Sinne des Dharmasästra, etwa das von Frauen und Kindern 
zum Zeitpunkt einer Gefahr, kann nicht aufgrund der Macht der Gunas erk- 
lärt werden. Vielmehr kann hier nur ein religiôs begründetes Zufluchtnehmen 
bei anderen Gôttern wie Brahmä und $iva gemeint sein, das für den frommen 
Vaisnava sehr wohl aus dem durch die Gunas geprägten Charakter der Verehrer 
verständlich wird. 

So versteht es jedenfalls auch der Kommentar zu NyäsU 1,8: , Das Merkmal 
der prapattih ist nicht, dass sie als solche den Erhabenen zum einzigen Gegen- 
stand hat, sondern dass sie die Emanzipation bewirkt. [Akte der] prapattih, 
welche die Frucht der jeweiligen Begierden anstreben, kônnen [nämlich] auch 
andere Gegenstände als das hôchste Heil zum Gegenstand haben; [diese] haben 
in [den Gunas] Rajas und Tamas [ihre] Wurzel. [In diesem Sinne] sagt er 
‘hauptsächlich aufgrund der Gunas’, [nämlich] der Kraft von Rajas und Tamas; 


TNyäsU 1,7-8: niscite nanyasädhyasya paratrestasya sädhane | ayam ätmabharanyäsah pra- 
pattir iti cocyate || 7|| präyo gunavasäd esa krtah sarvatra dehinäm | sarvesäm sädhayaty eva täms 
tän arthän abhipsitän || 8 ||. 

SPraP 2,2f: ananyasädhye sväbhiste mahävisesità | tad ekopäyatäyañnà prapattih faranägatih | 
faranägatisabdena prapattis tu visesitä. 


Gerhard Oberhammer 171 


das Entsagen (y4sah), wenn es beispielsweise mit Brahmaä, Rudra usw. als 
Objekt vollzogen wird, verwirklicht allen Menschen in der Regel das jeweils 
Begehrte, [nämlich] das [von ihnen] Gewünschte. Mit dem sprachlichen Aus- 
druck eva wird deutlich gemacht, dass die prapattih, wenn sie ein dem Mitleid 
entsprechendes Ziel zum Gegenstand hat, nicht ohne [ihre] Frucht ist, macht 
[aber auch] deutlich, dass die prapattih, wenn sie auf etwas gerichtet ist, das 
nicht entsprechend ist [und] nicht ein dem Mitleid entsprechendes Ziel hat, 
ohne die gewünschte Frucht bleibt. Worauf immer die prapattih [gerichtet] 
ist, das ist ein entsprechender Gegenstand, sofern sie auf Ziele des Menschen 
(purusärthah) gerichtet ist, [auch dann, wenn] diese nicht die Emanzipation 
sind. Das ist der Sinn des Verses.“? 

Der hier kommentierte Vers deckt mit seiner Kommentierung in diesem 
Text einen religionshermeneutisch nicht uninteressanten Aspekt der Theolo- 
giegeschichte seiner Tradition auf. Anders als Varadaguru sieht der Verfasser 
des Nyäsopade$ah die prapattih in ihrer praktischen Bedeutung, obwohl er von 
der gleichen Definition wie Varadaguru auszugehen scheint, allgemeiner als 
einen Akt tantrischer Religiosität, der zunächst nicht ausschliefRlich dem hôüch- 
sten Gott gegenüber und nicht nur zum Erlangen der Emanzipation vollzo- 
gen wurde, sondern zu seiner Zeit auch anderen Gôttern wie Brahmä und 
Rudra gegenüber zur Verwirklichung durchaus auch weltlicher Wünsche.!° 
Dies nôtigt ihn, diese Formen der prapattih zur Erfüllung weltlicher Wün- 
sche auf den Einfluss der den psychischen Apparat des Menschen prägenden 
Konstituenten der Urmaterie Rajas und Tamas zurückzuführen, die, wie der 
Kommentar sagt, durch den Hinweis, dass der Vollzug der prapattih immer 
von Mitleid getragen sein und den allgemein anerkannten Zielen des Men- 
schen dienen müsse, ausgeschlossen werden, offenbar als Akte der prapattih 
zum Zwecke verbotener tantrischer Magie verstanden sind. Vor diesem all- 


’Kommentar, NyäsU, p.4,14-23: bhagavadekavisayatvam na prapattimätrasya laksa- 
nam kintu moksasädhanatvam  prapatter eval  rajastamomülänäm  nih$reyasavyatiriktäh 
tattatkämaphalärthanäm prapattinäm anye ‘hi visayäs sambhavantity äha — präya iti| gunavasat 
rajastamabpäravasyät| sarvatra brahmarudrädike ‘pi visaye krte esa nyäsah sarvesäm dehinäm 
täms tän abbipsitän istän arthän präyah sädhayaty eva | evakärena sänukro$asamarthavisayäyäh 
prapatteh phalävyabhicäro dyotyate| präya ity anena kvacid asamarthaniranukrosavisayäyäs 
tabhyäh phalavyabhicäro dyotyate|  moksätiriktapurusärthaparäyaäh prapatter yah kascid api 
kärunikah samartho visayo bhavatiti flokäbhipräyah || . 

10Dies erinnert an Ahirbudhnyasamhitä 37,4fF., wo die prapattih, auch dort zunächst als 
nyäsah bezeichnet, zur Errettung eines Fürsten aus kriegerischer Bedrängnis durch Sudar$ana 
geoffenbart ist. Vol. OBERHAMMER 2004, p. 117#. 


172 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


gemeinen Verständnis der prapattih wird es dann môglich, die prapattih im 
spirituellen Sinne, um die es Varadaguru allein ging, und die auch für den Ver- 
fasser des Nyäsopadesah das entscheidende Anliegen seines Textes ist, konkret 
als deren erste und wichtigste Form abzuheben: ,[Die entsagende Hingabe 
seiner selbst] an das hôchste Brahma, den Herrn der Laksmiï, der ein Ozean 
der beglückenden Eigenschaften wie unendliche Erkenntnis, Macht usw. ist, 
ist die beste, die Vollkommenheit in ihrer Ganzheit bewirkt. Denn es gibt kein 
anderes verehrendes Zufriedenstellen Visnus, des Paramätmaä, des Lenkers aller 
Einzelseelen.“!1 

Diese konkrete Form der prapattih ist ein allen Wesen offen stehender 
Weg zur Emanzipation, wie der Verfasser des Nyäsopadesah in den folgen- 
den Versen NyäsU 1,13-16 ausführt, und entspricht genau der Thematik von 
PraP 3,1#. Im Anschluss daran führt Bharadväjas Belehrung über die prapattih 
dann ebenfalls in Übereinstimmung mit Gedanken von Varadagurus Prapan- 
naparijätam!? fort: , Die prapattih ist sechsfach: Wollen, was entsprechend ist, 
das Vermeiden von Nichtentsprechendem, Vertrauen, Erwählen, [verzichten- 
des] Hingeben und Armseligkeit. (17)!* Wenn er [sein] Wollen entsprechend 
gemacht hat, môge er das Nichtentsprechende meiden, armselig und voll Ver- 
trauen nach Schutz verlangen. (18) Wenn er sich [dann] dem Gott der brah- 
manischen [Weisen] (vipradevasya) zu Füfen wirft, ist dies die prapattih. Sie 
befreit sogleich von allem Bôsen. (19) Sie verleiht nämlich, einmal ausgeführt, 
den ‘Unglücklichen” (4rtänäm) schnell die [begehrte] Frucht [der Emanzipa- 
tion], [aber] auch den [mit ihrem gegenwärtigen Leben] zufriedenen Menschen 
ist sie die Bewahrung vor einer weiteren Verkôrperung [in einer Wiedergeburt]. 
(20)<14 

An diese Darlegung über das Wesen der prapattih, die in knappen Versen 
die wesentlichen auch von Varadaguru vertretenen spirituellen Charakteristika 


INyäsU 1,9-10: anantajñäanasaktyädikalyänagunasägare| pare brahmani laksmise mukhyo 
yam sarvasiddhikrt|| 911 prasasitur afesänäm ätmanäm paramätmanah| na hi prasädanam 
visnor anyad ätmärpanäd rte || 10||. 

2Vel. PraP 1,3-32. 

3Dies ist die formelhafte Charakterisierung der prapattih, die in mehreren Tantren und so 
auch bei Varadaguru geboten ist. Vgl. PraP 1,23. und 2,8f. 

ENyäsU 1,17-20: prapattir änukülyasya sañkalpo pratikülatä| vifväso varanam nyäsah 
kärpanyam iti sadidhà || 17|| krtänukälyasamkalpah prätikülyam vivarjayet| vifväsasali krpanah 
prärthayan raksanam prati. || 18|| ätmänam niksipati yad vipradevasya pädayoh | sà prapattir 
iyam sadyah sarvapäpapramocanti || 19|| ärttänäm ä$u phaladä sakrd eva krtä hy asau | drptänäm 
api jantünäm dehäntaranivärint || 20 ||. 


S 


Gerhard Oberhammer 173 


der prapattih wiedergibt, fügt der Autor des Nyäsopadeéah eine Klassifikation 
der prapattih hinzu, die es ihm ermôglicht, über das von Varadaguru Gesagte 
hinaus die ritualisierte Dimension der prapattih anzusprechen: , Diese ist auf- 
grund der Unterschiedenheit [ihrer] Ausführung als dreifach zu wissen. [Sie] 
ist durch die Verschiedenheit der [den psychischen Apparat prägenden] Kon- 
stituenten [der Urmaterie], [ebenfalls] jeweils dreifach unterteilt. (21) Die kôr- 
perliche prapattih ist die in Abhängigkeit vom Guru nur mit dem Merkmal 
des nyäsah [wie] Prostrieren, [Brand-] Marken usw. [vollzogene]. (22) Die 
prapattih von jemandem, der das wahre Wesen [des Mantra] nicht erkannt hat 
[und] den hôchsten Mantra [als solchen] abhängig von [der Zustimmung des] 
Guru rezitiert, ist die verbale prapattih. (23) Eine prapattih, [die] vom Guru 
verordnet mit dem Mantra [von jemandem] in rechter Weise vollzogen wird, 
der mit Verstand das wahre Wesen [des Mantra] erfasst hat und am Kôrper die 
Kennzeichen des nyäsah trägt, ist die geistige [prapattih]. (24)* 

Diese verschiedenen Arten der Durchführung der prapattih fehlen bei 
Varadaguru, der sie vermutlich noch nicht gekannt hat. Denn wenn es 
auch môglich ist, dass er sie nur deshalb nicht erwähnt, weil er an der 
Ausführung des Rituals nicht interessiert war, so hat man doch den Ein- 
druck, dass die unterschiedliche Ausführung der prapattih das Problem einer 
späteren Zeit ist, in der die prapattih zu einem allgemein geübten Rit- 
ual geworden ist, dies umso mehr als dieses Problem auch in allen von 
Varadaguru zitierten Päñcarätrasamhitäs ebenso wenig erwähnt wird wie die im 
Nyäsopadeéah unmittelbar anschlieRend erwähnte Unterteilung entsprechend 
der Gunabedingtheit des Zufluchtnehmens: , Wenn jemand Bôses wünschend 
zu Hari Zuflucht nimmit, der allen Wesen gegenüber mitleidig ist, [so] ist dies 
wegen der [ihr zugrunde liegenden] Verblendung eine tamashafte prapattih. 
(25) Wenn jemand vielerlei Wünsche hegend bei Hrsike$a, der nur dem nicht 
Begehrenden zugeneigt ist, Zuflucht nimmit, [so] versteht man das als rajashafte 
prapattih. (26) Wenn jemand ohne jeden Wunsch aus [reiner] Hingabe bei 
Hari als Herrn [seines] Selbstes in der Freude, Ihm zu dienen,!° Zuflucht 
nimmit, so ist dies die sattvahafte prapattih. (27) Die prapattih, die durch Ra- 


SNyasU 1,21-—24: esà ca trividhà jñeyà karanatrayabhedatah | gunatrayavibhedäd apy ekaikä 
trividhä punah|| 21|| pranämänkena mukhyena nyäsaliñgena kevalam| gurvadhinä hi bha- 
vati prapattih käyiki kvacit|| 22|| avijñätärthatattvasya mantramirayatah param | gurvadhi- 
nasya kasyäpi prapattir väciki bhavet|| 23|| nyäsaliñgavatämgena dhiyärthajñasya mantratab | 
upäsitaguroh samyak prapattir mänast bhavet|| 24 ||. 

16Diese Formulierung erinnert an Rämänujas Saranägatigadyam 16 (Ende) und 20. 


174 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


jas [oder] Tamas bedingt ausgeführt wird, ist minderwertig [beziehungsweise] 
besonders minderwertig, [jene,] die durch Sattva [bedingt ausgeführt wird], 
wird als die beste gepriesen. (28) Die geistig [und] durch Sattva verursacht ist, 
wird als einzige unter diesen als vollkommen betrachet. Denn durch sie gelan- 
gen die Menschen sogleich zur hôchsten Vollendung. (29) Prostrieren, Rez- 
itieren [des Mantra] und [im Geiste] Eingedenksein,!” jede einzelne [dieser] 
konkreten Formen [der prapattih] für sich allein ist, weil sie auf [der Autorität] 
eines Erkenntnis Besitzenden'® beruht, prapattih. (30) Selbst aufgrund des 
Versehenseins mit einem einzigen [von ihnen], wenn sie mit rechter Hingabe 
seiner selbst an Hari verbunden ist, gelangen die Menschen, die einen früher, 
die anderen später, zur Emanzipation. (31)“!° 

Die ganze Darstellung bezeugt eine eher späte Entwicklung der prapattih- 
Praxis, welche in ihrer Spiritualität von jener der Zeit Varadagurus deutlich 
unterschieden ist. Nicht deshalb, weil die Rückführung der verschieden mo- 
tivierten Akte der prapattih auf die Gunas der Urmaterie neu wäre. Diese ist 
in der Zeit der gro$en theologischen Systeme ein eher verbreitetes Topos der 
Erklärung unterschiedlicher Motivierung des Handelns und begegnet auch in 
anderen Sambhitäs als Begründung unterschiedlicher spiritueller Motivation. 
Das, was den Eindruck einer späteren Entwicklung vermittelt, ist vielmehr, 
dass dies in Zusammenhang mit der prapattih geschieht, was eine gewisse dis- 
tanzierte objektive theologisierende Reflexion zeigt, die in Zusammenhang mit 
dem ursprünglich existenziell drängenden Streben nach Emanzipation und 
Vereinigung mit Gott fehlt, für welches die prapattih noch bei Näräyanarya, 
einem jüngeren (?) Zeitgenossen Varadagurus, das einzige Mittel jener war, die 
keinen Adhikära zum Vedastudium hatten und daher den Weg des Bhaktiyoga 
Rämänujas nicht gehen konnten, das endgültige Heil zu erreichen. Ganz davon 
zu schweigen, dass die ersten beiden Arten der prapattih im Nyäsopadeéah die 
prapattih offenbar im Sinne magischer Praktiken verfremden, was selbst bei den 


l’Diese drei Stichworte beziehen sich auf die drei Arten der prapattih (NyäsU 1,22-24). 

I8D.h. des Guru. 

NyäsU 1,25-31: yadicchan pratiküläni sarvabhütanukampinam| prapadyate harim mo- 
hât sà prapattis tu tämasi || 25 || abhipsan vividhän kämän yad kämaïkavatsalam| prapadyate 
brsikesam täm imäm râjasim vidub || 26|| parityajyäkhilän kämän bhaktyaivätmesvaram harim | 
prapadyate däsyaratir yad esà tu sättviki || 27 || hinähinatamäs caiva tamasà krtäh| sattvena yäh 
prayujyante mukhyäs täh parikirtitäh || 28/|| sattvajà mänast tv ekà tatra mukhyatamä matä | 
tayà hi paramäm siddhim sadyo yänti manisinah || 29|| pranämah kirtanam väpi smaranam 
vâpi kevalam| ekaikam api câgänäm prapattih prâjñasamsrayät || 30|| anvayäd api caikasya 
samyañnyastätmano barau| sarva eva pramucyeran naräh pürve pare tathà || 31 ||. 


Gerhard Oberhammer 175 


von Varadaguru zitierten Päñcarätratexten fehlt. 

Dieser späte Charakter der prapattih-Lehre des Nyäsopade$ah wird beispiel- 
sweise auch von der fast beiläufigen Erwähnung der bei Varadaguru recht 
ausführlich vorgetragenen Unterscheidung der prapattih in eine des ,Armseli- 
gen“ (artaprapattih) und eine des ,Zufriedenen“ (drptaprapattih) deutlich.* 
Diese Unterscheidung?! scheint für die im Nyäsopadeéah beschriebene Praxis 
der prapattih keine wirkliche Bedeutung mehr zu haben. Sie ist nur mehr 
ehrwürdige Reminiszenz der Spiritualität einer vergangenen Zeit, die zwar 
weiter tradiert wird, aber im Grunde für die aktuelle Frômmigkeit keine 
Auswirkung zu haben scheint. Die für die Zeit Varadagurus charakteristis- 
che existenzielle Not des aus Armseligkeit Zuflucht Nehmenden ist letztlich 
der fast quietistischen Frômmigkeit eines für alle gemeinten liturgischen Aktes 
gewichen. Zwar ist bei Varadaguru und den von ihm zitierten Texten des Pañ- 
carätra die prapattih allen môglich, doch ist sie noch nicht wie im Nyäsopadesah 
zu einem allgemein praktizierten Ritual geworden, das ein Teil der Diksä, wenn 
nicht ein Ersatz der Dïksä geworden ist.°? 

Dies führt daher im Nyäsopadeéah anders als bei Varadaguru zu einer eher 
ausführlichen Erôrterung praktischer Fragen, beispielsweise die Zulassung zum 
Vollzug der prapattih durch einen rechtmäfigen Guru oder die Präzisierung, 
wer aller zu diesem Ritus berechtigt ist. Im Anschluss an NyäsU 1,31, der davon 
spricht, dass alle durch die prapattih, in welcher Form immer, zur Emanzipa- 
tion gelangen, führt der Text nämlich näher aus: ,Kinder, Stumme, geistig 
Behinderte [und] Blinde, so wie Lahme und Taube, [wenn] sie mit einem 
rechtmäfigen Lehrer (sadäcäryena) in Verbindung sind, erlangen lihre] hôch- 
ste Bestimmung. (32) Wer von einem Guru gutgeheifen wird, wer selbst einen 
Guru anerkennt, beide gelangen gewiss zur hôchsten Vollendung. (33) Wenn 
[jemand] aber das Wissen [besitzt] und Keuschheit bewahren will, ohne sich 
[einem Guru] anvertraut zu haben, für den ist die Hingabe seiner selbst auf dem 
Scheiterhaufen [des ryäsah] vergeblich. Er wird [wieder]geboren auf dem dun- 
klen Weg [der Väter]. (34) Ein Wissen fürwahr, auch wenn es mit [all] seinen 
Gliedern aus den Lehrbüchern wohl erworben wurde, führt ohne rechte Unter- 
weisung [durch den Guru] nicht zum Erfolg. (35) Einem Begehrenden, dem 


20Vel. zur Lehre Varadagurus OBERHAMMER 2004, p. 88f. 

2INyäsU 1,20. 

2Vel. unten, p. 11. 

23Der Kommentar bezieht die erste Alternative auf Kinder, die nicht selbst einen Guru 
wählen kônnen. 


176 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


weltliche Erkenntnismittel [zu Gebote] stehen, verwirklichen sich die Wün- 
sche [welthafter Frucht] nach Wunsch, das Eintreten unvergänglicher Frucht 
[aber verwirklicht sich nur] dem, der einen rechten [Lehrer] angenommen hat. 
(36) Beim nyä4sah oder auch bei der Verehrung darf [nämlich] nur der Mantra 
eines Ekäntin?* verwendet werden. Mit einem Mantra, der von einem Nicht- 
Vaisnava gelehrt wurde, gibt es keine [Erlangung] der hôchsten Bestimmung. 
(37) 5 

Bemerkenswert ist hier die Erwähnung von Kindern (b4/h) als Zuflucht 
Nehmende, die nicht in der Lage sind, den Entschluss zur prapattih selbst zu 
fassen und einen Lehrer zu wählen.# Sie zeigt unmissverständlich den wirk- 
lichen Abstand im Verständnis der prapattih zu dem der Zeit Varadagurus, 
wie es in der Literatur der Rämänuja-Schule überliefert ist. Hier handelt es 
sich schlichtweg um einen in der Tradition allgemein praktizierten liturgis- 
chen Akt und nicht mehr um ein existenzielles Verlangen aus persônlicher spir- 
itueller Not,” wenn eine solche auch nicht ausgeschlossen ist. Vielleicht ist hier 
auch die nachdrückliche Betonung eines geistlichen Lehrers (gwruwh) sachlich in 
Beziehung zu setzen, die offenbar aus der veränderten Wertung der prapattih 
als Akt tantrischen Rituals und dem damit zusammenhängenden tantrischen 
Verständnis der Verleihung eines Mantra als wesentliches Element der prapattih 
zu erklären ist. 


ÂEs bleibt offen, ob hier ein alleiniger Verehrer Visnus gemeint ist, oder der Angehôürige 
einer sozialen Gruppe der Vaisnavas. 

2NyasU 1,32-37: balamükajadändhäs ca pañgavo badhiräs tathà | sadäcäryena samdrstäh 
präpnuvamti paräm gatim || 32 || gurunaà yo ‘bhimanyeta gurum vä yo ‘bhimanyate| täv ubhau 
paramäm siddhim niyamäd upagacchatah || 33 || jñänatas tv anupetasya brahmacaryam abhipsa- 
tab| vrthaivätmasabhitksepä jàyate krsnavartmani|| 34 || Sasträdisu sudrstäpi säñgà sahaphalo- 
dayä| na prasidati vai vidyà vinä sadupadesatah || 35 || kämam lokapramänasya kämäh sidhya- 
nti käminah| grhitasatpadasyaiva nirapäyaphalodayah || 36 || nyäse väpy arcane väpi mantram 
ekäntinah $rayet| avaisnavopadistena mantrena na par gatih || 37||. 

26V9l. gurunä yo ‘bhimanyeta. 

27Vel. beispielsweise das vielleicht gleicher Zeit entstammende Zeugnis der Yatindra- 
matadipikä: ,Wer im Bewusstsein, dass das Karma, das zu reifen begonnen hat, genossen 
werden muss, die Emanzipation im Zeitpunkt erwartet, an dem dieser Kôrper aufhôrt, ist ein 
Zufriedener (drptah). Wer aber aufgrund seiner Befindlichkeit im Samsära gleichsam wie in 
der Mitte lodernden Feuers wegen dessen Unerträglichkeit die Emanzipation gleich [nach dem 
Akt der prapattih] begehrt, ist ein Armseliger.* (YMD), p. 34,22-24: avafyam anubhoktavyam 
iti prärabdhakarmänubhavan etad dehävasänasamayam ïksamäno drptah. jäjvalyamänägnima- 
dhyasthitasyeva samsärävasthiter atiduhsahatvät pratyuttaraksanamoksakäma ärtah.) 


Gerhard Oberhammer 177 


Für diesen Wandel im Verständnis der prapattih charakteristisch ist vor 
allem, was der Nyäsopadeéah über den Mantra als entscheidendes Element 
der prapattih sagt. Die entsprechenden Verse verdienen eine nähere Betra- 
chtung: ,Für ihn, der die Preisgabe [seiner selbst] vollzieht (7y4sin), ist die 
‘Gabe’ (yäsah) die eigentliche Vollendung (risthä) [seiner Preisgabe]. Die 
rituellen Handlungen setzen diese voraus. [Diese] soll man mit den allge- 
meinen oder mit den spezifischen [Mantren oder auch] mit anderen aus- 
führen. Auch diese sind im Sinne der Hingabe (wrpane) gedacht. (50) Mit 
der Hand den Kôrper [des Schülers] berührend, môge der Mantrenkundige 
(mantravit) [den Schüler], dadurch dass er [ihn] anblickt, [zu einem Zuflucht 
Nehmenden] machen. Sagt [doch] der Muni (sci. Bharadväja) selbst, dass 
dies die Diksäa für alle Varnas ist. (51) Diese Vollendung (siddhih), welche 
der Vaisnava-Lehrer (gwruh) mit visnuitischen Mantren verleiht, oder auch 
jeder andere, der vedischer [Tradition] angehôrt, darf man nicht mit anderen 
Mantren ausführen. (52) Die vedischen und tantrischen [Mantren], beide sind 
für die Zweimalgeborenen die besten. Für die Südras und znwloma-Geborenen 
sind jedoch die tantrischen Mantren. (53) Die profanen (/aukika-), die in 
der Volkssprache sind und zum Zweck der prapattih gemacht sind, sind allen 
pratiloma-[Geborenen] zu geben, nach Wunsch auch den Zweimalgeborenen. 
(SAS 

Der Text vermittelt trotz seiner nur konkret, praxisorientierten Aussagen 
wertvolle Ansätze sowohl für ein religionsgeschichtliches wie auch frôm- 
migkeitsgeschichtliches Verständnis der prapattih zur Zeit seiner Abfassung. 
Zentral sind vor allem zwei Phänomene: Die Betonung (a) der Zuordnung 
eines Mantras als entscheidenden Akt der prapattih und damit eng verbun- 
den (b) die Wirkung der prapattih als Diksa. Der Vers 50 ist zunächst eher 
schwierig zu interpretieren, wenn er sagt, dass der die prapattih zur Vollen- 
dung bringende Akt der nyäsah sei, auch wenn diese Aussage eher trivial zu 
sein scheint. Was bedeutet hier 7yäsah, zumal wenn man bedenkt, dass dieser 
Akt Voraussetzung der Ritualakte ist, die mit allgemeinen Mantren als auch 
mit solchen, die für die #isthä spezifisch sind (naisthikäh)? Der Kommentar 


28NyasU 1,50-54: nyäsino nyäsa eva syän nisthä tatpürvikäh kriyäh| vyäpakair naïsthikair 
vänyaih kuryät te by arpane matäh || 50|| karena sparsayan gäâtram mantravid bhävayed drsa | 
esà va sarvavarnänäm diksety äha munih svayam || 51 || yäm siddhim vaisnavair mantrair ädha- 
tte vaisnavo gurub| sarvavedadharo ‘by anyo nänyaih kurvita tädr$im || 52 || vaidikäs täntrikas 
caiva dvaye mukhyä dvijanmanäm| sûdränulomajätinäm manträh syus täntrikäh param || 53 | 
bhäsäkhyä laukikä manträh prapattyarthavibhävanäh | sarvebhyah pratilomebhyo deyäh kämam 
dvijätibhih|| 54 ||. 


178 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


erklärt dies mit den Worten: ,Für den nyäsin, der Zuflucht nimmt (prapan- 
nasya), ist der nyäsah der Mantraratna, welcher die prapattih eintreten lässt; 
die Vollendung (xésthà) ist das für immer [bleibende] Rezitieren dessen, so 
verhält es sich. Ritualakte (kriyäh) sind Akte der Verehrung. Diese soll man 
unter Voraussetzung des [#y4sah] ausführen [und zwar] soll man sie mit allge- 
meinen Mantren, die im Sinne der Gäyatri Visnus überliefert sind[, nämlich] 
den sechssilbigen, achtsilbigen oder zwülfsilbigen [bezichungsweise] mit den 
spezifischen Mantren, [nämlich] den zur Vollendung [gehôrigen] Mantren oder 
auch mit anderen als dem Mantraratna ausführen. Die Vollendung (risthä) 
wie auch die rituellen Akte kônnen sowohl im Falle der vom Mantraratna 
unterschiedenen als auch im Falle der allgemeinen Mantren unter deren Vo- 
raussetzung verwirklicht werden.“ Im Lichte dieser Erklärung scheint #yäsah 
sowohl das Offenbaren des Mantra an den Zuflucht Nehmenden als auch der 
mit diesem Mantra ausgeführte Akt der Hingabe seiner selbst an den Gott 
zu sein. Beides ist konstitutives Element sowohl für die prapattih selbst als 
auch für jeden anderen mit den Mantren auszuführenden Akt der Verehrung 
(arcanädikriyäh). Der in der prapattih vollzogene Akt des 7yäsah entspricht so 
voll dem Typus tantrischen Denkens, der hier deutlich zum Ausdruck kommit, 
während er in den beispielsweise von Varadaguru zitierten Päñcarätratexten und 
bei Varadaguru selbst fehlt. Berücksichtigt man in diesem Zusammenhang das 
in Vers 52 Gesagte, so zeigt sich eine gewisse Ambivalenz, die jedoch diesen 
Befund bestätigt. In diesem Vers wird davon gesprochen, dass nur visnuitische 
Mantren zur prapattih® verwendet werden dürfen. Von wem? Von anderen 
Lehrern, die der Tradition des Veda verpflichtet sind, wie der Text sagt. Dies 
scheinen offensichtlich nicht geistige Lehrer zu sein, die der visnuitischen Tra- 
dition, die von Bharadväja vertreten wurde, angehüren; was kaum anders ver- 
standen werden kann, als dass damit vermutlich Lehrer der Vedänta-Tradition 
Rämänujas gemeint sind, die ebenfalls eine Tradition der prapattih vertreten 
haben. Ein môglicher Unterschied scheint im Vers 51 zum Ausdruck zu kom- 
men, der die prapattih ganz im tantrischen Sinne der Päñcarätratradition als 


2Komm. zu NyäsU 1,50, p.19,14-20: atha kutra mantre nisthety apeksäyäm äha — nyäsina 
iti| nyäsinah prapannasya nyäsa eva prapattipratipädakamantraratna eva nisthà tasyaiva nitya- 
japa ity arthah | kriyà arcanädikriyäs tatpürvikäh tanmantrapärvikäh kuryat| vyäpakaih visnu- 
gäyatryäm ämnätaih sadastadvädasäksaraih naïsthikaih nisthämantrair anyaih mantraratnavyati- 
riktair vä kuryät| mantraratnavyatiriktesv api vyäpakesu và nisthà triyas ca tatpürvikà bhavitum 
arhantity arthab | . 

30Vel. nänyaih kurvita tädr$im (siddhim). 


Gerhard Oberhammer 179 


Diksä wertet und dies mit einer Aussage Bharadväjas begründet.°! 

Dies scheint den Abschluss eines langen Assimilierungsprozesses zu be- 
deuten. Denn wenn die prapattih auch zur Zeit Varadagurus in den Samhitäs 
des Päñcarätra als spirituelle Praxis gelehrt wird, wie das durch die im Pra- 
pannaparijätam zitierten Texte bezeugt ist, so ist sie doch nicht ursprünglich 
im Päñcarätra entstanden, sondern aus anderen, vermutlich visnuitisch- 
brahmanischen Traditionen übernommen.*? Abgesehen von dem tantrischem 
Ritual verpflichteten, älteren Ritus des ryäsah an Sudar$ana zum Schutze eines 
Fürsten vor einem übermächtigen Feind, mit dem die prapattih im Text ver- 
schmolzen wurde, scheint die prapattih jedoch auch im Päñcarätra jener Zeit 
kein tantrischer Ritus im eigentlichen Sinne gewesen zu sein, sondern ein per- 
sônlicher Akt spirituellen Emanzipationsstrebens. Dass die prapattih im Pañ- 
carätra nicht ursprünglich ist, legt auch die $Sesasamhità nahe, welche zwar die 
prapattih und deren Unterscheidung in eine prapattih eines Armseligen (ärtah) 
und eine solche des Zufriedenen (drptah) erwähnt, aber bemerkenswerter Weise 
die prapattih eines Armseligen anders wertet als dies bei Varadaguru und im 
Visistädvaita seiner Zeit geschieht, wo diese im Grunde als die spirituell ern- 
sthaftere erscheint. Sie wertet nämlich die prapattih des Armseligen mit ihrem 
leidenschaftlichen Wunsch nach unmittelbarer Emanzipation als dem Gott 
unangemessene Nôtigung: ,Die prapattih ist zweifach, o Brahma: der Arm- 
selige und der Zufriedene, Du Viergesichtiger! Der ‘Armselige’ (ärtah) ist der, 
der [Erfüllung seines] Begehrens wünscht, der meine Gebote verfehlt [und] der 
ohne Werke [und] ohne Erkenntnisist. Er gelangt in Wahrheit zum Genuss des 
Kaivalyam. Der ‘Zufriedene’ (drptah) erfreut sich eines von seinem [jeweiligen] 
Dharma geregelten Wandels. Er fürwahr ist makellos, hat [seine] Freude an der 
Vergegenwärtigung meiner Mantren [und] bewahrt immerdar meine Gebote. 
Er, der Wissende, der [zu mir] Zuflucht genommen hat, gelangt zum Genuss 
der Vereinigung mit mir. Der ‘Armselige’ beleidigt mich, der ‘Zufriedene” ist 
mir lieb, [und] so, fürwahr, werde ich dem ‘Zufriedenen’ Vereinigung mit mir 
(conj. matsäyujyädikam) gewähren. Dies ist das hôchste Geheimnis, das ver- 


borgener ist als das Verborgene.“*” 


51Vel. Kommentar, NyäsU, p.20,3f: yatah sarvavarnänäm dikseti munir Bharadväjah sva- 
Jam äha. 

32$iehe OBERHAMMER 2004, pp. 136-140. 

33AhirS 37,4f. Vel. OBERHAMMER 2006. 

FVol. OBERHAMMER 2004, pp. 74fF. 

35esas, p. 85,8—16: prapattih dvividhä brahman ärto drptas caturmukba | kämyärthi ärta eva 
syât madäjñächedakärakah || karmajñänädirahitah sa vai kaivalyabhogagah| svadharmaniyatä- 


180 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Die Stelle ist schwierig zu deuten, weil die Aussage nicht ausführlich genug 
ist. Offensichtlich ist, dass der Text die prapattih des Armseligen (ärth) anders 
sieht als dies zur Zeit Varadagurus geschehen ist. Was meint aber die Erk- 
lärung des Armseligen als den, ,der die [Erfüllung seines] Begehrens anstrebt“ 
(kämyärthi}? Ist er einer, der nur um der Erfüllung eines beliebigen Wunsches 
willen Zuflucht nimmt, also ,jener, der vielfältige Wünsche hegt“ (4bhipsau 
vividhän kämän), wie es NyäsU 1,26 heifit, und den auch der Nyäsopadesah 
ablehnt?*$ Oder ist es noch der alte ,Armselige“ (ärtzh), von dem Varadaguru 
spricht? Der Text führt dies nicht näher aus, sondern deutet mit diesem Aus- 
druck nur den Grund an, warum das Zufluchtnehmen des Armseligen dem 
Gott missfällt; deshalb nämlich, weil der Armselige durch sein Begehren in 
Form des Zufluchtnehmens den Gott unziemlich ,nôtigt“, seinen Wunsch zu 
erfüllen. Dieser Grund würde aber letztlich für beide Auffassungen eines ,Arm- 
seligen“ Geltung haben, und bezeugt jedenfalls eine doch grundlegende Wand- 
lung in der Auffassung des Zufluchtnehmens, die jener des Nyäsopadeéah nahe 
kommt: Die prapattih ist nunmehr ein allgemeiner Akt fast pietistischer Frôm- 
migkeit geworden, der jede existenzielle Not verloren hat: Der ,Zufriedene“ 
(drptah) hat Freude am jeweiligen, ihm zugemessenen Dharma. Er ist der in 
seinem Wandel Lautere, der Freude an den Mantren Gottes hat und dessen 
Gebote beobachtet; so gelangt er zum Genuss der Vereinigung mit dem Gott. 
Aber selbst in dieser eher rezenten Samhitä scheint die prapattih noch nicht zu 
einem konkreten Ritus geworden zu sein, wie dies im Nyäsopadeéah der Fall 
ist. 

Dies scheint in Verbindung mit einer anderen religiôsen Praxis, der Aus- 
führung der fünf samskäras, zu geschehen, die im Nyäsopade$ah die rit- 
uelle Form der Ausführung der prapattih sind. Dies lässt sich jedenfalls im 
Sinne einer Arbeitshypothese vermuten. Denn ursprünglich scheinen die fünf 
samskäras”” nicht mit dem Zufluchtnehmen verbunden zu sein. Varadaguru 
erwähnt zwar fünf Glieder (añigam) der prapattih, doch scheinen diese, wie 
im Kontext nahe gelegt, nicht die fraglichen samskäras, sondern die vom 
Laksmitantram vertretenen sechs für die prapattih konstitutiven Elemente”® 


cârarato drptas sa vai $ucih || manmantradhyänanirato madajñäpälakas sadà | sa vai jñänt prapa- 
nnas syàt matsäyujyädibhogagah || maddroht ärta eva syät matpriyo drpta eva ca| drptasyaiva hi 
däsyämi yat säjuyädikam tathà || idam rahasyam paramam guhyäd guhyataram bhaver| . 

36Vol. NyäsU 1,28. 

7Scil. tapah, pundrah, näma, mantrah, yägab. 

S8LT 17,60f: änukälyasya samkalpab, pratikälyasya varjanam, raksisyati visväsah, goptrtvava- 
ranam tathà, ätmaniksepakarpanye sadvidhà saranägatih (.…). 


Gerhard Oberhammer 181 


zu meinen, deren letztes, der ätmaniksepah, als mit der prapattih gleichzuset- 
zen, von ihm nicht gezählt wird.* Dass dies so zu verstehen sein dürfte, wird 
auch durch Näräyanärya nahe gelegt, der als erster in der Sanskrittradition der 
Rämänuja-Schule die prapattih als eine Alternative für jene erwähnt, die nicht 
den Bhaktiyoga Rämänujas üben kônnen, und keinen bestimmten Ritualakt 
wie die fünf samskaras erwähnt.° 

Jedenfalls begegnet aber in der Iévarasamhitä 21,283f. die Praxis der fünf 
samskäras als Teil der Diksä, ohne jedoch als konkrete Form der prapattih ver- 
standen zu sein. Bemerkenswert ist dabeiï, dass es sich um einen Textabschnitt 
handeln dürfte, der in den Kontext der Diksä eingeschoben ist, #1 sodass die Ver- 
mutung nahe liegt, dass zuerst diese Praxis ins Ritual des Paäñcarätra aufgenom- 
men wurde und so die Wertung der prapattih des Nyäsopadeéah als eine Art der 
Diksä, wie sie in Vers NyäsU 1,51 verstanden zu sein scheint, ermôglicht wurde. 
Der in diesem Vers enthaltene Verweis auf Bharadväja (ty ha munih svayam) 
ist zunächst natürlich eine Begründung dafür, dass die Initiation in den bei 
der prapattih mitgeteilten Mantra durch Berührung des Zufluchtnehmenden 
geschieht, die offenbar durch einen rituell verstandenen Blick des Initiieren- 
den erfolgt; dadurch ist sie aber auch als Diksä oder jedenfalls als eine Art der 
Diksä für die Angehôrigen aller Varnas ausgewiesen. 

Die konkrete Durchführung dieser Diksä ist dann der Gegenstand von 
NyaäsU 1,57-67: ,Zu rechter, günstiger Zeit môge er sich, nachdem er in 
einem Tirtha gebadet hat, zu einem reinen, dem Erhabenen heiligen Ort, fest 
entschlossen [und] vertrauensvoll dem Guru nähern, indem er ihm prostri- 
erend seine Verehrung erweist. (57) Der Lehrer môge [ihn], nachdem er für 
ihn, der sich an ihn gewandt hat, mit Hingabe Janärdana verehrt hat und seiner 
[eigenen] Gurus ehrend gedacht hat, veranlassen, mit dem Mantra, das er ihm 
mitteilt,] die prapattih zu vollziehen. (58) Falls aber eine Frau, ein Südra, ein 
[Abkômmling] vermischter [Varnas], die nicht ohne Makel sind, oder einer, 
der [durch ein gro$es Vergehen] gefallen ist, [oder] auch ein einer anderen 
[religiôsen] Anschauung Angehôrender der initiierende Lehrer waren, [dann] 
ist die [prapattih], auch wenn sie vom betreffenden [Zuflucht Nehmenden] 
vollzogen wurde, nicht zustande gekommen. (59) Daher muss [dessen] Zu- 
fluchtnehmen sobald als môglich anderswo entsprechend der Vorschrift [von 


Val. OBERHAMMER 2004, p. 87f. 

#0Vel. ibid., p. 44f. 

Ich verdanke diese Beobachtung meiner Kollegin M. RASTELLI, die mich auf diese Stelle 
der Iévarasamhitä hingewiesen hat. 


182 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


neuem] vollzogen werden. Er aber, der den Mantra gelehrt hat, hinab stürzt 
er, der Verblendete. (60) Aufgrund der anfanglosen, widrigen Verbindung mit 
den [konditionierenden] psychischen Eindrücken, gedenkt [er] selbst nicht 
Visnus; woher [sollte] es zu dem Gedanken an eine Hingabe [an Ihn] kom- 
men? (61) Weil durch das eigene Bôse [ihnen] eine [entsprechende] Fami- 
lie [zukommt, und] aufgrund anderer gegebener [Umstände], [wie] Ort, Zeit 
und Eigenwesen, nehmen [die Menschen] keine Zuflucht bei Ke$ava. (62) 
Ohne jemals Näräyana, den makellosen Herrn, erkannt zu haben, verlangen 
die Unerleuchteten [danach,] anderen, unreinen [Güttern] zu dienen. (63) 
Einige nehmen bei Visnu, dem Herrn von Allem, der das Bôse restlos ver- 
nichtet, Zuflucht, [weil] sie [vielfältige] Wünsche hegen. Diese wissen nicht 
vom Dienersein, welches das beste ist. (64) Die Guten, deren Befleckungen 
zufolge [ihrer] in vielen Geburten erworbenen Verdienste geschwunden sind, 
nehmen [ihre] Zuflucht bei Hari, dessen Diener zu sein sie als einzige Frucht 
begehren. (65) Die Vollkommenen, deren Verblendung geschwunden ist, die 
sich selbst hingegeben haben, erfreut allein das Dienen, das im Tun des eige- 
nen Dharma usw. [besteht]. (66) Für sie, die bei Vaäsudeva Zuflucht gesucht 
haben, die einzig [daran] Geschmack finden, Ihm zu dienen, für sie, deren 
Furcht geschwunden ist, gibt es keine Trennung [von Ihm], weder hier noch 
im Jenseits. (67) “2 

In diesen Versen ist das rituelle Geschehen der prapattih nur in seiner 
wesentlichen Struktur dargelegt, wie es dem Inhalt des 1. Adhyäya entspricht. 
Dem Autor geht es offenbar vor allem darum, die Mitteilung des Mantra und 
dessen zentrale Bedeutung als Diksä für die prapattih darzustellen und damit 
verbundene Fragen der traditionsgerechten Ausführung der prapattih zu klären. 
Diese Struktur ist für ihn wesentlich durch die von ihm genannten Elemente 


#NyäsU 1,57-67: punye nuküle samaye dese bhägavate Subhe| nimajjya niyatas tirthe prani- 
patyäsrayed gurum || 57 || äcäryas copasannäya bhaktyäbhyarcya janärdanam | gurün pranamya 
mantrena prapattim pratipädayet || 58 || atha strifüdrasañkirnänirmaläpatitädisu | ananyenänya- 
drstau ca krtäpi na krtä bhavet|| 59|| ato ‘nyaträsu vidhivat kartavyà Saranägatih| upadestà 
tu mantrasya müdhah pracyavate hy adhah || 60] anäder väsanäyogäd viparitädihätmanah | 
smrtir na jàyate visnau kuta evärpane matih|| G1|| svapäpasambhaväd eva kulät samsargato 
nyatah| desat kälat svabhäväc ca prapadyante na kesavam || 62|| avijñnäya sadä Suddham 
naräm näräyanam prabbum| asuddhänämaho ‘nyesäm däsyabhicchanty abuddhayah || 63 || 
kecit sarvefvaram visnum asesaduritäpaham| kämakämäh prapadyante na te däsyam param 
viduh || G4|| bahujanmakrtaih punyair ätmanah ksinakalmasäh | harim santah prapadyante 
taddäsyaikaphalärthinah || 65|| krtinäm vitamohänäm kesave nihitätmanäm\ svadate keva- 
lam däsyam svadharmakaranädikam || 66 || väsudevam prapannänäm taddaäsyaikarasätmanäm | 
bhedo vitabhayänäm hi nätra kascit paratra va || 67 ||. 


Gerhard Oberhammer 183 


bestimmt: Nach dem rituellen Bad des Schülers in einem Tirtha nähert sich 
dieser in ritueller Form dem geistlichen Lehrer, der die Zeremonie an einem 
dem Visnu geweihten Ort vornimmt. Der Lehrer vollzieht diese, indem er 
an Stelle und für den Kandidaten dem Gott Verehrung erweist, seiner eige- 
nen Lehrer verehrend gedenkt und dann die Initiation des Schülers in der 
Weise vornimmt, dass er ihn mit seiner Hand berührt und ihm, indem er ihn, 
der Weisung Bharadväjas folgend, anblickt, den Mantra mitteilt und so zur 
prapattih ermächtigt. Nicht erwähnt ist die Ausführung der fünf smskäras, die 
im Sinne der Verse 22 und 24 ein Element der eigentlichen, vollkommenen 
Form der prapattih (manasà prapattih) ist. Da der vierte dieser samskäras aber 
gerade die Mitteilung des Mantra ist, muss man wohl annehmen, dass diese 
Mitteilung des Mantra, von der der Vers 57 spricht, eben im Rahmen der Aus- 
führung dieser fünf samskäras erfolgt ist, will man nicht annehmen, dass die 
prapattih letztlich auch ohne diese erfolgen konnte. Leider ist der 2. Adhyäya 
des Nyäsopadesah nicht erhalten, der die Elemente der prapattih offenbar im 
Einzelnen besprochen hat.“ 

Verwunderlich ist, dass der Autor im Zusammenhang seiner Darstellung 
auf die abgelehnte Môglichkeit von Lehrern anderer Traditionen abermals 
eingeht, von der er auch schon an anderer Stelle gesprochen hat,“ und so die 
Ablehnung solcher Praxis besonders betont. Diese Ablehnung ist nicht an sich 
verwunderlich. Wenn die prapattih eine spezifische Praxis visnuitischer Tra- 
dition ist, ist es wohl selbverständlich, dass man nur Angehôrige der eigenen 
Tradition als initiierende Lehrer wählen sollte. Der relativ groRe Nachdruck, 
den der Autor diesem Verbot jedoch verleiht, kann wohl nur bedeuten, dass die 
Gefahr tatsächlich bestanden hat, einen nicht der Tradition Angehôürenden zu 
dem die prapattih leitenden Lehrer zu wählen. Da man jedoch kaum annehmen 
kann, dass jemand, der von Visnu Emanzipation und bleibende Vereinigung 
mit Ihm erlangen môchte, zu diesem Zwecke einen anderen als einen Vaisnava 
zum Lehrer erwählen würde, liegt es nahe anzunehmen, dass dies nur für eine 
prapattih zu anderem Zweck erfolgt sein kann. Dies wird umso wahrschein- 
licher, wenn man sich in Erinnerung ruft, dass der Autor des Nyäsopadesah 
solche prapattih (räjasi und tamast prapattih) zur Erfüllung irdischer Wünsche 
ebenfalls abgewertet und im Grunde abgelehnt hat.* Man môchte daher an- 
nehmen, dass es tatsächlich vorgekommen sein muss, dass um der Erfüllung 


Vel. NyasU 2,1. 
Vol. NyäsU 1,59f. und 37. 
Vel. NyäsU 1,26, 28 und 64. 


184 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


solcher Wünsche willen unter Umständen auch Lehrer anderer Tradtitionen 
gewählt wurden, wenn sie ein entsprechendes Ansehen in der Gesellschaft hat- 
ten. Ahnliches muss man wohl auch im Falle von Frauen und Südras vermuten, 
die offenbar der eigenen Tradition angehôrten. Wenn dies richtig ist, dann 
scheint durch diese Verbote im soziologischen Umfeld der spirituellen prapattih 
zur Erlangung der Emanzipation eine Vielfalt volkstümlicher Religiosität fass- 
bar zu werden. 

Seine Darlegung der prapattih abschlieRend* spricht der Autor des 
Nyäsopade$ah von der Frucht der Selbsthingabe an den hôchsten Gott, Es- 
chatologie und Spiritualität des Lebensstiles gleichsam verbindend: ,Hier [in 
dieser Welt] ist die Lebensweise, die von der $ruti usw. geregelt ist, selbst die 
Frucht; und im Jenseits [ist es] das sich Erfüllen der Wünsche nach dem Willen 
des hôchsten Herrn. (68) Nachdem sie ihr Selbst, all das Ihre und all ihr Tun 
dem All-Âtmä hingegeben haben, weilen sie dort frei von [jeder] Befleckung, 
(69) in der Überzeugung: ‘[Er] selbst, der Herr, wird uns, die wir rein sind, 
dieses Leben des Dienens zu seinem Wohlgefallen môglich machen.” (70)“* 
Die Verse bedürfen für das Verständnis dessen, was sie sagen, keiner beson- 
deren Erklärung, kontextuell und im Horizont einer historischen Betrachtung 
gewinnen sie jedoch ihr eigentliches Profil: Im Zentrum ihrer Aussage steht 
die Vorstellung, dass es die Sinnerfüllung des menschlichen Lebens ist, Diener 
Gottes zu sein, und zwar sowohl im Leben als auch im Zustand bleibender Sin- 
nerfüllung in der Emanzipation. Diese Vorstellung begegnet nicht nur hier, 
sondern ebenso in den vohergehenden Versen NyäsU 1,65-67, wo von der 
rechten Gesinnung des Zufluchtnehmenden die Rede ist, und schon zuvor in 
1,27, wo gesagt ist, dass der in der sattvischen prapattih Zufluchtnehmende 
seine Lust darin findet, Hari zu dienen (däsyaratih). Dieses Gott Dienen als 
Sinnerfüllung menschlicher Existenz in der Emanzipation ist wenigstens in der 
Sanskrittradition des Visistädvaita seit Rämänujas Saranägatigadyam für diese 
Tradition charakteristisch, während sie in der tantrischen Tradition des Pañ- 
carâtra, wann man von der Zeit nach Rämänuja absieht, zu fehlen scheint. 
Muss man daher annehmen, dass diese Vorstellung im Nyäsopadesah dem 
Einfluss der des Viistädvaita Tradition zuzuschreiben ist? Auffallend ist je- 


#6Vgl. Kommentar zu NyäsU 1,70, der mit den Worten iti prapattyadhikärah endet. 

#NyäsU 1,68-70: ha srutyädiniyatä vrttir eva svayam phalam| paratra ca paresasya kämät 
kämapravrttayah || 68 || niksipyätmänam ätmiyam a$esam akhilätmani | kriyäs ca sakaläs tatra 
varttante vitakalmasäh || G69|| manyante ca svakiyännah svaprityai svocitäm svayam | näthah 
svakiyaseväm täm vritim kärayatiti vai || 70||. 


Gerhard Oberhammer 185 


denfalls eine ausgesprochene Tendenz des Textes, die Beziechung der prapattih- 
Spiritualität zur brahmanischen Orthodoxie zu betonen. So wird gesagt, dass 
die der prapattih entsprechende Lebensweise ,durch die Sruti usw. geregelt ist“ 
(Vers 1,68), und wird die gläubige Erkenntnis (#rstih) als Element gelebter 
prapattih aus Vers 1,72 als vedavedäntavijnanam erklärt (Vers 1,78) und die 
anukülatä in Vers 1,77 als svadharmesv abhiratih. Auch der in Vers 1,68 
begegnende Gedanke, dass die Wünsche des Emanzipierten sich abhängig 
vom Wollen des hôchsten Herrn verwirklichen® erinnert an das Attribut des 
satyasamkalpatvam des emanzipierten Âtmä, das von Rämänuja beispielsweise 
im Kommentar zu BrSü 4,4,20 in Abhängigkeit vom Wollen des Paramätmaä 
erklärt wird. Zu all dem kommit die kaum zu übersehende Übereinstimmung 
des Nyäsopadesah als literarisches Werk mit Varadagurus Prapannaparijätam, 
die bei aller inhaltlichen Unterschiedeheit durch die stark tantrisch, ritual- 
isierten Denkweise des Nyäsopadesah dennoch gegeben ist. 

Nimmt man all diese Beobachtungen zusammen, dann gewinnt man 
den Eindruck, dass dieses Werk, auch wenn es in der Überlieferung als 
Bhäradväjasamhitä bezeichnet wird, keine Päñcarätrasamhitä im üblichen 
Sinne, noch auch, wie SMITH, ohne es selbst zu glauben, erwägt, der Teil 
einer solchen ist, sondern einfach ein Traktat zur Praxis der prapattih, der 
unter dem Einfluss päñcarätrischen Denkens, vielleicht dem Vorbild des Pra- 
pannaparijätam folgend, verfasst wurde. Denn auch die anderen Kapitel des 
Nyäsopade$ah befassen sich ähnlich wie Varadagurus Werk ebenfalls mit dem 
geforderten Verhalten des Zufluchtnehmenden und stellen so eine der spir- 
ituellen Praxis des Zufluchtnehmens gewidmeten Werkeinheit dar. Wenn dies 
richtig ist, dann wäre der Nyäsopadeéah des Bharadväja das Beispiel eines selb- 
ständigen Lehrtraktates aus einer Tradition, in der visistädvaitische Spiritual- 
ität und eine dem rituellen Denken, nicht jedoch der Theologie des Päñcara- 
tra nahestehende Religiosität vereinigt wurden und so ein Text entstanden ist, 
der eher der Spiritualitätsgeschichte der Räimänuja-Schule bezichungsweise der 
Srivaisnavas zuzuweisen ist, auch wenn er traditionsgeschichtlich ein Text des 
Päñcarätra zu sein scheint. 


88Vol. paratra ca paresasya hämät kämapravrttayah. 
8 Sy. Tayar, 


186 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The “Pañcaratra Passages” in Agnipurana 21-70* 


MARION RASTELLI 


INTRODUCTION 


Already thirty years ago, Hélène BRUNNER pointed out that chapters 72-106 of 
the Agnipuräna “sont très probablement la copie (...) d’un Âgama qu'il reste à 
identifier” (1976:117). Many years later, she was informed by Alexis SANDER- 
son that the larger part of these passages (AP 72-90 and 92-103) indeed hail 
from a $Saivasiddhänta text, though not from an Âgama, but from a text to 
which Hélène BRUNNER had devoted many years of her life, the Somasambhu- 
paddhati.\ 

This inspired me to take a closer look at the passages of the AP that are 
generally considered to have derived from Päñcarätra Samhitäs. The affiliation 
of AP 21-70 to the Päñcarätra tradition was already noted by HAZRA in 1940. 
According to his observations, these chapters “are most probably summaries 
of one or more of the Pañcarätra Samhitäs” (1975:136). He also noticed that 
some verses from AP 39-70 have parallels in the Hayañrsapañcarätra, which 
he knew only from quotations.? Other scholars have also pointed out passages 
parallel to the Hayasrrsapañcarätra in this part of the AP, among them BANER- 
JEA (1956:21), KramMriscH (1946:105), SarkAR,? R. N. SHARMA,* and SINGH 
(1985:180). 

Why do the beginning of chapter 21 and the end of chapter 70 form the 


boundaries of these “Päñcarätra passages”? 


*I thank Jun TakasHIMA for making the digitized text of the Agripuräna available online 
(http://www.aa.tufs.ac.jp/"tjun/data/gicas/ind_scripture-e.html), which 
was immensely helpful for conducting this study. I'am also grateful to Cynthia PEck-KuBaCzEk 
for suggesting various stylistic corrections of the English manuscript. 

ISee the introduction to SP4, pp. lix f. 

2The edition of the Hayasirsapañcarätra was published only in 1952 and 1956. 

3See the introduction to the edition of the H, pp. x f. 

#$ee the introduction of AP3, p. 8. 


188 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


First of all, when looking at the structure of the AP, Hazra (1975:135) 
seems to be right in his opinion that the chapters 21-106 are a later interpola- 
tion. After the frame story, which tells how Agni came to relate the Agnipuräna 
(AP 1), the AP continues with a description of Visnus avatäras in chapters 2- 
16. The subjects of the following chapters (AP 17-20) are the creation of the 
world and genealogies of the first beings created. Then the last verse of AP 
20 suddenly turns to a new subject: “Having performed the worship rituals 
(päjä) for Visnu, etc., which consist of the bath, etc., [and] which were taught 
by Närada, etc. to the rsis, Sväyambhuva and others obtained enjoyment and 
emancipation.”” The subsequent chapters, 21-106, consist mainly of ritual pre- 
scriptions and information relevant to temple building and to the preparation 
of idols and their installation. Chapter 107, bearing the title sväyambhuvasa- 
rgakathanam (in AP:), returns to the story of the creation. Thus we see that 
the chapters 21-106, together with the last verse of chapter 20, were probably 
inserted into the description of the creation. 

We already know that the chapters beginning with 72 have parallels to the 
SP. Chapter 70 concludes with the words: “Hear what the Lord (3%) told 
Skanda about the installation, etc., of Sürya, the Lord, Gana, the Sakti, etc., the 
retinue, [and] Hari.”6 This clearly refers to the section following these words, 
the chapters 71fF. First of all, “the Lord” (%vara), i.e., Siva, is indeed the person 
who is speaking in these chapters. Secondly, he speaks to Skanda, as we see, 
for example, in AP; 72.1a. Finally, Siva speaks about the topics mentioned 
here: the worship of Gana (i.e., Gane$a) in AP 71, the worship and installation 
of Sürya in AP 73 and 99, the worship and installation of Siva in AP 74 and 
95-97, the installation of His Sakti Gauri in AP 98, and the installation of the 
deities at the door, as is probably meant by the term “retinue”, in AP 100.7 
Thus it is highly probable that the $aiva section begins with chapter 71, despite 
the fact that not all of it, especially chapter 71, has parallel passages in the SP. 

Thus the chapters 21-70 remain. With regard to these chapters the follow- 
ing questions need to be answered: Are they of a Päñcarätra origin? If so, do 
they originate from a single Samhitä or from several sources? Can this or these 


SAP: 20.23: rsibhyo näradädyuktäh püjäh snänädipärvikäh | svayambhuvädyas täh krivä vi- 
snväder bhuktimuktigäh. 

SAP: 70.8c-9b: skandäyeso yathä präha pratisthädyam tathä $rnu | süryesaganasaktyädeh 
parivärasya vai hareh. 

TThe installation of Hari, i.e., Visnu, is not found in this section of the AP althouglh it is 
part of the SP (SP4, chapter VI). Cf. BRUNNERS note at the beginning of her translation of 
this chapter (SP4, p. 294). 


Marion Rastelli 189 


source(s) be identified? To answer these questions three criteria may be rele- 
vant: (1) the narrator of the respective chapters of the AP, (2) parallel passages 
in other texts, and (3) the consistency or inconsistency of these chapters with 
regard to their contents. 


FIRST CRITERION: THE NARRATORS 


As already mentioned, the AP basically represents itself as a narration of Agni. 
However, Agni is not the narrator of every chapter. Other narrators are also 
mentioned. These other narrators could indicate that the passage they narrate 
derives from another source. However, this need not necessarily be the case. 
Let us look at which passages are attributed to which narrator in the first 
chapters of the AP, beginning from AP 2.5 


2.2-5.1 Agni 
5.2-11.13 Närada 
11.14-20.23 Agni 
21.1-30.36 Närada 
31.1-38.35 Agni 
38.36-50 Yama 
38.51 Agni 
39.1-47.14 Hayagriva? 
48.1-68.19 Bhagavat 
69.1-23 Agni 
70.1-9 Bhagavat 
71.1-106.24 Ivara 
107.1. Agni 


AP 2-20, the chapters preceding the section under investigation, are narrated 
by Agni with the exception of chapters 5-11. These chapters give a short version 
of the Rämäyana, which Agni explicitly ascribes to Närada. 19 

The chapters AP 21-30 are narrated by Närada. They are introduced by the 


verse 20.23, which was quoted above (p. 188), but there are no corresponding 


closing verses. 


8As already mentioned, AP 1 contains the framing story of the narration. The following 


table refers to AP1. For variants in AP: see n. 9. 

*Variants: At the beginning of AP: 39, the reading of a single manuscript (ga.) is agnir 
uväca, but this v.l. can probably be ignored. At the beginning of AP: 40, several manuscripts 
read bhagavän uväca. In AP», the beginnings of chapters 40, 41 and 43-68 read bhagavän 
uväca. At the beginning of AP: 42, havagriva uväca is given. 

10See AP; 5.1 and 11.14, where this sub-story is introduced and closed by Agni. 


190 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Agni is again the narrator in AP 31-38, interrupted once for a few verses 
by Yama. This interruption is explicitly introduced and closed by Agni in AP: 
38.35 and 51ab. 

In chapters 39-68, Hayagriva or Bhagavat (cf. n. 9) are given as narrators. 
This section is introduced by Agnis words: “Hayagriva told Brahman about 
the installation, etc., of the deities.”!! Here again there is no closing passage. 

Chapter 69 is again narrated by Agni, chapter 70 by Bhagavat. The chap- 
ters 71-106 are narrated by Iévara, i.e., Siva, and the chapters immediately 
following this section are again recounted by Agni. ‘The later chapters are not 
of interest here. 

Let us start with the facts we already know. We know that AP 72-90 and 
92-103 have parallels in the SP a Saiva text. This fits very well with the fact 
that the narrator of these chapters is Siva. 

The next piece of evidence we have are the parallels that HAZRA found to 
the Hayasirsapañcarätra in AP 39-70. The larger part of this section of the AP is 
ascribed to Hayagriva/Bhagavat. This would also fit very well. Let us examine 
how closely this section of the AP is really related to the Hayastrsapañcarätra. 


SECOND CRITERION: PARALLEL PASSAGES: 
THE HAYASIRSAPANCARATRA 


To date, the Hayasirsapañcarätra has been little studied by scholars. The text 
seems to have originated in North India, but its dates are uncertain.!? It consists 
of four sections (kända), of which only the first, the Zd/kända, has been edited 
and published. It derives its name from the fact that according to its frame- 
story (4dikända 1) it was revealed by God in the form of Hayaëiras, the Horse- 
Headed One. At the beginning of each chapter of this text, the narrator is 
identified as Bhagavat, just as in some chapters of the section AP 39-70. 

If we compare the chapters AP 39. with the 4dkända of the H, we 


indeed find parallels between them, in part verbatim, in part with regard to 


IAP: 38.51cd: hayagrivah pratisthädyam devänäm brahmane ‘hravit. Some manuscripts 
used for AP: and the edition AP2 (here 38.50cd) read hayañrsah instead of hayagrivah. 

LC. Smrrn 1978:166: “(.) there are many clues in it which suggest an early date; yet 
other details indicate that, albeit written early, it passed through the hands of late redactors.” 
Cf. also SmirH 1975:549f. 

BCf. Smrrx 1975:537. I would like to thank Dominic GoopaLz for providing me with a 
copy of the edition of the ädikända of the H. 


Marion Rastelli 


the contents: 


191 


AP: H ädikända topic 

39.1-5 2.1-6 list of Päñcarätra Samhitäs 

39.6c-7b | 3.3c-4b places from which a person performing the installation 
should not come 

39.7c-9b | 4.2-6 desired characteristics of an äcärya 

39.9cd 5.10c-11b places suitable for temples of various deities 

39.10c- 5.5c9 places suitable for temples of various deities 

13b 

39.13c- 5.13-14 how to proceed if there is already a temple nearby 

15b 

39.15c-18 | 6.14-23 acquisition of the land (bhämiparigraha), the expelling 
of evil beings, ploughing 

39.19-21 7.2-5b definitions of various units of measurement 

40.2-22b | 8.18-30,9.2-23 | which deities should be placed in which part of the 
västupurusa (pattern of the house personified), what 
should be given to them as the ba/i offering 

40.22c-30 | 10.1-26 offering of arghya (arghyadäna) 

41.1-12 11.1-39 placing of nine bricks and nine pots 

41.13-21b | 12.1-20 placing of à stone and a pot in the centre, placing of 
auspicious items and various deities, “impregnation” (ga- 
rbhädhäna) in the central pot 

41.21c- 12.41c-62 garbhädhäna (continued), construction of the base of the 

37b temple 

42.1-26b | 13.141 characteristics of the temple 

43.1-9b 14.1-15b location of the various deities in different kinds of temple 

43.9c-11 15.1-3 various materials of which an idol can be made, begin- 
ning of the description of a stone-made idol 

43.12ab 15.7cd if mountains cannot be reached a stone can be taken 
from the earth 

43.12c-15 | 15.25-40b characteristics of suitable stones 

43.16-29 16.1-50 acquisition of a stone! 

44.1—49b | 18.1-57 characteristics of an idol, description of a Väsudeva image 

45.1-7b 19.1-7 characteristics of the pedestal (pirdikä) 

45.7c-15b | 20.1-16 image of Laksmi 

45.15c 21.1-6 image of Garuda!” 

46 no parallel in H | various fälagräma stones related to different deities, 
among others, the navamürtis 

47 no parallel in H | worship of the f%/agräma stones 

48 no parallel in H | description the 24 mürtis 


MH ädikända 17 deals with diksänti, ‘fänti-rites required for stones not found in the proper 
places’, i.e., a topic that belongs to the acquisition of stones. 
5H ädikända 22 deals with images of the twelve “regents of the months”, also known as 


192 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 

AP: H ädikända topic 

49.1-9 23.1-38 images of the ten avatäras 

49.10-19b | 24.1-22 images of the nine Vyühas 

49,19c- 25.1-25 images of other deities, among them Aévasiras (= 

28b Hayafïrsan) 

50.1-17 no parallel in H | images of Candiï/Candikä, Saubhägyä, Laksmiï, Saras- 
vati, Yamunä, Tumburu 

50.18-28 27.121 images of various female deities 

50.29-43b | no parallel in H | images of further deities 

51.1-13 26.1-11 images of the planetary deities (gr4ha) 

51.14-16a | 28.1-14 images of the directional deities (/okesa) 

51.16b- no parallel in H | images of further deities 

18b 

52.1-9b no parallel in H | images of the eight yoginis 

52.9c-13 29.1-28 image of Bhairava 

52.14ab no parallel in H | image of Virabhadra 

52.14c- 30.1-12 images of Gauri, Lalitä and Candikä 

17b 

53.1-23b | 31.1-22 characteristics of an idol in the form of à lriga 

54.148 no parallel in H | different varieties of lñgas 

55.1-9b 32.1-12 characteristics of the pedestals of idols 

56.1-2b 33.1-3 five types of installation (pratisthä)\ 

56.2c-32b | 34.141 preparation for the installation (pratisthä), worship of the 
directional deities 

57.1-26 35.145 preparation of pots to be used during the installation 

58.1-34 36.1-67 bathing of and offerings to the idol to be installed 

59.1-58b 37.1-92b preparations for the installation 

60.1-5 38.1-39b + 1- | depositing of jewels (ratnanyäsa) 

19b 

60.6-36b | 39.1-74 installation (pratisthä) 

61.1-2a 40.1-24b bath of the ïidol concluding the installation 
(avabhrthasnäna) 

61.2b 41.1-27b bali offering 

61.2c7b | 42.1-31b installation of the entrance of the temple 

61.7c-16b | 43.1-17b installation of the “heart” of the temple (hrépratisthä) 

61.16c-50 | 44.1-61 installation of the flag 


As the other sections of the H are not yet published and a manuscript of them is 


not available to me at the moment, we can compare the contents of the chapters 
AP 62f. only with the list of chapter titles of the remaining sections of the H 
as given by SMiTH (1975:551f). This comparison shows that the chapters AP 
62-69 have parallels with the samkarsanakända of the H: 


vyñhäntaras. 


16The rest of H ädikända 33 deals with the proper time for the pratistha. 


Marion Rastelli 


Contents of the AP (AP;) 


193 


Chapter titles of the H°s samkarsanakända 


62: installation of Laksmi (= Sri) 

63.1: the installation of Tärksya (= Garuda), 
the Discus (= Sudar$ana), Brahman and 
Nrhari should be done in the same way as 
the installation of Visnu. 

63.2-3: installation of the Discus 


63.4-7b: installation of Nrsimha 
63.7c-9: installation of Trailokyamohana 


63.10a: installation of Vämana 
63.10a: installation of Vaikuntha 
63.10b: 
Hayaëirsan) 
63.10b: installation of Aniruddha 

63.10c: installation of Jalaéayya 

63.10d: installation of the avatäras begin- 
ning with the Fish (matsya) 

63.11a: installation of Samkarsana 


installation of Hayäsya (= 


63.11a: installation of Vi$varüpa 

63.11b: installation of à liga 

63.11b: installation of an idol of Rudra 
(rudramürtika) 

63.11c: installation of Ardhanäriévara 
63.11d: installation of Hari$añkara 

63.11d: installation of the Mothers 

63.12a: installation of Bhairava 

63.12a: installation of Sürya (= Âditya) 
63.12b: installation of the planetary deities 
(graha) 
63.12b: 
Ganapati) 
63.12c: installation of Gauri 


installation of Vinäyaka (- 


63.12c: installation of Indra, etc. (= the di- 
rectional deities) 


1: fristhäpana 
2: vihagendrasthäpana: installation of the 
king of the birds (= Garuda) 


3: cakrapratisthà 

4: visesavidhi: special prescription 

5: caturmukhasthäpana: installation of the 
four-faced one (= Brahman) (cf. AP; 63.1) 
6: nrsimhapratisthà 


7: varähasthäpana: installation of Varäha 

8 purusottamasthäpana: installation of 
Purusottama 

9: vämanasthäpana 

10: vaikunthasthäpana 

11: hayasrrsapratisthà 


12: aniruddhapratisthä 

13: jalasayanapratisthä 

14: dasävatärapratisthä: installation of the 
ten avataras 

15:  anantapratisthä: 
Ananta!7 

16: vifvarñpapratisthà 
17: liñgapratisthä 

18: rudramürtipratisthà 


installation of 


19: ardhanärifvarapratisthà 
20: harisañkarapratisthà 
21: mätinäm sthäpana 

22: bhairavasthäpana 

23: ädityapratisthä 

cf. 26 


cf 25 


24: gauristhäpana 

25: ganapatisthäpana: (cf. AP: 63.12b) 

26:  navagrahalokapälasthäpana:  installa- 
tion of the nine planetary deities (cf. AP: 
63.12b) and the directional deities 


VI is possible that Samkarsana is identical to Ananta. Samkarsana has been identified with 


194 


Contents of the AP (AP;) 


Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Chapter titles of the H°s samkarsanakända 


63.12c: installation of an “idol” that has the 
form of writing (?/epyd; v.l. AP2 63.9a) 
63.12d: installation of an idol that has the 
form of a painting (citrajà) 

63.12d: installation of moveable and im- 
moveable idols!$ 


cf. 63.12d 
cf. 63.12d 
cf. 63.12c 
cf. 63.12d 
63.13-26b: 


(vidyä)° 
64: installation of wells, tanks and ponds 


installation of knowledge 


65: installation of a hall (s4bh4) 

66: installation of the totality of deities (cf. 
AP; 66.1a: samudäyapratisthä) 

67: removal of an idol that is old and used 
(jérnoddhära) 


68: temple festival (wésava) 


69: bath of the idol concluding the temple 
festival (cf. AP: 69.23a: yajñävabhrtasnäna) 
69.23c: (mention of) the marriage of Gauri 
69.23c: 
Laksmi 


(mention of) the marriage of 


cf. 29 
cf. 30 
cf. 27 and 28 


27: acalapratimäpratisthä: installation of 
immoveable idols 

28: calaliñgapratisthä: installation of move- 
able rigas 

29: lekhärcäpratisthä: installation of an idol 
in the form of writing 

30: citrapratisthäpatala: chapter [dealing 
with] the installation of paintings 

31: vidyäpratisthä: installation of knowl- 
edge 

32: väpiküpatadägapratisthä: installation of 
wells, tanks and ponds 

33: sabhäpratisthä: installation of à hall 

34: samudäyapratisthä: installation of the 
totality [of deities] 

35: jtrnoddhäravidhi: prescription for the 
removal of an [idol] that is old and used 
36: utsavapatala: chapter [dealing with] the 
temple festival 

37: yajñävabhrthasnänavidhi: prescription 
for the bath concluding the sacrifice (?) 

cf. 39 

cf. 38 


38: srivivähavidhi: prescription for the mar- 
riage of Sri (cf. AP: 69.23c) 

39: gaurivivähavidhi: prescription for the 
marriage of Gauri (cf. AP 69.23c)?° 


AP 70, dealing with the installation of trees (p4dapapratisthä), has no parallels 
with the H, as far as can be judged by Smrrx's list. According to BRUNNER 


the snake-incarnation Samkarsana/Balaräma (cf. HärreL 1987:582-584) and is called Sesa in 
Mahäbhärata 12.326.35, which is à name of the snake-king, just as Ananta is. 
18Both AP 63.12d and AP 63.9b read baläbalam, which should probably be emended to 


caläcalam. 


For this rite cf. PausS 41.77-97 and TAK II s.v. jänapraistha. 
20This is the last chapter of the sakarsanakända. 


Marion Rastelli 195 


(SP4:414),this chapter is adopted from Matsyapuräna 59. Although there are 
only a few verses in AP 70 and MP 59 that are actually verbatim,”* BRUNNER 
may be right. However, it is also possible that the Marsyapuräna is not the AP*%s 
source, but that both of these Puränas had another (common?) source. 

The two tables above show that the text of the AP is generally shorter than 
that of the H. Although SMirH does not give the length of the chapters of 
the H°s samkarsanakända, we see in the second table that some topics that are 
described in separate chapters in the H are only mentioned in the AP Thus 
we get the impression that the chapters of the AP are an abbreviated version of 
those in the H, just as BRUNNER observed for the chapters of the AP that are 
parallel passages of the SP (SP4, p. lix). However, further research, especially 
a detailed comparison of the texts of these two sources, is necessary in order 
to accurately ascertain whether the AP chapters under consideration are really 
an abbreviation of the two kändas of the H or whether, vice versa, the H is an 
elaboration of an originally shorter version. 


FIRST CRITERION: THE NARRATORS OF AGNIPURANA 39-70 


Let us reconsider the narrators of the passage just described. The narrator of 
AP 39-68 and 70 is either Hayagriva or Bhagavat; the narrator of AP 69 is 
Agni. When we look at the parallel passages of this section, we see that the 
chapters AP 39-69 have parallels with the H, in which Hayaëiras (= Hayagriva), 
who is called Bhagavat at the beginnings of the chapters, is also the narrator. 
However, AP 70 seems to have no parallel with the H. This shows us that, at 
least in this section, the specification of the narrator is not a reliable criterion 
for the identification of the source. The parallel passages found in the H should 
probably be considered to be stronger evidence than the specification of their 
narrators. [n regard to AP 70, however, another possibility should also not be 
forgotten: it may have been part of an earlier version of the H. 


2 Matsyapuräna 59 is almost identical with Padmapuräna V.24.192-211. According to 
HazrA (1975:109-112), there are several chapters that appear in both the Matsyapuräna and 
the Padmapuräna. The latter borrowed from the former. 

2AP; 70.1c-2 & MP 59.5-6b, PP V.24.194-195b; AP; 70.4cd & MP 59.12cd, PP 
V.24.202ab; AP: 70.6cd = MP 59.14ef & PP V.24.205ab; AP 70.7c = MP 59.16c & PP 
V.24.207c. 

23Sce, e.g., the chapters H szmkarsanakända 9-30 and 38-39 in the table. 


196 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


CONTENTS AND STRUCTURE OF AGNIPURANA 21—38 


Let us now look at the remaining part of the AP section under consideration, 
AP 21-38. What are the contents of this section? AP 21, called sämänyapüjä- 
kathanam (in AP2), describes the ritual worship of Visnu, Siva, Sürya, again 
Visnu, Sarasvati, and their retinue. This ritual’s description is very general. The 
chapters AP 22-24 give prescriptions for the daily ritual from the bath (s74na) 
up to the fire-ritual (agrikärya).* AP 25 gives the mantras of the nine Vyühas 
and their retinue and describes the worship of various deities and entities (cf. 
pp.203f.). AP 26 describes the mudräs of the nine Vyühas and the arigas. AP 
27 and 28 contain the prescriptions for the initiation (4;ksä) and the conse- 
cration (abhiseka). AP 29-30 describe the preparation of mandalas and the 
worship of various entities and deities on them. AP 31 gives prescriptions for 
rites for protection, removal of miseries and attainment of happiness. AP 32 
enumerates samskäras and other rites known from the Vedic orthodox tradi- 
tion. AP 33-37 give prescriptions for the paviträropana ritual (“investiture of 
the sacred thread”). And AP 38 describes the benefits of constructing a temple. 

With regard to their contents, the chapters of this section are systemati- 
cally and logically arranged. Furthermore, especially with AP 38, which in- 
troduces the topic of temples, they can be seen as structurally forming an in- 
tegrated whole with the second part, in which one finds parallel passages to 
the Hayastrsapañcarätra and which is mainly devoted to temple construction 
and the installation of temples and images. Thus, from the point of view of 
structure, it is possible that the entire section AP 21-70 derives from a single 
Samhitä.? However, this integrated structure could also be the work of the 
redactor of the Agripuräna. Thus we cannot conclude anything definitive from 
the structure of this section. 


SECOND CRITERION: PARALLEL PASSAGES OF AP 21-38 


In the section AP 21-38, parallel passages with other texts can also be identified. 
The following table gives the identified parallel passages that either agree nearly 


The last part of AP 24 (AP; 24.42f7)) is a description of the initiation (4;ksä); for this, see 
below, pp. 218f. 
2% Agreements and disagreements in the contents’ details will be treated below; see pp. 200f. 


Marion Rastelli 


197 


literally (©) or that are parallels with regard to their contents (:).2 


AP: Parallel passages Content 

23.2c-5b Æ  Närs 2.34c-37b mental purification of the body 

23.6-8b :  NarsS 2.44-46b imposition of mantras 

23.8c-9 NärS 2.54-56 worship of Visnu/Acyuta; 
preparation of implements of worship 

23.11 Æ  NärS 2.49-50b description of the yogapitha 

24.1c-10b #  NärS 7.30c-41b preparation of the fire-pit 

24.10c-12b :  NärS 27.6-8 description of sruc and sruva 

24.14cd &  NärsS 27.15cd U 

24.15cd :  NärS 27.8ab ? 

24.16-18b #Æ  NaärS 27.17-19b É 

25.4c-5b Æ  GarP 1.11.37 colours of the nine Vyühas 

26.1c-7 Æ  GarP 1.11.27c-34b mudräs of the nine Vyühas 

27.1cd &  NaärS 7.15cd initiation (d;ksa) 

27.2-6b &  NarSs 7.18-21 

27.6c-7 :  NärS 7.22-25b 

27.8ab Æ  Närs 7.25cd 

27.8cd :  NarS 7.26 

27.9ab Nars 7.27-28 

27.9cd :  NärS 7.78cd 

27.10ab Æ  Närs 7.79cd 

27.10c-12 &  NärS 7.81-83b 

27.13-17 :  NarS 7.83c—92 

27.18-22 &  NarsS 7.93-97 

27.34ab :  NärS 7.98c-99b 

27.34cd :  NärS 7.102c-105 

27.35ab :  NärS 9.2-4b 

27.35d-37 %  NärS 9.5b-7b 

27.38c—43b #  NarS 9.7c-12b 

27.45-47 &  Närs 9.12c-15b 

29.2ab :  NärS 8.7ab preparation of mandalas 

29.3 :  NärS 8.10-11b 

29.4-11 &  NärS 8.11c-19b 

29.12c-18 &  NärS 8.21-27b 

29.19-20b :  NarS 8.28-31 

29.20c21b #  NärsS 8.32 

29.21c-22 &  NärsS 8.33c-34 


26 Here, of course, not all passages that are parallel with regard to the contents are listed (they 


can be found in great numbers), but only passages that literally agree at least in a few words, 
or that are found close to passages from the same source that do agree literally. The table is not 


exhaustive. There are also passages in AP 24 and 27 that are parallel to VisnuS 10, but with 


regard to their contents rather than literally. These are treated separately; cf. below pp. 221f. 


198 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


29.23cd :  NarS 8.35-38b 

29.24-25b Æ  NärS 8.38c-39 

29.25cd :  NärS 8.40ab 

29.26cd &  NärS 8.40cd 

30.12c-13b Æ  NärS 8.47 colours of the mandala 
30.13cd :  NärsS 8.48 

30.14ab :  NärS 8.49-50b 

30.14c-15b #  NärS 8.50c-51b 

30.15c-16b :  NärS 8.51c—52b 

30.18c—19 :  NärS 8.59-60b 

30.26 &  SärK 1.8 mantra visualisation 
30.29c-32b : JS 12.38-41b (cf. pp. 208f) mantra visualisation 
31.2-46 &  VDh28.15-61 rites for protection, etc. 
32.1ab :  GautDhSü 1.8.8 samskäras and other rites 
32.2a-3b :  GautDhSü 1.8.14 

32.3cd :  GautDhSü 1.8.15 

32.4b-5b :  GautDhSü 1.8.19 

32.5c-6c :  GautDhSü 1.8.20 

32.6d-7 :  GautDhSü 1.8.21 

32.9d-11la :  GautDhSü 1.8.23-24?7 

38.33cd :  VDh 80.20, PrA 35.4c-5b benefits of constructing a temple 
38.37-—44 VDh 80.29-36, PrA 35.15-22 


à à 


38.45-50b VDh 80.17-24b, PrA 35.1c-8 


THE NARADIYASAMHITA 


The table shows that the chapters AP 23-30 include several passages that can 
also be found, nearly verbatim, in the Méradiyasamhitä. In addition to this, 
there are two other arguments, albeit less significant, that could be offered for 
the assumption that the NärsS is the source of these chapters. First, the AP 
names Närada as the narrator of chapters 21-30. Närada is also the narrator of 
the Närs; it derives its name from this fact. However, we must not forget that 
Närada is a prominent 75; and appears very often in the Samhitäs.?* This means 
that naming Närada as the narrator does not necessarily indicate that a text 
assigned to him comes from the När$. Second, the structure of the contents of 
the Närs bears some similarities with that of AP 22-30. Cf. the following table: 


27 Another parallel passage of AP; 32.1-11b can be found in the AP itself, namely, AP: 
166.9c-17b. 
28As an interlocutor, Närada appears, e.g., in the JS, the SS, and the Ahirs. 


Marion Rastelli 199 


AP NarS Content 
22-24 2 daily worship 
25 3-5 mantras 
26 6 mudras 
27 7 initiation (d;ksä) 
29-30 8 mandalas 
9 initiation (4;ksä) (continued) 
28 10 consecration (zbhiseka) 


Apart from the sections dealing with mandalas, the structure of the contents is 
the same in both the AP and the När$. Again however, this structure is not an 
unusual one. Thus this is also not a clear indication that the NärS*%s structure 
influenced the section of the AP under consideration. Thus the only strong 
argument for the Närs as a source of AP 22-30 are the parallel passages that 
are almost literally the same. However, we will see below (pp.227f.) that the 
Näïs in the form we know it cannot be the source, since there are some vital 
differences between this section of the AP and the Nars. 


VISNUDHARMA, PRAKIRNADHIKARA, GARUDAPURANA, GAUTAMADHARMASÜTRA 


AP 31 and 38 include passages that are parallel to the Viszwdharma. The 
Visnudharma is a work that was compiled from earlier texts. As is gener- 
ally the case for compilations, its date is uncertain, but it is probably quite 
early. Its earliest datable manuscripts are from the eleventh century from Nepal 
(GRÜNENDAHL 1983:IX, 10f. and 14f.). The Visrudharma was used as a source 
for several Puränas, among them the Agreya- or Vahnipuräna (ibid. 67f.), which 
is earlier than the AP? The Visnudharma was originally a work by Bhäga- 
vatas and was later appropriated and modified by Päñcarätrins (GRÜNENDAHL 
1989:49-57). 

From these two facts, its being a popular source for Puränas in general on 
one hand and having been incorporated into and thus being part of the Pañ- 
carätra tradition on the other, it is highly probable that for AP 31 and 38 either 
the Wisnudharma was used as a direct source or that these chapters were bor- 
rowed from a Päñcarätra text that was based on the Visnwdharma. The passage 
that is parallel between AP 31 and Wisnudharma 28 can also be found in the 
Prakirnädhikära, à text of the Vaikhänasa tradition. The Prakirnädhikära is à 
relatively recent text. According to CoLas (1996:69f. and 94), the “medieval 
corpus” of the Vaikhänasas probably arose between the ninth and thirteenth 


For the Agneya- or Vahnipuräna cf. Hazra 1953/1954. 


200 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


centuries. Among the texts of this corpus, the PrA ranks among the later ones. 
Thus we can exclude the possibility that the PrA was a source of the AP. 

In AP 25 and 26, there are a few verses parallel to passages in GarP 1.11. 
Apart from these, there are a number of other similarities between the AP sec- 
tion under consideration and the GarP (cf. notes 35, 42, 67 and 69). How- 
ever, according to Hazra (1975:144), the GarP was modelled on the AP and 
thus it is probable that the GarP is not a source of the AP, but vice versa. 

The Gautamadharmasütra, of which we find parallel passages in AP 32, is 
the Dharmasütra of the Sämaveda. t is certainly older than the AP It is not 
necessarily the immediate source of the AP, but these parallels show that an 
influence from Vedic orthodoxy was effective here. 


THIRD CRITERION: THE CONTENTS 


Let us now look at the contents of AP 21-70. Are the contents of these chapters 
consistent or not? Can we conclude the origin of these chapters from their 
contents? We shall first look at teachings that appear in a similar form at several 
points of the text. This may indicate that the sections in which they appear also 
originally belonged together. Then we shall investigate the teachings and rites 
that are found in different forms in this text. They may point to different origins 
of these sections. Whenever suitable, I will also present teachings from the AP 
section under consideration that are unique in that sense that they have not yet 
been found in other sources, since they expand our knowledge of Päñcarätra 
doctrines in particular. 


WoRSHIP OF A SINGLE OR NINE MANIFESTATIONS OF GOD 


A characteristic feature of the ritual that is found in several chapters is the 
choice of worshipping a single or nine manifestations (navamuürti, navavyüha) 
of Visnu. The nine manifestations are Väsudeva, Samkarsana, Pradyumna, 
Aniruddha, Näräyana, Brahman, Visnu, Narasimha, and Varäha. These al- 
ternatives are explicitly mentioned in the context of the daily ritual®° and of 
the initiation (dksa).*' In addition, the mantras and colours of the nine martis 


30C£ AP; 23.20cd: “[Thus] the worship of a single manifestation was taught; [now] hear 
the worship of the nine Vyühas.” (ekamürtyarcanam proktam navavyäühärcanam $rnu). 

31C£ AP; 27.58: “[Thus] the performance of the initiation for a single manifestation was 
briefly taught. The course of procedure for nine Vyühas, etc., is known in exactly the same 


Marion Rastelli 201 


are described in AP; 25.1-5b. Their mudras are given in AP; 26.3c-6a.*° 

Probably considered as part of the nine mürtis, the mantras of the first five 
mürtis, i.e., Vasudeva through Näräyana, are often used in the ritual.° 

Images of the nine mürtis are described in AP; 49.10-19b, which is parallel 
to H ädikända 24. AP; 46, of which parallel passages cannot be found in the 
H, describes various fälagräma stones related to different deities and the first 
nine deities mentioned are the nine mürtis. However, it is not clear if they are 
considered a group here, because they are not differentiated from the several 
other deities listed. 

The ritual worship of the nine mwrtis or Vyühas is also described in 
other texts. Such descriptions can be found in PausS 10.3-33 and 33.4-13, 
Visnurahasya 3,3 AP 201, and Garudapuräna 1.11-12.% In PädS kriyäpäda 
18.62d-63, ParS 15.697c—698 and 17.96c—99 as well as SripréS 23.225 this 
worship is only mentioned; the PädS and the Par list Hayagriva instead of 
Brahman as one of the nine.% In PadS jñanapäda 1.81cd, caryäpäda 21.66, and 
BRT 22.90-91b, the worship of the nine is mentioned (also listing Hayagriva 
instead of Brahman) as being a characteristic feature of the Tantrasiddhänta, 


manner” (ekamürtäv ayam prokto diksäyogah samaäsatah | evam eva prayogas tu navavyñhädike 
smrtah). 

321f one looks at only this AP passage, it is not clear that this is a description of the mudräs 
of the nine mürtis: beginning with AP; 26.3c, eight mudräs are described without mention of 
their names. AP; 26.5b-6a then names the final mudrä being described as the verähamudrä. 
However, the parallel passage in GarP 1.11.27c-34b, which is nearly verbatim, removes any 
doubt that the #udräs of the nine mürtis are being described here. 

33See AP1 27.4c—5 (sprinkling of the five products of the cow [paricagavya] over the earth), 
27.11-13 (preparation of an oblation of boiled rice or barley [caru]), 34.9c-10b (reciting of 
these mantras over the five products of the cow). In AP; 35.3c—4, the four mantras from 
Samkarsana to Näräyana are used for the preparation of ritual implements. 

The Vispurahasya is a Päñcarätra text of which Nepalese manuscripts are extant, one of 
which is dated AD 1195 (GRÜNENDAHL 1989:54f). According to GRÜNENDAHL (ibid.), the 
text quoted in Hemädris Caturvargacintämani (CVC), vol. 2, fasc. 9, pp.1125-1131 and 
ascribed to the Vissudharmottara is the entire chapter 3 of the Wisnwrahasya. Here, the wor- 
ship of the nine Vyühas is described (see especially p. 1127,14-1128,2 for their positions on a 
mandala \although the text seems to be corrupt] as well as 1128,4-5 and 1130,17 for the term 
navavyäha). 

3These two chapters of the GarP have many similarities to AP1 23, 25 (the mantras of the 
nine Vyühas) and 26 and even two verbatim parallel passages; cf. p.197 and n. 32. 

36The Prakirnädhikära also mentions the worship of nine märtis, but here they bear the 
names Visnu, Purusa, Satya, Acyuta, Aviruddha, Nara, Näräyana, Varäha, and Narasimha 


(13.1-2b). 


202 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


one of four Siddhäntas into which the Päñcarätra tradition is divided.*” 
SMITH (1975:549f) thinks that the inclusion of the teaching of nine 
Vyühas indicates a “fairly early” date for such texts. He does not provide a 
reason for this assumption, but it is possible that he is right. The passages 
that give detailed descriptions of rituals for the nine märtis in the Pauss, the 
Visnurahasya, the Agnipuräna, and the Garudapuräna probably date to an ear- 
lier period than those passages that only mention these rituals, thus indicating 
that the nine mürtis were more important in earlier periods than in later. These 
later texts, the PadS, PärS, Sripré, and BhT, give the impression that their au- 
thors knew of these rituals, but did not attach sufficient importance to them 
to give detailed prescriptions for them. However, we must also be aware that 
the given list of references is certainly not exhaustive, and that perhaps detailed 
descriptions of rituals of the nine mwrtis in more recent texts do exist. 


OTHER DEITIES 


In the AP section under consideration, other individual deities or groups of 
deities are also mentioned, but not all are so characteristic as to clearly identify 
the origin of the passages describing them. Two groups of this type are the 24 
mürtis® and the twelve regents of the months (masädhipa).*” Especially the 
latter, also known as Vyühäntaras in the Päñcarätra tradition, are very com- 
mon in the texts of the Päñcaratra as well as of other traditions.“ Thus they 
do not indicate a specific origin of the passages that describe them. The in- 
dividual deities that are mentioned in the AP section under consideration are 


37 For the four Siddhäntas cf. RasreLLi 2006:185#. The concept of the four Siddhäntas arose 
probably later than the source text of this AP section. Thus it is improbable that its author 
considered himself as belonging to the Tantrasiddhänta. But perhaps his text was considered 
as belonging to it in later times. 

8These martis are Kesava, Naäräyana, Mädhava, Govinda, Visnu, Madhusüdana, 
Trivikrama, Vämana, Sridhara, Hrsïkeéa, Padmanäbha, Dämodara, Väsudeva, Samkarsana, 
Pradyumna, Aniruddha, Purusottama, Adhoksaja, Nrsimha, Acyuta, Upendra, Janärdana, 
Hari, and Krsna. They are described in AP; 48. In the Päñcarätra Samhitäs that are known to 
us, they are described in PädS jiänapäda 2.21-8, in the SriprsS (e.g. 9.64c—72, 23.281c-293), 
and in BBS 1.13.110c-119 (Both the Sripr$S and the BBS are partly based on the PadS; for 
this and for further information about the 24 martis, cf. RAsTELLI 2006:349f)). 

These are Visnu, Madhubhara, Trivikrama, Vämana, Sridhara, Hrsïkeéa, Padmanäbha, Dà- 
modara, Ke$ava, Näräyana, Mädhava, and Govinda. They appear in the list of the one to 
twenty-six vyähas (cf. p.203), being themselves the group of twelve vyähas (AP: 25.38-39) 
and in AP; 59.33c-36 & H ädikända 37.52c-55b. 

40C£. RasTeLLI 2006:348-55. 


Marion Rastelli 203 


numerous, and an examination of each of them would go beyond the scope of 
this paper. Nevertheless, one individual deity should be considered, namely, 
Krsna or Govinda. If we disregard its affiliation to the two groups just men- 
tioned, Krsna or Govinda appears only in the section that is ascribed to Agni 
(AP 31-8), and most of the passages in which these names are mentioned have 
parallel passages in the Visnudharma. This means that Krsna/Govinda does 
not play any role in the other parts of the AP section under consideration, but 
is a characteristic feature of the sources used for the section ascribed to Agni.*? 


THE ONE To IWENTY-SIX VYÜHAS 


Another characteristic feature of the first part of the AP section under consid- 
eration is the doctrine of the one to twenty-six entities that are called vyähas 
in this context. These entities are listed in AP, 25.18c—45, which describes the 
imposition of them on the worshipper’s body, and in AP; 30.1-11, which gives 
their imposition on a mandala. The vyñhas given there are as follows: 1: prakrti; 
2: purusa, prakrti; 3: fire (agni, vahni), wind (väyu, anila), sun (arka, äditya); 
4: Reveda, Yajurveda, Sämaveda, Atharvaveda;®® 5: the five elements: ether 
(äkäsa), wind (väyu), fire (jyotis, tejas), water (jala), earth (préhliui); 6: mind 
(manas) and the five organs of perception: ears (srotra), skin (rvac), eyes (dr$, 
caksus), tongue (jihvä, rasanä), nose (ghräna); 7: the seven worlds: bhärloka, 
bhuvarloka, svarloka, mabharloka, janarloka, taparloka, satyaloka:** the seven 
sacrifices: agnistoma, atyagnistoma, ukth(y)a, sodast, väjapeyaka, atirätra, apto- 
ryäma;® 8: intellect (dhi, buddhi), egoism (aham, ahamkara), mind (manas), 


“Krsna is mentioned in AP; 31.10b (& VDh 28.23b), 36.6a, 38.2c, 20a, 22a, 42d (& 
VDkh 80.34d), 43c (& VDh 80.35c); Govinda in AP; 31.19c (& VDh 28.32c), 26a (& VDh 
28.39a), 45c (& VDh 28.592), 38.40c (& VDh 80.320). 

“Another piece of evidence for the fact that Krsna/Govinda is a characteristic feature of this 
section could be GarP 1.28, which describes a throne and a retinue similar to those described 
in AP; 33. The throne and retinue in GarP 1.28 are meant for Gopäla (=Krsna/Govinda). 

#31n AP; 25.22, only Reveda, Yajurveda and Atharvaveda are mentioned, but a line is perhaps 
missing here; cf.: “He is to impose the Reveda extending over the [whole] hand, the Yajur/veda] 
on the fingers, the one having the form of the Afharvaveda on both palms, [the Sämaveda] on 
the head, the heart, and finally on the feet.” (AP: 25.22: revedam vyäpakam haste añgulisu yajur 
nyaset | taladvaye ‘tharvarüpam $irohrecaranäntagam). 1n any case, the number of items that is 
required here is four. In AP; 30.2d and 3c, all four Vedas are mentioned. 

#4 syarloka is not mentioned in AP: 30.4d-5a. The text is probably corrupt here. 

Satyagnistoma is missing in AP1 25.28c-29b. For these seven sacrifices, cf. GautDhSü 
1.8.21; they are also listed in AP; 32.6d-7 and 166.15b-16a. 


204 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


sound ($zbda), touch (sparsa), visibility (räpa), taste (rasa), scent (gandha); 9: 
the individual soul (j7v4) and the eight just mentioned; 10: the ten directional 
deities (/okapälas): Indra, Vahni, etc.;*” 11: mind (manas), the five organs of 
perception (see s.v. 6) and the five organs of action: speech (v4c), hands (päni), 
feet (añghri, päda), the anus (päyu), the penis (#pastha); 12: the twelve regents 
ofthe months (m4sädhipa): Visnu, Madhuhara, Trivikrama, Vämana, Sridhara, 
Hisikesa, Padmanäbha, Dimodara, Ke$ava, Näräyana, Mädhava, Govinda; 25: 
purusa, intellect (dh?), egoism (vhamkära), manas, citta, the five subtle sensory 
media fabda, etc., the five organs of perception, the five organs of action, the 
five elements;*® 26: para purusal purusottama and the 25 sattvas just mentioned. 

The meaning of the doctrine of the one to twenty-six vyähas seems to be as 
follows: The totality of all vyhas comprises the entire universe. They include all 
entities that together constitute the world: the sarrvas, the natural powers, the 
seven worlds, the Vedas and the Vedic sacrifices, and the deities who reign space 
(the /okapälas) and time (the mäsädhipas), given in lists of entities in ascending 
numbers. They do not include the Supreme God Väsudeva or his form as nine 
mürtis, but with all probability the one to twenty-six vyähas are considered to be 
manifestations of the Supreme God, since according to the Paäñcarätra the world 
and all its constituents are manifestations of God (cf. RAsTELLI 1999:98f.). By 
means of the ritual imposition on the body and the mandala, the entire universe 
and thus the various forms of God’s appearance can be made present. To date, I 
could not find any other texts that describe this doctrine of the various numbers 
of vyähas or one that is similar. Thus the origin of the passage that describes 
this doctrine remains unclear. However, precisely because it has not yet been 
found in another text, it is a stroke of luck that it is conserved in the AP as 
otherwise we would not know that this doctrine is also a part of the Päñcarätra 
tradition. 


SERIES OF TATTVAS 


In connection with our examination of the constituents of the world as well as 
of a doctrine that has not yet been found in other sources, I would like to look 


#6Both AP; 25.31c—32a and 30.7cd are corrupt, but the nine vyähas are most probably 
these. 

47]n AP; 25.33c-34, only Indra and Vahni are mentioned, in AP: 30.3a, only Indra, etc. 
In AP; 25, a few lines are probably missing. 

8 This series differs from the classical series of the Sämkhyas. Here, in the AP citta instead 
of prakrti appears. 


Marion Rastelli 205 


at another conception of the series of the saftvas that is found in the AP section 
under consideration. In AP 27, the series of #attvas, apart from purusa, con- 
sists of the primary matter (prakrti), the subtle body (/riga), egoism (ahamkrti, 
ahamkartr), intellect (buddhi, jnäna), mind (manas), the five subtle elements 
(canmätras), the five organs of perception (bwddhyäkhya), the five organs of ac- 
tion (kzrmäkhya), and the five elements (bhäta).“ The first unusual feature is 
the order of those sattvas that constitute the mental aspects of a being. Their 
usual order is buddhi, ahamkära, manas (see e.g. AP; 25.29c and 41cd or PadS 
caryäpäda 3.44c-45b). The second, more striking feature is that the subtle body 
(liñga) is counted as one of the sattvas. According to Sämkhyas, the subtle body 
consists of the bwddhi, the ahamkära, the manas, the five organs of perception, 
the five organs of action and the five sanmätras (FRAUWALLNER 1992:102), i.e., 
it consists of sattvas, but is usually not considered to be one of them. The subtle 
body is also mentioned in AP; 24.43cd and 48a, but here it is not clear if it is 
also considered to be a separate #attva. 


THE VISUALISATION OF THE MANTRA 


At the end of the section ascribed to Närada, immediately after the prescrip- 
tions related to mandalas, a meditation practice called the “visualisation of the 
mantra (mantradhyäna) is described. This description starts with three forms 
of the mantra: “T will explain the visualisation of the mantra by which a mantra- 
born fruit arises. The form consisting of sound [and] the exterior body is re- 
garded as the coarse [mantra]. (25) The form consisting of light, being in the 
heart [and] consisting of thought is the subtle [wmantra]. That which is devoid 
of thought, however, is proclaimed as the supreme [mantra]. (26) The form 
of the boar (varäha), the lion (simha) and the Saktis is principally coarse. The 
form devoid of thought is taught as [being that] of Väsudeva. (27) For the oth- 
ers, the form being in the heart [and] consisting of thought is always taught. 
The coarse one is said to be the one belonging to Brahman (vairäja), the subtle 
one is the marked one (/ñgita). (28) The form devoid of thought is declared 
to be the one belonging to the Lord (aisvara) °° 


#AP2 27.29 (prakrtir liñgasaktis ca kartä must be emended to prakrtir liñgadeho ‘hamkartä) 
and 54-55b (in 54b the v.l. kzrmäkhyäni is to be read). 

S0AP;, 30.25-29b: mantradhyanam pravaksyämi yena syän mantrajam phalam | sthülam 
fabdamayam rüpam vigraham bähyam isyate 25| süksmam jyotirmayam rüpam härdam 
cintämayam bhavet | cintayä rahitam yat tu tat param parikïrtitam 26 | varähasimhasaktinäm 
sthälam rüpam pradhänatah | cintayà rahitam rûpam väsudevasya kirtitam 27 | itaresäm smrtam 


206 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Let us consider the characteristic features of the three forms of the mantra 


systematically: 
form coarse (sthüla) subtle (sksma) supreme (para) 
quality sound ($zbda) light (jyotir), thought | devoid of thought 
(cintä) 
place of manifestation | exterior body in the heart 
form of manifestation | Varäha, Simha, $aktis | others (?) Väsudeva 
? vairäja linñgita aisvara 


The coarse form of the mantra consists of sound, the subtle form, of light and 
thought, and the supreme form is devoid of thought. Apart from the subtle 
forms quality of light, this concept can also be found in $aiva sources, namely, 
in the Sérdhatrisatikälottara and in the Sivapuräna.5\ 

The term jyotirmaya, used for the characterisation of the subtle form, can 
be found in a description of the coarse, the subtle and the supreme mantra in 
JS 12.23c-28b, a passage that has some other parallels with the mantradhyäna 
passage of the AP as well.*? However, in this case the attribute jyotirmaya is as- 


räpam härdam cintämayam sadà | sthülam vairäjam äkhyätam sûksmam vai liñgitam bhavet 28 | 
cintayà rahitam rüpam aïsvaram parikirtitam. 

5IThe description of the SärK is identical in part to AP 30.26, cf. SärK 1.8: “The coarse 
one is called sound, the subtle one consists of thought. That which is devoid of thought, 
however, is proclaimed as the supreme one.” (sthülam Sabda iti proktam süksmam cintämayam 
bhavet | cintayä rahitam yat tu tat param parikirtitam). For the $ivaP cf. 7.1.29.4-5b: “Wise 
men explain the expansion of sound as three-fold, [namely,] coarse, subtle and supreme. The 
coarse [expansion of sound] is in the range of the fruri (1.e., the Veda), the subtle one is taught 
as consisting of thought, the supreme one is devoid of thought.” (fbdätmikä vibhütir yä sà 
tridhä kathyate budhaih | sthülä säksmä parà ceti sthülä y $rutigocarà | sûksmä cintämayi proktà 
cimtayà rahitä parà). 

52C£: “The form consisting of light [and] characterized by delight and bliss is the supreme 
one. (23cd) The subtle one, however, is characterized by the cit-fakti; [it is] a mere mark 
[and it is] illuminating. Then the coarse body is to be visualized according to its various 
forms. (24) The Lord of the primary matter and the purusa has [the size] of a hundredth 
part of the point of a hair. [He is] the enjoyer of the qualities, the support of the qual- 
ities, endowed with qualities, and devoid of qualities. (25) This Lord who consists of all 
deities is called the Lord in the body. As purusa the size of à thumb, he is present in all 
bodies. (26) The All-Pervading One [obtains different forms] by means of different visu- 
alisations, just as a jewel that is endowed with [the colours] blue, yellow, etc., obtains dif- 
ferent colours when [it is] divided. (27) Thus he is Brahman, Rudra, Candra, Sürya, [and] 
Prajäpati” (param jyotirmayam rûpam ählädänandalaksanam 23 | süksmam cicchaktilaksam tu 
liñgamätram prakäsavat | tatah sthülavapur dhyeyo nänärüpavibhägasah 24 | valägrasatabhä- 
gas ca pradhänapurusesvarah| gunabhoktà gunädhäro gunavän nirgunas tathä 25 | dehesvaras 


Marion Rastell 207 


cribed to the supreme form (JS 12.23c & AP; 30.26). Nevertheless, according 
to the JS, light is also a characteristic of the subtle form, which is described here 
as “illuminating” (prakäfavar, 12.24b). The coarse mantra becomes manifest in 
a body, e.g., an anthropomorphic body. The subtle mantra is present in the 
heart of beings, i.e., as personal souls. These ideas can also be found in the JS 
(cf. JS 12.24c-26 [quoted in n. 52], 4.234). In this respect, nothing is said 
about the supreme form. It is probably considered to be beyond perceptible 
forms. 

The outward appearance of the coarse mantra are deities that are manifesta- 
tions of Visnu, but that are subordinate to his manifestation as Visnu/Väsudeva 
himself. This latter manifestation is that of the supreme mantra, but, if we as- 
sume there to be no contradiction in this section, it is not his anthropomorphic 
form that is meant here. The subtle form becomes manifest as “the others” 
(itara), by which personal souls could be meant. 

The meanings of the final attributes ascribed to the three forms are not clear. 
These are “belonging to Brahman” (wviräja), “marked” (/irgita), and “belong- 
ing to the Lord” (avara), “Belonging to Brahman” could mean belonging to 
creation or the created world, as Brahman is usually considered to be the creator 
of the world. irgita is probably related to the term lñgamätra, which is used 
in the description of the subtle form in the JS (12.24b). In the Yoga system, 
liñgamätra denotes the mahattattva (e.g. YSü 2.19, YBh 185,6-8), but in the 
descriptions of the subtle form of the mantra, it seems rather to refer to the 
soul. And the supreme form belongs to the Lord, i.e. Visnu/Väsudeva, which 
corresponds to the other attributes ascribed to this form. 

The AP proceeds with the description how the mantra is to be visualised: 
“He is to visualise the seed-syllable (bja) as having the nature of the personal 
soul (va), which has the shape of à kadamba flower, as the consciousness that 
abides in the heart-lotus, [and] as the imperishable light. The lord ofthe mantra 
stands in the heart, compressed [and] alone, like a lamp in the interior of a pot, 
whose (i.e., the lights) radiation is suppressed. (29c-31b) In the same manner 
[as] rays of light in a pot with many holes spread out [of this pot] in the same 
number [as that of the holes of the pot], the beams of the seed-syllable [spread 


sa vikhyätas sarvadevamayah prabhubh| añgusthamätrah purusas sarvadehesu tisthati 26 | manir 
yathà vibhägena nilapitädibhir yutah| rüpabhedam aväpnoti dhyänabhedaät tathä vibhuh 27 | 
brahmä by ayam tathà rudra$ candrasüryau prajäpatih). Cf. also RasreLLt 1999:105-113. 

3 A mantra has not only a form of sound, but also has a visual form, e.g. an anthropomorphic 


form of a body; cf. RasrELLI 1999:129#. 


208 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


out of the body] by means of the channels of the body (7442). (31c-32b) The 
channels of the body, which have taken possession of the divine body [and] 
which illuminate the entrails (?), rise from the heart to the range of the organs 
of perception.** Two of their channels have the nature of 4gni and soma [and] 
come to an end at the tip of the nose.* (32c-33) 

Having conquered the wind of the body by means of a correct ‘eruption’ 
(udghäta), the mantrin who is intent upon recitation and visualisation [of the 
mantra] obtains a mantra-born fruit. (34) [A person] who has wishes and who, 
having purified the elements and subtle elements [of his body], practises yoga 
obtains [superhuman powers] such as becoming as small as an atom, etc., and 
[a person] who has no wishes, having traversed [this world and] (35) having the 
nature of consciousness (cir), gets rid of the elements and the subtle elements 
as well as of [his] imprisonment by the organs of senses.”°6 

The beginning of this passage is very similar to a passage from the JS, which 
follows the description of the three forms of the mantra, which was quoted 
above: “In the centre of the heart-lotus, there is the imperishable light of con- 
sciousness that has the shape of a kadamba ball, that has all forms, that shines 
like a gem, (38) that is similar to a big jewel-lamp whose spreading is uninter- 
rupted. And its beams come forth through apertures and openings such as the 
ears, etc., (39) O Twice-Born One, just as a multitude of rays comes out of a 
pot full of holes that is furnished with a big lamp, the mantra that is provided 
with a large number of beams spreads out of the body.” Here, we see the same 


SiLiterally: (...) rise from the heart, [reaching then] the range of the organs of perception. 

Here the two nädis called idä and pirgalä are meant. For the concept of nädis in the 
Päñcarätra tradition, cf. RasreLLr 2006:519-532. This sentence in AP; 30.33cd seems super- 
fluous, since with regard to the contents it is not necessary in this context. Either it is a later 
insertion or it is an abbreviation of a longer description of the nädis from the original text. 
In general, the AP section under consideration seems to be an abbreviated version of the texts 
upon which it is based. 

S6AP; 30.29c-36b: hripundarikanilayam caitanyam jyotir avyayam 29 | bijam jivätmakam 
dhyäyet kadambakusumäkrtim | kumbhäntaragato dipo niruddhaprasavo yathä 30 | sambatah ke- 
valas tisthed evam mantresvaro hrdi| anekasusire kumbhe tävanmäträ gabhastayah 31 | prasaranti 
bahis tadvan nädibhir bijarasmayah| anträvabhäsakà daivim ätmikrtya tanum sthitäh 32) 
brdayät prasthitä nädyo darsanendriyagocaräh | dve ‘gnisomätmake täsäm nädyau näsägrasamsthite 
33| samyagudghätayogena jitvä dehasamiranam | japadhyänarato mantri mantrajam phalam 
afnute 34 | samsuddhabhütatanmätrah sakämo yogam abhyasan | animädim aväpnoti viraktah 
pravilañghya ca 35 | cidätmako bhütamäträn mucyate cendriyagrahät. 

S7JS 12.38—41b: hrépundarikamadhyastham caitanyajyotir avyayam | kadambagolakäkäram 
visvarñpam maniprabham 38| ratnadipasamäkäram acchinnaprasaram mabat | $rotrapürvaih 


Marion Rastell 209 


concept of the shining mantra in the heart, whose rays come out of the organs 
of perception, exemplified by just the same simile. 

Next, the practice of yoga is described, whereby three yogz techniques are 
mentioned. The first is breath control (pränäyäma), the “conquering of the 
wind of the body”, the means for which being described as #dghäta. As pre- 
sented by VasuDEvA (2004:409), wdghäta is “the yogic term for the sensation 
of a spontaneous upward surge of vital energy brought on in the early stages of 
self-induced asphyxiation”, and thus wdghäta is usually an effect of successful 
breath control and not the means for it.*® From another point of view, how- 
ever, one can consider the wdghäta, which is induced by breath control, as the 
means for the final effect of breath control, namely, “the conquering of breath”, 
and this is probably the point of the author of this passage. ‘The two other 
yoga techniques are recitation (japa) and the visualisation (dhyäna) of a mantra. 
Both are means for making a mantra present (cf., e.g., RASTELLI 1999:336f. 
and 339f.), and accordingly, the successful yogin, who is described as “possess- 
ing the mantra” (mantrin), achieves à fruit that is effected by the mantra (cf. 
mantra-born [mantraja]). This fruit is, according to the yogin’s desire, either su- 
perhuman powers or the liberation from transmigration, i.e., either enjoyment 
(bhukti, bhoga) or emancipation (mwkti, moksa). 

Concluding, we can state that the passage AP: 30.25-36b bears a strong re- 
semblance to the passages quoted from JS 12. Further, it is directly or indirectly 
influenced by $aiva concepts. 


RETINUES AND THRONES 


Now we come to the concepts and rituals that are described in several places 
of the AP section under consideration, although in different forms. One of 
these concepts is God%s retinue and throne. In ritual worship, God is often 
surrounded by a retinue and situated on a throne, both mentally constructed 
before the actual worship. In the section AP 21-70, retinues and thrones for 
worshipping Visnu””? are described in several contexts. Comparing them (see 
the table on pp.211f) shows that these descriptions differ in several aspects. 
Let us look at the last entries in the table. Two descriptions mention deities 


kharandhraïs ca ra$mayas tasya nirgatäh 39 | chidrapürnäd yathà kumbhän mahädipayutäd dvija | 
yäti bhäsäm gano bähye farträd evam eva hi 40 | mantro ramisamühas tu nädibhih prasared babib. 
58 For a detailed exposition of #dghäta, see VasupEva 2004:402-—409. 
?Thrones of other deities are not considered here. 


210 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


that seem to be placed in the eight regions outside the throne. This is explicitly 
stated in AP, 47.5-6.$ In AP; 21.1c-2c this meaning is not as explicit,$! but 
it seems probable that Dhätr, etc., also have a position similar to door-keepers 
outside the throne here, if on one hand we consider that Visnu’s retinue as 
described in AP; 21.5c-8 seems to be closer to Visnu than Dhätr, etc., and, 
on the other hand, the fact that some of the deities belonging to the group 
Dhätr, etc., function as door-keepers in other Samhitäs.°? 


S0Having shown the three mudräs, he is to worship the Guru outside the circle in the east. 
He is to worship Gana (i.e., Ganeéa) in the west, Dhätr in the north-west, Vidhätr in the south- 
west, Kartr [and] Hartr in the south and in the north. Heis to worship Visvaksena in the north- 
east [and] Ksetrapäla in the south-east.” (krtamudrätrayas cakräd bahih pürve gurum yajet | äpye 
ganam väyave ca dhätäram nairrte yajet 5 | vidhätäram ca kartäram hartäram daksasaumyayoh | 
visvaksenam yajed ï$a ägneye ksetrapälakam 6). 

6l“He is to worship [with the words] ‘salutation to Acyuta and his whole retinue’, ‘[salutation 
to] Dhätr, Vidhätr, Gañgaä, [and] Yamun. In the same manner [he is to worship] the two 
Nidhis, Dväraéri, [and] Västunara.” (samastapariväräya acyutäya namo yajet 1| dhätre vidhätre 
gañgäyai yamunäyai nidhi tathà | dvärasriyam västunaram). 

G2n the JS, e.g., Ksetrapäla, $rï, Canda, Pracanda, Jaya, Vijaya, Gañgä, Yamunä, Sañkhani- 
dhi, and Padmanidhi are the dväradevatäs (13.77c-81). In PärS 11.4-30, they are Västupuru- 
sa/Västvi$a, Ksetranätha/Ksetreéa, Laksmï, Canda, Pracanda, Garuda, Dhätr, and Vidhätr. 


Marion Rastelli 211 
AP: 21.1c-8 AP: 21.20-23b AP: AP: 33.43c-58b AP: 
23.10d- 47.5b- 
17b 7 
deity Acyuta Visau Hari Hari/Acyuta 
retinue | Durgä, Guru, Gana, | Sridhara, Trailokya- Laksmiï, Sarasvati, Priti, 
Ksetra®? mohana, Hisikesa, Kirti  Sänti,  Kaäntikä, 
Visnu Pusti, Tusti (kesara) or(?): 
Mahendrä, etc. (Hari in 
centre) or( ?): Dhrti, Sri, 
Rati, Känti, etc. (Acyuta 
in centre) 
Väsudeva, etc. 
Gañgas | hrdaya, $iras, cüdà | hrd, etc. añgas brd, $iras, $ikhä, kavaca, 
(AP:), varman, netra, [netra], astra 
astra 
Garuda Väsudeva,  Samkarsana, 
(andaja) Pradyumna, Aniruddha 
(cardinal directions); 
Sri, Dhiti, Rati, Kanti 
(intermediate directions) 
weapons | $ñkha, cakra, gadä, | cakra, gadä, $añkha, | cakra, gadä, | $añkha, cakra, gadä, padma 
padma, $rivaisa, kaus- | musala, khadga, | $añkha, (intermediate directions); 
tubha, vanamälà Särñga, päsa, añkusa, | dhanus, Särñga, musala,  khadga, 
$rivatsa, kaustubha, | isudhi, vanamälä (cardinal direc- 
vanamälà khadga, tions) 
carman 
Saktis Sri, Pusti Sri, Mahälaksmi Sri, Pusti 
vanamälà, 
$rivatsa, 
kaustubha 
Garuda, Guru Tärksya, Guru 
lokapä- | Indra, Agni, Yama, | Indra, etc. dikpatis Indra, etc. 
las Raksas, Jala, Väyu, 
Dhaneévara, I$äna 
astra astra 
vähana Airävata, Chäga, Mahisa, 
Vänara,  Jhasa  (AP2 
33.46d), Mrga,  $aéa, 
Visabha, Kürma, Hamsa 
Prénigarbha 
dvära- Kumuda, etc. Kumuda, etc. 
pälas 


Visvaksena 


Visvaksena 


SAP; 21.ScurgamiramRanandksetramtnustbmendedoWurgäm@u manambksetram ME Mhe 


series of deities in AP1 21.24cd: durgä gano gurus ca ksetrapah. 


212 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


AP: 21.1c-8 AP: AP: 23.10d-17b AP: 33.43c—58b AP: 47.5b-7 
21.20— 
23b 
throne | Vimalä,  Utkarsini, Vimalä, etc. (ke- 
Jñäna, Kriyà Yoga, sara), Anugrahà 
Prahvi, Satyä, Iéà, (karnikä) 
Anugrahä 
Gana, Sarasvati, 
Närada,  Nalaküvara, 
Guru,  Gurupädukä, 
para guru, pädukà of 
the para guru; pürvasi- 
ddhas, parasiddhas 
Garuda (paksiräja) 
arkädimandala säryädimandala säryädimandala 3 mandalas 
mäyätattva, vidyätattva, 
kälatativa 
padma padma padma 
sattva, etc. sattva, etc. 
krtayuga, etc. 
Reveda, etc. 
karnikà 
kesara 
padma 
näla 
kanda 
dharma, jñäna, vairä- dharma, etc., adharma, | pitha 
gya, aisvarya, adha- etc. 
rma, etc. 
Drthivi mahi bhü 
Ananta Ananta Ananta Ananta 
kürma kürma kürma 
$akti ädhärasakti ädhära 
dharma,  jñäna, Reveda, etc. 
vairägya, disvarya, 
adharma, etc. 
outside| Dhätr, Vidhätr, Guru, Gana, 
throne | Gañgä, Yamunä, Dhätr, Vidhätr, 
[Sañkha]nidhi, Kartr, Hartr, 
[Padmalnidhi, Dva- Visvaksena, 
raéri, Västunara Ksetrapäla 
(AP1) 


AP; 23.11 begins the description of the throne with the dispositions of the 
intellect (bwddhi), namely, dharma, jñäna, vairägya, aisvarya, and their oppo- 


Marion Rastelli 213 


sites adharma, ajñäna, râga, and anaïifvarya. À more detailed passage parallel 
to this verse can be found in the NärS,{ from which we see that the disposi- 
tions of the intellect serve a function similar to the feet of the throne. The four 
Vedas described in AP; 47.7a could also have this function. In the two other 
descriptions of the throne, the eight dispositions of the bwddhi, the four Vedas 
and the four yugas (AP; 21.3-4a), or only the eight dispositions of the bwddhi 
(AP; 33.44ab) are situated above the earth. This is similar to their position, for 
example, in the JS, which describes them as carrying the pztha (JS 12.5c-13b). 

The next element of the throne is the 4dhära$akti, which is present in all 
versions except that of AP; 23. This absence of the 4dhära$akti in AP; 23 can 
again be explained by a passage in Närs 2. The line immediately following the 
description of the eight dispositions of the buddhi reads: päthäkäram anantam 
ca gätramadhye Sya vinyaset (2.50cd), “In the centre ofits ‘limbs, he is to impose 
the one having the shape of a pedestal (pztha) and Ananta” “The one having 
the shape of a pedestal” has obviously been interpreted as the tortoise (kärma) 
in AP, 23,% and so here the ädhärasakti is absent, just as it is in Nars 2. 

The subsequent elements of the throne are the tortoise (kärma) (with the 
exception of AP: 47; cf. n. 65), the snake-king Ananta, and the earth. In the 
versions of AP; 21 and 33, the dispositions of the buddhi then follow, whereas 
in AP; 47.7c, an element called pZtha is the next. In AP; 21, the next ele- 
ments of the throne are the constituents of a lotus, namely, its bulb (k4nda), 
stalk (74/4), flower (padma), filaments (kesara), and pericarp (karnikä);$7 the 
four Vedas and the four yugas, which were already mentioned, then follow. 
In AP; 21 and 33, the three constituents of primary matter, sattva, rajas and 


GA“There (i.e., on the yogapitha), he is to visualise the feet. (48d) [He is to visualise] suc- 
cessively dharma, jñäna, vairägya, and aifvarya as the feet in the quarters of Agni (south-east), 
Raksas (south-west), Marut (north- west) and $arva (north-east), in due succession. (49) [He 
is to visualise] 4dharma and the others as ‘cross-struts (gäträni; for gätra in the context of a 
throne, see TAK IT s.v.), successively in the east, etc.” (NärsS 2.48d- 50b: pädäms tatra vicintayet 
48 | dharmam jñänam ca vairagyam aifvaryam ca yathäkramam | agniraksomaruccharvadiksu 
pâdän yathäkramam 49 | adharmädini gäträni pürvädikramayogatah). AP: 23.11 is probably an 
abridgement of this passage; cf: dharmam jñänam ca vairägyam aïsvaryam vahnidiñmukhän | 
adharmädini gäträni pürvädau yogapithake. 

With a small emendation, namely, pzthäkäram to pithädhäram, the ädhärasakti would also 
be present in the NärS. However, then the tortoise would be absent. This variant, namely the 
absence of the tortoise, can be found in AP; 47.7b. 

G6The earth is absent in AP: 23, just asit is in Närs 2. 

S7Cf. GarP 1.31.15 and 1.34.21, where kanda, näla and padma are constituents of the 4sana, 
albeit above sattva, rajas and tamas. 


214 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


tamas, continue the construction of the throne. In AP, 23, 33 and 47, a lotus 
(padma) is the next element. In AP: 33.44d-45a, the mäyätattva, the vidyä- 
tattva, and the kälatattva are above the lotus. The first temptation when seeing 
this is to associate these sarrvas with the $aiva series of sattvas, in which these 
three also appear, although usually not in this order.% It is indeed probable 
that the appearance of these #attvas in the throne is influenced by Saiva teach- 
ings. However, AP; 33 is not necessarily based directly on a Saiva source. The 
Saiva influence may also have been indirect, i.e., there may have been a Saiva 
influence on the source used by the AP for this passage. °? 

The next level of the throne’s construction, three concentric discs identi- 
fied as the sun, moon and fire, is common to all the throne descriptions under 
consideration. ‘The descriptions then diverge again. In AP; 33, the next con- 
stituent of the throne is Garuda; then follows a group consisting of Ganea, 
Sarasvati, Närada, Nalaküvara, the Guru, the Guru’s shoes, the supreme Guru 
and his shoes, and the previous and the future siddhas."° In AP; 21 and 23, 
the uppermost constituents of the throne are nine $aktis: Vimala, Utkarsini, 
Jñänä, Kriyä, Yogä, Prahvi, Satyä, à, and Anugrahä. On the throne, God is 
worshiped, surrounded by his retinue, which is situated around him in concen- 
tric circles. From the top of the table, each successive entry describes the next 
concentric circle, beginning at the centre and moving progressively outwards. 
Comparing the various versions shows that the retinues differ in many aspects. 
The only retinue group that appears in every version is that of the six aigus. 
From these differences in the descriptions of God’s throne and retinue, we can 
conclude that the various passages probably originate from different sources. 


THE PURIFICATION OF THE ELEMENTS (BHÜTASUDDHI) 


In the AP section under consideration, two descriptions of the ritual “purifi- 
cation of the elements” (bhzätasuddhi), à ritual to make the worshippers body 


G8Cf. Goopaiz 1998:li-lv. For an example of the position of these tattvas in a throne, cf. 
Kirana 14.19c-22b, as quoted in Näräyanakanthas commentary on MreT kriyäpäda 3.12. 

The three sattvas also appear in a description of a throne for Gopäla, i.e., Krsna, in 
the Garudapuräna; cf. GarP 1.28.7d-8a: …käkatattvakam (em. kälatattvakam) | vidyätattvam 
param tattvalm]…..Note that the three #z#fvas appear in the reverse order here. In addition to 
the appearance of the three #aftvas, the throne described in GarP 1.28 also has other similarities 
to the throne described in AP: 33. 

70Cf. the similar series in GarP 1.34.43: Närada, Siddha, Guru, Paraguru, the Guru’ shoes, 
and the Paragurus shoes. 


Marion Rastelli 215 


fit for worship,/! can be found, one within the daily ritual (AP; 23.2c-6a) 
and one in the context of the paviträropana ritual (AP: 33.21d-40). The 
description of AP; 23 has a parallel passage in NärS 2, which is in part 
literally identical, but which also includes some variants. Let us compare the 
bhütafuddhi procedure in the two sources: 


AP: 23.2c-6a NärS 2.34—43b 
e visualising the smoke-coloured wind seed-syllable y477 in the navel, the worshipper is to 
remove all stains (ka/masa) from the body (AP; 23.2c-3b, Närs 2.34c-35b) 


e  visualising the fire seed-syllable ksaum 
in the heart lotus, he is to burn the stains 
(23.3c—4b) 

e visualising an object that is not specified, 
which stands on the sky like the moon, he 
is to inundate his body with nectar, which 
then pervades the heart lotus and spreads in 


all radis (23.4c-5) 


e imposition of the #aftva(s) that constitute 


the body (23.6a) 


e visualising the fire seed-syllable r47 in the 
heart lotus, he is to burn the stains (2.35c- 
36b) 

e  visualising the seed-syllable sy in the 
form of the moon on the sky, he is to revive 
his body with nectar, which then pervades 
the heart lotus (2.36c-37b) 


e _withdrawal of the elements to their 
mantras, Withdrawal of these to the paramät- 
man (2.37c-38b) 

e burning of the body (2.38cd) 

e after the body has become ashes, visualisa- 
tion of an ocean of milk, of a lotus in its cen- 
tre, and of a manifestation (mrti) (of God?) 
that is endowed with the power of the desire 
to create (sisrksäsakti) in the pericarp (2.39- 
40b) 

e re-creation of the body (2.40c—41b) 

e visualisation of God in the heart lotus of 
this body (2.41c-42b) 

e besprinkling of the body with nectar from 
God’'s mantra in the sky (2.42c—43a) 

e imposition of the #attvas that constitute 


the body (2.43b) 


The beginning of the bhütasuddhi procedure according to NaärS 2 is almost 
identical to the procedure according to AP; 23. The body is purified by means 
of a yogic technique that is generally known as fixation (dhäranä).”? Here three 
fixations are applied, namely that of the wind, by which stains are mentally 
removed from the body, that of fire, by which the stains are burnt, and probably 


For a detailed description of this ritual, cf., e.g., RASTELLI 1999:210f. 
7?For the dhärana, cf., e.g., RASTELLI 1999:337f., Vasupeva 2004:410—19. 


216 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


that of water, by which the body is inundated and thus revived. 

The main difference between the two versions are the seed-syllables. The fire 
seed-syllable differs and the seed-syllable used for the inundation of the body 
is not mentioned in the AP. This second difference probably has its origin in a 
transmission error. In the ritual procedure as described in the AP. immediately 
after the three dhäranäs, the tattvas that constitute the body are imposed onto 
the body. According to the Närs, the three fixations are to be followed by a 
further procedure to purify the body. The elements that constitute the body are 
withdrawn into their mantras, and these mantras, then, into the paramätman. 
The body is then burnt, re-created and revived. Only then are the sartvas that 
constitute the body imposed onto it./* Also here, the version of the AP seems 
to be an abbreviated form of the NaärS’s version. 

The purification of the elements described in AP; 33 is more detailed than 
that of AP; 23. It consists of the following steps: 


74 à 


e visualisation of the earth-mandala in the form of the gandhatanmätra, 
quadrangular, yellow, firm (AP2 33.21d: kathina), marked with a vajra, with Indra as 
its tutelary deity, in the centre of the two feet, during five vdghätas (cf. p.209) (AP: 
33.2-25) 

e dissolution of the purified gandhatanmätra into the rasatanmätra (em. rasatanmätre) 
(AP1 33.26ab) 

e visualisation of the rasatanmätra in the form of a half moon, as white, marked with 
a lotus, with Varuna as its tutelary deity, between the knees and the navel, during four 
udghätas (AP1 33.26c-30b) 

e dissolving the purified rasatanmätra into the räpatanmätra (AP 1 33.30cd) 

e visualisation of the fire-mandala as triangular, red, marked with a svastika, with 
Anala (i.e., Agni) as its tutelary deity, between the navel and the throat, during three 
udghätas (AP1 33.31-330) 

e dissolving the purified räpatanmätra into the sparsatanmätra (AP1 33.33d) 


73Similar procedures for the bhütasuddhi are described in ParS 4.9c—22 and PäadS caryäpäda 
3.25-50. 

7ÂThe author of this passage does not make much difference between the elements (bhxta) 
and the finmätras; cf. the following steps of the bhütasuddhi. 

75Before each visualisation, the mantras to be used for withdrawing the ranmätras are given 
in full words, namely, all five mantras for the gandhatanmätra to the abdatanmätra before the 
visualisation of the earth, the four mantras from rasatanmätra to the fabdatanmätra before the 
visualisation of the water, three mantras for the fire, etc. It is not clear why these mantras, each 
time fewer, are given in full words at each step. 


Marion Rastelli 217 


e visualisation of the wind-mandala as round, smoke-coloured, marked with a bright 
moon, between the throat and the nose, during two wdghätas (no tutelary deity 
mentioned) (AP, 33.34-35) 

e dissolution of the purified sparsatanmätra into the fabdatanmätra (em. $abdamätre) 
(AP1 33.36ab) 

e visualisation of the ether resembling a pure crystal between the nostrils and the 
top-knot (khä) during one wdghäta (AP1 33.36c-370) 

e dissolving the ether (AP: 33.374) 

e visualisation of the body as being dried up by means of the seed-syllable yzm (AP: 
33.38c—39a) 

e visualisation of the body as being endowed with flames, i.e., as burning, by means 
of the seed-syllable vzm (AP1 33.39abc) 

e visualisation of a drop of nectar that comes out of the brthmarandhra by means of 
the seed-syllable r4m (AP1 33.39c—40a) 

e mental inundation of the body that consists of ashes with the nectar by means of 
the seed-syllable /4m and thus effecting a divine body (AP: 33.40bcd) 


This procedure of the bhätasuddhi is different from that of AP: 23. Here, 
first the elements/#nmätras are dissolved and then the body is dried up, burnt 
and re-created by an inundation with nectar. This procedure resembles the part 
of the NarS's bhütasuddhi that does not appear in AP, 23.76 

The mantras used for the diverse steps of destroying and re-creating the 
body also differ in AP; 23 and 33, with exception of the wind b7ja yam used for 
removing stains from the body and for its drying up. Apart from this difference, 
the order of the bijas in AP; 33 seems to be jumbled. According to SanS va- 
rätra 3.40c—41b and Sripré 50.54-5, the bja of the wind is ya, that of the fire 
ra, that of the earth (mähendra) la and that of the water v4. ‘This order of the 
bijas would also fit AP; 33 better. 

The description of two different versions of the bhärtafuddhi ritual supports 
the impression that has already been gained in the comparison of the various 
retinue and throne descriptions, namely, that the sections describing the daily 
ritual (AP 224) and describing the paviträropana ritual (AP 33-7) derive from 
different sources. 


76A similar procedure can also be found in AhirS 28.21c-27b. 


218 


THE INITIATION (DIKsA) 


Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


In the AP section under consideration, there are two descriptions of the 
performance of the initiation (4ks4), one in AP; 24.42-56b and the other in 
AP; 27. The first description appears in the frame of the daily ritual, after the 
fire ritual and before the worship of Visvaksena and letting God go (visarjana). 
The second description appears in a separate chapter devoted to initiation and 
is followed by a chapter on consecration (zbhiseka). À comparison of the two 
descriptions shows that the procedures they describe differ: 


AP; 24.42-56b 


AP: 27 


parallels 
in Nars 
to AP 1 
27 


42b-50: The guru calls the initiates to 
come near him and besprinkles them; 
he joins them with his own 4tman, be- 
sprinkles them again mentally and pu- 
rifies them by means of fixations. De- 
tailed description of how their bodies 
are destroyed and newly created. The 
initiates are besprinkled again, and their 
bodies are given the nature of mantras 
through their imposition. 

Slab: The guru lays the Visnu-hand 
(his hand that is identified with Visnu) 
on the heads of the initiates and visu- 
alises them as belonging to Visnu.”? 


1-9b: First day: Preparation of the ritual 
implements and the place. 

9c-15b: The guru cooks the caru oblation, 
makes an offering of three parts and eats 
the fourth part together with the initiates. 
15c-17a: The initiates chew a small piece 
of wood to clean their teeth (dantakästha) 
and throw it on the earth in order to read 
omens (then fire offerings according to a 
v.l.). 

17b-20a: The gwru enters the house of 
worship, imposes mantras on his body, 
worships Visnu and asks Him for permis- 
sion to liberate the initiates. 

20b-21a: The guru causes the initiates to 
enter (em. sampravefya) into the house of 
worship, purifies them by means of fixa- 
tions (dhäranä), “makes them perfect” by 
means of burning, etc. (cf. p.214f.), and 
joins them with God’s mürti (?). 


7.15cd, 
18-28 
7.78c-— 
87 


7.88-— 
91b 


7.91c- 
95a 


7.95b- 
96a 


77The meaning of AP1 24.51cd: evam ekam bahün vapi janitva (v.A.) dhyänayogatah, “Hav- 


Marion Rastelli 


AP; 24.42-56b 


AP; 27 


219 


parallels 
in Nars 
to AP 1 
27. 


52-55a: The initiates are blindfolded. 
They throw flowers. (The reason for this 
rite is not given here.) The initiates wor- 
ship Visnu without a mantra.’$ 


21b-22: The initiates are blindfolded. 
They throw à flower (probably on a 
mandala). They then receive the name of 
that mürti (being present on the mandala) 
on which the flower has fallen. The initi- 
ates worship Visnu without a mantra. 
23-31: Nooses (päfa) are tied in a thread in 
which primary matter has been visualised. 
The thread is put into a shallow vessel near 
the fire. The rattvas are visualised and im- 
posed on the initiates’ bodies in the order 
of creation. Then they are withdrawn to 
the thread (now each noose represents one 
tattva). Fire offerings (sampätahoma [cf. 
e.g. JS 16.174c-181b] and pérnähuti) are 
performed, and the shallow vessel with the 
thread is covered. 

32-33: Preparation of the ritual imple- 


ments. 

34ab: bali offering; the guru and initiates 
go to sleep. 

34cd: Second day: Adorning of the 


mandapa. 

35ab: Worship of Visnu on the mandala 
and in the fire. 

35c-36b: The guru calls the initiates near, 
besprinkles them and lays the Visnu-hand 


on them. 


7.96b- 
97 


7.98c- 
100b 
7.102c- 
105 
9.2-4b 


9.5 


ing created one or many by means of visualisation in this way...” is not clear to me. In VisnuS 
10.52ab, a similar prescription can be found: evam ekam bahün väpi janayed dhyänayogatah. 


For the Visnus see below. 


78Here, the reading of AP2 24.55a is preferred, because a parallel passage can be found in 


Visaus 10.62c. 


220 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 
AP; 24.42-56b AP; 27 parallels 

in Nars 
to AP: 
27 

36c-39: The guru withdraws the whole  9.6-8 

creation into his heart and goes with the 

thread near the fire; fire offerings. 

40-57: Purification of the ratvas: striking  9.9-15b 


55b-56b: Theinitiates worship the feet 
of the guru, give him a gift (daksinä). 
The guru gives instructions to the ini- 
tiates. The initiates worship Visnu by 
reciting His names. 


(tädana) on the heart with white powder, 
separation (viyojana) of the éfattvas (1e. 
cutting the nooses from the thread), seiz- 
ing and throwing down the rattva (ädäna, 
äpätana), joining (yojana) the tattva with 
the prakrti, offering of the #artva into the 
fire, making the initiate perfect by means 
ofthe samskäras garbhädhäna, jätakarman, 
bhoga, and laya./? When all tattvas have 
been dissolved in due succession, the in- 
dividual soul (ÿ3v4) dwells in the supreme 
abode, liberated from all bonds. 

58: This was the initiation for the wor- 
ship of a single manifestation (märti) of 
God. Theinitiation for the worship of nine 
Vyühas is performed in the same way. 
59-62b: Initiation that bestows the au- 
thority (adhikära) to perform rituals. 
62c-63: Initiation for à sädhaka. 

64-71: Initiation for a person without 
property. 

72-79b: saktidiksä: for ascetics or persons 
without property. 

79c-81b: Concluding remarks on how a 
householder (grhin) proceeds after the ini- 
tiation. 


79VisnuS 10.75cd adds adhikära between janman (= jätakarman) and bhoga. It is probable 
that adhikära is also implied here. 4dhikära, bhoga and laya also appear, e.g., in SS 19.87-— 
88. For the meaning of these samskäras in the Saiva-Siddhänta, cf. SP3, pp. 268-74; in the 
Päñcarätra they are probably conceived in a similar manner. 


Marion Rastelli 221 


It is immediately obvious that the initiation procedure according to AP; 
24 is much shorter. It consists of less ritual elements, and it is performed in 
less than one day. The initiation described in AP: 27 spans two days. It in- 
cludes several additional ritual elements, namely the rites with regard to the 
caru oblation, the ritual with the piece of wood for cleaning the teeth (danta- 
kästha), asking for Visnu's permission, and the purification of the #artvas with 
the help of a thread. However, it lacks an important element of the initiation 
that is included in the procedure described in AP; 24, namely, the teaching of 
the samaya. Further, it is striking that AP; 27 describes the destruction and 
recreation of the body by means of the fixations with only half a verse (AP; 
27.20cd), whereas AP; 24 describes this ritual in much greater detail, needing 
six and a half verses (AP, 24.44-50b). 

Striking, too, is the fact that AP; 27 contains many passages that are parallel 
to the NärS, whereas the passages in AP; 24 are not. One would rather expect 
parallels to the NaärsS in AP: 24, since the beginning of this chapter, describing 
the fire ritual, contains passages parallel to NärS 7, which is devoted to diksa. 
In addition, it also seems that the reason why AP; 24 describes this initiation at 
all is the fact that the prescriptions for the fire ritual hail from the prescriptions 
for the dksä ceremony. 

Up to the purification of the safttvas, the structure of the initiation in the 
Närs is similar to that of AP; 27. The NärS then contains a detailed description 
of the six adhvans, which does not have à parallel in the AP section under 
consideration and can thus be disregarded here. The various kinds of initiation 
described in AP; 27.58-79b cannot be found in the NärS. 

In addition to the Nas, another passage describing d3ksä that is parallel to 
the sections under consideration can be found in VisnuS 10, the 4ks4 chapter 
of this Samhita. Compared to the Närs, this chapter has fewer passages that 
are literally parallel to the AP, but because it contains many technical terms 
that are also used in the AP’s dksä sections, we can also consider it a parallel 
text. And what is striking: it has parallels to both AP; 24 and 27 and presents 
the procedures described in these two chapters as a well-structured initiation 
ceremony. See below the parallel passages of VisnuS 10 and the AP and the 
ritual elements they describe: 


222 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


VisnuS AP: rituals 
10 
8ab : 27.1cd preparation of the ritual implements 
lcd ë 27.2 protection of the place 
15-18 : 27.3c-6b preparation, offering and eating of the caru oblation 
19b, 25c— : 27.6c-8 
28b 
30-34 : 27.9-14 
35d-36b  : 27.15ab 
36c-37 : 27.15c- dantakästha ritual 
17a 
38 : 27.17bcd  asking Visnu for permission to liberate the initiates 
39-40 = 27.18-19 
4lab : 27.20cd destruction and recreation of the body by means of fixa- 
tions 
41cd : 24.42c- 
43b 
42-46b : 24.44-50 
46c-51 : 24.51ab imposition of the Visnu-hand 
52ab & 24.51cd ? (cf. n. 77) 
53 = 24.52 throwing of a flower in order to find a name 
54ab & 24.53cd 
Glab : 24.54cd 
62cd # 27.22ab worship without a mantra 
() (AP: 
24.55a) 
65c-66b _ : 27.26 imposition of the rattvas on the initiates bodies; s4mpä- 
tahoma 
67c-68b  : 27.30c— 
31 
G8c-69 & 27.32c— preparation of ritual implements 
33 
70ab : 27.34b sleeping 
71lab : 27.35a worship of Visnu in various places; imposition of the 
Visnu-hand 
72-73b : 27.35b- 
36b 
73cd É 27.36c— purification of the rattvas 
37a 
74ab & 27.37cd 
75cd : 27.44ab 
80-81 : 27.39—41 


83 ñ 27.42 


Marion Rastell 223 


VisnuS AP; rituals 

10 

84-85b . 27.45- 
46b 

85c-86b AP: investing of the initiates with the authority to worship 
27.53 (adhikära) 

86c-87b # 27.64c— initiation for persons without property 
65b 

87cd = 27.67cd 

92cd : 24.56a teaching of the rules of conduct (samaya), worship of the 


guru’s feet, giving of a daksinà 


93ab : 24.55bc 


As in AP; 27, VisnuS 10 starts with the preparatory rites, the carw and the 
dantakästha rituals and with asking Visnu for permission. ‘Then, in as much 
detail as in AP; 24, the fixations by which the initiate’s body is destroyed and re- 
created are described. Then follow, also as described in AP; 24, the imposition 
of the Visnu-hand, à rite that cannot be identified (cf. n. 77), the throwing 
of a flower to find a name for the initiate, and the worship of Visnu without 
a mantra. After this, the rites connected with the thread that represents the 
tattvas that are to be purified and several other rites such as another imposition 
of the Visnu-hand are given, as in AP: 27. The procedure for a person without 
property is also mentioned just as in AP; 27. And theinitiation ceremony ends, 
as depicted in AP; 24, with the teaching of the rules of conduct (s4maya), the 
worship of the guru and presenting him a gift. 

The structure of the initiation ceremony in the VisnuS seems systematic 
and logical. One could conclude that it was the original structure that was 
described in the text upon which the sections of the AP under consideration 
are based, that the redactor of the AP mistakenly, perhaps because he used the 
description of the fire pit hailing from the 4ksä chapter of the original text, 
removed a part of the dksä chapter and inserted it into his fire ritual chapter. 

However, two facts speak against this assumption. First, AP; 27, the actual 
diksä chapter, does not really lack much. Except for a second imposition of the 
Visnu-hand, à rite that cannot be identified, the teaching of the samaya, and 
the final worship of the gwru, every important rite that is described in AP; 24 is 
also described here. The destruction and the re-creation of the initiates bodies, 
the throwing of the flower in order to find a name, and Visnu’s worship without 


a mantra are all found in AP; 27, although not always in as much detail as in 
AP; 24. 


224 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Second, in the NärS we can find a passage that is exactly parallel to this 
passage in AP; 27 describing the rites just mentioned. In order to maintain the 
thesis that AP; 27 lacks the part that appears in AP: 24, one would then have 
to conclude that this part also was lost during the composition of the Nars. If 
one considers all these findings concerning the two d;ksä descriptions in the AP 
section under consideration and their parallel passages, it is difficult to form any 
convincing conclusions. It is neither clear whether the parallel passages provide 
any definitive clues about the formation of the AP 4ksä sections, nor can the 
question of whether the two descriptions hail from a single source or from two 
be answered with certainty. 


SAIVA [INFLUENCES 


I would like to return to a feature of the AP section under consideration that 
has already been occasionally mentioned in passing, namely, conceptions that 
probably originate from a $aiva tradition. Conceptions that have been men- 
tioned include the three forms of the mantra (cf. p.206), as well as the three 
tattvas, mâyatattva, vidyätattva and kälatattva (cf. p.214). 

Not yet mentioned is the usage of the terms pa$y and päsa for the individual 
soul and the fetters that bind the soul to the world. In the AP section under 
consideration, they appear in the context of the Zksä.$® They are especially 
prominent in the verses through which the gwru asks God for permission to 
liberate the initiates: “Only You, God, are always the refuge for the release of 
the fetters (pä$a) of the individual souls (pa$u) who have sunk into the ocean 
of transmigration, You who is kind to [His] worshippers. God of gods, permit 
[me], through Your favour, to set free those individual souls who are fettered 
by the bonds of the fetters made of primary matter.”#! 

The terms paÿu and päÿa used in this sense are very common in Saiva tra- 
ditions.®? However, they also appear in Päñcarätra texts. Even the verses just 
quoted and other very similar verses appear in several Päñcarätra texts.** Al- 


SAP; 24.42d, 27.18-20b (& NärS 7.93-95b), 25a, 28d, 80c. 

STAP: 27.18—19: samsarärnavamagnänäm pasinäm pasamuktaye| tvam eva $aranam 
deva sadà tvam bhaktavatsalah 18| devadevänujanthi präkrtaih päsabandhanaih| pasitän 
mocayisyämi tvatprasädät pasün imän 19 (= VisnuS 10.39-40; & Nars 7.93-4). 

82Sce, e.g., DasqurTa 1922, index s.v. pasu and päsa. 

83 For passages parallel to these verses, see n. 81. Similar verses that also include the terms 
pasu and päsa and that are also recited during the initiation ritual can be found in PädS 


caryäpäda 2.29c-31, SripréS 16.66c-68, and VisS 9.35-37b. In addition to these passages, for 


Marion Rastelli 225 


though it is probable that these terms came into the Pañcarätra texts through 
Saiva influence, it is also certain that several Päñcarätra texts were indepen- 
dently influenced by $aivism, not only one.%* Thus we cannot conclude that 
those passages of the AP section under consideration showing $aiva influence 
derive from the same source, since Saiva features are commonly found in many 
Päñcarätra texts. 


CONCLUSION 


Let us now summarize our findings about the contents of AP section under 
consideration. Which features indicate that the passages that describe them 
come from the same source and which features indicate that the sections in 
which they are presented derive from different sources? Do these findings 
correspond to our findings with regard to the two other criteria that have been 
taken into consideration, namely, the given narrators and parallel passages 
within the text and in other works? 


the term pda, see JS 16.133, 246, ParS 26.73ab, Närs 9.33ab, 307-9, 341ab, PadS jñänapäda 
4.18, 21, SripréS 3.6ab, VisS 10.2; for the term pasu, NärS 9.28cd, 224ab, LT 50.170-2; and 
for both terms, NärS 7.6c-8, 9.159ab, 279c-289b. 

84See e.g. SANDERSON 2001:35-9 for Saiva influences in the Ahirs, LT, JS, PausS, and SS. 
The När$, at least in its 9th chapter also seems to be heavily influenced by $aivism; compare, 
e.g., the description of the cosmos in NärS 9.56. to ParT 5.5f. and GooDaLL% annotations 
to the translation of this passage; also the meditative practices called visuvas described in NaärS 
9.241f, seem to be typically Saiva (for these, cf. TAK II s.v. kälavisuva), at least I could not yet 
find a description of them in any other Päñcarätra text. 


226 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 
ch.  narrator parallel pas- similar concepts: different concepts 
sages of: 
nine Krsna/ | 1-26 | retinue/| bhüta- | diksä 
Vyühas | Govinda| wyähas | throne | fuddhi 
21 | Närada 00 
22 | Närada 
23 | Närada Närs e o o 
24 | Närada Närs, VisnusS © 
25 | Närada GarP e e. 
26 | Närada GarP e. 
27 | Närada Närs, VisnusS e o 
28 | Närada 
29 | Närada Närs 
30 | Närada Närs, SärK, JS . 
31 | Agni Visnudharma e 
32 | Agni GautDhSü 
33 | Agni o o 
34 | Agni e. 
35 | Agni . 
36 | Agni e. 
37 | Agni 
38 | Agni, Visnudharma, . 
Yama PrA 
39 | Hayagriva | H ädikända 2-7 
40 | Hayagriva | H ädikända 8- 
10 
41 | Hayagriva | H ädikända 11- 
12 
42 | Hayagriva | H ädikända 13 
43 | Hayagriva | H ädikända 14- 
16 
44 | Hayagriva | H ädikända 18 
45 | Hayagriva | H ädikända 19- 
21 
46 | Hayagriva e? 
47 | Hayagriva © 
48 | Bhagavat 
49 | Bhagavat | H ädikända 23- | © 
25 


The nine Vyühas are primarily treated in the section ascribed to Närada. In 
the section dealing with the paviträropana ritual and ascribed to Agni, four or 
five of these Vyühas are mentioned (cf. n. 33). Further, as a group of nine 
deities they are dealt with in a chapter that is parallel to a chapter from the 


Marion Rastell 227 


Hayasirsapañcarätra. Krsna or Govinda is only mentioned in the section as- 
cribed to Agni. The one to twenty-six vyähas are only treated in chapters as- 
cribed to Närada. Different forms of the description of God retinue and/or 
throne are found in AP 21, which deals with retinues and thrones of several 
deities in a general way and which is ascribed to Närada, in AP 23, in part 
consisting of passages to which parallel passages can be found in the NärS and 
also ascribed to Närada, in AP 33, ascribed to Agni, and in AP 47, ascribed to 
Hayagriva. The ritual of the purification of elements (bhätafuddhi) is given in 
two different forms in AP 23, with passages parallel to the Närs, and in AP 33. 
AP 23 is ascribed to Närada, whereas AP 32 is ascribed to Agni. Theinitiation 
ritual is described in AP 24 and in AP 27. Both chapters are ascribed to Närada. 

From these findings we can set apart the following sections, which are prob- 
ably based on different sources: 

1) AP 21: This chapter deals with the retinues and thrones of several deities 
in a general, not specifically Päñcarätra manner and describes retinues and 
thrones for Acyuta/Visnu in a form that is different from the others described 
in the AP section under consideration. It is ascribed to Närada. Its origin is 
difficult to identify. It is not necessarily of Päñcarätra origin, because it deals 
with various deities, but we can also not exclude this possibility. 

2) AP 22-30: This section deals with a set of individual rituals, from the 
daily päja to the initiation (4ksä) and consecration (abhiseka). It contains pas- 
sages parallel to the NärS and is ascribed to Närada, includes descriptions of 
a retinue, a throne, and a bhätasuddhi ritual that differ from the others de- 
scribed in the AP section under consideration. Its particular characteristic is 
the concepts of the nine Vyühas and the one to twenty-six vyähas. At its end 
it describes a visualisation of the mantra (mantradhyäna) that is similar to that 
described in the JS. 

Ï mentioned already above (pp. 198£) that it is possible to conclude that 
these chapters are based on the NärS. However, in its present form the NärS 
is certainly not the source of this section of the AP, since the NärS lacks 
certain characteristic features of this section and teaches a completely different 
mantric system: First, the NärS does not teach the one to twenty-six vyähas 
and second, the nine Vyühas do not appear init at all. Third, the chapters AP 
22-30 describe, as the early Paäñcarätra Samhitäs also do, an individual ritual, 


85Two passages of the AP that mention the first five mantras of those of the nine Vyühas give 
the pañcopanisanmantras in their parallel versions in the NärS (AP: 27.4c-5b & NärsS 7.20 and 
in AP; 27.11-13 & NärS 7.81c-83). So here are given explicitly different mantras. 


228 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


i.e., a ritual that is performed for the sake of the performer. The Nars, as later 
Sambhitäs in general, describes and focuses mainly on elaborate temple rituals 
that have à public purpose, e.8., for the sake of the king and his kingdom.56 
Finally, the mantric system or retinue of God of the NarsS is as follows: 


e Väsudeva, Samkarsana, Pradyumna, Aniruddha, and their arigas; 

e the szktis: Säntä,®” Sri, Sarasvati, and Rati; 

e the twelve regents of the months (masädhipa) (cf. p.202); 

e the ten avatärast Matsya, Kürma, Varäha, Nrsimha, Vamana, Jämadagnyaräma, 
Dä$arathiräma, Krsna, Buddha, Kalkin; 

e the weapons: sañkha, cakra, gadä, padma, musala, khadga, $ärñga, vanamälä; 

e the eight directional deities: Indra, etc.; 


the dvärapälas: Kumuda, etc.; 
Garuda, Visvaksena. #8 


This mantric system cannot be found in the AP section under consideration. 
Hence the Närs in its present form cannot have been the basis of the AP. How- 
ever, given the many parallel passages, it is also improbable that the two texts 
were composed independently of one another. A possible conclusion from this 
fact is that the redactor of the AP section under consideration used an earlier 
version of the NarsS (bearing the same or another name), which was later revised 
by the redactor of the present version of the Nars. 

3) AP 31-38: This section deals with various rituals such as protection rites, 
Vedic orthodox rituals, and the paviträropana ritual, and with the benefits of 
constructing a temple. It is mainly ascribed to Agni. It includes passages parallel 
to the Wisnudharma, contains specific forms of the retinue, throne, and the 
bhütafuddhi ritual, and is the only section in which Krsna or Govinda is referred 
to. The worship of Krsna/Govinda could indicate a Bhägavata orientation of 
the source text, as was also originally the case in the Wisnudharma. ‘The Vedic 
orthodox rites given in AP 32 hint at an influence from the Vedic orthodoxy. 
Perhaps the source text haïls from a tradition that was characterised by both 
of these features. However, we must also bear the possibility in mind that this 


86 For these two purposes of ritual being characteristic of earlier and later Samhitäs, and also 
for references to the Närs, cf. RasTELLI 2006:91-8. 

87C£. NarS 2.83b. NärS G.21b: sgrrigamudrä must be emended to äntämudrä. 

S8NarS 2.66ab, 2.82-85b, NärS 3-6 (the order of the various groups of the retinue is not 
always the same). 


Marion Rastelli 229 


section may consist of passages of different sources. The paviträropana part (AP 
33-37) could stem from a different source than the other sections, despite the 
fact that Krsna is also mentioned here. 

4) AP 39-70: This section is ascribed to Hayagriva and includes for the 
most part passages parallel to the Hayastrsapañcarätra. It stems from this text, 
although the source of the AP may not necessarily have been identical with the 
present version of the text. 

It is thus clear that the section AP 21-70 originally haïls from various 
sources. Ît is difficult to say who compiled this text from these sources. Did 
a redactor of the AP use these different sources for compiling the text of the 
present AP? Or did he have access to a single work that had already been com- 
piled from these sources, of which he produced an abbreviated version? This 
question cannot be answered at our present state of research and so remains 
open. 

Nevertheless, this section of the AP is a precious building block in our 
knowledge about the history of Päñcarätra. On one hand, it includes concepts 
that have not been found in other Samhitäs up to now. On the other hand, it 
offers us new pieces of information about the history of Päñcarätra literature, 
especially concerning the process of the formation of the Närs, the VisnuS and 
the Hayasirsapañcarätra, even if further research is necessary for interpreting 
these data correctly. 


230 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The Saiva Exegesis of Kashmir 


ÂLEXIS SANDERSON 


INTRODUCTION 


The great majority of the surviving exegetical works on the scriptures of the 
Saiva Mantramärga was produced by Kashmirian brahmins towards the end of 
the early medieval period, principally in the course of the tenth century and 
the early decades of the eleventh. Among these authors there were two distinct 
groups in line with the division within the scriptural corpus of the Mantramärga 
between purely Saiva scriptures known collectively as the Siddhänta or Saivasid- 
dhänta and dedicated to the propitiation of $Siva and those of a more Säkta 
or completely $äkta character dedicated to the propitiation of Bhairava or the 
Goddess. One group took the purely $aiva scriptures to be the highest of Siva’s 
revelations and saw the others as secondary. The other, while recognizing that 
those texts were indeed the Mantramärga’s fundamental authorities, considered 
its own scriptures to be the higher, believing that they had been revealed by Siva 
for the benefit of an élite within the $aiva community. 

Both groups, Saiddhäntikas and non-Saiddhäntikas, held that Saivas, at 
least those who were married householders rather than celibate ascetics, were 
simultaneously subject to brahmanical regulation in accordance with their sta- 
tus as members of castes within the brahmanical life-stages. This is prescribed 
in a passage of the lost scripture Bhärgavottara much cited by the Saiddhäntika 
exegetes:! 


So he should not transgress the practices of his caste-class and brahmanical dis- 
cipline even in thought. He should remain in the discipline in which he was 
when he was initiated into the Saiva religion and [at the same time] maintain 
the ordinances of $iva. 


lE.g. Näräyanakantha, Mreendravrtti, Vidyäpäda p. 63, 1. 13-15; Bhatta Rämakantha, Mo- 
ksakärikävriti on 14Gab: iti varnäsramäcärän manasäpi na lañghayet | yo yasminn äframe tisthan 
diksitah Sivasäsane | sa tasminn eva samtisthec chivadharmam ca pälayet. 


232 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Non-Saiddhäntika adherence to the same view is seen in the following verse 
quoted without attribution by the Säkta Saiva Jayaratha and the anti-Saiva 
Aparäditya:” 


Inwardly Säkta (kaulah), outwardly $aiva, and brahmanical in his mundane 
observance, he should hold on to what is essential like a coconut [protecting its 


juice inside its flesh and hard shell]. 


Thus they accepted a level of revelation that they shared with non-$Saivas 
(sämänyasästram) as well as a level of revelation applicable to them alone 
(visesasästram), with adherents of the Säkta-inclined and Säkta traditions 
adding a third level of more restricted recruitment within the second 
(visesatarasaästram). 

This model of a hierarchy of revelation imposing levels of obligation that 
are accumulated as one ascends from the more universally accessible to the less 
is most clearly articulated by the Säkta-inclined Siraccheda (Jayadrathayämala, 
Satka 1) in an account which extends this model to the Indian religious sys- 
tems in general. The base-line of binding revelation shared with the non-Saivas 
is subdivided here into universal common (sämänyam) and restricted com- 
mon (sämänyavisesam). The former comprises the two Epics and the Puränas, 
since those are accessible and applicable to members of all four caste-categories 
(varnäh), that is to say, to all including Südras? —$aiva initiation was accessible 
to the same social range—, and the latter comprises all brahmanical authori- 
ties open only to members of the three regenerable caste-categories (brahmin, 
Ksatriya, and Vaiéya), namely Sruti comprising the three Vedas in their various 
recensions and Smrti comprising the Dharmasästras.* The systems on the first 
level of narrower recruitment are set out as follows: 


The Saura, Saiva, and Päñcarätra [scriptures], and [in the Saiva Atimarga] the 
Läkula and Vaimala [scriptures], together with the Atharvaveda, [the texts of] 
Sämkhya and Yoga, and the scriptures of the Buddbhists, Jains, and the like, are 
restricted teachings (viesatantram), because à person adheres to [one of] them 
only after taking on specific vows [in addition to or, in the case of the Buddhists 


2 Tanträlokaviveka on 4.251ab; Yäjñavalkyasmrtitikä on 1.7, vol. 1, p. 10: antah kaulo bahih 
Saivo lokäcäre tu vaidikah | säram ädäya tistheta närikelaphalam yatha. 

SJayadrathayämala,  Satka 1, f.166vI-2 (35.65-G6b): itihäsapuränäni  ganitam 
kävyanätakam | chandämsi $abdasästräni sämänyavisayäni tu | sarvesäm varnikänäm tu 
sämänyasravanäd iha. 

#Jayadrathayämala, Satka 1, f. 167r1 (35.77c-78b): atha sämänyavaisesa(m) säma-rgyajusah 
priye | Säkhäcaranabhinnasya smrtyantaragatasya tu. 


Alexis Sanderson 233 


and Jains, as opposed to, the general obligations imposed by brahmanical au- 
thorities].5 


The level of narrowest recruitment, from within systems on this level, is defined 
as follows: 


The Bhairava (Daksinatantras [dzksinasrotah]), the Guhyätantras (Vamatantras 
[vämasrotah]), the Gärudatantras (pärvasrotah), the Bhütatantras[, Mätrtantras, 
Jyesthätantras] and [Candäsidhäratantras] (pascimasrotah), and[, for Buddhists, 
those of] the Vajrayäna, are yet more restricted (viesataram), because only a 
person already bound by the vows of the [corresponding body of] restricted 
[scripture] can exercise authority in them. 


That the texts Saiva scriptures on the first level of narrower recruitment are 
those of the Siddhänta is made clear later in this passage, when they are defined 
as the [ten] Sivabhedas and [eighteen] Rudrabhedas.” For this is the standard 
definition of the Saiddhäntika canon, though in reality the scriptures existent 
or operative in our period are only some of these, mostly within the category 
of the Rudrabhedas. They are principally the Kämika and the Sähasra among 
the Sivabhedas, with the Mrgendra, which claims to be derived from the first, 
and among the Rudrabhedas and derivatives, the Misväsa, the Pauskarapära- 
mesvara, the Matañgapäramesvara, the Yaksinïipäramesvara, the Hamsapärame- 
#vara, the Mukuta, the Süksmasväyambhuva, the Sväyambhuvasütrasamgraha, 
the Rauravasñtrasamgraha, the Kirana, the Kälottara in various recensions of 
differing length, the Sarvajñänottara, and the Paräkhya. In addition there were 
specialized Saiddhäntika Tantras concerned only with matters pertaining to the 


5 Jayadrathayamala, Satka À, f.166v2-4 (35.68-G9b): sauram Saivam pañcarätram pramä- 
nam vaimalam matam | atharvam sämkhyayogam ca bauddham ärahatädikam | viesäkhyam 
yatas *tatra (er. : tantram Cod.) visesasamayät sthitih. 

SJayadrathayämala, Satka 1, . 166v4 (35.69c-70): bhairavam vajrayänam ca guhyätantram 
sagärudam | bhütatanträditantram ca visesataram ucyate | vaisesike tu samayi yato ‘traivädhikä- 
rakrt. 

 Jayadrathayämala, Satka 1, f. 167r1-2 (35.78c-79b): atha vaisesasästrasya $aivasiddhänta- 
räpinah | Sivarudrabhedasamiñah kramo väcyo *vipascitä (corr. : vipascitäh Cod.). Cf. Satka 
1, f. 4v2-4 (1.65-66) on the ten Sivabhedas beginning with the Kämika and the [eighteen] 
Rudrabhedas beginning with the Vijaya and ending with the Päramesvara: kämikädini yäny 
äsan da$a proktäni *älinä (conj. : älinäm Cod.) | fivabhedagatäniha *$aive sarvärthadäni (con : 
Saiva Saivärthadäni Cod.) tu | GG vijayädini cänyäni *päramesäntikäni (em. : paramesäntikäni 
Cod.) tu | rudrabhedaprabhinnäni bhedänantagatäni tu. 

$For canonical lists of these twenty-eight see GoopaLL 1998, pp. 402-417. 


234 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


installation of idols and the consecration of temples: the Mayasamgraha, the 
Devyämata, the Mohacüdottara, and the Pratisthäpäramesvara. 

The more restricted level within the Saiva canon is defined immediately 
after this as comprising the four and the fifteen Tantras of the four divisions 
(bhedäh) and three currents (srotämsi).” The four Tantras are identified as the 
primary scriptures (mälasäträni) of the Bhairava-centred Mantrapitha; and the 
fifteen as the same of the Goddess-centred Vidyäpitha. Of the four divisions 
the first is defined as that of the four Mantrapitha texts. These are listed as the 
Svacchandabhairava, Candabhairava, Krodhabhairava, and Unmattabhairava.\° 
Of these only the first appears to have been current in the period of the 
commentators; and it is clear that this was considered to be the pre-eminent 
text of this class.!! It survives in Kashmirian, Nepalese, and South Indian 


manuscripts, ? influenced the development ofthe Saiddhäntika ritual system, ! 


and attracted learned exegesis. 
The other three divisions contain the fifteen Tantras of the Vidyaäpitha 
canon,” namely the seven Saktitantras, the three Vämatantras, and the five 


Yämalatantras. The Saktitantras are listed as the Sarvavirasamäyoga/Sarvavira, 


 Jayadrathayämala, Satka 1, f. 16712 (35.79c-80b): visesatarasastrasya catuhpañca*dasasya 
tu (em. [Aïa]: gatasya tu Cod.) | srotastraya*nibaddhasya (em. : vibaddhasya Cod.) caturbheda- 
gatasya tu. 

1 Jayadrathayamala, Satka À, f. 16915 (36.12): (1) svacchandabhairavam (2) candam (3) kro- 
dham (4) unmattabhairavam | granthäntaräni catväri mantrapithe sthitäni ca. "The same verse 
is cited from the Sarvavira by Ksemaräja on Svacchanda 1.4c-7. 

11See footnote 511 on p. 385. 

The published edition is based on Kashmirian manuscripts. For the existence of Nepalese 
and South Indian manuscripts of this text see SANDERSON 2001, p.21, footnote 26. The Ywi- 
gahvara claims to have been extracted from the Candabhairava (final colophon, f. 40v3: ty 
uttarämnäye $ri-omkärapithavinirgate $ricandabhairave sodasasahasre *uddhrtam [conj. : uddhite 
Cod.] yonigahvaram samäptam), but since the former is a not a Mantrapitha text this attribution 
is implausible. 

For evidence that the early Saiddhäntika Paddhatis drew heavily on the Suzcchanda see 
SANDERSON 2004, pp. 359-60, footnotes 27 and 28. 

lSee p. 398. 

D Jayadrathayamala, Satka 1, f.169r7-v1 (36.15-19b): granthäntarany asamkhyäni vidya- 
pithe sthitäni tu | pañca ca da$a siddhäni mülasñträni sundari | vidyäpithaprasiddhäni nämabhih 
kathayämi te | (1) sarvavirasamäyogam (2) *siddhayogesvarimatam (em. : siddhäyaägesvarimatam 
Cod.) | (3) pañcamrtam ca (4) visvädyam (5) yoginijälasamvaram | (6) vidyäbhedam (7) $irac- 
chedam (8) mahäsammohanam tathä | (9) nayottaram (10) mahäraudram (11) rudrayämalam 
eva ca | (12) brahmayämalasamÿiñam ca (13) tathänyam visnuyämalam | (14) dasaturyam 
smriam “skändam (15) aumam (em. kädamarmam Cod.) pañcadasam matam. 


Alexis Sanderson 235 


Siddhayogesvarimatal Trisäla, PañcamrtalSricakra, Visvädya, Yoginijalasamvara, 
Vidyäbheda, and Siraccheda, the three Vämatantras as the Nayottara, Mabä- 
raudra, and Mahäsammobhana, and the five Yämalatantras as the Rudrayämala, 
Brahmayämala/Picumata, Visnuyämala, Skandayämala, and Umäyämala. The 
three currents are the Daksina, the Vama, and the Mixed. To the Daksina are 
assigned the four Tantras of the Mantrapitha, the first six Saktitantras, and 
the five Yämalatantras, to the Väma the three Vämatantras, and to the Mixed 
the seventh Saktitantra, the Sirzccheda itself. This excludes from the broader 
definition not only the non-$aiva Vajrayäna but also two of the four non- 
Saiddhäntika divisions of the Saiva scriptures: the Bhütatantras (pascimasrotah) 
and the Gärudatantras (pärvasrotah), no doubt because these were considered 
to be on a lower level, ancillary corpora concerned with less exalted matters 
such as exorcism.!7 

Within the two non-Saiddhäntika divisions that remain, the Bhaira- 
vatantras and the Vämatantras (/Guhyätantras), the tradition of the non- 
Saiddhäntika Saiva exegetes of Kashmir is grounded within the Saktitantra di- 
vision of the Vidyäpitha, which contains texts of the two main divisions of that 
tradition: the Trika and the Kälikula, rooted respectively in the Siddhayoges- 
varimata and the Siraccheda, the former further developed in such texts as the 
Mälinivijayottara, Triirobhairava, and Tantrasadbhäva and the latter expanded 
into the /ayadrathayämala, also known as the Tantraräja, which comprises four 
sections of six thousand verses each, of which the Sraccheda is only the first, !# 


16 Jayadrathayämala, Satka 1, f. 174r6-v9 (40.29): sarvaviram trisalam ca $ricakram visva- 
pürvakam | yogintjälasamiñam ca vidyäbhedam $irohrtam | etäni faktitanträni santi Yalälayani 
(conj. : särälayäni Cod.) tu | savyasrotasi siddhäni $iracchid ubhayätmakam | nayottaram 
mahäraudram mahäsammohanam tathà | trikam etan mahädevi vämasrotasi nirgatam | vibhi- 
nnam kotibhedena $äkhäkalitavistaram | yämye srotasi sûträni pañcakam vaimaläni tu | santi 
vistirnasäkhäbhih kathyante täni nämabhih | raudraumam vaisnavam cäpi caturtham skandayä- 
malam | akravyäcäram etad dhi catuskam api tat smrtam | brahmayämalasamiñam ca pañca- 
mam tat picu-r-matam | duyaksaram matasamjñam ca kravyädocchusmani$cayam | niräcära(m) 
mahäcäram sarvatobhadrasamiñnakam | dvikam sarvätmakam caiva mahädaksinam eva ca | 
brahmayämalam etad dhi sütrair bhinnam tu saptabhih. On the mixed character ofthe Sirccheda 
see also f. 177r2 (40.75cd): vämadaksinabhedastham $iracchedam suvistaram: and for the doc- 
trine of the three currents f. 168v3 (35.121c): vämadaksinamisresu. 

17On the Bhütantras and Gärudatantras and the Kashmirian Ksemaräjas knowledge of the 
scripture Xriyäkälagunottara, which covers the territories of both see SANDERSON 2001, p. 14, 
footnote 13. Ksemaräja also cites the Gärudatantra Zotula, in Netroddyota vol. 2, p.150, Il. 9— 
14; pp. 151, 16-152, L. 2; and p. 199,11.9-17. 

18See p. 252. 


236 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


and further developed in the scriptures of the Krama.!? The non-Saiddhäntika 
exegetes of Kashmir also claimed authority over the Mantrapitha by propagat- 
ing a Saktitantra-based exegesis of the Suzcchandabhairava.? 

No manuscript of any of the other five Saktitantras listed by the Siraccheda 
has come to light; and of them only the Sarvavira and Pañcämria have been 
cited by the Kashmirians.®! There is no evidence that they had access to the 
Yoginïjälasamvara, Vidyäbheda, ox Visvädya.? The same is true of the three Vä- 
matantras and the five Yämalatantras other than the Brahmayämala. The latter, 
also known as the Picumata, is the only one of these eight texts to have come 
down to us, and it was known and cited in Kashmir, where it has left an en- 


1See p.251. 

20Sce p. 398. 

21Sarvavira: Tanträloka 4.55-57b; Svacchandoddyota, vol. 1, p. 10, IL. 9-10; vol. 4, p.55, 15- 
16; Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 7, Âhnika 12, p. 106, Il. 7-15; Nerroddyota, vol. 1, pp. 47, 1. 15-— 
48, L. 6; Kvarapratyabhijnävivrtivimarsint, vol. 3, p.311, IL. 5-7; p. 384, IL. 18-19. The text was 
probably also known as the Sarväcära, since the last of these citations is given as from the 
Sarväcära in Parätrisikävivarana, p.266, Il. 21-29 (= KSTS ed., pp.235-6). For à translation 
and interpretation of this passage see SANDERSON 2005a, pp. 111-112. Other citations of the 
Sarväcära: Tanträloka 13.303d-304 (= Parätrifikävivarana, p. 218, IL 1-3 [= KSTS ed., p.92]); 
and Tanträloka 13.303c-305. Pañcämrta: Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 9, p. 140, Il. 5-13. 

20f these three the Yoginijälasamvara, though not quoted by the commentators, is cited in 
the Woginisamcära of the third Satka of the Jayadrathayämala as a major source on its subject; 
see f. 172v4-5 (Yoginisamcära 1.83): ity evam yoganiyamam yoginïjäla*famvare (em. : samcare 
Cod.) | yathotpannam tu kathitam niryogam $rnu sämpratam: £. 199v6-7 (7.124cd): uktäni yani 
karmäni yogintjälasamvare; £. 215134 (11.60c-6): evam eva samutpannäh sad yoginyo *mahä- 
tape (em. : majñätape Cod.) | tadà devi samäkhyatà yoginïjälasamvare | lampatädye ‘tha rak- 
tâdye sarvavire visesatah. The existence of the Vivädya and Vidyäbheda is less certain. The 
Siraccheda says of the former that it was taught by Bhairava to the Goddess but concealed 
by her, that a small part of that was learned by the Sun, that only a small part of that part 
reached earth, and that it will liberate pure souls only at the end of the present aeon (Sarka 
1, f.176r3-4 [40.51-52, Séab]): éantrasäram viniryätam dhrtam tac ca mayä priye | mayà tat 
kathitam tubhyam tvayà tad gopitam punah | 52 *kimcinmaätram (conj. : kecinmäntram Cod.) 
tu vijñätam tvattas tat kila helinä | tasmät *tadasyatah (conj. : tadäsyate Cod.) satyam alpakam 
arpitam (conj. : sarpite Cod.) bhuvi | 54 *kalpänte (coni. : calpyante Cod.) vimalänünäm 
malam praksälayisyati. Of the Vidyäbheda it says that it comprised seven Samhitäs of which 
six did not reach the earth and will be received only in the final age, that only a very small 
part of the seventh, a short work called the /#änaprasüti, was passed on by Bhairava (£. 176v9— 
177r1 [40.72c-75b]: raya jñänaprasätis ca vidyeänäm mahätape | 73 tato pi hi mayà jñätà sval- 
pasütrà surämbike | matto ‘py amsaphalä devi *tadäväpi (conij. : tasmädväpi Cod.) tridandinà | 
74 tridandito *trnah präpa (conj. : trnapräya Cod.) samhitäm saptamäm priye | sat *samhitä 
(corr. : samhitäm Cod.) na bhürlokam ägatà viravandite | 75 antime tu yuge täsäm präptir 
matto bhavisyati). 


Alexis Sanderson 237 


during imprint, albeit minor, in the ritual manuals of the Kashmirian Saiva 
officiants.* 

Both the Saiddhäntika and the non-Saiddhäntika scriptures offered the at- 
tainment of two goals: (1) the liberation of the soul from the beginningless cycle 
of birth and death (#10ksah), insisting that this could be achieved only by those 
who followed their precepts, and (2) the bringing about of the lesser benefits 
termed siddhih, such as the elimination of dangers (fntih), the restoration of 
health (pustih), and the warding off or destruction of enemies (abhicärah); and 
they held that the pre-eminent or sole independent means of attaining these 
goals is not knowledge but a supramundane form of ritual empowered by vi- 
sualization and other practices of a meditational character. 

They taught à single ritual system, both in the ordering of their ceremonies 
and in the construction of each. AIl set out the same elaborate procedures for 
the initiation (4ksä) of recruits and the consecration (abhisekah) of officiants, 
the same ceremonies for the installation of images and other substrates of wor- 
ship (pratisthä), and the same rituals of obligatory regular worship (riyakarma) 
comprising the summoning of the deity into the person of the worshipper, the 


23 For Abhinavagupta's citations of the Brahmayämala (and Jayaratha's lack of access to that 
text) see SANDERSON forthcoming 4. The imprint in the manuals is the inclusion of Candä 
Käpälini and her nine-syllable Mantra (the root-Mantra of the Brahmayämala) among the god- 
desses included among the recipients of oblations in the fire-sacrifice (Agnikäryapaddhati À, 
f.77v1-7 and B, f. 38v8-39r1) and in the worship of the Goddess in the Tantric Sivarätripüjà 
(Sivarätripäjapaddhati, exposures 70, 1. 13-71, L. 11). We see it also in the use of Candä Käpälini 
and her four subordinates Raktä, Karälä, Candäksi, and Mahocchusmä and their Dütis Karälï, 
Danturä, Bhimavakträ, and Mahäbalä as deities of the Sräddha lamp in the Kashmirian Saivas’ 
#ivadipasräddham, the Paddhati for which can be seen in photographic reproduction in CHAN- 
DRA 1984, pp. 236b-246d. The goddesses appear there in p.237c9-10 and p.238a8-10, with 
minor deformation: Candäksi appears as Candäkhyä, and Mahocchusmä as Mahodhmä; and 
HRIM is substituted for HÜM and CANDI for CANDE in the root-Mantra ([oM] HÜM CANDE 
KÂPALINI SVAHA). In the fragmentary and disordered folios of the birch-bark manuscript of the 
Tantric Sivarätripüjapaddhati listed in the bibliography the correct form CANDE is preserved (ex- 
posure 71, Il. 4-10): oM HRIM CANDE KÂPALINI SVÂHÂ MAHÂLAKSMYAMBAPADUKABHYO NAMAH. 
iti mülavidyä. OM HRIM HRDAYÂYA NAMAH. OM CANDE $IRASE SVÂHA. OM KAPÀ SIKHAYAI VAUSAT. 
OM LINI KAVACAYA HUM. OM [SVA NETRE]BHYO VAUSAT. OM HÀ ASTRAYA PHAT. [y a]ñigäni. "The er- 
ror is the result of the lack of clear distinction in Kashmirian pronunciation of Sanskrit between 
eand 3, for which see footnote 355 on p. 338. À Nepalese compendium of scriptural passages on 
the worship of the goddess Siddhalaksmi/Pratyañgirà (7ridasadämarä(di) pratyañgirävisayaka- 
nänâtantra) contains one whose colophon identifies it as the 24th chapter of the Umäyämala 
and others whose colophons assign them to the third Sarka of a Rudrayämala. But there is à 
strong possibility that these attributions are fictitious. 


238 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


deity's worship first there (antaryägah) and then externally (bzhiryägah) by pro- 
jection into a material substrate such as a Liñnga, Mandala, or anthropomorphic 
image, followed by the repetition of the deitys Mantras (japah) and their grat- 
ification with offerings in fire (homah, agnikäryam), with inflections and elab- 
orations of all these for the attainment of siddhih (kämyakarma). The features 
that differentiated the divisions of the Mantramärga, such as the choice of de- 
ity propitiated, the specific character of the visualizations (dhyänam), Mantras, 
Mandalas, Mudräs, substrates of worship, and offerings that these choices en- 
tailed, were surface features that did not affect significantly this deeper struc- 
tural unity. 

Central in all this was the enactment of the belief that while brahmanical 
ritual can affect only the body or status of the individual, Saiva ritual works 
directly on the soul, that through intense imagination reinforced by incanta- 
tion, breath-control, and a choreography of hand gestures the soul itself can 
be grasped, manipulated, and transformed. This is the driving force of all the 
rituals of the Mantramärga, and it is most clearly displayed in the ‘fusion with 
Siva” (Svayojanikä) at the climax of initiation, when the officiant, seen not as 
an agent in his own right but as a vessel through which $iva himself is acting, 
enters the initiand’s body through the flow of the breath, takes hold of his soul, 
visualizing it as a point of brilliant light, draws it out and into his person with 
the return of the breath, fuses it with his own soul, and then, as he exhales, 
raises them both up as one to exit through the cranial aperture and unite with 
the deity. 

The principal features that differentiate the two divisions are (1) that in 
the choice of offerings for the propitiation of the deity the rituals prescribed in 
the Saiddhäntika scriptures generally remained within the parameters of purity 
set by brahmanical convention, while those of the non-Saiddhäntika systems 
transgressed these parameters to a greater or lesser extent by requiring the inclu- 
sion of alcoholic and sanguinary offerings, in keeping with the special character 
of their deities; and (2) that the rituals of installation taught in the Siddhänta 
extended beyond the consecration of small moveable Lingas for the worship 
performed by initiates for their own purposes or those of individual clients to 
include the consecration of temples where worship was to be performed on a 
regular schedule for the public good, typically those established by royal pa- 
trons, and the installation in such temples of a large immoveable Liñga which 
would serve as the principal embodiment of the deity, who was then individu- 
alized for legal purposes (vyavahärärtham) by the prefixing of the name of the 


Alexis Sanderson 239 


donor to -Ævara, as in Prakäéeévara for a Siva established by, or for the spir- 
itual benefit of king Prakä$a[dharma],* thus allowing it to be treated in law 
as the owner of the benefactions in the form of land-revenue and other valu- 
ables that would sustain the cult. This involvement in the public domain led 
to the production of the specialized revelations known as Pratisthätantras that 
dealt exclusively with these rituals and such ancillary matters as iconometry, 
iconography, and the structure and layout of temple types, attached monastic 
residences, royal palaces, and towns.?” 

In later times in the Tamil South a new Saiddhäntika scriptural literature 
emerged under titles listed in early scriptural accounts of the Saiddhäntika 
canon. This corpus was concerned primarily with the rituals to be performed 
before these temple images, modelled on those for personal worship but on a 
much more lavish scale, to be conducted by initiated and consecrated Saiva of- 
ficiants engaged for this purpose with the right to pass on their office to their 
descendants. But in the scriptures known to the Kashmirian exegetes, in the 
early Paddhatis, in South Indian sources up to at least the thirteenth century, 
and in the Saiva works that have survived in Nepal from this early period, we 
find no accounts of such rituals. The role of the officiant presented in those 
texts extends no further than the consecration of the image before which the 
worship will be performed. Neither they nor those exegetes make any mention 
of the $aiva officiant in the role of the temple priest after installation has been 
completed.?7 


24]n À.D. 515 a temple for Siva Prakä$eévara was established in Da$apura by an official of the 
Aulikara Prakä$adharma. See RAMESH and Tewart 1983, 1. 17, v. 22. I cite this as a very early 
example of what became universal practice in India and South-east Asia. 

#%The following Pratisthätantras cited in the Kashmirian exegesis survive (in Nepalese 
manuscripts): Devyämata, Mayasamgraha, and Piñgalämata. Cited there in the Bhävacñdämani 
of Vidyäkantha but not surviving to my knowledge are the Mandikefvaramata (Æ. 17v, 53r) 
and the Pratisthäpäramesvara (Æ. 71, 8r, 12r, 13v, 17v, 23r, 24v, 57v, 67r). To these early 
Pratisthätantras must be added the Mohacüdottara, known to Soma$ambhu in the late eleventh 
century (see p. 420). 

26New South Indian scriptures are found under the titles of all the canonically listed Siva- 
bhedas: Kämika, Yogaja, Kärana, Cintya, Ajita, Dipta, Süksma, Amsumad, Sähasra, and Supra- 
bheda. Yet others were circulated under the titles of Rudrabhedas: Vijaya, Siddha, Raurava, 
Mukuta, and Vimala. 

27 However, it is obvious that Saiddhäntika Saiva officiants must have been functioning as 
priests in Saiva temples before the emergence of the South Indian scriptures devoted to their rit- 
uals. The earliest possible evidence of which I am aware is found in the Küram copper-plate in- 
scription of Paramesvaravarman I of the Pallava dynasty of Käñcï, who ruled from A.p. 668/9 to 


240 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The Kashmirian exegesis of the Mantramärga in both its divisions shows a 
deep and comprehensive knowledge of those of these traditions that were cur- 
rent in its time. Yet its perspective imposes a selective emphasis. In the scriptures 
initiates, and the officiants among them, are both married men and celibate as- 
cetics; and the epigraphical record of royal patronage, mostly confined to the 
Saiddhäntika tradition, shows that the latter were a conspicuous and influential 
element, presiding over monastic establishments (#athah) attached to temples, 
officiating as royal preceptors (räjaguruh), and bestowing initiation on their 
patrons. But in the Kashmirian exegesis we are presented above all with the 
$Saivism of married householders, this being the status of the great majority of 
its authors.? The lineage of the most Säkta form of the religion does include 
some ascetics who, as we shall see, were observers of the Käpälika Mahävrata,*° 
but the private and esoteric orientation of their religious practice means that 
they are not likely to have been engaged in the manner of the Saiddhäntikas in 
management of richly endowed religious foundations. The fact that this lineage 
is distinguished from all others known to us by the inclusion of female Gurus 
tends to the same conclusion. 

Furthermore, while the efficacity of ritual for siddhih is nowhere challenged, 
the detail of such rituals is hardly touched upon. The emphasis is overwhelm- 
ingly on the Mantramärga as the means of Liberation. The commentators have 


690. This records the appointment of an Anantagiväcärya with hereditary rights to perform the 
worship (devakarma) and periodic renovations (#avakarma) in the royal Siva temple Vidyäv- 
initapallavaparamesvara (MAHALINGAM 1988, no. 46, Il. 55-56 and 84-89). Anantasiväcärya is 
a typical Saiddhäntika initiation-name. It is therefore probable that he was a Saiddhäntika; but 
it is not certain, since it is possible that such names were current among $aiva priests before the 
Saiddhäntikas’ advent. The Saiddhäntika Saiva priests of South India are commonly referred to 
as Sivabrähmanas in inscriptions and in the Saiddhäntika scriptural sources that defend their 
rights. References to them are numerous in the inscriptions of the Cola period. But the term 
Sivabrähmana occurs considerably earlier in the Tiruvallam inscription of Pallava Nandivarman 
II, dated in c. A.b. 863. Concerning a grant to the temple of Paramesvara of Tikkälivallam it 
specifies that 500 kädi of paddy are for the Sivabrähmanas who offer worship and services in the 
sanctum (MAHALINGAM 1988, no. 132, Il. 25-26: tiruvunnäligaiyull-ärlä]dilt]t-uppäsarikkum 
(Siva]brähmanarkku nellu aiññürru-kkädiyum). But in this case too we cannot exclude the pos- 
sibility that the term Sivabrähmana predates its Saiddhäntika application. 

28See SANDERSON forthcoming c. 

2 For the existence of Saiddhäntika ascetics in Kashmir see p. 391. 

30See pp. 252, 280, 291, and 292. 

31 For female Krama Gurus see p. 263 (Mañgalä [Makäradevi]), footnote 92 on p. 263 (Rüpä- 
nandä), p. 273 (Keyüravati, Madanikä, and Kalyänikä), p. 275 (Keyüravati [Kakäradevi]), and 
p- 292 (Käni). 


Alexis Sanderson 241 


also tended to give less attention than the scriptures on which they have com- 
mented to meditation (yogah) as a path of practice in its own right. The medi- 
tator (yogi) as opposed to the master of ritual worship (kzrmÿi) and the gnostic 
(jñäni) has shifted to the periphery of vision. This is very obvious in the works 
of the Kashmirian non-Saiddhäntikas. Their scriptures place great emphasis 
on the practice of visionary meditation, particularly as the means of attain- 
ing siddhih, here understood primarily as the achieving of private supernatural 
powers such as clairvoyance, telepathy, and the ability to leave the body to enter 
other worlds. À whole culture of visionary experience has been pushed to the 
margins by the Kashmirian commentators or its accounts translated through 
creative exegesis into teachings of non-visionary liberating gnosis (j%4nam); 
and with it have disappeared from the foreground the exotic ascetic observances 
(vidyävratam, pura$caryä, caryävratam) taught in the scriptures for those seeking 
to master the Mantras for such ends. This shift of focus arises from the nature 
of the commentators’ social milieu, which is one of Saiva brahmins eager to 
consolidate their religion on the level of high culture. It is this, I propose, that 
also predisposed them to devote much more attention than can be seen in their 
scriptures to formulating their metaphysical doctrines and to defending them 
against those of their opponents in the shared language of Indian philosophical 
argument. *? 

Concerning the social position of the post-scriptural Saiva authors of Kash- 
mir we have little information and what we have is confined to the non- 
Saiddhäntika authors. À number of those bear the title Räjänaka, which was 
given by the ruler to brahmin ministers and inherited by their descendants.°° 
The Säkta Saiva teacher Hrasvanätha, also called Viranätha, was minister of war 


32See also SANDERSON 1985, p. 203. 

3See Räjatarañgini 6.117: sa pärthivatvamantritvamisrayä cestayà sphuran | räjà räjänakas 
ceti misräm evam dhiyam vyadhät ‘Brilliant by reason of his conduct that combined the char- 
acter of both king and minister he thus created the impression that he was both Räja and 
Räjänaka’”; 6.261. The title has been attributed to Utpaladeva, Abhinavagupta, Ksemaräja, 
Jayaratha, Taksakavarta, Bhullaka (Suacchandoddyota, vol. 5a, p.211, IL. 9-10), Yogaräja, and 
Räma (the author of the Spandakärikavivrti). In the Agamadambara, p.47,18-20, p.49, 
14-15 Samkarsana is made Bhattaéri-Samkarsana by the king when he is appointed to a 
position in the administration. Kashmirian Säkta Saiva authors whose names are so pre- 
fixed are Kallata (e.g., Yogaräja, Paramärthasära, p.91), Bhäskara (author of the Sivasätravär- 
tika), Vamana[datta]/Viravämanaka (Spandanirnaya, p.48, quoting his Subodhodayamañjart, 
Yogaräja on Paramärthasära, p.146), Sitikantha (author of the Kawlasñtra [colophon: krtir 
gurubhattasriitikanthasyeti subham]), and Somänanda (Utpaladeva, Évarapratyabhijñakärikä- 
vrtti on 4.16). 


242 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


and peace under king Yaéaskara (r. A.D. 939-948);% the innermost circle of the 
devotees of Abhinavagupta, the most famous and gifted of these Kashmirian ex- 
egetes, consisted of members of ministerial families, one a grandson of the same 
king's prime minister; and his commentator Jayaratha reports that his patri- 
lineal ancestors included ministers under Yaéaskara, Ananta (r. 1028-1063), 
Uccala (r. 1101-1111), and Räjadeva (r. 1213-1236), the last of these being 
his own father.*$ A connection with the milieu of the court is also suggested by 
contributions by these authors to belles-lettres and the theory of poetry, drama, 
dance, and music.” The humbler title Bhatta and the absence of evidence of 
any such high-cultural activities among the Saiddhäntikas both suggest that 


their social position was less elevated. 


THE SIDDHANTA 


In this domain we have commentaries by Bhatta Näräyanakantha on the 
Mrgendra, by his son Bhatta Rämakantha (Il) on the Matañgapäramesvara, 
the Kälottara in its three hundred and fifty verse recension, and the first 
twelve chapters of the Xÿrana (of which the commentary on the first six 
has been published), and references to a commentary, now lost, on the 
Sväyambhuvasütrasamgeraha (Sväyambhuvoddyota). Bhütikantha, probably a 


member of this same lineage, is credited with a commentary on the Xirana.°® 


34See p.280. 

5 Parätrifikävivarana, concluding verses 5—10 (A) and Tanträloka 37.65-83 (B), concerning 
his disciples Karna (Vallabha, prime minister [amaätyägranih] of Yaéaskara [A 5] — $Sauri, who 
retired as a minister to devote himself to religion [B 75] — Karna), and his cousin Mandra, 
described as the wealthy and learned son of an unnamed minister (B 66). Sauri was the brother 
of Mandra father and was married to Vatsalikä (A 6ab, B 75a [emending bhrätä to bhartä]), 
in a house provide by whom Abhinavagupta wrote his Tanträloka (B 82). 

36 Tanträlokaviveka, concluding verses 8-41: Pürnamanoratha, minister of king Yasaskara — 
Utpala[ratha] — Prakä$aratha — Süryaratha — Utpalaratha, minister of Ananta, and disciple 
ofhis mother brother Vibhütidatta, grandson ofan unnamed minister of finance — $ivaratha, 
minister of Uccala; his brother Sammaratha — Gunaratha — Guñgaratha — Srngäraratha, 
minister of Räjaräja (Räjadeva, r. 1213-1236), initiated by Subhatadatta, descendant of Vi- 
bhütidatta and author of a lost commentary on the Zanträloka — Jayaratha. 

$7Thus we have Abhinavaguptas commentaries on the Dhvanyäloka of Anandavardhana (- 
locana), the Bharatanätyasästra (Abhinavabhäratï), and the Ghatakarpara, and Jayaratha’s com- 
mentary (-vimarsini) on the Alamkärasarvasva of Ruyyaka. 

8Vaktrasambhu, Mrgendrapaddhatitikä, p.208, IL 12-17: srimatkiranamrgendramatañga- 
sväyambhuvasüksmasväyambhuvarauravädisu sarvesu Sästresu garbhädhänädayah *“smrtyukta- 


Alexis Sanderson 243 


From Bhatta Rämakantha (I) pupil Bhatta Vidyäkantha (II) we have an un- 
published commentary (Bhävacüdämani) on the unpublished Pratisthätantra 
Mayasamgraha; and a commentary on another unpublished scripture of this 
kind, the Piñgalämata, is attributed by one source to Bhatta Näräyanakantha”? 
and by another to Bhatta Rämakantha.* From these two authors also came 
a number of exegetical works on the Sväyambhuvavrtti and Rauravavriti, 
commentaries by the early Saiddhäntika authority Sadyojyotis on the doctri- 
nal teachings of the scriptures Sväyambhuvasütrasamgraha and Rauravasütra- 
samgraba. Bhatta Näräyanakanthas Sväyambhuvavrttitippanaka on the former 
has not come to light, but of Bhatta Rämakanthas Rauravavrttiviveka on the 
latter we have the Moksakärikävrtti and the Paramoksaniräsakärikävrtti, and ref- 
erences to and citations from the Mantravärtikavrtti, the Agamaviveka (= Sarvä- 
gamaprämänyopanyäsa), and his commentary on the section dealing with Mu- 
dräs.“! We also have his unpublished commentary (-vivrti) on Sadyojyotis 
Tattvatrayanirnaya, which is an analysis of the ontology of the Sv2yambhuva- 
sätrasamgraha®? There was also a lengthy commentary (brhattikä) by Bhatta 
Näräyanakantha on the Zattvasamgraha, in which Sadyojyotis set out the on- 
tology of the Rauravasütrasamgraha; but this has not come to light. We know 
of it only from the South Indian Saiddhäntika Aghoragiva, who tells us that he 
wrote his own short commentary (/aghutikä) on the Tattvasamgraha for the ben- 


samskäräh (smrtyukta conj. : rutyukta Cod.) diksämadhye Sivamantrair bhavisyadbrähmanaÿä- 
tipradakarmasamhäräy"oktä iti (conij. : oktäh | Cod.) srrmatkiranavriti*krdbhätikanthäcäryena 
(krd em. : krta Cod.) diksäyäm uktam. 

#Trilocanasiväcärya, Somasambhupaddhativyäkhya, p. 99, 11. 13-15: sad uktam piñgaläma- 
tatikäyäm näräyanakanthena pithäntam pithavyäpiti. 

The anonymous commentary -vy&khyä on the Sivapñjästava of Jñänasambhu, p.90: 
piñgalämatavrttau rämakanthenäpi “vyäpinyäm ädhärasaktyavasthäyäm sthitam” iti, cited in 
GoopaLL 1998, p.xxvi. I thank him for reminding me of his report of this citation when I 
mentioned Trilocanasiva’s assertion that the work is by Bhatta Näräyanakantha. I see no hard 
evidence that would enable us to establish which of these two attributions is correct, but I in- 
cline to favour the first. Bhatta Rämakantha has not referred to the Pirigalämata in his surviving 
works, while his father cites five lines from it under its alias /ayadrathädhikära, in Mreendravrtti, 
Kriyäpäda, p.47, Il. 8-13. 

#1On these commentaries that constituted or were parts of the Rauravavrttiviveka and Bhatta 
Rämakantha*s other works see GoopaLz 1998, pp. xviii-xxviii. 

#2%$ee GoopazL 2004, p. lxi. The codex unicus of this commentary has been located by Kei 
KATAOKA and is being edited for publication by Diwakar AcHarvA, Kei KaraoKkA and Dominic 
GoopaLL, to whom I am very grateful for supplying me with a photocopy of the manuscript 
and his transcription in the form of an e-text. 


244 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


efit of those whose understanding the longer work had taxed.#? Finally, we have 
Bhatta Rämakanthas Marefvarapariksäprakäsa. This, a commentary on Sadyo- 
jyotis philosophical treatise Naresvarapariksä ‘An Enquiry into the Soul and 
God’, is surely his most outstanding work. Transcending association with this 
or that individual scripture it provides a reasoned philosophical defence against 
the Buddhists, Mimämsakas and others of what it takes to be the shared doc- 
trinal position of all the scriptures. For while differences between individual 
scriptures in matters of ritual procedure (kriyä), meditation (yoga), and rules 
of discipline (caryä) were recognized—indeed one was strictly enjoined to stay 
within the parameters of a single scripture in this regard—differences on the 
doctrinal level (j#änam, vidyà), though, of course, they existed, especially be- 
tween earlier and later texts, could not be seen without throwing into doubt 
the unitary validity of the corpus and had therefore to be thought away, either 
through selective neglect or faith-driven creative exegesis. 

Bhatta Näräyanakantha also composed a Paddhati, a systematic guide to the 
performance of the Saiddhäntika rituals, based on the X%lottara, now known 
only from references in his sons commentary on that scripture“* and from an 
excerpt or paraphrase in the Mryädisamgrahapaddhati, an unpublished Kash- 
mirian Paddhati in the form of a digest of $aiva scriptural sources compiled by 
Räjänaka Taksakavarta® at some time after the eleventh century. A late South 
Indian source claims the composition of Paddhatis not only by Näräyanakantha 
but also by other Gurus of this -kantha lineage: by Rämakantha, Vaidyakantha, 
probably identical with Vidyäkantha, Vibhütikantha, probably one with the 


8 Tartvasamgrahatika, introductory verses 3—4. 

#Särdhatrisatikälottaravrtti, pp. 28, 29, 36, 42, 58, and 59. In all these cases Bhatta Räma- 
kantha introduces verses in the Anustubh metre by saying that they are “what his Guru has said 
on this [matter] in [his] Paddhati” (yad uktam |] proktam | tad idam uktam] asmadgurubhir atra 
paddhatau). 

S Nityädisamgrahapaddhati, f. 31135: pascäd asesatattva*vyäpitväd ähüya (con. : vyäpitvam 
ähuyec Cod.) chivam mürtau uccärya *“mülamantram (em. : mülamantra Cod.) plutäntam udya- 
ntrtävalambanatah brahmädikäranesvaranisevitebhyah padebhya udgamya dhvaninidhanadhä- 
mni *kramäd viliya (conj. : manänñgriliya Cod.) srstikramena vinivrttya ciccittapavanaväcakavä- 
cyänäm sämarasyam anubhüya hrtpundarikamadhyät sphuradanupamadhämatärakäkäram sau- 
sumnena pathà tam samgrhya ca Säntamudrayà nyaset. $rinäräyanakanthenetyädistam nijapaddh- 
atau. For the title of this digest see the final colophon (f.75v14-15): samäpteyam nityädisamgra- 
bäbhidhänà paddhatih krtis tatrabhavatah mahämähesvaräcäryasrimattaksakavartasyeti ivam. In 
an intermediate colophon it is referred to simply as the Mryädisañgraha and described as ex- 
tracted from the scriptures: ity ägamoddhrte nityädisamgrahe (£. 24v4, etc.). 

#6On the question of Taksakavarta’s date see p. 420. 


Alexis Sanderson 245 


Bhütikantha who composed a commentary on the Kirana, and Srikantha, 
who is probably the scholar of this name who wrote the Ratnatrayapariksä, à 
treatise of unknown scriptural affiliation.{” À Srikanthapaddhati, perhaps by 
this scholar, has been quoted once by the South Indian Saiddhäntika Vak- 
trasambhu, in the twelfth century. 

It may be thought that Somaéambhus famous Paddhati should be included 
in this account of Kashmirian Saiddhäntika literature. For the Räjänakas of 
Padmapura (Pampur, 34°02'35"N 74°53'53"E) have claimed Soma$ambhu as 
one of their remote ancestors, at least from the fifteenth century onwards. But 
the claim is dubious. In the Kashmirian version of the final verses of his Pad- 
dhati he is said to have been a brahmin of the Gärgya Gotra,* while the Räja- 


The source that lists these Paddhatis is the Saivabhäsana of Pañcäksarayogin (17th cen- 
tury). See BRUNNER 1963-1998, pt. 4, pp. xlv-xlvi. On the question of $rikantha's identity 
and position in the Kashmirian -kantha lineage see SANDERSON forthcoming b. 

#8Mrgendrapaddhatitikä, p.130, IL 10-15: srikanthapaddhatau .….. "The name of the au- 
thor of this work is given at the end of the manuscript in the wreckage of the follow- 
ing verse in the Särdülavikridita metre (p.253, IL. 10-15): #( + + +) natesvarena guruna 
vakträdinàä $ambhunä $rimacchamkarasinuna viracità tikà samäptàä (mayä) | “rimacchrimr- 
garäjaräjapadavipräptaprathäyäh (mrgaräjaräjapadavi conj. : mrlge/ndraräjapaddhatir iti Cod. 
[probably by substitution of a marginal gloss]) *krter (em. : krtor Cod.) | &rädhyasya 
madiyapäsavipinacchede (madiya em. : diya Cod.) kuthärätmanah ‘Here ends the commentary 
composed by the Guru $ambhu-after-Vaktra, *a Nataräja [among ...(?)], son of the venerable 
Sañkara, on the composition known as the Mrgendrapaddhati of the Worshipful Master who 
was the axe that served to cut through the forest of my bonds.” The expression vakträdinàä $amb- 
bunä (Sambhu-after-Vaktra!) is a periphrasis of a common type for the initiation-name Vaktra- 
$ambhu (= Vaktrasiva, Tatpurusagiva, Purusasiva); cf. somah $ambhüttarah for Somasambhu in 
footnote 50 on p. 246. The obvious emendation madiya for diya makes him the pupil of Agho- 
ra$iva, the author of this Paddhati on the Mrgendra, who dated the completion of his Kriyäkra- 
madyotikä in Saka 1080 (a.p. 1157/8). It is possible that -ratesvarena after the lacuna of three 
syllables gives his mundane name or part of it. But since we are told the authors initiation- 
name I have taken it to mean that he is praising himself as outstanding (‘a [veritable] Nateévara 
[Nataräja]”) in some class lost in the lacuna, most probably the [Saiva] learned. In favour of 
this hypothesis we can cite a parallel in a text of the same kind from the same region and com- 
munity. The Asmärthapñjapaddhati refers to Präsädasiva, author of the Präsadapaddhati as à 
Nataräja among Gurus (p. 4, Il. 1-2): anyac cärutaram kriyäkaranakam sanmandanam nirmitam 
präsädäkhyasivena defikanatesena svanämocitam ‘Another, most elegant aid in the performance 
of the rituals, an ornament of the virtuous, was composed by Präsädagiva, that Nataräja among 
Gurus, and named after him’. 

Karmakändakramävali, v. 1810c-1811: gärgye kule samudito vitatävadätavidyavisesa*ku- 
Salah (em. : kusala Ed.) $rutasilavän yah | frimän asau somasiväbhidhäno dikcakravälodaragita- 
kirtih | faivagamaÿño munivrndavandyas cakre kriyäkändapadakramävalim ‘The venerable So- 
magiva (/Soma$ambhu), born in the Gärgya Gotra, adept in his vast and pure higher knowl- 


246 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


nakas of Padmapura tell us that their Gotra is the Gautama.”°? In any case, 


edge, endowed with both learning and morality, his fame proclaimed through the world in 
all directions, master of the $aiva scriptures, revered by the community of [Saiva] ascetics, has 
composed [this] Kriyäkändapadakramävalr . 

The claim that Somasambhu was an early member of the Kashmirian lineage of the 
Räjänakas of Padmapura (the Räzdäns of Pampur) and the report that their Gotra is that of 
Gautama is seen in the concluding verses of Räjänaka Ananda's Naisadhiyakävyatattvavivrti, 
in *Räjänakavamsaprasamsaä À, f. 1, 1.25, 10-11, f.2, Il. 1-7 (vv. 12, 5, and 10-12): 45% 
Srifäradäpithah *kafmirä (B : kafmira À) iti vifrutah |  vidyänam muktibijänäm ksetram 
ksetrajñasiddhidam | 2 äste padmapuram tatra padmasadmapuropamam | *mähesvaraih (em. 
STEIN in marg. : mahesvaraih AB) $ripatibhir bhüdevair upasobhitam | 5 jayanti jagati 
khyätà râjänakapadänvayät | taträbhijatäs sadvidyà guravo gautamänvayäh | ..….. 10 *kaiyya- 
ttovattamammattakstrasvämimukhair ayam (B : kaiyyattovattamammatta em. : kaiyyatthova- 
thamammattha À) | fatasäkhikrto vamso muktänäm udayasthali | 11 asminn anante vamsä- 
bdhau citprakäsair vikäsayan | lokam *Yambbhättaro (B : $ambhubhuro À : $ambhudharo conij. 
STEIN : fambhuparo conj. STEIN in handwritten notes at the end of the transcript) jajñe somah 
soma iväparah | 12 nigrahänugrahaih khyäto loke vigrahaväñ Sivah | yas cakre farmane ‘nünäm 
Saivakarmakramävalim ‘There is the throne of the Goddess of Learning (Säradä) known as 
Kashmir, the home of the sciences that lead to Liberation, the bestower of success on souls. 
In it is Padmapura, the equal of the heaven of Brahmä, adorned by wealthy $aiva brahmins. 
Hide Victorious are its noble and wise Gurus of the Gautama Gotra, famed in the world by 
their possession of the title Räjänaka. This lineage, this source ofliberated souls, has spread 
in countless branches through Kaïiyata, Uvata, Mammata, Ksïirasvämin and others. In the vast 
ocean of this lineage was born Soma, [his name] followed by -éambhu (fzmbhüttaro ….somabh), 
who, like the moon (somah) caused mankind to expand with the radiances of his consciousness, 
who, famed for both his chastisements [of the unobservant] and for the favour he showed [to 
the worthy by granting them initiation and instruction], was Siva himself in human form, who 
composed the Saivakarmakramävali for the welfare of souls’. It is only after this verse that the 
account of the lineage generation by generation begins, running from the fourteenth to the sev- 
enteenth centuries. The claim that Somasambhu was a member of this lineage had already been 
made in the fifteenth century in a similar encomium given by Räjänaka Sitikantha in his com- 
mentary on the Bälabodhini of Jagaddhara in *Räjänakavamsaprasamsaä À, £.9, 1. 6-9 (vv.2): 
vidyätirthavihärasälini param $risäradäsamsraye kauberyä harito lalätatilake ka$miradese ‘bhaye | 
yac chripadmapuram (yac chri corr. : yah $rï AB) purandarapuraprodyatprabham bhäsate | 
taträcäryavaro babhüva bhagavän somah sa somaprabhah ‘In Padmapura, which shines with the 
great radiance of the heaven of Indra in the land of Kashmir that is secure from all dangers, the 
forehead mark of the north, the home of Säradä, rich in learning, holy sites, and Vihäras, there 
was born the venerable Soma, radiant as the moon, the foremost of [$aiva] Âcäryas’. Hélène 
Brunner, to whom I communicated these passages, took them (1963-1998, pt. 4, p. xlv) to be 
persuasive evidence that Somasambhu was indeed a Kashmirian by birth and that the clash of 
Gotras was of no consequence since the verse that attributes the Gärgya Gotra to Somasambhu 
appears only in the Kashmirian edition of the text and is therefore not authentic. However, 
one wonders what motive there could have been for a Kashmirian redactor to have inserted 
this false information. There are, incidentally, no Räzdäns with the Gotra Gärgya. 


Alexis Sanderson 247 


even if Somasambhu was from Kashmir, the Saiddhäntika Saiva ritual system 
that he teaches is in no sense characteristic of that region. Somasambhu wrote 
for a pan-Indian audience while holding office as the abbot of the prestigious 
Golakimatha near Tripuri in Central India. 

One set of features above all others may be said to mark out the Kashmirian 
Saiddhäntikas’ exegesis from that of their Säkta contemporaries. This is its un- 
compromising ritualism, relative mundanity, and professionalism. For Bhatta 
Rämakantha the soul’s state of bondage is one of ignorance, but he denies that 
knowledge, the usual means ofliberation in Indian soteriologies, is able to elim- 
inate that state. This is because its root cause is impurity (w14lah), defined as an 
imperceptible, all-pervasive substance (ravyam) that prevents the deployment 
of the soul’s innate omniscience and omnipotence. Being a substance it can be 
removed only by action (vyäpärah), and the only action that can remove it is 
the ritual of Saiva initiation performed by $iva himself acting in the person of 
a consecrated officiant. Moreover, the liberation to be achieved through ini- 
tiation is a future state, one that will become manifest only at death. So the 
question who #s liberated does not arise for these Saiddhäntikas. The only is- 
sue is that of who wi] be liberated and that being dependent on whether or 
not one has been accepted for initiation is a matter entirely within the control 
of the Siddhänta’s institutions. For the Säktas too the performance of ritual 
and the bestowing of qualification through publicly verifiable ceremonies were 
important, but they were subordinated to a gnostic perspective that allowed 
the possibility of Liberation and qualification to office through illumination 
alone, gradual or sudden, without the necessity of ritual. Moreover, the cause 
of bondage was defined simply as ignorance and therefore the state of libera- 
tion brought about by its removal could be seen as a goal that could be achieved 
before death. Of course, liberation through insight alone and recognition as a 
Guru without passing through visible ceremonies but by an internal and there- 
fore unverifiable “consecration by the goddesses of one's own mind and senses”, 
were seen as exceptional. But the possibility was there for charismatic individ- 
uals to enter and innovate in a way and to a degree that was hardly conceivable 
within the more institutionalized Siddhänta. Similarly, Bhatta Rämakantha is 
more restrictive than the Säktas in his assessment of the criteria of selection for 
initiation, trenchantly opposing the lax theory of inferable grace that enabled 
the Säktas to justify post-mortem initiations performed at the request of the 
deceased's relatives, the fervour of such requests, or simply the Guru’s own de- 
sire to assist the dead being taken as valid signs that Siva wished the ritual to 


248 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


be performed.°! This opposition between Bhatta Rämakantha and the Säktas 
prompts the observation that while the Saivism of the Säktas was in general 
more esoteric and less public than that of the Siddhänta it nonetheless encom- 
passed a spectrum of practice that extended further into the domain of social 
religion than the Saiddhäntikas felt able to go. The staider Siddhänta stressed 
in accordance with its metaphysical pluralism (dvaitavädah) the primacy and 
irreducibility of individuals acting for their own benefit, so aligning itself in 
the wider context of religious values with the autonomism of the brahmani- 
cal Mimämsaka ritualists.®? Just as the Mimämsakas autonomism prevented 
them from providing an adequate account of the domain of social religion, 
where religious acts are performed by individuals as representatives of families 
or communities who expect to share the merit of those acts, so that the fre- 
quent assertions of shared merit in the literature have to be dismissed as not 
literally true (arthavädah), so the Siddhänta, as it chose to draw closer to this 
polarity of brahmanical thought, found itself disinclined to justify those areas 
of established Saiva practice in which individualism was blurred. The left, there- 
fore, was enabled to outflank the Siddhänta on both sides by offering itself to 
Saivas not merely as a higher, more esoteric kind of practice but also as better 
equipped to justify the more mundane faiths of the religion. 


THE COMMENTARY ON THE PINGALAMATA 


Of the scriptures on which these Kashmirian Saiddhäntikas wrote or based 
Paddhatis, the Rauravasütrasamgraha, the Sväyambhuvasütrasamgraha, the 
Matañgapäramesvara, the Kirana, the Kälottara, the Mrgendra, and the 
Mayasamgraha are all texts of the Saiddhäntika canon, as we would expect. 
But the remaining scripture, the Pratisthätantra Piñgalämata, is not. For that 
work, of which several Nepalese manuscripts survive, connects itself and is in- 
deed connected with the Säkta-inclined Yämala tradition of the Brahmayämala 
(Picumata). * That a commentary on such a text should be among the works 


51On post-mortem initiation (#rtoddhärah) in Kashmir see SANDERSON 2005b, pp. 264- 
267. 

2On the Mimämsakas’ autonomism see SANDERSON 1985, pp. 193-196. 

3On the opposition between the two theories of liberation, through ritual and knowledge, 
in the Saiddhäntika and Säkta views, see SANDERSON 1995, pp. 38-47, and on the opposed 
metaphysical doctrines that underly these theories see SANDERSON 1992, pp. 282-291. 

SPiñgalämata, f. 2v4: asya tantrasya kà samjñä. piñgalämatasamjña pratisthäkalpam jayadra- 
thädhikäram brahmayämalasyäntahpätiti ca …..(£. 2v6:) sa ca dvividhah (corr. : dvividham Cod.) 


Alexis Sanderson 249 


of these Saiddhäntikas may surprise. However, the procedures it teaches are for 
the most part exactly those that are the subject of Saiddhäntika texts of this kind 
as described above. It teaches non-Saiddhäntika ritual procedures and details of 
iconography specific to the Väma, Yämala, and Trika traditions, but only in ad- 
dition to these.*” As such it is not only a source relevant to Saiddhäntikas—and 
indeed it is much cited by them— but also a valuable indication that the sep- 


kämarüpy odayänt ca. ayam ca kämarüpt ….(f. 313—5:) idänim brahmayämalasyäntahpätity äsa- 
ñkäà ‘daurväsyam paicikam caiva särasvatamatam tathà | jayadratham ca phetkäram pañcamam 
pariktrtitam | raktädyam lampatädyam ca saptadhà brahmayämalam” etesäm saptavidhabrahma- 
yämalänäm madhye kim iti. jayadratham etat What is the name of this Tantra? The name is 
Piñgalämata. [Also known as the] /ayadrathädhikära it is a text on the rituals of installation and 
is part of the Brahmayämala [group]. …It is twofold: that of Kämarüpa and that of Uddiyäna. 
This is that of Kämarüpa. .…. Now it will be asked which this is of the seven Brahmayämala texts 
taught in the passage “The Brzhmayämala is sevenfold: the Durväsomata, the Pecikämata, the 
Sarasvatimata, the Jayadratha, the Phetkäramata fifth, the Raktämata, and the Lampatämata”. 
Itis the Jayadratha Cf. Jayadrathayämala, Satka 1, f. 329r1-3 (40.163-165), on the Mata divi- 
sions ofthe BrahmayämalalPicumata: tad ekam saptadhà bhinnam brahmäkhyam $rävakecchayä | 
raktädyam pecikädyam ca $frgälimatam eva ca | $ämbaram nilakesäkhyam bhärundäkhyam ca 
piñgalam | $ambaram tu dvidhä bhinnam bhedenotphullakena tu | evam etäni castau ca matäni 
kathitäni tu | vistirnäni kurañgäksi tantre smin brahmayämale “This one Brahmalyämala] has 
divided into seven to meet the wishes of those to whom it was to be taught: Raktämata, Pecikä- 
mata, Srgälimatal Pherämata, Sambarämata, Nilake‘imata, Bhärundämatal Bhärudimata, and 
Piñgalämata, together with the Utphullakamata (for the Sambarämata has this as one of its 
two divisions). Thus, O doe-eyed one, I have told you the eight extensive Mata texts that are 
within this Tantra Brahmayämala’. 

The text does not refer to these traditions by name, but it gives the colours of their prin- 
cipal deities in the Citrädhikära, its section on painted images (Parä, Paräparä, and Aparä 
[Trika]; Tumburu, Jayä, Vijaya, Ajitä, and Aparäjitä [Vämal]; Bhairava, Raktä, Karälä, Candäksi, 
and Mahochusmä [Yämala]), f. 28r5-v6: (Citrädhikära, v. 18:) parä raktä jayà caiva svadütyà 
saba sundari | sarve $ukläh samäkhyätä ye cänye Subhasambhaväh …(20:) raktavarnäh smrtä hy 
ete karälä vijayà tathà | aparà saha dûütyà ca ye cänye tatparicchadäh …..(22c-23b:) ajità caiva 
candäkst dütyà saha varänane | sarve prtäh samäkhyatäh svaparigrahasamyutäh .….(24:) paräparä 
mahocchusmä ajità kimkariyutä | krsnavarnäh smrtä hy età vas cänyäs tatsamudbhaväh ….(33- 
36:) raktädyäh patraga likhya bhairavam karnikopari | bhairavam ca dhuram krtvä pañktisthas 
täs tu devatäh | catuskam ca tathà sastham dvädasätmam ca sodasam | caturvimsam likhed devam 
vidhinänena suvrate | jayädyas cakragäs tadvat pañktisthä va likhet kramät | nävärüdhäs ca va 
Ükhyäs tumburuh karnadhärakah | parädyäh fülahastäs ca trifiräs tu tripadmake | svasastroktä- 
thavà likhya cakrasamsthätha pañktigäh. 

S6E.g., Vidyäkantha, Bhävacidämani ff. 4v, 8v, 21r, 24r, 25r, 25v, 35v, 37v, 40r, 43r, 43v, 
44v, 50v, 53r, 53v, 55r, 57v, 61r, 61v, 62v, and 661; Somasambhupaddhati, pt. 4, p.71, 
v. 6cd; p.123, v. 143cd; Jñänasiva, /ñanaratnävali, pp. 481, 485, 548, 563, and 567; änasi- 
vagurudevapaddhati, Kriyäpäda, p.369; Vaktra$ambhu, Mrgendrapaddhatitikä, p.238; Bhatta 
Sivottama, Varunapaddhativrtti, p.41. 


250 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


aration and opposition between the Saiddhäntika and non-Saiddhäntika forms 
of Saivism is less clear-cut than appears from reading the commentaries on the 
general Tantras. For those are restricted in their scope to one or other of the tra- 
ditions, paying little or no attention to the others. Furthermore, the Kashmirian 
exegetes of the Saiddhäntika and Säkta-inclined Tantras developed mutually 
opposed metaphysical views, encouraging us to assume that this dichotomy on 
the level of learned theory must reflect an equally strict separation on the level 
of ritual practice among Saiva officiants. While there may have been officiants 
limited to purely Saiddhäntika procedures there were certainly others who were 
not, as the existence of the Piñgalämata indicates.°” 


THE KALIKULA 


Kashmirians of the Säkta Saiva division have given us exegesis in two traditions, 
the Kälikula and the Trika, and, from the standpoint of those, on the cult of 
Tripurasundari, and on two non-Saiddhäntika scriptures for the propitation of 
Bhairava and his consort that were the primary basis of the Kashmirian Saiva 
Paddhatis, thus inserting their exegesis into the less esoteric domain of main- 
stream observance. 

The Kälikula texts teach the means of propitiating numerous forms of the 
goddess Käli/Kälasamkarsant.*® Within this literature we find a great mass 
of Kalpas that conform in their ritual structure to the standard type of the 
Mantramärga, that is to say, with a single goddess to be propitiated at the cen- 
tre of a single retinue of secondary powers or emanations, but also a tradition of 
a different kind, known as the Krama or Great Teaching (Mahänaya, Mahärtha, 


57In future work I hope to explore further the theme of the co-functionality of these Saiva 
systems that we have too readily seen as though they were those of distinct schools or sects. Some 
evidence of this has already been presented. I have shown the input of the ritual system of the 
Daksina Svacchanda into the early Saiddhäntika ritual manuals (SANDERSON 2004, pp. 358- 
361 and footnote 27), the diversity of ritual systems, Saiddhäntika and non-Saiddhäntika, 
in the practice of the specialized $Saiva officiants whose duties are the subject of the Metra 
(SANDERSON 2005b, pp. 245, 252-254), and the co-existence of Saiddhäntika, Daksina, and 
Säkta ritual in the repertoire of the $aiva officiant taught in the Urtarabhäga of the Lingapuräna 
(ibid., pp. 235-236). For a summary classification of the Mantramärga into nine ritual systems 
see ibid., p. 229, footnote 1. 

S8The post-scriptural Kashmirian literature regularly gives the name of this goddess as 
Kälasamkarsint, but the manuscripts of our scriptural sources always give it as Kälasamkarsani 
in keeping with common Aifa usage for the feminine of krt derivatives in -ana-. 


Alexis Sanderson 251 


Mahämnäya),” in which Kälï is worshipped as the central deity in a sequence 
of deity circles seen as embodying successive phases of her operation in the 
cosmic process conceived as those of a dynamic consciousness to be contem- 
plated through the sequence of worship as the worshippers own cyclical low 
of awareness in the perception of objects. 

Of the scriptures of the Kälikula the following were known to the 
Kashmirians: the /ayadrathayämala, the Kälikulapañcasataka, the Kälikula- 
kramasadbhäva, and the /Devi-]särdhasatikä. These, with the exception of the 
[Devi-}särdha$sataka and the latter part of the Kälikulakramasadbhäva, have sur- 
vived in Nepalese manuscripts. Of the Särdha$ataka only four verses have come 
down to us, giving the names of the thirteen Kälis that form the circle of the 
Nameless (anäkhyacakram), in which the Krama’s worship culminates in the 
system of the Kä/ikulapañcasataka. 

In addition to these we have Nepalese manuscripts of other related Kälikula 
scriptures: the Devidvyardhasatikä, à version of much of which has also been 
transmitted in the Siddhakhanda of the Manthänabhairava,®\ the composite 
Yonigahvara, which shares much material with the Devidvyardhasatikä and 


For the variety of terms used to denote this system see, e.g., (1) Kä/kulakramasadbhava, 
f.3v8 (3.4); Arnasimha, Mahänayaprakä$a, £. 120v4-5 (v. 166): krama$äsanam; (2) Käl- 
kulakramasadbhäva, £. 6V6 (3.1): kramärthah; (3) Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p. 189, 1. 1: kra- 
madarsanam; (4) Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.157, 1.7: kramanayah; (5) Trivandrum, Mahä- 
nayaprakäsa 1.2cd, 9.52a, Spandanirnaya, p.9, 1.3, p.78, L. 16: mahärthah; (6) Arnasimha, 
Mahänayaprakäsa, £. 120r2 (v.159); Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.193, L. 16: mahänayah; (7) 
Arnasimha, Mahänayaprakäsa, f. 103v5 (v. 4), f. 121r1 (v. 167), commentary on Sitikantha's 
Mahänayaprakäsa, p. 141, IL. 12-13; Ksemaraja, Sivasärravimarsint, p.29, 1.7: mahämnäyah: 
(8) Arnasimha, Mahänayaprakäsa, £. 120r4-5 (v. 161), Yonigahvara, v. 492: mahäsäsanam; (9) 
qu. in Zanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.193, L. 16: kälinayah; (10) Kälikäkulapañcasataka, . 8rl 
(2.52): kälikäkramabh; (11) Arnasimha, Mahänayaprakä$a, f. 1195 (v. 157), Mahänayaprakäsa 
(Triv.) 3.109: devatänayah; (12) qu. in Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p. 196, 1. 11, Viñänabhairava- 
vivrti, p.110, L. 15: devinayah; (13) qu. in Zanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.195, L. 14: atinayab, 
though the commentator on Sitikanthas Mahänayaprakä$a refers to the atinayah as that of 
which the Krama teaching is the essence: asmims câtinayasärasarvasve kramärthe (p. 126, IL 11- 
12; cf. p. 141, IL. 12-13); and (14) Ksemaräja, Sivasätravimarsini, p. 21, 1. 5: rahasyämnäyab. 

S0The verses have been quoted by Jayaratha in Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p. 161, IL. 6-13. In 
1.9 emend svakälï to sukäli. The passage is identical except for minor differences with Devi- 
dvyardhasatikä, #. 14v7—15r5 (vv. 175c-179). 

SlManthänabhairava, Siddhakhanda, f.179v1-186v3. This forms a chapter of 115 verses 
with the title #r-asitävidyädhikäravarnanakramodayah. In the Devidvyardhasatikä Bhairava asks 
the questions and the Goddess answers them. But here the roles have been reversed in line with 
the rest of the Manthänabhairava. 


252 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


some with the X%/;kulakramasadbhäva, and the *Urraragharämnäya that is a 
section of the Ciñcinimatasärasamuccaya®? and includes two short texts, the 
Kälikäkramaslokadvädasikä and the Kälikäkramapañcäsikä, which it describes 
as having been taught by the Siddha Niskriyänanda, also called Krodharäja, 
to the Siddha Vidyänanda, described as à denizen of the cremation-ground 
(smasänavast) 

Several verses of a Kälikäkrama have been quoted by Ksemaräja. This should 
perhaps be added to the list of Kälikula scriptural texts known to the Kashmiri- 
ans, though the verses lack the vocatives indicative of dialogue and any of the 
Ai$a deviations from Paninian norms typical of such texts.‘ 


THE EXEGESIS OF THE JAYADRATHAYAMALA/TANTRARAJA 


The /ayadrathayämala, comprising four parts, each of some six thousand stan- 
zas (Satka), is far larger in extent than the rest of the surviving literature of the 
Kälikula combined, and at least the last three parts appear to have been redacted 
in Kashmir. The first part is earlier than the others, presents itelf as a complete 
work, and gives us no strong reason that I can see for assuming that it too is 
Kashmirian in origin. Jayaratha quotes frequently from the first, third, and 
fourth quarters in his commentary on the Tanträloka, without attribution® or 


2 Ciñcinimatasärasamuccaya fF. 20r8—24v3 (7.155-245). 7.155ab: punar anyam pravaksyämi 
ämnäyagharam uttaram. 

3 Ciñcinimatasärasamuccaya, f. 20V6-7 (7.164c—165a): labhyate sma mahäjñänam vidyärä- 
jena suvrate | krodharäjena vikhyätam: f.21v3-4 (7.182-183): Släcitir munivaras tasya 
putras tapodhanah | yogäbhyäsarato devi siddhah Säbararüpadhrk | vidyänandeti vikhyäto 
mahäviravarah priye | $masänaväst nityastho nifätanaratah param: f. 21v7-8 (7.187c-188b): 
tasya tusto munivaro niskriyänanda uttamah | amoghavänyä tasyaiva samkräntam kälikäkra- 
mam; f.24r3—4 (7.241): friniskriyänandanäthena $äbarasyaiva bhütale | uktä pañcäsikä devi 
kälikäkramam uttamam. 

À Svasñtravimarsint, p.118, Il. 1-7 (the first verse has also been cited in Nerroddyota, vol. 2, 
p.202, IL. 2-3, and the first two verses in Paramärthasäravivrti, p.90, Il. 1-4); Tanträlokaviveka, 
vol. 2, p. 56, IL. 3-6; vol. 3, p. 390, 11. 9-12; p. 119, IL. 8-9; pp. 133, L. 12-134, 1. 2; p. 133, IL 9- 
10; and p. 139, IL. 9-10. 

On the independence of the first Sarka see SANDERSON 2002, p. 2. For evidence of the 
Kashmirian origin of the rest of the text see SANDERSON 2005b, pp. 278-283. 

SESatka 3, .76v8-77r2 at Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 11, Ahnika 29, p.92, IL 15-19; f. 130r7— 
vl ibid., p. 66, IL 15-16. Satka 4: f. 121r2-6 ibid., vol. 8, p. 186, Il. 14-5 and pp. 186, L 17- 
187, L. 2; £ 123r7 ibid., p.63, L. 20; £ 199v2-3 ibid., vol. 2, p. 103, IL. 16-17; £ 200v6-7 ibid., 
p- 164, IL. 12-13; f. 200v7 ibid, p. 145, L. 5; £. 206r4-5 ibid., vol. 11, Ahnika 29, p.71, Il. 5-6; 
F235v4 ibid, p.9, IL. 2-3; #.235v7-236r1 ibid., p. 10, IL 14-17. 


Alexis Sanderson 253 


under the name Tantraräjabhattäraka;$ and it is probable that this is the R4- 
jatantra that he says that the Guru Srngära, his teacher’ teacher (paramagurubh) 
and son of Räjänaka Däi, taught to his father, the minister Srngäraratha. 6 
The importance of this text in Kashmir is evident in the fact that a number 
of the forms of Kälï whose Kalpas it teaches have found their way beyond the es- 
oteric context of this literature into the Paddhatis used by Kashmirian Saiva of- 
ficiants until recent times for the fire-sacrifice that accompanied their major cer- 
emonies, being included in the section of that sacrifice reserved for the female 
deities (devinäm äjyahomah). These Kälis are Bhuvanamaälini, Päpäntakärini, 
Vidyävidye$vari, Vagbhavesvart, Vagiäi, Siddhalaksmi, Mantramätrkä, Mantra- 
dämarikä, Saptakoti$vart, Bhägyädhirohint, and Nityakäli.? In the Paddhatis 
the sections devoted to each of these goddesses include passages from the Kalpas 
themselves to be recited for the goddesses’ gratification (as s4rpanaslokäh) and 


7 Satka 1: f. 29r8-9 at Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 5, p. 17,11. 15-18; f. 29v1-2 ibid, p. 18, IL. 1-4; 
£.29v2-3 ibid., I. 6-7; 30v3-5 ibid., IL. 9-11; £ 41r8-9 sbid., p. 63, IL. 15-16; £ 41v2-4 ibid., 
pp. 63, 1. 18-64, L. 4. Sagka 3: f. 148r6-—7 ibid., p. 17, IL 8-11; f 148v1 sbid., 1. 12; f. 148v1 sbid., 
L. 4; £ 148v1 ibid, p. 18, L. 16; f. 153v1-2 ibid, vol. 10, p.211, Il. 14-18. Surka 4: f. 59r3— 
5 ibid., vol. 3, p. 189, IL. 19-16; f. 118v2 bid., vol. 11, Ahnika 29, p.46, IL. 8-9; f. 120r2-3 
ibid., p. 41, IL 9-10; £. 120r3 ibid. L. 12; £ 120v6-7 ibid. IL. 14-15; £ 124r2 ibid, p. 43, L. 12; 
f. 124r3—4 ibid., p.44, IL 4-7; f. 124r5-6 ibid., p. 49, IL 22-23; f. 124v6 ibid. 1. 15; £. 124v6 
ibid., 1.15; £ 125r1 sbid., 1. 17; f 125r7-v1 ibid., p. 51, 11. 3-4; £ 125v1-3 ibid. p. SL, IL 16- 
19; £. 125v3—4 ibid., p.53, IL 15-18; £ 125v7-126r1 ibid, p. 54, IL. 2-5; £ 126v5-6, p.45, 
IL 2-4; 127v1 ébid., p. 52, L 11; £ 127v2 ibid., L 13; £ 127v5—6 ibid. IL. 15-18; £. 128r7 sbid., 
p.46, Il. 4-5; £ 130v2-3 ibid, pp. 46, 18-19, L. 2; £ 130v5-6 ibid., p. 48, Il. 18-12; £. 204v5-— 
20555 ibid., p. 68, 1. 14-69, L. 19. 

8 Tanträlokaviveka, concluding verse 36: apy asya râjatantre cintayato räjatantram ästa gurub | 
däsiräjänakajanma Srisrñgäro mamäpi paramaguruh ‘And Srñgära, son of Räjänaka Däéï, who 
was also my Gurus Guru (paramagurub), was the Guru in the Räjatantra of this [my father 
when he was] concerned with the kings governance’. The alternative is to take this to mean 
that Srngära taught him the science of governance while he was concerned therewith. But 
that would be very flat and out of context, especially since Jayaratha declares him his own 
paramaguruh. It is more probable that Jayaratha has substituted Räjatantra ‘the King Tantra 
for the usual title Tantraräja ‘the King of Tantras for the sake of a play on words. 

For the full sequence of goddesses that receive oblations in the Kashmirian $aiva fire- 
sacrifice see SANDERSON 2002, pp. 22-23, footnote 19. They may be summarized as compris- 
ing Durgä forms, the local goddesses ($ärikä, Säradä, Räjñi, and Jvälämukhi), Tripurasundari 
forms, these Kälis of the Kälikula, Candä Käpälini (from the Picumata), the Trika’s Mälini 
(Pürvämnäyesvari), Kubjikä (Paécimämnäyeévari), and Laksmi forms whose origin is as yet un- 
known to me. The Paris manuscript of the Agnikäryapaddhati has added several goddesses taken 
from the later East Indian Säkta tradition, such as Tära/Ekajatä (f. 80r5-v2) and Daksinäkäl 
(E 81r2-v3). 


254 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


give the Mantras to be used, both the primary (mälamantrah) and the six an- 
cillaries (sad añgäni), while making the oblations into the fire. This required 
accurate interpretation of the text of the /ayadrathayämala, since that gives the 
Mantras in a coded form, whereas here they are set out undisguised. Where the 
source has no suitable visualization text (/hyänam) for a goddess, the Paddhatis 
make good the lack, since the ritual format requires such verses to be recited 
before the deity is summoned for worship in the fire and in some cases also 
while making the final oblation (pärnähutih).° 

No comprehensive commentary on this text has survived in Kashmir or 
elsewhere. But we do have some explicit exegesis, and all of it is demonstrably 
or probably Kashmirian. We have the Bhuvanamälinikalpavisamapadavivrti of 
Srivatsa, a commentary on the chapter of the fourth Satka that gives the Kalpa 
for the worship of Bhuvanamälini. The worship of this goddess, also known as 
Diksädevi, served among the Saiva officiants of Kashmir as a brief substitute 
for the elaborate regular form of Saiva initiation (diksà), to be used in times of 


70(1) Bhuvanamälint (Diksadevi): Jayadrathayamala (JY), Satka 4, ff. 16215—165r6 (bhu- 
vanamälinividhipatalah) — Agnikäryapaddhati (AKP) Paris (P), £. G4r7-vl; Gôttingen ms (G), 
f#.28v7-29r2 (contains JY 4, f. 162v4-162v5, vv. 12-14b); Annapürapüjäpaddhati, . 30v1- 
9 (contains JY 4, f. 164v5-6, vv. 56c-59b); Kalädiksäpaddhati (KDP) À, #. 225v14-226v6 
(contains the same). (2) Päpäntakärint: JY 4, Æ 142r4-143r1 (päpäntakividhipatalah) — 
AKP P, f.64v1-11; AKP G, f 29r2-8 (contains JY 4, f 142v3—4); KDP A, #.226v15- 
227r12 (contains JY 4, f. 142v3-4, 4-5, wv. 11, 13-14b). (3) Vidyävidyesvart: JY 2, ff. 106v5-— 
126v6 (vidyävidyesvaricakravidhipatalah) — AKP P, f.71r4-18; KDP B, f.2v3; (4) Väg- 
bhaveévari: JV 3, Æ.118r4—121r2 (väghbhavesividhipatalah) — AKP G, f.33v10-12; KDP 
B, f.2v3. (5) Vägisi: JY 4, Æ.158r5-159v3 (vägifkälividhipatalah) — AKP P, f.71r5-6; 
AKP G, f.33v11-12; KDP A, ff. 3v11-5r11 (pustakavägisvaripüjävidhih); KDP B, f.2r4- 
v19 (same; contains JY 4, f 209r3—4, r5-v2, pustakädhikärapatalah, wv.20c-21, 23-29). (6) 
Siddhalaksmiï: JY 2, #.129r-131v6 — AKP P, #.73r5-74r9; AKP G #.35r9-36r5; KDP 
À, f.222v8-223v15; and AKP G, f.37r4-38r6 (tarpanaslokäh, = JY 2, f.129r2-5 [vv.2- 
5]; f. 130r2-4 [vv. 37—42b], and £. 130r-v7 [vv. 43-53b, 64-65b]). (7) Mantramätrkä: JY 3, 
FE. 69r3-72r4 (pratyañgirävidhipatalah |9]) — AKP P, f.74r9-v4; AKP G, f. 36r5-13 (con- 
tains JY 3, f. 69r6-7, v.6 [as éarpanaslokah], and f.70v4-5 [as visualization text]); and AKP 
G, £.38r7-— (sarpanaslokäh, = JN 3, f. G9r6-7, v. 6). (8) Mantradämarikä: JY 3, #.72r4-75v5 
(pratyañgirävidhipatalah (101) — AKP P, f. 74v4-18; AKP G, £. 36r14-v8. (9) Saptakoti$vari : 
JY 4, Æ. 178v5-179v4 (last section of the kwhakädividhipatalah) — AKP P, f.75r1-15; AKP 
G, £. 36v8-37r4. (10) Bhägyädhirohini (Bhägyakäli): JY 4, Æ. 136v5-137v7 (mahäbhägyoda- 
yavidhipatalah) — AKP P #.79v5-80r4; AKP G f. 38v11-16 (contains JY 4, f.137r4, v.11 
[as tarpanaslokah], and f. 137r6-vl, vv. 15-18 [as visualization text]). (11) Nityakäli: JY 4, 
Æ.150r7-151v1 (mityakälividhipatalah) — AKP G f. 40r7-13 (contains JY 4, f 151r7, v. 12c- 


13 [as visualization text]). 


Alexis Sanderson 255 


distress:/! 

It may happen that he is unable to perform [the regular] initiation. This may 
occur if such things as the [necessary] offerings are lacking and if a circum- 
stance such as a national disaster should arise. In that case he should adopt the 
following procedure. First he should bring fire in the manner taught for the 
sadadhvadiksä. Then, after [summoning and presenting the guest offerings to] 
this Diksadevi and gratifying her [in the fire] with a thousand oblations, us- 
ing her primary Mantra [HÜM BHUVANAMALINI HRIM], [he should make obla- 
tions with] the Mantra for raising up [the soul], namely “OM HÜM HÂM HiM 
HÜM HAIM HAUM HAH HÜM I perform the raising up of N°”. When this has 
been completed, he should first give the initiand the Mantra of Bhuvanamälini. 
The Gurus say that the Mantras of Aghorabhattäraka [= Sakalasvacchanda], 
Niskalasvacchanda], and [Aghore$vari] should be bestowed on the initiand after 
that.”? 


Concerning its date we can say only that it was written after Utpaladeva (f. c. 
925-975), since it is imbued with the doctrines of the Xvarapratyabhijñäkärikaä 
and quotes one of that authors Saiva hymns.”? Nothing reveals how soon after 
his time he wrote, but he is likely to have done so several generations later, since 
its colophon reports that its author was a descendant in the “great lineage of 
the learned author Bhatta Diväkaravatsa”, who was active around the middle 
of the tenth century.’ 


7'Kalädiksävidhi À, f.226r14-226v6: yasya dravyädyabhave sati desopaplavädau ca kadäcit 
sati diksäkrtau Saktir nästi tasyäträyam prayogah. prathamam sadadhvadiksoktakramenägnim 
äniya *ridiksädevim (corr. : frideksädevim Cod.) etäm svamülamantrenäsyà ähutisahasrena devim 
etäm samtarpya pa$cät OM HÜM HÂM HIM HÜM HAIM HAUM HAH HÜM AMUKASYODDHARANAM 
KAROMI SVAHA ty uddharanamantrah. *evam (corr. : eve Cod.) krte ädau bhuvanamälinimantrah 
Sisyäya deyah. tadanantaram aghorabhattäraka$riniskalädayo manträh Sisyasya pratipädyà ii 
guravah. 

7?These other Mantras are specified because they are three principal Mantras of the Svaccha- 
nda, the source that is the basis of the standard initiation procedure. 

7 Bhuvanamaälinikalpavisamapadavivrti, f. \3r2-4: sadà srstivinodäya sada sthitisukhäsine | 
sadà tribhuvanähäratrptäya svämine nama (= Sivastoträvali 20.9) iti vidvadvarastutirüpayä yuk- 
â … 
7 Bhuvanamaälinikalpavisamapadavivrti, f. 17r1-3 (colophon): it fribhuvanamälinikalpe 
visamapadavivrtih sampürnä. krtih frimadbhattasästrakaradiväkaravatsaprasrtamahäkulaprasi- 
tadvijavarapanditasrivastasyeti Sivam. bhadram pasyema pracarema bhadram. No manuscript of 
a work by Bhatta Diväkaravatsa has come down to us. But verses from two works of his are pre- 
served in quotations in other works: a philosophico-devotional hymn with the title Kzksyästotra, 
of which we have à number of verses (quoted in Bhägavatotpalas Spandapradipikä, pp. 90, 
103; and Pratyabhijñnährdaya on Sütra 18)—this reveals him to have been a Päñcarätrika 


256 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


There is also an anonymous /ayadrathayämalaprastäramantrasamgraha pre- 
served in Nepalese manuscripts. Covering the whole text, it comments on 
and decodes the passages that set out the Mantras (mantroddhärah) of its 
many Kalpas, and, since in some parts the /syadrathayämala describes diagrams 
(prastärah) in which the letters of the syllabary are arranged in patterns so that 
any can be identified cryptically by referring to it as that which is above or 
below another or between two others, it also provides drawings of these. 7° 

The manuscripts of this useful text preface it with the Zantraräjatanträ- 
vatärastotra, an elegant hymn by an Acärya Visvävarta,/© which summarizes 
the first Sarkas account of its place in the $Saiva canon and its differentia- 
tion through the process of transmission (avatärah) from its transcendental 
source to mankind, and hymns what it takes to be the principal Kälis of 
its four parts: Kälasamkarsant in the first Saska, Siddhalaksmiï in the second, 
Sära$akti manifest as the three 1000-syllable Vidyäs (Trailokyadämarä, Mata- 
cakreévari/Mateévari, and Ghoraghoratarà) in the third, and, in the fourth, Sid- 


influenced by Kashmirian Saiva non-dualism—and a Vivekäñjana, the opening and closing 
Pädas of a verse or verses of which have been quoted by Abhinavagupta in Ævarapratyabhi- 
jñävimarsini, vol. 1, p.10. The approximate limits of his date are established by his knowl- 
edge of Kallata (c. 875+), the influence of whose Spandakärikä (1.1ab: yasyonmesanimesäbhyäm 
jagatah pralayodayau) is evident in the verse of the Kaksyästotra quoted in Spandapradipikä, 
p.90 (évadäsayonmesanimesamätramayau jagatsargalayäv itidrk), and by his works having been 
cited by Abhinavagupta (dated works 990+) and Bhägavatotpala. That he was a Päñcarätrika, 
like Bhägavatotpala, is apparent from the verse quoted in the latter’s Spandapradipikä, p.103, 
which interprets the Päñcarätrika sädgunyam and the nature of avidya. Srivatsa’s short work 
contains nothing that necessitates the conclusion that its author is identical with the Srivatsa 
who composed the Cidgaganacandrikä. 

7SThe text as transmitted has no introductory or concluding verses. It begins (A, 
£.3v3; B, f.3v7 [for what precedes see footnote 76]): om svasti | om namah fivädibhyo 
gurubhyah | $rtjayadrathayämaläc caturvimsatisähasrät satka*catustayät (conj. : catustayä AB) 
*brastäramantrasamgraham (em. : prastäram mantrasamgraham AB) lkhyate. The title I have 
proposed is based on this alone. This is the work given the title Jayadrathayämalamantroddhä- 
ratippanï in SANDERSON 1990, p. 84. That name was taken from the catalogue card accompa- 
nying the NemPP microfilm of manuscript B. It is not found in the text itself, but is probably 
based on the colophons at the end of the treatment of each Surka, which refer to what precedes 
each as the mantroddhäratippakam on that Satka. The meaning of prastäramantrasamgrahabh is 
‘A Digest of the Code-diagrams and Mantras’ and of mantroddhäratippant ‘An Annotation of 
[the Passages Consisting of] the Extraction of Mantras’. 

76The colophon of Viévävartas hymn (A, f.3r7-vl: Sitantraräjatanträvatärastotram 
krtih $rimadäcäryavisvävartapädänäm) is followed by unattributed verses that encode the 
nine-syllable Vidyä of Kälasamkarsani (= Devidvyardhasatikä, Ÿ. 8v2-4 [vv.88-91b]). The 
Jayadrathayämalaprastäramantrasamgraha then begins as stated in footnote 75. 


Alexis Sanderson 257 


dhayogeévari and the Krama’s culminating circle (ktam cakram) of the thir- 


teen Kälis, twelve surrounding and mirroring their source./” 


7 Tantraräjatantravatarastotra À, f. 2V7-317; B, f. 3r4-v6 (vv. 21-27 [last verse]): bibharti 
bhedäms caturo vatärapravrttikälikramasamhrtinäm | catustayenäkhilatustaye yah $ritantrara- 
jam tam aham prapadye | 22 *rimadbhairavato ‘dhigamya (em. : bhairavatädhigamya AB) 
vidhivad devi *sarasvaty alam (em. : saratyamla AB) yäm tärksyäya jagäda so pi bhagavac- 
chukräya yäm “abhyadhät (B : abhyadhän À) | dattà tena mayäya martyabhitakrt präkskandham 
d$ritya yà vidyà saptadasäksarä jayati s frikälasamkarsant | 23 yah pärvatipatihimädrisutä- 
dasäsyasindhuksitifvaravarakramato vatirnah | *skandham (corr. : skamdha À) dvitiyam avalam- 
bya rahasyabhedo vidyäprapañcanicitah sa jayaty anantah | 24 jayati sakalasampadvämanäma- 
nusäriprakatitasubhasiddhih sadguruvyaktasuddhih | vividhaviditavidyäratnakosagamagryapra- 
srtasitapatäkävibhramaä *siddhalaksmih (A : siddhilaksmih B) | 25 ugram äntam tadubha- 
Jam iti tryätmakam yatsvarüpam tisro vidyäh sthitim upagatäs täh sahasrärna*mänäh (A : 
mänah B) | väcyam täsäm mahitamahasäm bhäti devitrayam “yat tasyTähsoñgaht (yadyasyäh- 
soñgah À : yadyasyähsyerkuh B) khalu vijayate käpi säräkhyasaktih | 26 satcakrädikulasthiti- 
prakatant *atkonacakrodaräd yà satkäranabhedini (A : satkonacakro \..….] bhedini B) samudirà 
sadbodha*sambodhint (B : sambodhanï À) | sanmudrärucirä sadadhvajanant sädgunyapürnä- 
kramä | vande täm samayaprapüranaparäm “$risiddhayogesvarim (A : $risiddhilaksmivarim 
B) | 27 yasyäväritaviryam TavivaritahT *sargäntam (A : svarggäntam B) à sargato bhogam dätum 
udätta eva mahimä devipadapräptidah | dhatte yan mukurävalivyatikaravyaktaikavaktropamäm 
Säktam cakram apakramam paramayä devyà “tad iddham numab (em. : ad iddham namah À : 
tadivyammamah B). The four divisions of v.21 are the texts four parts of 6000 verses each 
(satkäni), assigned here to the four phases of the Krama in the order pravrttih (= srstikramab), 
avatärab (= sthitikramah), sambrtih (= sambhärakramah), and kälikramah (= anäkhyakramab), the 
order of enunciation in the verse being for the metre. The two divisions (präkskandhah and 
dvitiyaskandhah) of vv. 22 and 23 are the first Safka and the rest respectively, the former, origi- 
nally a self-contained work on the cult of Kälasamkarsant, and the latter à supplementary collec- 
tion of Kalpas (procedures for the worship) of numerous ancillary Mantra-goddesses (vidyäh) 
of a more esoteric, Kaula character (v.23: rahasyabhedo vidyäprapañcanicitah). The Kalpa of 
Siddhalaksmiï (v. 24) is at the end of the second Sarka (Æ. 129r1—-132v3). The Kalpas of the 
three goddesses described here as the aspects of a single ‘Säraéakti” (v. 25), are in Satka 3: that 
of Trailokadämarä is chapters 2-7 (f. 5v4-69r3), that of Matacakre$vari/Matesvari is chapters 
11-14 (Æ.75v5-107v1), and that of Ghoraghoratarä is chapters 17-23 (#. 121r2-169r8). The 
Kalpa of Siddhayogesvari ‘for rectifying defects in one’s observance’ (v. 26: samayapüranaparä) 
is chapter [80] (Æ.215r7-219v6) of the fourth Satka. The fäktam cakram [of the thirteen 
Kälis] (v.27) is taught in chapter [4] of the same (Kä/kramavidhi) (Æ. 57v2-61v5). Viéva- 
vartas comparison of this circle to a single face reflected in [twelve] mirrors is based on 
vv. 67c-68 of this chapter (£. 60r5-6): dhyätvä svadhämni *vitate (em. : vitato Cod. : vitata 
qu. in Jayadrathayämalaprastäramantrasameraha [JYP] ms A) püjaniyätha mandale | tadvad 
devyah prapüjyaiva dhyeyäh sarväh yathärthavat | pratibhedagatà saikà devadevi karañkini. The 
Mandala here is a circle surrounded by twelve others within a four-doored square (Æ. 59v2-3): 
samlikhya mandalam devi *bhramadvädasasammitam (bhrama qu. in JYPms À, £. 57v4 : mahà 
Cod.) | madhye trayodasam käryam räsivarnasamanvitam | raktena rajasä devi *caturlekham 


258 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Though these two texts have come down to us, like the Jayadrathayämala 
itself, only in Nepalese manuscripts, it is probable that they too were composed 
in Kashmir. In the case of the hymn this is indicated by the authors name. 
Names ending in -ävarta, -varta, -ävatta, or -vatta are a Kashmirian peculiarity, 
and that beginning with Vi$va- is common./* That the -prastäramantrasamgraha 
too is Kashmirian is suggested not merely by its transmission with the hymn of 
Vi$vavarta but also by the fact that it quotes the Spandakärikä of the Kashmirian 
Kallata.”? 

To these sources we can add an unattributed inclusion and brief explanation 
of five verses from the chapter of the fourth Ska on sixteen centres in the 
meditator’s body found in the Sarcakranirnaya (A), a short Kashmirian treatise 
of unknown authorship and date on this and other series of such centres.$° 

Finally, a section of Abhinavaguptas Zanträloka, though it is a work of the 
Trika, is a Paddhati based on the Mädhavakula. That too, as Jayaratha asserts 
and the Nepalese manuscripts confirm, is part of the Jayadrathayämales fourth 
Satka.#\ Tayaratha justifies its inclusion in this text on the Trika by saying that 


(qu. in JYPms À, f. 57v5 : caturlekhyam Cod.) prapürayet | caturdvärasamäyuktam tatra püjyam 
kramottamam. 

78I am aware of eleven other Kashmirians bearing such names: (1) Taksakavarta, author 
of the Nisyädisamgrahapaddhati; (2-3) two Rayävattas (Räjatarañgint 7.1480 [a brahminl] 
and 8.322 [a lamp-bearer]); (4) Nägavatta (ibid, 8.664 [a military commander and son of 
a Käyastha]); (5) Lostävatta (b1d., 7.1295 [a soldier]); (6) Madhurävatta (5bid., 7.766 [a cav- 
alry commander]); (7) Vi$vävarta, who named the hymns redacted by Räma and Âdityaräja 
from Utpaladeva’s Sivastoträvalivivrti, p. 2; (8) a Säkta Viévävarta, pupil of Kvaragiva (Jayaratha, 
Vämakesvarimatavivarana, p. 36); (9) Viévavarta, the father of Mañkha (Srzkanthacarita 3.35; 
there the metre requires the second vowel to be short; but in the colophon of the 25th Sarga he 
is Vi$vävarta: friräjänakavisvävartasänor mahäkavisriräjänakamañkhakasya); and (10-11) two 
Viévävattas (Räjatarañgini 7.337 [a brahmin], 7.617 etc.). 

7 Jayadrathayämalaprastäramantrasamgraha À, f. 17r2-5, B, f. 18r1-5: bhaäsvaräpaä prakäsa- 
mayi pränäpänarñpà vyäkhyätä. niskalä pränäpänakalämadhyodaye somasäryayor bhaksanärtham 
“adä (conj. : yatà AB) gatà tadà sà kälagräsaikaghasmarety uktä. tad uktam: “yäm avasthäm 
samälambya yad ayam mama *vaksyati (B : vaksyate À) | “tad avasyam (em. : tadävasyam 
AB) “*karisye ham (em. : karisye tam AB) iti samkalpya tisthati | *täm (em. : tam AB) äfrityo- 
rdhvamärgena candrasüryäv ubhäv api | sausumne ‘dhvany “astam ito (em. : astamite AB) hitva 
brahmändagocaram | tadà tasmin mahävyomni pralina$asibhäskare | sausuptapadavan müdhah 
prabuddhab syäd “anävrtah (em. : anävrtam AB)” ity arthah. The passage quoted is Spandakärikà 
1.23-25 in Ksemaräjas numeration. 

80 Jayadrathayämala, Satka 4, f.113v4-7, kälikule kälikramabhedah, vv.1-8 — 
Satcakranirnaya À, £. 2r19-v7 (vv. 30-35). The prose commentary follows: Æ. 2v7-3r18. 

81The Paddhati is Zanträloka 29.56-77. The source is Jayadrathayämala, Satka 4, fÆ. 117v5— 
135v2 (kälikulapatalah). Abhinavagupta himself does not mention that it is and since the /ayad- 


Alexis Sanderson 259 


there were Gurus in Kashmir whose tradition combined the teachings of the 
Mädhavakula with those of the Devyäyämala, a Trika scripture that no doubt 
lent itself to this fusion since it teaches the worship of the Kälikula’s Käla- 
samkarsani as a fourth goddess transcending the Trika*s three and, like this 
Satka, was probably Kashmirian.*° 


rathayämala suggests that it has incorporated the Mädhavakula it is conceivable that Abhinava- 
gupta knew this Kälikula scripture in an independent form (see SANDERSON 2002, p.2, and 
notes 11 to 14). The work is introduced at the end of the preceding Patala (£ 117v3-4): etat 
kulakramam sarvam mahämädhavake kule | vadisyämi punar bhadre tava mandaramürdhani | 
vistarenätirabhasä(t) ‘On a future occasion, on the summit of the Mandara mountain, I shall 
eagerly tell you at length this whole procedure of Kaula worship in the Mahämädhavakule . 
The opening of the dialogue at the beginning of our text is as follows (Æ. 117v6-118r): katha- 
yasva mahädeva sücitam yat tvayädhunä | “tantram (em. : tatvam Cod.) tan mädhavakulam 
vaktavyam tatra *“bhairava (em. : bhairavi Cod.) | samksepena samäkhyähi tantre min saraha- 
syakam | yena sampürnatä “casya (em. : väsya Cod.) “tantrasya bhavati (em. : tamtresya bha- 
gavati Cod.) prabho | $ribhairava uväca: frnusva kathayisyämi tantraräjasya madhyatah | yathäà 
tan mädhavakulam vaktavyam mandaropari ‘Tell me now, O Mahädeva, the Tantra Mädha- 
vakula that you will teach me there, O Bhairava. Explain it to me, O Lord, together with its 
secret teachings in a short form within this Tantra so that that may be complete. Bhairava 
replied: Hear, I shall [indeed] teach [you] within [this] Zantraräja about the Mädhavakula that 
I shall teach you on Mandara. At the end of the chapter Bhaïrava says (f 135r7-v1l): evam 
samäsatah proktam tantre smin tava Sobhane | etad eva hi samksepän mandarägre ca mürdhani | 
bhüyo vaksyämi subhage mahämädhavake kule | kälikulam idam guhyam mukhapäramparägatam 
“Thus, O fair one, I have taught you this within this Tantra in summary form, in few words. 
On the summit of Mandara, in the Mahämädhavakula, O beautiful one, I shall teach you again 
this secret Kälikula that has come down through oral transmission.” 

82 Tanträlokaviveka on 29.56: atra hi kesämcana gurünäm sridevyäyamalasrimädhavakulärtha- 
sammelanayà sampradäyah samasti. 

My reason for proposing that the Devyäyämala is Kashmirian is as follows. Sev- 
eral $aiva scriptures rule that one should not engage a $aiva officiant of any of eight 
countries whose names begin with the letter K. In an unidentified non-Saiddhäntika 
scripture quoted by the Saiddhäntika Jhänagiva they are Kä$mira, Kosala, Käñci, 
Kaliñnga, Kämarüpa, Käveri, Koñkana, and Kaccha (/fänaratnävali, p.314): käfmiïrakausaläh 
käñcikaliñgäh kämarñpajäh | käverikoñkanodbhütä *kacchadesasamudbhaväh (kaccha em. : 
kañca Cod.) | tathänye pi “surästriyäh (con. : surästräayä Cod.) *kusañgä uñchavrttayah (coni. : 
kusasañgacchavrttayah Cod.) | viprädivarnäs catväro gurutve nädhikärinah; and the same eight 
are given in the Piñgalämata, f. Sr7-vl: kapürvästavinirmuktau anyadesodbhaväv api | *ka- 
marükacchakä$mirau (kämarñkaccha em. : kämarñpaccha Cod.) käliñgau koñkanodbhavau | 
käñcikosala*käverträstrajäv (käveri em. : käveryau Cod.) api varjayet. There are duals here be- 
cause the text applies this restriction to both Gurus and Sädhakas. The Kämarü (= Kämarüpa) 
of my emendation kämaräkaccha- is also seen in the Kwlakridävatära as quoted in Tantra- 
lokaviveka, vol. 11, Ahnika 29, p.29, 1. 14 (varadevasya kämarä) and is supported by Chinese 
kemolou and the traveller Ibn Battuta’s Kämru/Kämrü/Kämrün (see PELLIOT 1904, pp. 181- 


260 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


THE KRAMA EXEGESIsS 


Of the other Kälikula scriptures to which Kashmirian authors bear witness, 
the Kälikulapañcasataka and the Kälikulakramasadbhäva are the principal scrip- 
tural authorities of the Krama. The /syadrathayämala contains Krama materi- 
als and presents them as the Kälikula’s most fundamental teachings, but they 
are embedded there in a mass of Kalpas of the common Mantramärgic type. 
Here the Krama alone is presented, and this was no doubt also the case in 
the lost Devisärdhasataka, as it is in the Devidvyardhasatikä and Yonigahvara. 
These texts are focused on setting out the Mantras, deities, and offerings of 
the successive phases of Krama worship and they differ in fundamental re- 
spects from the Mantramärgic standard. They teach no rituals of initiation and 
consecration—the post-scriptural Krama tradition envisaged initiation through 
the simple act of consuming a sacrament in the form of the Kaula ‘nectars’ 
(carupräsanam)—,® no hand-postures (Mudräs), no visualizations of the con- 
stituent deities forms, no fire-sacrifice, and none of the elaborate ascetic ob- 
servances (kastasädhanam) characteristic of the Mantramärgic Kalpas of the 
Jayadrathayämala. Moreover, the texts are presented as instruction given by the 
Goddess Bhairavi to Bhairava, in an inversion of the normal gender of teacher 


82). Now, the Devyäyämala too has à list of eight countries beginning with K whose Gu- 
rus are to be avoided. It is as in the first two sources quoted here with the difference that it 
drops Kä$mira and inserts Karnäta in its place (Tanträlokaviveka on 23.14): käñcikosalakarnätäh 
kaliñgäh kämarñpajäh | kuñkunodbhavakäverikacchadesasamudbhaväh | ete varjyäh, a revision 
most likely to be the work of a Kashmirian. A similar manipulation is seen in the version of 
the list of the eight Ks given in the Saiddhäntika Vijayatantra quoted in the Känasivagurude- 
vapaddhati, Kriyäpäda 11, pp. 96, 1.25-97, L. 1: karnätakakaliñgäkhyakacchakäfmiraväsinah | 
koñkanäh karahätäs ca kämbojäh kämarüpinah | kakärästakasamjñas te desà desikavarjitäh. Since 
this is probably a work of the Tamil country it is striking that it has dropped Käñcï and Käveri, 
which encompass that region. 

Sn the Jayadrathayämala Krama teachings are found in the second Sarka in 
the Kalpa of Viryakäli (Æ.96v8-100r9), in the third in the consecutive avyapade- 
$yakälividhih, devisvarñpaniräpanavidhih, and devikramapatalah (Æ.215r6-226r3), and in 
the fourth in the #&/kramavidhih (#.57v2-61v5), and the consecutive sälambakra- 
mavidhibhedah, nirälambakramapüjävidhipatalah, ädyayägavidhikramärthapüjäpatalah, and 
viratändavavidhikramajñänapatalah (#.200v7-208r6). Initiation before the Mandala of the 
thirteen Kälis (1+12) is taught here in the kä/kramavidhih. I is this set of identical Kälis that 
Viévävarta hymns in the last verse of his Tantraräjatanträvatärastotra, implying that the teach- 
ings of the Tantra culminate here (27cd: dhatte yan mukurävalivyatikaravyaktaikavaktropamäm 
Säktam cakram apakramam paramayà devyà tad iddham numah'T sing the praise of the sequence- 
transcending circle of powers animated by the supreme Goddess that resembles a single face 
appearing in contact with a series of mirrors. 

8 For the identification of these substances and their role in this initiatory trial of non-dual 
awareness see SANDERSON 20052, pp. 110-114 (footnote 63). 


Alexis Sanderson 261 


and pupil in the non-Saiddhäntika Saiva dialogues, formulating for his bene- 
fit a secret oral tradition concealed in the innermost awareness of the Yoginis 
of Uddiyäna, the Pitha of the North (wrtarapithah), on the occasion of their 
assembling there in the Karavira cremation ground to worship her.$f 


In the North is the great Pitha called Oddiyäna, the best all Pithas, the resort of 
Siddhas and Yoginis. In this fair and excellent Pitha is the Karavira cremation 
ground. In this fearsome cremation ground thronged by great Bhairavas in 
this most fearsome circle thronged with great Mätrs rests the supreme goddess 
Kälï in the limit of the state of self-awareness, standing on Bhairava, devouring 
the power of Mahäkäla, void in form, infinite, with eight embodiments, aus- 
picious, adorned by fifty Rudras and attended by sixty-four [Yoginis]. Indra, 
Brahmä, Visnu, Rudra, Iévara, Sadäsiva Mahädeva, and Bhairava, the seventh, 
are ever present in their entirety as the ‘dead’ [i.e., as the transcended deities that 
form the throne] of that Goddess.®” .…Bhairava said [to her]: O Goddess, Why 


S6Kalikulakramasadbhäva, f. 1r4-5 (1.1-2): frimaduttaradigbhäge pitham pithavaram ma- 
bat | *oddiyänäbhidhänam tu (em. : oddiyänäbhidhänan te Cod.) siddhayoginisevitam | tasmin 
pitha*vare (em. : vane Cod.) ramye $masänam karavirakam: {. 119 (1.9ab), £. 1v1-3 (1.17—20): 9 
tasmin pitrvane ghore mahäbhairavasamkule |... 17 tasmims cakre mahäghore *mahämätrbhi 
(corr. [Asa] : mahämaätrbhih Cod.) samkule | svavimarsadasäntasthà tisthate paramesvari | 
18 kGlï tu bhairavärñdhä mahäkälakaläsinr | vyomarñpà anantäkhyà astamürtidharà $iva | 
19 pañcäsadrudrakhacitàä *catuhsastisusevitä (conj. : catuhsastistusevitä Cod.) | indro brahmä 
tathà visnñ rudra ivara eva ca | 20 sadäsivo *mahädevo (conj. : mahädevyä Cod.) bhairavas 
caiva saptamah | pretatve samsthità nityam tasyà devyäs tu sarvatah; f.216-8 (1.42c—44b): 
Sribhairava uväca: asmin pithe mahävir(air) viravirais tu samkule | 43 kimartham ägatäh 
sarve *catuhsastir (corr. : catuhsasti Cod.) mahäbaläh | yoginiviraviresyo virajäh paramesvari | 
44 *tvadärädhanasamsaktä (em. : tvayärädhanasamsaktä Cod.) *mahäyägendrasotsukäh (em. : 
mahäyogendrasotsukah Cod.); f.2r11-12 (1.49c-51b): prechämi paramam devi svavimarsa- 
balena tu | SO “agragäs tu paräh devyäh (corr. : agragà tu parä devyä Cod.) samhäraka- 
rana*ksamäh (corr. : ksamä Cod.) | sarvas tas tu mahäbhägäh “svecchayä (em. : svacchaya 
Cod.) *visvabhaksikäh (em. : visvabhaksaki Cod.) | 51 tathäpi hrdgatam täsäm  (corr. : 
täsà Cod.) prasnam asti *mahädhiye (conj. [Aï$a] : mahädhiya Cod.) | guptam tu paramam 
divyam *kimartham suravandite (conj. [or viravandite] : kimarthanacavandite Cod.); f. 2v10- 
3r2 (1.67c-72b): atyantamohajälena vestito ham tu “sundari (corr. : sundari Cod.) | 68 
mamärthe nugraham samyak kuru tattvena *bhämini (corr. : bhämini Cod.) | vadasva paramam 
guhyam apratarkyam aninditam | 69 yoginihrdayävastham prakatam kuru *fañkari (corr. : 
samkari Cod.) | tithivelävinirmuktam desakälädivarjitam | 70 sthänasamketakair muktam 
naksatrais ca grahais tathä | mudrämantravinirmuktam rajorañgädibhis tathà | 71 aksataïs ca 
tilair nityam agnikarmena varjitam | ähvänädivinirmuktam vratacaryädikais tathä | 72 recakaih 
pürakais caiva kumbhakaïs ca visesatah. 

87C£. Kälikulapañcasataka À, f. 1v3—4 (1.3): frimaduttarapithasya $masan|am karavi\rakam | 
püjitam devadevena $ivena paramätmanä; £. 1v5 (1.7-8b): tatrasthà bhairavi bhimä sthülasa- 
ksmänuvartini | pithesvaribhih samyuktä siddhaïs ca pariväritä | mahänandasamävistä mahä- 


262 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


have all the sixty-four Vira-born mighty Viravire$is among the Yoginis come to 
this Pitha thronged with Mahäviras and the foremost of Viras, devoted to your 
propitiation and eager to celebrate the Great Sacrifice? I ask about the ulti- 
mate, O Goddess, through the power of my self-awareness. Standing before [us] 
are all the greatest and most venerable goddesses, capable of withdrawing [the 
world], who devour all things by their will [alone]. Yet, wise one, the [answer 
to my] question still hides within their hearts. O you who are venerated by the 
gods, why have they continued to conceal the ultimate celestial [secret]? ...O 
beautiful one, I am enveloped by a net of total delusion. O radiant [goddess], 
truly show your favour for my sake. Tell me the perfect, unthinkable, ultimate 
secret. Make plain, O Sañkari, what remains hidden in the heart of the Yoginis, 
[the practice] that is free of [restriction by] lunar day and [auspicious] hour, 
without [specified] place or time, free of the conventions of [sacred] sites, with- 
out Mudräs and Mantras, the coloured powders [of the initiation Mandala] and 
all other [paraphernalia of ritual], the fire-sacrifice and [oblations of] unhusked 
grains and sesame seeds, the summoning [of the deities] and other [ritual forms], 
the post-initiatory ascetic observance and other [ancillary practices], above all 
free of the exhalations, inhalations and retentions [of breath-restraint]. 


The Krama teaching is seen as the explication of the dynamic structure of the 
ultimate reality embodied and made manifest in that sacrificial assembly, and 
the process of Krama worship is seen as the means of realizing it through re- 
enactment.Ÿs 

No commentaries on these texts survive, and we have no evidence that any 
existed,®” but there is nonetheless a rich body of texts based upon them in 


ghorogranäsant ‘The cremation ground of the northen Pitha is the Karavira, venerated by the 
supreme soul Siva, the god of the gods. In it is fearsome Bhairavi, who permeates the gross and 
the subtle, accompanied by the Pithe$varïis and surrounded by Siddhas, immersed in absolute 
bliss, the destroyer of Mahäghorogra[bhairava]’. 

88The notion that the programme of worship re-enacts the primal sacrifice is also im- 
plied in related Kälikula scriptural sources. We see it in the Mahäkaravirayäga (E. 1v1-2 
[1.1-2]): *mahasiddhasamäkirne (mahasiddha em. : mahäsiddhi Cod.) $masäne karavirake | 
*mahävrndamahäsphäre (sphäre conj. : sphära Cod.) prakäsänandakojjvale | *nirvartite (em. : 
nivvatyate) mahäcakre yäge tridasadämare | sämarasyasthitam devam prechate kulasundarï; in 
the Tridasadämara (B, £. 1v3-5 [81.5-6]): pürvam gauri mahäghore $masäne karavirake | ärä- 
dhito ‘’ham devibhir yâge sampüjanäya ca | tväm *corusamsthäm (coru À (cf. B, f. 2r2-3 (81.130): 
ürum pasyämi tvacchänyam] : câru B) krivä tu yätas tatra varänane | catuhsastis tu *yäh kotyah 
(conj : y4 kotya B : ye kotyä À) Säkinyädyà mahäbaläh | yajñabhägam prayacchanti carum krtva 
svabändhavän: in the Sivarätri aetiology of the Dätidämara and the Kashmirian sources pre- 
sented in SANDERSON 2005b, pp. 285-288; and in the Dämaramandala (dämarayägah) of the 
Devyäyämala (see Tanträloka 3.70cd; 15.335cd; 13.351cd; 30.54c-55b; and 31.100cd). 

#Jayaratha refers to the interpretation of two verses of the first by an Ojaräja, otherwise 
unknown, saying that his reading of the text at this point is incorrect (Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 12, 
p.197, Il. 4-11). It is possible that this interpretation was part of a commentary on the text. 


Alexis Sanderson 263 


the form of esoteric hymns and treatises setting out the course of the Krama's 
meditative worship composed by Gurus in the lineage of this tradition. The 
earliest of them is Jñänanetra[nätha], also known as Sivänanda[nätha]. It was 
believed that he had received the Krama revelation in Uddiyäna directly from 
its Yoginis, known as the Pithesvaris,* or from their leader (cakranäyikà) 
Mañgalä, also called Virasimhä Svämini,”! and all Krama authors who speak 
of their lineage trace it back to him.”? Jayaratha calls him the Promulgator 


The two verses quoted are a variant of Kä/kulapañcasataka À, f. 12r4-—5 (3.29-30): amrtärnam 
tu brahmärnam tripindam brahma satparam | sa devi sa $ivas tu ca vifva(m) tasyänyavistarah | 
granthakotisahasränäm etat säram vicintayet | prabhävo ya na $akyeta vaktum kalpäyutair api. 
Perhaps Ojaräja was following this reading. 

0 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p. 19, IL. 7-8, quoting Abhinavagupta's Kramakeli: pithesvaribhya 
*uttarapithe (em. : uttarapitha Ed.) labdhopadesäc chrifivänandaät …. On the Pithe$varis as trans- 
mitters of revelation see also footnotes 87 on p.261, 312 on p.326, 330 on p.333, 364 on 
p.343, 374 on p. 345, and 376 on p. 346. 

%Arnasimha, Mahänayaprakäsa, f. 117v2-3 (v.136): ayam (em. : idam Cod.) $rivira- 
simhäkhyasväminya samprakäsitah | $rijñänanetranäthasya vrndacakrodayah parah; Mahänaya- 
prakä$a (Triv.) 7.86ab: virasimhäsanastheyam devi paramamañgalä. 

There is an exception in a section of the composite Yonigahvara. Though that text at- 
tributes its revelation to Jhänanetra this part, written in a lower register of Sanskrit than 
the rest, claims to have been put together by one Oghänanda, who received the teaching 
from a Yogini called Rüpänandä, who had received it from Virasimhä Svämini (Æ. 34v3-35r2 
[492-496]): samyak mahäsasanasampradäyam püjäkathäsamkramapürvam evam | sampräpya 
kaulottarasärabhütam abhütapürvam atha *käranädeh (conj. : käranädim Cod.) | 493 devi 
$rivira*simhäkhyä (corr. : samhäkhyä Cod.) svämint *prasphutä (corr. : prasphatä Cod.) bhuvi | 
tatpädapadmayugalät präptam caiva mahänayam | 494 *riräpänandäbhidhä (em. : frrräpänan- 
davidhà Cod.) devi dattam tasya prasädatah | tayä dattam svafisyasya oghänandäbhidhänatah | 
495 dattam parämrtarasam mahäsäsanam uttamam | tenedam racitam sarvam yathäpräptam 
*guror (conij. : gurur Cod.) mukhät | 496 sampradäyam “susambandham (conj. : susammbadham 
Cod.) sarahasyam mukhägamam | racitam guruväkyena svasamtänahitäya ca ‘Having thus duly 
received the unprecedented tradition of the Great Teaching that is the essence of the Kaula 
Uttar[ämnäy]Ja from the first of the Cause-deities through worship, oral instruction, and direct 
transmission, the holy Virasimhasvämini became visible on earth. From the two lotuses that 
were her feet the holy Rüpänandä received the Great Teaching, given by her favour. She gave the 
supreme Great Teaching that contains the joy of the highest nectar to her disciple Oghänanda; 
and he composed all this exactly as he had received it from his Guru. At his Guru’ command he 
composed the well-constructed tradition, the oral transmission with its secrets, for the benefit 
of his spiritual descendants’. The Sanskrit of this passage is exceptional for its use of nom./acc. 
sg. neuter of the past participle passive as an active verbal predicate with past sense; see also 
here f. 36v5: sad eva cakram tu punar drstam devi ‘Once again the Goddess beheld that same 
circle”; f.37r1-2: *punar ärdhvam (corr. : punah ürddha Cod.) *niriksanti (corr. : niriksanti 
Cod.) drstam anyam kutühalam ‘Gazing up again, she saw another wonder’. This construction 
is common in late Buddhist Sanskrit. 


264 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


(avatärakanäthah),"* and this term indicates that he saw him as having received 


and propagated the Krama scriptures themselves. For the term avatärakah is 
used to denote à divine or semi-devine promulgator of scripture throughout 
the Saiva Mantramärga and Jayaratha uses the same expression when referring 
to Macchandanätha,”*saying that he was the avatärakah of the Kula teachings 
in the Pitha Kämarüpa in the present Kali Age after receiving them directly 
from Bhairavi.” Only one of the Krama scriptures, the Yonigahvara, claims 
that it was revealed by Jhänanetra;®% but it is probable that the same claim was 
made for the K%/5kulapañcasataka and Kälikulakramasadbhäva. For the chap- 
ter colophons of both say that they emerged in the Pitha of the North and 
were promulgated by the venerable Nätha ($rinätha).? This too is an epithet 


of Jñänanetra in the literature of the Krama:°® 


9% Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.195, IL. 1-2: frimadavatärakanaäthena; p. 197, IL. 8-9: srimad- 
avatärakanäthasyäpi. 

%#Macchanda is also known as Matsyendra, Macchaghna, and Minanätha. The name Mac- 
chaghna means ‘fisherman’ (—-OIA matsyaghnah) and Macchanda is probably derived from 
the MIA synonym macchamdha- (—macchabamdha-). Matsyendra can be explained as a false 
Sanskritization of Macchanda and Minanätha as a synonym of Matsyendra. 

® Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 1, p.24, IL. 7-12: kulaprakriyäyäh prakriyantarebhyah prädhänyäd 
“bhairavyä bhairavät präptam yogam “präpya (em. : vyäpya Ed.) tatah priye | tatsakäsat 
tu siddhena minäkhyena varänane | kämarüpe mahäpithe macchandena mahätmanà” ityä- 
diniräpitasthityà tadavatärakam turyanätham eva tävat prathamam kirtayati ‘Because the 
Kaula system is superior to all others he refers first to the Nätha of the Fourth [Age], 
who promulgated it, as taught in such passages as “Beloved, the [corpus that teaches the 
Kaula] Yoga was received in its entirety by Bhairavi from Bhairava, and then from her by 
the great Siddha Macchanda, known as Minafnätha], in the great Pitha of Kämarüpa”. 
Colophons of scriptures of the Kula do indeed refer to them as promulgated by him: e.g. 
(1) Kulapañcäsikä, f.6v5S (end): ii kulapañcasikäyaäm $rimanmats(y)end\r)apädävatäre; (2) 
Guhyasiddhi, {. 20r6-7: $rimacchagnapädävatärite rkämäkhyävinirgatah guhyasiddhisasthamah 
patala(h); (3) Ürmikaulärnava À, f.27r7-9: iti Y*érinilatantre (nila em. : nira À) 
frimadürmikaulärnave mahäsästre laksapädoddhrte paramarahasye $ribhogahastakramämnäye 
$rikaulagiripithavinirgate $riminanäthävatärite sat$atädhikasate kulakaulanirnaye karmakosavi- 
cäro näma trtiya(h) patalah; (4) Kaulajñänanirnaya, p.80: iti jñänanirnaye mahäyoginikaule 
frimatsyendrapädävatärite candradvipavinirgate trayovimsatitamah patalah; and (5) Kulänanda, 
p.113: matsyendrapädävatäritam kulänandam. 

96 Yonigahvara, f. 1v2-3 (vv. 1-2): frimaduttarapithe tu $masäne karavirake | sarvayogin- 
imeläpe [ + + + + nilrämaye | 2 yonigahvaram uddhrtya mantrasadbhävam uttamam | $rijñä- 
nanetranâthena bhütale samprakäsitam. 

 Kälikulapañcasataka colophons: frimaduttarapithodbhüte $risrinäthävatärite srikalikäkule 
pañcasate; Kälikulakramasadbhäva colophons: frimaduttarapithavinirgate frinäthapädävatärite 
$rikälikäkulasadbhäve. 

*8Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa 3.9: nâthe *panavapitha (em. : pavanapitha Ed.) *ädiste 
(em. : &disto Ed.) | bahi andara paramäthuka *mona (em. : mauna Ed.) | avatäre bhütadayäviste 
(em. : bhütadayävisto Ed.) | s0-ye kamasamudäyu vamona. 


Alexis Sanderson 265 


The Nätha after being taught in the Pranavapitha (Oddiyäna) was filled with 
compassion for living beings and as the promulgator emitted the internal and 
external silence of ultimate reality as the corpus of the Krama.°” 


Uddiyäna and Kashmir 


Uddiyäna, also written Oddiyäna, U/Odiyäna, U/Odyäna, and U/Oddayana, 
was the petty kingdom known to the Chinese as Wuzhangna (Jap. Ujôna) and 
to the Tibetans as U rgyan or O rgyan, located west-north-west of Kashmir to 
the north of Peshawar in what is now Pakistan. Its capital on the river Swat be- 
yond the Indus!°®° was only about 150 miles from the capital of Kashmir as the 
crow flies, but it was considerably further for a traveller, who on account of the 
mountains that intervene would need about a month to make the circuitous 
and arduous journey on foot from one to the other.!°1 It has also been located 
in eastern India, in Käñci in the Far South, near Kashgar in Chinese Turkestan, 
and even in the Urgensh region south of the Aral sea in Uzbekistan.!"? But 


%See the Sanskrit commentary thereon: frimanmakäradevyäh pithavare präptädesena $ri- 
jñänanetranäthena … ‘Jhänanetranätha, who received the teaching in the best ofthe Pithas from 
the goddess M [Manñgalä] ….”. See also the commentary on the Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a, 
p.73, IL. G-8: *devagurumantrasvätmanäm (em. [reconstructed from the Old Kashmiri on 
which this is the gloss: dyugurumantra-äpa] : deva .…..svätma .… Cod.) vastuta aikyam. ädipithä- 
dista(h) $rinäthas tu devagurubhägavyavasthäm ekasyaiväkhandacitsvarñpasya yad ädidesa tat sar- 
vais tathaiväbhivandyopäsyate. For the expression Pranavapitha [= Omkärapitha] for Oddiyäna 
see also Trivandrum Mahänayaprakäsa 2.35c-37; and ibid., p.60, 1. 10-11; Arnasimha, Maha- 
nayaprakäsa, £. 119r5-v1 (v. 153ab): sdgithapithajà $rimanmañgalänandanirbharä. 

100According to Xuanzang (602-664, India 629-641) (trans. BEL 1884, vol. 1, p. 118) and 
the New History of the Tang of Ouyang Xiu (1007-72) and Song Qi (998-1061) (Xi Tang- 
shu, chap. 221a, p. 12r, transl. CHAVANNES 1969, pp. 128-129), Wuzhangna’s seat of govern- 
ment was at Mengjieli. It is probable, as Beal has suggested (bid., p.121, footnote 9), that 
this was Mangora (/Mingäora, Manñglavor, Mañgalävor <— Mañgaläpura), which is located at 
34°46'34"N 72°21'40"E. 

101The Tibetan pilgrim U rgyan pa rin chen dpal (a.p. 1230-1309) gives an account of his 
own return from © rgyan to Kashmir in his O reyan lam yig. It took him 25 days to travel by 
the most convenient route from the heart of O rgyan to Rdo rje mu la at the western extremity 
of the valley of Kashmir; see the translation (Tuccr 1940, p.58). Rdo rje mu la is surely a 
Tibetan rendering of *Vajramüla, and that is surely a Buddbhist assimilation of the toponym 
Varähamüla (mod. Varahmul/Bärämüla) (34°12'00"N 74°21'00"E), since the latter is situated 
above the gorge through with the river Jhelum leaves the valley in the West. From Baramula 
he went on to the capital Pravarapura/Srinagar (34°05'00"N 74°50'00"E), which would have 
required two more days travel, as testified by Al-Birüni (SacHau 1964, vol. I, p.207). 

102ÆEastern India (Assam/Bengal/Orissa) has been proposed by Haraprasad SHAsTRI and 
Benoytosh BHATTACHARYA (see Sädhanamälä, vol. 2, pp. xxxvii-xxxix), Kashgar by Sylvain LÉvi 


266 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


the evidence offered for these counter-theories is negligible and they have been 
able to multiply only because of the apparent lack of references to the loca- 
tion of Uddiyäna in known Sanskrit sources. However, such references exist, 
and though they do not locate the place exactly, they are sufficient to conclude 
that it was in the vicinity of Kashmir. The Mañju$rimülakalpa mentions it with 
Kapisa, Balkh, and Kashmir as one of several regions in the North where cer- 
105 à Jaina historical text, the Kumärapälaprabodha- 
prabandha, has the Caulukya king Kumärapäla include it with Kashmir and 
Jälandhara in an expedition to the Himalayan region from Gujarat;!% and the 
eighth-century inscription on the base of the Ganeéa statue from Gardëz, 60 
miles south of Kabul, states that it was installed by Khingala, the Sähi ruler of 
Odyäna.!® Finally, the Kälïkulakramasadbhava refers to Uddiyäna not merely 
as the Pitha of the North (wétarapithah)—the North of that expression, seen in 


other Krama texts, might be suspected of being non-geographical—but explic- 
106 


tain Mantras are effective: 


itly as located in the northern region. 


(bid., p.xxxvii), Käñci by Lokesh CHaNDRA (1979), and Urgensh by Herbert GUENTHER 
(1994, p.26, footnote 58). 

105 Mañjusrimülakalpa 30.2c-3, speaking of the Usnisaräjamantras: *käpise (em. : kävise Ed.) 
*balakhe (conj. : vakhale Ed.) caiva *udiyäne (corr. : udiyäne Ed.) samantatah | ka$mïre sindhu- 
dese ca himavatparvatasamdhisu | *uttaräm disim ä$ritya (em. [cf. 10.10c; 19.99b: wétaräm disim 
äsrayet] : uttaräm di$i nibsrtya Ed.) manträh siddhyanti freyasäh ‘[These] excellent Mantras can 
be mastered in the North: in Käpi$a, Balkh, throughout Udiyäna, in Kashmir, Sindh, and in 
the valleys of the Himalaya’. 

104 Kumärapälacaritasamgraha, p. 54: athottaräm disam prati pratasthe. tatra käfmiroddiyäna- 
jälandharasapädalaksaparvatakhasädidesän ähimäcalam asädhayat ‘Then he set out towards the 
North. There he reached Kashmir, Uddiyäna, Jälandhara, the Siwaliks, Khasadesa [in western 
Nepal], and other regions up as far as the Himälaya. 

1%. pratisthäpitam idam mahävinäyaka paramabhattärakamahäräjädhiräjasrisähikhimga- 
lodyänasähipädaih) This Mahävinäyaka was established by the Supreme Lord and Emperor, 
Sähi Khinñgala, the Sähi of Odyäna’. See the reproduction of the ink estampage in Kuwayama 
1991, p.274, fig. 3. I agree with the reading proposed by Kuwayama in consulation with 
H. Nakatani, except that I see khimgalaudyäna rather than Khimgälaudyäna. 1 also accept 
Kuwayama interpretation of the date as falling in À.p. 765. 

106 Kälikulakramasadbhäva 1.1: frimaduttaradigbhäge pitham pithavaram mabat | oddiyäna- 
bhidhänam tu siddhayoginisevitam ‘In the northern region is the great Pitha called Oddiyäna, 
the best of Pithas, the resort of Siddhas and Yoginis — Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 2.36-37: 
mahäcakrakramo yo yam kathyamäno yathäyatham *yaträntarnetranäthasya (conj. : aträntarne- 
tranäthasya Ed.) prakatänubhavo *’bhavat (em. : bhavan Ed.) | tad odyänam (em. : tatodhyänam 
Cod. : tato dhyätam conj. Ed.) mabhat (conj. : tu tat Ed.) pitham sarvapithottamam bahih | 
yoginisiddhasamsevyam uttarasyäm disi sthitam ‘In the external world it is Odyäna, the great 
Pitha, the best of all Pithas, the resort of Siddhas and Yoginis, located in the northern region, 


Alexis Sanderson 267 


The identity of Uddiyäna, then, is beyond reasonable doubt. It can also 
be shown that what the Kashmirian Krama knows of the place is exact. For 
the goddess Mangalä and the Karavira cremation ground were indeed proper 
to it, these two facts being independently attested by the Tibetan U rgyan pa 
rin chen dpal (1230-1309), who visited it from Pu rans in Western Tibet. He 
tells us in his ‘Guide to Uddiyänx (O rgyan lam yig) that in the heart of the 
region, before the entrance to the town, there was a sandal-wood statue of the 
goddess Mañgalä (marigaladevi).\% He also visited the cremation ground to the 
east of the town and records that it was called bhir sma sha.® This is surely a 


in which this great sequence of the circles that I am relating as it truly is was directly experienced 
by the Nätha of the Inner Eye [Jfänanetra]. 

100 reyan lam yig, p.97, IL. 30-34: de nas nyi ma phyed kyis dhu ma tha lar sleb. de u rgyan 
sprul paï gnas kyi ngo bo. gnas de mthong ba tsam gyis, ‘ur nas rtsis med la song dug. dei mdun 
na mang ga la dhevi bya ba tsan tan las rang byon paï rie btsun ma gzhugs.. ‘After half a day we 
reached Dhumathala. This is the heart of Uddiyäna, the land of miraculous power. When we 
saw that place our cries were beyond counting. Before it there dwells a self-born [image] of the 
goddess Mañgaladevi made of sandal-wood’; ibid., p.98, Il. 7-9: gnas de la mi khyim Inga brgya 
sam dug. bud med thams cad kyis sprul bsgyur shes. khyed su yin byas rnal ‘byor ma zhes zer dug. 
mang ga la dhevi drung du nyal bsdad nas bud med gcig na re mo la ‘dod pa sten lo ngas dbyug 
pa gcig breyab pas bros song. ‘In this place there are about five hundred houses. All the women 
know the art of miraculous transformation. If you ask them who they are they say that they 
are Yoginis. While I was lying down to sleep in the presence of Mañgaladevi a certain female 
said [to me] “Enjoy a woman”. In reply I struck her with [my] staff and she went running of; 
p.97, IL 5-8: ngas reyang nas mthong u reyan gyi sa cha bags chags thug par dug. sa de rnams su 
tha mal gyi rtogs pa re re sam byung ma khad la phra men sha za mkha ‘gro ma du ma mdun 
du rengs la sleb bzaïi zer ba ‘dug ‘When I saw the land of Uddiyäna from a distance my residual 
memory traces were aroused. In these regions as soon as any spiritual insight arises [in one], 
however commonplace, many phra men ma flesh-eating Däkiniïs turn up alone in front of one 
and stay as ones ‘wife”. 

1080 reyan lam rig, p.99, IL. 2-3: gnas deï shar la bhir sma sha zhes pa dur khrod breyad kyi 
ya gcig (conj. : ya ba corr. Tucct : gya ba Cod.) phag rgod dang dug sprul dang dur bya dang ka 
ka dang lce spyang la sogs pa gdug paï mkha ‘gro sprin ltar du pa ÿigs su rung ba skyo bung byed pa 
yod. de nas byang cung zad na o ka sha briksha ces pa shing brgyad kyi ya gcig yod. dur khrod de las 
cung zad lho na dhu mun khu ces pa zhin skyong rdo las rang byung ba yod. shing deï rtsar la ka pa 
la bho jon zhes paï rdo gcig la tshangs pa drag sogs rdo la rang byung du byon pa yod. ‘To the east 
of that place is one of the eight cremation-grounds, called [Kara]viraémasä[na], thronged with 
a frightening cloud-like horde of malevolent Däkinis [in the form of] wild boars, poisonous 
snakes, vultures, crows, jackals, and the like. A little to its north there is one of the eight trees, 
called Oka$avrksa [recte A$okavrksa]. A little to the south of that cremation-ground is à natural 
stone Ksetrapäla named *Dhumunkhu (?). Near the tree, on a single rock called Kapälabhojon 
[recte Kapälabhäjana or Kapälabhojana] are natural stone [embodiments of] Brahmä, Rudra, 
and other [deities]’. 


268 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


deformation of virafmasänam for karavirasmasänam, confirming that the Kash- 
mirian tradition is accurate in this regard too. It is not probable that he was 
drawing on a Buddbhist Literary tradition rather than reporting, directly or in- 
directly, local usage heard 7 situ. For where Uddiyänas cremation ground is 
identified in Buddhist tradition, as it is as one of those venerated in associa- 
tion with eight sacred places in the ritual system of Heruka and Vajrayogini, 
it is called Attattahäsa.!®” Moreover, U rgyan pa shows no inclination to su- 
perimpose Buddhist readings in such cases. He also relates a visit to the Säkta 
Pitha of Jälandhara and reports the name of the cremation ground there to be 
Lang gur, !!° which is a close approximation of Lañkuta, the name given in the 
Kumärikhanda of the Säkta Manthänabhairava.\" 

It is not implausible that Jñänanetra should have propitiated Käli in 
Uddiyäna. There is no very strong evidence that he did, but Jñänanetra himself 
does tell us that he had his revelation of the nature of the goddess in “the great 
cremation ground” (mahäsmasänam),\"? and if this was meant to be understood 
geographically rather than esoterically then in a Krama context it most probably 
referred to Karavira. Moreover, the practice of seeking revelation by propitiating 
the goddess during a period of ascetic retreat at a remote Pitha is attested else- 
where in the Kramas literature. Srivatsa, the author of the Cidgaganacandrikä, 


1WKarañkatoranakrama of Dhyäyipada in the Guhyasamayasädhanamäla, f. 113v4: 
oddiyänadväre attattahäsam $masänam. 

100 reyan lam rig, p.93, IL. 14-16: deï *dur khrod (em. Tuccr : khrod) lang gur zhes pa na 
pha bong thod pa ‘dra ba la rje btsun ma rang byong bzhugs ‘In its cremation ground called Lang 
gur there stays a self-created [image of] the goddess near a big skull-shaped boulder’. 

MTManthänabhairava, Kumärikhanda, f. 18v3-4: evam daksinapitham tu oddiyanäd vinir- 
gatam | $masänam tatra Ycodyänamt lañkutam näma bhisanam ‘Thus from Oddiyäna came 
forth the southern Pitha. *...Ÿ a terrible cremation-ground there called Lañkuta”; and f. 18v5: 
idre jälandharam pitham j(v) älävvä tatra visrutä ‘Such is the Pitha Jälandhara. There there is 
the famed Mother Jväla’. 

I am aware of one other Buddhist reference to Karavira in connection with Uddiyäna. This 
is in the Grub thob breyad bcu risa bzhi'i lo reyus, the collection of legends of the eighty-four 
Siddhas, which the monk Smon grub ées rab claims to have heard directly from bla ma chen 
po Mi ‘jigs sbyin pa (*Mahäguru Abhayadatta), an Indian of Campä, and then rendered into 
Tibetan. There we are told that when the Siddha Kambala went to Mälapura (Mañgalapura 
[Dowmax 1985, p. 180]), the capital of Uddiyäna, he spent time in a cave called Panawa (recte 
Pranava?) in a place called Karavira (RoBiINson 1979, p. 141, IL 2-3): sras kyis nub phyogs o 
rgyan gyi mà la pu ra bya ba na grong khyer ‘bum tsho phyed dang gsum yod par phyin pa dang | 
de na yul ka ra bi ra zhes bya ba na | pa na wa zhes bya bai dgon pa na ta la tse phug bya baï 
phug pa yod sar bzhugs nas sgrub pa byas pas. 

1 Kälikästotra, v.19. See p.272. 


Alexis Sanderson 269 


reports that he propitiated Käli in Pürnapitha,!!* and, on a mythological level, 
the frame-story of the Kä/käkramapañcäsikä relates that this text is the teach- 
ing that was transmitted by Niskriyänanda through a [disembodied] voice to 
the cremation-ground dwelling Siddha Vidyänanda when he was propitiating 
the goddess in a cave in the mountains of the Pitha Srisaila in Andhra.! 14 

However, even if this detail is true, the evidence at our disposal does not 
permit us to suppose that the claim of revelation in Uddiyäna idealizes a pro- 
cess of cultural influence in which a tradition already established in that re- 
gion was assimilated by Jhänanetra and then introduced into Kashmir. Nor is 
there is anything in our sources to suggest that a connection with the place 
was maintained after Jhänanetra, probably himself a Kashmirian brahmin, had 
passed on his knowledge to his Kashmirian successors. The author of one ofthe 
later works of this tradition might be taken to be writing in Uddiyäna rather 
than Kashmir, since he speaks in an introductory verse of the knowledge of the 
Krama “here in Uddiyäna”.!1* But since the author is writing a Sanskrit com- 
mentary on a text in Old Kashmiri he is evidently a Kashmirian and writing 
for a Kashmirian audience. It is preferable, therefore, to take this as evidence 
that for the followers of the Krama the original toponym had come to denote 
Kashmir itself, or that its meaning had been extended to include it, or, most 
plausibly, that the author is referring to a sacred site in Kashmir that had been 
identified with the original location, either Bid?r in the south-east of the valley 
or, more probably, Här*parbuth in the capital. 116 


1BSee p. 298. 

DAKGlikäkramapañcäsika, f. 21v4-8 (7.182-188): éiläcitir munivaras tasya putras tapodha- 
nah | yogäbhyäsarato devi siddhah $äbararüpadhrk | 183 vidyänandeti vikhyäto mahävirava- 
rah priye | $masänaväsi nityastho niätanaratah param | 184 siddhayogindraviras ca cakracäre 
ratipriyah | fivapitham mahädevi srisailam devatäpriyam | 185 tasya uttaradigbhäge nänäsikha- 
raparvate | tatra hemamayi divyà guhà siddhasurärcitä | 186 taträrädhanakam krtvà vidyasa- 
baram uttamam | karoti bhaktim yogindro niskriyajñänaväñchinah | 187 bhaktim tivrataräm 
divyäm krtvä fäbararüpadhrk | tasya tusto munivaro niskriyänanda uttamah | 188 amoghavänyä 
tasyaiva samkräntam kälikäkramam | vämäjñänam tu kathitam pañcäsadbhümikäkramam. 

1$Commentary on the Mahänayaprakäsa of Sitikantha, p. 2, 1. 3: pithe sminn uddiyäne param 
aparamalam jñänam asty ugracaryà ‘Here in the Pitha Uddiyäna is the highest knowledge, free 
of the impurity of the other, [together with] the awesome practice [of Krama worship|’. 

16A Kashmirian Tirthamähätmya, the MNendikseträvatära, states (f. 11v, v. 55) that by the 
command of Mahesäni Oddiyäna is present in Kashmir itself (along with the other three Pithas, 
Pürnagiri, Kämaräja [sic], and Jälandharà). A gloss in the margin of the manuscript tells us that 
this Kashmirian Oddiyäna is Bhedar. This must be the large Agrahära called Bhedara in Skt. that 
Kalhana tells us was founded by king Bäläditya (Räjatarañgint 3.481) and which Srein (1979, 


270 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The Kälikästotra 


From Jñänanetra we have only a single work, the K%/ikästotra, which survives 
in both Kashmirian and Nepalese manuscripts.!!”7 In twenty Âryä verses he 
invokes KälFs nature as pure, non-dual, all-projecting consciousness:! 1 


Supreme, O Goddess, is your formless nature that takes the form of the three 
worlds, free of the concepts of the existent and the non-existent, unlimited by 
adjuncts, to be attained in the purest awareness. Supreme indeed is your stainless 
non-dual nature, that one and multiform pervades the world that flows out 
[within it, yet is] free of change, its name the true ground of consciousness. 


and touches on the phases of a system of worship of the constituent powers of 
this nature that will be set out in detail only in the works of his successors.!!? In 


vol. 1, p.115) identifies with the present Bid®r, a large village in the Bring Pargana(33°35'N 
75°20'E). But a more plausible location is the hill Här*parbuth (Särikäparvata, Pradyumna- 
giri) in Srinagar. For that is called Omkärapitha(/Pranavapitha) in the Sarikäpariccheda (f. 213, 
v. L: omkärapitham etad vai pitham pradyumnakam param); f. 311: pranaväkhyasya pithasya), as 
is Uddiyäna in Krama sources; see footnote 12 on p.234 and 99 on p. 265. This à more plau- 
sible location because it is in a prominent position, rising in the old capital some 125 metres 
above the floor of the valley, and has been a site of the worship of the Goddess since early 
times, principally of Särikä/Cakreévari, who gives the hill its name, but also of other goddesses, 
notably Käli and Siddhalaksmiï. The daily five-kilometre circumbulation (parikramah) of the 
shrines on the hill was a conspicuous feature of piety among the Kashmirian brahmins (Särikä- 
pariccheda £. 3x1: pranaväkhyasya pithasya paridaksinatah priye | sa yäti fivasäyujyam yatra gatvä 
na $ocate) and deep attachment to their Saktipitha (Sarikäpariccheda f. 216: Saktipithätmakah 
prokto vedäsyah pranavah parah) has led them in their present diaspora to establish a replica of 
the temple of $ärikä on a hill, renamed Här*parbuth, in Anangpur village, Faridabad, south of 
Delhi. 

I7T have not seen Kashmirian manuscripts of the text but it is probable that one at least exists 
since it has been published in Kashmir in booklets for devotional use; see Ssutisamgraha and 
Srigurustuti in the bibliography. In the quotations that follow I have cited only the readings 
of the second, that of the first being identical with it but for the addition of numerous minor 
errors. À line of a verse by Srinätha has been quoted by Ksemaräja in Sivasätravimarsini, p.92, 
IL 10—12: yathoktam $risrinäthapädaih Yrayet svätantryasaktim sväm sà frikäli parà kal& iti ‘As 
the venerable Srinätha has said, “He should take hold of his own power of autonomy. That is 
Kälï, the highest power”. This is perhaps from another, lost work by Jhänanetra. 

DB Kälikästotra, f. 90v1-3 (v.1): sitatarasamvidaväpyam sadasatkalanävihinam anupädhi | 
jayati jagattrayaräpam “nirapam (Ed. : nairñpam Cod.) devi te rüpam | 2 ekam anekäkäram 
*prasrtajagadvyäpti (prasrta Ed. : prasrti Cod) vikrtiparihinam | jayati tavädvayarñpam vima- 
lam alam citsvarüpäkhyam. 

19For a brief, unannotated account of the phases of this worship see SANDERSON 1988, 
pp. 695-698 (= 1990, pp. 164-167) and SANDERSON in the discussion after Goupriaan 1986, 
p.164. 


Alexis Sanderson 271 


verse 17 he invokes the first of these phases, that of the goddesss embodiment 
as the Pitha:!?° 


Supreme is your embodiment as the venerable Pitha[. For it is] replete with 
the pervasive power of the gnosis that flashes forth through the circles of the 
Bhücari, Dikcari, Gocarï, and Khecari goddesses, and [in its culmination] is 
one with the matchless state of rest [in the ground of consciousness]. 


In verses 3-4 and 16 he alludes to the five phases that follow, (1) the 
Five Flows (pañcavähacakram), (2) Hlumination (prakäfacakram), (3) Bliss 
(änandacakram), (4) Embodiment (mürticakram), and (5) the Celestial Or- 
der (divyaughah), elsewhere termed the circle of the Multitude (vrndacakram) 
or Säkinis (kintcakram), comprising the sixty-four Siddhäs and their leader 
Mañgalä: 1? 


Supreme is the unique (kim api) act, surging up within, in which you assume 
your form through your pure creative urge, the shining forth of that conscious- 
ness absolute and spontaneous [as the cycle of the Five Flows]. Then when you 
have projected all Time [through the circles of Illumination and Bliss] and 
[your] terrible manifestation as the [introverting] ego through the [circle of] 
Embodiment you eliminate this [ego through the rise of the circle of the Mul- 
titude vrndacakram] and so accomplish liberation. 


and:/7? 


Supreme is the Mother [Käli] who saves the world, pouring forth the Celestial 
Order by dividing each of her thirteen forms into five. 


In verses 8-9 he alludes to the four phases that follow these five: the three 
phases of Emission, Stasis, and Withdrawal (srsticakram, sthiticakram, and 
samhäracakram), and the thirteen Kälis of the phase of the Nameless (474khy- 
acakram) in which the course of worship ends:!?° 


120 Kälikästotra, f. 92r4—5 (v. 17): bhüdiggokhagadevicakralasajiñänavibhavaparipürnam | nir- 
upama“visräntimayam (Ed. : vif{rläntamayam Cod.) $ripitham jayati te *rüpam (Ed. : pitham 
Cod). 

1 Kälikästotra, f. 90v3—5 (vv. 3-4): jayati tavocchalad *antah svacchecchayä (Ed. : asveccha- 
cchayä Cod.) svavigrahagrahanam | kim api niruttarasahajasvarüpasamvitprakä$amayam | 3 
väntvà samastakälam “mürtyähamkäraghoramürtim api (Cod. : bhütyà jhamkäraghoramärttim 
api Ed.) | nigraham “asmin (Ed. : api Cod.) krtvänugraham api kurvaïï jayasi. 

2Kälikästotra, f.92r3-7 (v.16): réumunisamkhyam rüpam vibhajya pañcaprakäram ekai- 
kam | divyaugham udgiranti jayati *jagattärint (Ed. : jattärini Cod.) janani. 

123 Kälikästotra, f. 91r4-v1 (vv. 8-9): *ekam (Ed. : evam Cod.) svarüparñpam prasarasthitivi- 
layabhedatas trividham | pratyekam udayasamsthitilaya*visramatas (visramatas Ed. : virämatas 
Cod.) caturvidham tad api | 9 iti vasupañcakasamkhyam vidhäya sahajasvarñpam ätmiyam | 
visvavivartävartapravartakam jayati te rüpam. 


272 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The unitary nature of [your] essence becomes triple in the aspects of Emission, 
Stasis, and Withdrawal; and each of these assumes four aspects through Emis- 
sion, Stasis, Withdrawal, and Rest. Supreme is your form that by thus dividing 
your spontaneous essence into twelve sets in motion the whirl that is your un- 
folding (vivartah) as the world. 


In verses 5 and 18 he venerates the last of these: 12 
Supreme are you, O Käli, who, after dividing the body of Time into twelve, 
make that same nature shine forth within yourself as one. !? 


and:/26 


I praise the absolutely transcendent Goddess within that ground that lies within 
the state [of the Nameless] in which withdrawal itself is withdrawn, who is 
untouched by the prolixities of the existent and non-existent that she projects, 
[yet is] manifest in everything at every moment. 


He closes with a prayer that now that this nature of the Goddess has been 
revealed to him it may be realized by all beings:!?7 


O mother, by your favour, may these three worlds appropriate the nature of 
the Goddess that rests within the transcendental void, as I experienced it in the 
great cremation ground. Thus I, $iva, have expressed praise of my own nature 
by force of the state of true immersion. O Mañgalä, may it benefit the whole 
world that is itself myself. 


In this hymn he draws on both of the principal Krama scriptures. Thus, for 
example, he takes the circle of the Multitude from the Xä/kulakramasadbhäva, 
and the circle of the thirteen [Kälis] from the Kä/kulapañcasataka.# Nor has 


A Kälikästotra, f. 90v5—91r1 (v.5): kälasya käli deham vibhajya munipañca*samkhyayäbhi- 
nnam (em. : samkhyayä bhinnam Ed. [Cod., of course, allows both interpretations]) | susmin 
viräjamänam tad rüpam kurvaïi jayasi. 

15He intends us to understand that this manifestation of the twelve Kälis as one is the thir- 
teenth Käli worshipped at their centre. 

126 Kälikästotra, #. 92r5-v1 (v. 18): pralayalayäntarabhümau vilasitasadasatprapañcahinäm | 
*devim (Cod. : devi Ed.) niruttarataräm naurmi sadà sarvatah “prakatäm (Ed. : prakatam Cod). 

127 Kälikästotra, f.92v1—4 (v.19-20): *yadri mahäsmasäne drstam devyäh svarüpam *aku- 
lastham (Ed. : akulamstham Cod.) | tädre jagattrayam idam bhavatu tavämba prasädena | 20 
ittham svarüpastutir abhyadhäyi samyaksamävesadasävasena | mayä fivenästu fiväya samyarñ ma- 
maiva visvasya tu *“manñgaläkhye (Cod. : mañgaläya Ed.). 

lP8The phase of the 64 (+1) is taught in the Kä/kulakramasadbhäva (Patala 2: catuhsasti- 
vibhä(gä)vatärah) but not in the Kä/ikulapañcasataka, while the phase of the 13 [Kälis] is de- 
rived from the Kä/kulapañcasataka (Patala 5), the Kälikulakramasadbhäva teaching the worship 


Alexis Sanderson 273 


he simply cobbled together elements from the two. The result, to judge from 
the more detailed accounts to be seen in the works of his successors, is a harmo- 
nious and original whole carefully designed to express a coherent model of the 
cyclical unfolding and reversion of cognition pervaded by its non-sequential 
core, producing perhaps for the first time in Saivism a model for a form of 
contemplative ritual entirely fashioned by and subservient to the terms of a 
doctrine of liberating gnosis. 7? 

A passage from a lost text on the Krama lineages quoted by Jayaratha, which 
I shall call the Xramavamsävalr, asserts that Jhänanetra had seventeen disciples, 
some of whom came in time to initiate others, so establishing their own lin- 


eages. According to Jayaratha himself the total was at least nineteen. 2 


The Kramastotra of Eraka 


Abhinavagupta relates that three of these disciples, the Yoginis Keyüravatr, Ma- 
danikä, and Kalyänikä—it is the last two that raise Jayaratha’s count—passed 
on the teaching that Jñänanetra had received to Govindaräja, Bhänuka, and 
Eraka:"! 


First the venerable, excellent Vira Govindaräja, of auspicious name, second 


of seventeen Kälis in this phase. When in verse 9cd (f. 91r5-v1) he speaks of the circle of the 
Kälis as setting in motion the whirl of the [her] unfolding as the world he echoes K%/kula- 
pañcasataka À, f.27v4 (7.27ab): sadvivartah smrto jyotihpuñjas cakresipürvagah ‘The mass of 
radiance beginning with the leader of the circle [of Kälis] is her unfolding (vivartah) . 

129See also SANDERSON 1995, pp. 90-91 

130 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.195, IL 1-11: kim ca frimadavatärakanäthena $rikakäradevivac 
chrimadanikäsrikalyänike cänugrhite ity apy ato vasitam. tad esa ‘kramakulacatustayäsrayabhedä- 
bhedopadesato näthah | saptadasaiva isyan ittham cakre savamsanirvamsän iti niyamo na 
nyäyyah Sisyadvayasyäsyäparigananäd anyasyäpi sambhävyamänatvät ‘Moreover, it is also de- 
termined on the evidence of this source [the Kramakeli of Abhinavagupta] that the revered 
Promulgator initiated not only Kakäradevi [Keyüravati] but also the venerable Madanikä and 
Kalyänikä. So the limit expressed in the following passage is not justified: “Thus the Nätha 
[Jñänanetra] initiated precisely seventeen disciples in the teaching of duality-cum-noduality 
that rests on the four phases of the Krama, who themselves had or did not have disciples of 
their own”. For its author has failed to count these two disciples and there may well have been 
another’. 

B1 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.192, IL. 3-9, quoting Abhinavaguptas Kramakeli: yad uktam 
tatraivänena yathàä (As [Abhinavagupta] has said in that same work’): ekah $rimän vira- 
varah sugrhitanämadheyo govindaräjäbhidhänah $sribhänukäbhidhäno dvitiyah $rimän eraka- 
samäkhyas trtiyah samam evopadesam pithefvaribhya uttarapithe (em. : uttarapitha Ed.) labdho- 
padesac chriivänandanäthäl labdhänugrahäbhyah $rikeyüravatirimadanikäsrikalyänikäbhyah 
präpnuvantah. 


274 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Bhänuka, and third Eraka received together the teaching from Keyüravati, 
Madanikä, and Kalyänikä, all three of whom had been initiated by Sivänanda- 
nätha,!*? who had received the teaching in the Northern Pitha from the 
Pithesvaris. 


Eraka first strove for siddhih but later resolved to benefit mankind by passing 
on the esoteric teaching in the form of a hymn:!*° 


As for the venerable Eraka, he strove for siddhih, until having achieved it he 
reflected as follows: “What is the value of the supernatural rewards that I have 
undergone this great hardship to attain? Why did I not devote myself exclu- 
sively, as my [two] fellow pupils did, to the spiritual upliftment of those who 
might have come to me as disciples. For: ‘Even on the level of Sadäsiva [to 
which those who seek reward ascend] Mahograkäli with her ferocious frown 
of fury will come in time to destroy. Realizing this one should ascend to the 
ultimate state and forcibly enter the Goddess Kälasamkarsini [/who withdraws 
even Sadäsiva]”. So let me now benefit mankind by spreading through [this] 
hymn the esoteric teaching that I have held hidden in my mind”. 


This hymn was the Xramastotra, which later authors refer to reverentially 


as the Kramastotrabhatiäraka, using an honorific otherwise reserved for scrip- 


134 


tures. ”* Unfortunately no manuscript of the text has reached us. AÏl we have 


1#$ivänandanätha is Jhänanetranäthas alias; cf. Arnasimha. Mahänayaprakäsa, f. 119v1- 
2 (v.154ab): fatah $rimacchivänandanäthaguruvaram sadä | lokottaramahäjñänacaksusam 
pranamämy aham ‘Next I offer homage to the foremost of Gurus, the venerable Sivänanda- 
nätha, who possessed at all times the eye of the supramundane, great knowledge’. The ex- 
pression -jñänacaksusam is evidently intended to allude to his other name, Jñänanetra, which 
Arnasimha uses in f. 117v2-3 (v. 136): frjñänanetranäthasya (see footnote 91 on p.263). 

13 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.193, IL. 1-11: srémän erakas tu siddhyai präyatata yävat siddhah 
sann evam manasà samarthayate sma. kim bhogair yad ayam mahän kleso mayänubhütah. katham 
aham sabrahmacärivad yävajjivam prapannalokoddharanamätrapara eva näbhavam yatab rimat- 
sadäsivapade pi mahograkäli bhimotkatabhrukutir esyati bhañgabhümih | ity äkalayya paramäm 
sthitim etya kälasamkarsinim bhagavatim hathato ‘dhitisthet. tad idänim api nijabhävagata- 
rabasyopadesam stotramukhenäpi tävat prasärayaml lokän anugrhniyäm iti. That the whole pas- 
sage, beginning from ekah frimän viravarah and ending here with /okän anugrhniyäm iti, is 
direct quotation from Abhinavaguptas Kramakeli is confirmed by the fact that Ksemaräja at- 
tributes the first half of the verse cited here to that work in Sivastoträvalivivrti, p.159, IL 17-18 
(L 16: yathoktam asmadgurubhih kramakelau ‘As has been said by my Guru in the Xramakelÿ). 

14e find it in Kashmirian sources in the following: Kramasadbhävabhattäraka (= Kälikula- 
kramasadbhäva), Tantraräjabhattäraka (= Jayadrathayämala), Mrtyujidbhattäraka (= Netra), 
Vijñänabhattäraka (= Vijñänabhairava),  Sarvavirabhattäraka, and  Svatantrabhattäraka 
(= Svacchanda). 


Alexis Sanderson 275 


are quotations in the works of others of its verses on twelve out of the thir- 


teen Kälis of the phase of the Nameless, 155 


lines on (1) the activation of the seed-syllable KHPHREM 


and five citations of verses or single 
136 as the contempla- 
tion of the progressive dissolution of the content of cognition into the sky of 
consciousness (cidäkäsah), (2) on the rise of [the goddess in consciousnesss as] 
the Mantra dissolving all differentiated cognitions, !*” (3) on the single radiance 
that permeates the object, means, and agent of cognition, (4) on the inexpress- 


ible essence of all verbalization, and (5) on the inner fusion of light and bliss. 8 


Keyñravati 


Later Krama Gurus trace their initiatory lineage back to Jñänanetra through 
the Yogini Keyüravati alone, who thus occupies a position of particular rever- 
ence in the tradition as the conduit through which the teachings of Jñänane- 
tra reached all subsequent Gurus. Nor does Abhinavaguptas account, though 
it adds Madanikä and Kalyänikä, claim any independence for them as the 
source of individual lineages, simply merging them somewhat implausibly with 
Keyüravati as co-initiators. No work is attributed to her in spite of her emi- 
nence, or to any other of the known female Gurus of this tradition; but the 
*Kramavamsavali reports that she had three disciples, all of whom began their 
own teaching lineages. Jayaratha raises the total to six, by adding Govindaräja 
and Bhänuka on the authority of Abhinavagupta, and a certain Naverakanätha 
on the authority of a citation from a lost work. !*? 


Hrasvanätha (/Vämana/Vämanadatta/Viranätha) 


The transmission that reached these later Gurus passed from her through the 
Vira Hrasvanätha, also called Vämana, Viravämanaka, Vaämanavira, and Viranä- 


15 For the citations of these verses see footnote 204 on p. 297. 

B6This syllable opens the principal Krama Mantra, the nine-syllable Vidyä of Käla- 
samkarsani: KHPHREM MAHACANDAYOGESVAR. For this verse and a translation see p. 363. 

137 For this verse and a translation see p. 362. 

B8These five citations are respectively in (1) Tanträlokaviveka on 4.191cd, (2) Mahartha- 
mañjariparimala on v. 49, (3) Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 6.27; Vijñänabhairavavivrti, p. 140; (4) 
Mahärthamañjariparimala on v. 39; and (5) ibid., on v. 44, partially in Spandasamdoha, p.10, 
L15-11, 1 (yathoktam .…siddhapädaih). 

139 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, pp. 195, L. 16-196, 1.9. 


276 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


tha. #0 Jayaratha tells us that Hrasvanätha composed a commentary (-vivarana) 
on Erakas Kramastotra, and claims to have seen a manuscript of it written in 
his own hand.!#! But no trace survives beyond this single mention, nor of any 
of the other commentaries on the same whose existence he reports.1# Of his 
work we have a single verse from an unidentified source, which speaks of “that 
supramundane fire-sacrifice in which the fuel is the forest of dualities and the 
human sacrifice (mahäpasuh) Death himself”. 

We also have two short texts: the Svabodhodayamañjari and the Dvaya- 
sampattivärtika, also known as the Bodhaviläsa. The last verse of the former 
declares that it is the work of Väamanadatta, the son of Harsadatta ‘a lion in the 
forest of the Mimämsx.# In the closing verse of the latter the author does not 


140(1) Vämana: Zanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.196, 15-16, quoting from a lost work by 
one Somaräja a passage on his teacher Hrasvanätha: #Zmadvämanabhänuh kramakamala- 
vikäsane caturah ‘The venerable Vämana, a [veritable] sun able to cause the lotuses of the 
lineage to unfold’; and Arnasimha, Mahänayaprakäsa, £.119v3-5 (v.156): mahäviravaro 
Jo au $rimadvämanasamÿjñakah | devidhämni sadärüdhas tam vande kramabhäskaram ‘1 
praise the best among the best of Viras, Väamana by name, that sun to [the lotuses of] 
the Krama [lineage], who was constantly immersed in the radiance of the Goddess’; (2) 
Viravämanaka: Yogaräja, Paramärthasäravivrti, p.146, 1. 15: yathäha bhattasriviravämanakah; 
(3) Vämanavira: Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.), 8.27c: etadvimarsasambhütavirävalyäditarpanät | 
äsid *vämanavirasya (em. : vämanaviryasya Ed.) *vidvesastambhanädikam (con). : yadvisnu- 
stambhanädikam Cod.); and (4) Viranätha: Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.196, IL. 10-13: srÿhras- 
vanäthasyäpi ‘Sriviranäthapädaih pañca ca devinaye krtäh Sisyäh” iti na pañcaiva $isyäh ‘Nor is 
it true of Hrasvanätha that he had only five disciples, as is stated in the verse “The venerable 
Viranätha initiated five disciples in the Devinaya”. 

M1 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.203, IL 13-15, speaking of a second verse on Yamakälï in that 
hymn: athäyam api bhavatkalpita eva Sloka iti cen naïtat $rihrasvanäthenäpi svalipivivarane ya 
drstatvät ‘Tf it is claimed that this verse too is my work [rather than Erakaïs], I reply that this 
cannot be so, because Hrasvanätha too bears witness to this verse in his commentary in his own 
hand’. 

142 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.203, IL. 15-16: sarvesäm eva ca vivaranakrtäm atra pratipadam 
pâthänäm Slokänäm (ca) vyatyäso dr$yate. ity asmaddrsta eva päthe ka iväyam pradvesah ‘More- 
over, we find that all the authors of commentaries have inversions of readings and verses at 
every step in this [work]. So why, I wonder, should there be this special hostility to the reading 
that I have seen? 

18Yogaräja, Paramärthasäravivrti, p.146, 1. 15: yathäha bhattasriviravamanakah: yatrendha- 
nam dvaitavanam mrtyur eva mahäpasuh | alaukikena yajñena tena nityam yajämahe. For the 
meaning of mahäpasuh see Svacchandoddyota, vol. 2, p.7: mahäpasuh purusapasuh ‘a mahäpasuh 
is a human sacrificial victin. 

M Svabodhodayamañiart À, f. 8r9—11; B, f. 5v7-9 (v. 44): mimämsävanasimhasya harsadatta- 
sya sünunà | krtä vämanadattena svabodhodayamañjart. 


Alexis Sanderson 277 


state his name but identifies himself simply as the son of Harsadatta ‘a lion in 
the forest of the Mimämsä and a native of Takade$a’.1# The -datta of the name 
would hinder us from identifying this author with the Kramas Vämana w/ias 
Hrasvanätha, were it not that Siva[sväamin] Upädhyäya quotes the second text 
as the work of Vämananätha at one place, 6 and as that of Hrasvanätha, son 
of Harsadatta, at another.!* Abhinavagupta quotes the same as the work of 
$ri-Vämana,!# and Ksemaräja quotes the first as that of Bhattaéri-Vämana, “ 
while Yogaräja, the pupil of Ksemaräja, attributes the verse cited above on the 
supramundane fire-sacrifice to Bhattaéri-Viravämanaka. !°° 

The purpose and content of the Suzbodhodayamañjari is the teaching of a se- 
ries of purely mental practices to bring about liberation-in-life through the dis- 
solution of contracted awareness (manab, cittam) by means of insight (#icayah) 
into the emptiness of objective and mental phenomena!*! and reversion into 
the uncontracted inner ground by observing the process of the arising and dy- 
ing away of cognition, especially where the latter is particularly intense, as in 
the perception of the beautiful and meditation on the sensation of orgasm: 


One may meditate on any beautiful sound that one hears until ceasing it brings 
about the cessation of mind. In the same way one may meditate on the beauty 
of the visible and other [objects of the senses]. After the object-perception has 
dissolved one should let one’s awareness remain empty, with no memory ofit, 
full only of the sense of one’s own immediate being. 1°? 


15 Doayasampattivärtika À, f. 8v24 and upper margin; B, ff. 6v9-7r1 (v. 23): räkadesasamu- 
dbhüto mimämsävanakesart | harsadatteti nämnä tu tasya sûnor iyam krtih. 

M6 Viñänabhairavavivrti, p.78, IL. 1-2: dvayasampattikäras tu vämananätho …. 

7 Viñänabhairavavivrti, p.90, IL 14-17: $rihrasvanäthena harsadattasünunà ‘ahamkäramayi 
bhümir” *ityädinà dvayasampattau (corr. : ityadinä advayasampattau Ed.). The citation is Dvaya- 
sampattivärtika À, f. 8r18-19; B, £. 6r8 (v. 5). 

18 Parätrisikavivarana, p.198, IL 13-14: esa eva $rivämana*viracite dvayasampattivärtike 
(viracite dvaya corr. : viracite advaya Ed.) upadesanayo boddhavyah. 

14 Spandanirnaya, p.48, IL 14-7: bhattasrivämanenäpy uktam ‘älambya samvidam yasmät 
samvedyam na svabhävatah | tasmät samviditam sarvam iti samvinmayo bhaved” iti. ‘Bhattaéri- 
Vämana too has said: “One can become flooded with consciousness by [contemplating] the 
fact that since the objects of knowledge exist not in themselves but only in dependence on 
cognition everything is known”. This is Svabodhodayamañjart À, f. 7v19-—20 (v. 32). 

150See footnote 143 on p. 276. 

151See, e.g., v. 32 translated in footnote 149. 

12Svabodhodayamañiari À, f. 7111-14; B, f.3r4-7 (vv. 15-16): yad yan manoharam kimcic 
chrutigocaram ägatam | ekägram bhävayet tävad yäval linam nirodhakrt | räpädinäm tathaive- 
ttham bhävayed ramaniyatäm | vilinän “na (A : nà B) smaret pascäd ätmabhävopabrmhitah. 


278 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


One should direct one attention at the climax of love-making to the point be- 
tween the penis and the navel. As the bliss of orgasm fades one will suddenly 
be freed of all perturbation. 153 
If a persons awareness dissolves into the self in every moment through these 
methods he becomes liberated-in-life, having reached the full reality of con- 
sciousness. 154 

The defining feature of these methods, which sets them apart from the med- 
itation practices of the brahmanical tradition and indeed from those taught in 
much of the Saiva Mantramärga, has been expressed by the author as follows: 155 
The ancients taught that the cessation [of the activities of the mind and senses] 
comes about through the method of cultivating distaste for them. I shall teach 
[here] how that cessation can be achieved effortlessly. 


and by Abhinavagupta in an oblique reference to the text:!°f 


To explain, the Guru has taught in many ways in his treatise that it is by an 
effortless detachment that the activities of the senses dissolve. [For] the more 
they are forcibly restrained, the more they rise in ever new forms. 


As for the Dvayasampattivärtika, that is an explanation of two verses, as- 
cribed to oral transmission (vakträgamah), 57 on the attainment of liberation- 


153 Svabodhodayamañjari B, f. 5r6-7 (lacking in A) (v. 38): näbhimedhräntare cittam *suratänte 
(corr. : svaratänte B) viniksipet | liyamäne ratänande nistarañgah ksanam bhavet. 

154 Svabodhodayamañjar: À, f. 8r7—9; B, f. 5v5-7 (v. 43): ittham pratiksanam yasya cittam ät- 
mani liyate | sa labdhabodhasadbhävo jivanmukto vidhiyate. 

SSvabodhodayamañjari À, f.7r6-7; B, ff. 2v9-3rl (v.12): pürvair nirodhah kathito 
vairägyäbhyäsayogatah | ayatnena nirodho yam asmäbhir upadisyate. 

156 Malinivijayavärtika 2.111—12: tathà hi gurur ädiksad bahudhà svakasäsane | anädaravi- 
raktyaiva galantindriyavrttayah | yävat tu viniyamyante tävat tävad vikurvate. 

157 Dvayasampattivartika À, f. 8r17—18; B, f. 5v6-7 (v. 4ab): slokadvayam idam yasmäc chi- 
vavakträgamoditam. GNoLi (1974, p.454) takes fvavakträgamoditam to mean ‘stated in the 
scriptures from the very mouth of Siva’ (‘state dette nell’ägama dalla stessa bocca di Siva’). 
However, the term vakträgamah and its synonyms such as vakträmnäyah and mukhägamah 
mean oral teaching as opposed to teaching in the form of scripture; see, e.g., Devidvyardhasa- 
tikä, . 12r4-5 (v.139ab): pascäc *chrnusvaiva (em. : chrnusvava Cod.) mahopadesam vakträ- 
game yat?) sthita khecarisu; £. 3v6-7 (v.31cd): *mukhägamam idam (conj. : mukhägamami 
Cod.) devi khecarinäm hrdi sthitam; Kälikulakramasadbhäva, Ÿ. 4r12-v1 (3.29cd): tena vaktrena 
vaksyämi vakträmnäyakramägatam; Kälikulapañcasataka À, . 2v1 (1.18ab): mukhägamavidha- 
nena vakträdvaktrakramena tu; Chummaäsamketaprakä$a, £. 9v6 (v. 142): samcäru | mukhänmu- 
khakramäyätah sarvasamkalpavarjitah | vakträmnäyah paro yo ‘yam sa samcäro mitah sthitah: 


Alexis Sanderson 279 


in-life (vyutthäne Sivatvam) through meditative fusion of the two urges, intro- 
vertive and extrovertive, of uncontracted consciousness. 

These practices and their description contain no elements that link them di- 
rectly to outward features specific to the Krama. Indeed many are drawn from 
the Viÿñänabhairava rather than any scripture of the Kälikula. Nonetheless, 
their spirit is precisely that which animates the Krama; and this proximity is 
particularly clear in the practice of observing the arising and reversion of sen- 
sual cognition, from initial excitation to final quiescence. We cannot conclude, 
therefore, from the abstract character of these instructions that they must have 
been written by an author other than Hrasvanätha. Moreover, both works are 
connected with the oral tradition of the Siddhas, an expression for the enlight- 
ened that is mostly applied in the Kashmirian literature to masters of the Krama. 
The author of the anonymous Mahänayaprakä$a when citing the first verse of 
the Svabodhodayamañjart refers to it or the whole work as siddhamukhämnäyah 
‘the oral teachings of the Siddhas’. 8 The author himself refers to those teach- 
ings in that work!” and at the end ofhis Duayasampattivartika identifies them 
as his source. Moreover, he declares that those who achieve success by following 
the path that he has formulated on their basis will attain the yoginipadam, the 
domain of the Yoginis, which is to say the state that they embody or, which 
comes to the same, the state that they hold in their awareness and transmit to 
others. This too is consistent with a Krama background, though it does not 


Vätälanäthasätravrtti, p.19, 11. 1-2: mahämeläpasamaye sütropanibaddho vakträmnäyah prakä- 
fitah; Tanträloka 6.252ab: iti kälatattvam uditam Sästramukhägamanijänubhavasiddham. This 
leads me to question the reading va-. For the oral teaching of $iva s his scriptures and the 
expression #vavakträgama- is therefore pleonastic. Moreover, as GNoLrS translation shows, it 
supposes an awkward ellipsis: ‘scriptures by/from $iva's mouth’ for ‘scriptures uttered by Siva's 
mouth’. I therefore suspect that the manuscripts have transmitted a corruption of siddhavak- 
trâägamoditam ‘taught in the oral transmission of the Siddhas’. That reading would make better 
sense, and it would be in keeping with the authors statement at the end of the work that it is 
the oral teachings of the Siddhas that he has formulated (see footnote 160). 

58 Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 9.52-53: …iti siddhamukhämnäyayuktyà …. 

59 Svabodhodayamañjari B, f. 5r1-2 (v.35): vämadaksinasamcärabindudvayanigharsanät | 
dvädasänte mahäsaktih siddhair uktä mukhägame ‘The Siddhas have taught in their oral teach- 
ings that the Great Power [becomes manifest] in the Dvädasänta through the friction of the 
two drops in the flows of the left and right [channels of the breath]’. 

160 Doayasampattivärtika À, f. 8v23-24 and left margin; B, f. 6v8-9 (v. 22): ii siddhamukho- 
deitam svayam evam udährtam | märgenänena samsiddhä labhante yoginipadam ‘Thus 1 have 
formulated in my own words the oral teaching of the Siddhas. Those who achieve success by 
this path attain the Yoginrs domain’. 


280 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


prove it conclusively. Finally, the Suzhodhodayamañjart, though infrequently 
cited in the Kashmirian literature, is, as we shall see, one of the few texts cited 
by Kashmirian authors of the Krama. I see no good reason therefore to deny 
that these two texts are the work of Hrasvanätha/Vämana. 

Some have asserted that the author of these works is the Vämanadatta 
who wrote the long philosophical hymn to Visnu (*Visnustuti) rooted in the 
Päñcarätrika tradition of the Sasvatasamhitä that has been referred to as the 
Samvitprakä$a, though that appears to be the title only of the first of a series of 
Prakaranas contained in the work.!f! But that position is refuted by the hymn 
itself. For while the author of the Saiva works describes himself as the son of 
Harsadatta, a Mimämsaka of Takadeéa in the northern Panjab, the author of 
this Päñcaratrika work describes himself as a Kashmirian of the Ekäyana lin- 


eage, whose father was Devadatta, son of Rätradatta.!°2 


Hrasvanätha and Cakrabhänu 


Hrasvanatha initiated five disciples according to the *Kramavamsävali and 
six according to Jayaratha.!% The foremost of these was Cakrabhänu, whom 
Krama tradition reports to have been an ascetic following the [Käpälika] ob- 
servance as a skull-carrying denizen of the cremation ground (mwhävrata- 
dharabh) 4 

Now the Kashmirian historian Kalhana reports in his Rdjatarañgini, writ- 
ten between 1148/49 and 1149/50, that a brahmin ascetic of this name was 
punished by King Yasaskara (r. A.D. 939-948) for transgressing the limits of 
brahmanical conduct (atyäcärah) in a cakramelakah. He also reports the claim 
of the Gurus of this tradition that the Yogin Viranätha, who, he tells us, was 
Yaéaskara’s minister of war and peace and Cakrabhänu’s maternal uncle, took 


161This assertion is seen in GNoL1 1974, p.453 and 1989, p. 125; and ToreLLA 1994, p. 482. 

162 Samvitprakäsa, f. 516—9 (vv. 153-155, end): rätradattir devadatto ratnädevyäm yam ätma- 
jam | lebhe vämanadattäkhyam tatstutyà private harih | sastyuttaram $loka$atam idam bodham 
vinäpi yah | pathen madhuripor agre bhaktyä moksam sa gacchati | ekäyane prasütasya kafmiresu 
dvijanmanah | krtir vämanadattasya seyam bhagavadäsrayä. iti samvitprakäsanäma prathamam 
prakaranam ‘Hari delights in the hymn of Vämanadatta, whom Devadatta, son of Rätradatta, 
obtained as his son by Ratnädevi. Whoever recites these 160 verses in the presence of Visnu 
with devotion, even if he does not understand them, attains liberation. This work on the Lord 
is Vämanadatta*, a brahmin born in Kashmir in the Ekäyana [lineage]. Here ends the first 
Prakarana, called the Samvitprakäsa’. 

16 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, pp. 193, L. 16-197, I. 4. 

164$ee Arnasimhas Mahänayaprakä$a, v. 156 in footnote 194 on p.292. 


Alexis Sanderson 281 


revenge by performing a ritual of chastisement (nigrahakarma) that caused the 
king death:!° 


The king, having committed himself vigorously to the task of supervising the 
caste-classes and [brahmanical] disciplines discovered that a brahmin ascetic 
called Cakrabhänu had transgressed prescribed brahmanical conduct in a cakra- 
melakah and, being submissive to his religious obligations as a king, punished 
him by branding his forehead with the shape of a dogs foot. The [Säkta] Gu- 
rus, promoting their standing by [pointing to] the power of their predecessors, 
confidently proclaim that in his fury at this the Yogin Viranätha, who was the 
king’s own minister of war and peace and Cakrabhänu’s maternal uncle, per- 
formed [a ritual of] chastisement against him. The story that they themselves 
have put about is that [as a result] the king died at the end of seven days. 166 But 
how can that be reasonable when [in fact] what killed him was the illness from 
which he had long been suffering? 


I propose that this is the Cakrabhänu of our Krama lineage and that Vira- 
nätha, his maternal uncle and Ya$akaras minister, is none of other than his 
Guru Hrasvanätha. For, as we have seen, Hrasvanätha was also known as Vira- 
nâtha in the Kramas literature, and the placing of these events in Yasaskara’s 


I5Kalhana, Réjatarañgini 6.108-112: varnäsramapratyaveksäbaddhakaksyah ksitisvarah | 
cakrabhänvabhidham cakramelake dvijatäpasam | krtätyäcäram älokya *“räjadharmavasamvadah 
(em. : räjä dharmavasamvadah Ed.) | nijagräha $vapädena lalätatatam añkayan | tanma- 
tulena tadrosäd viranäthena yoginà | sämdhivigrahikenätha sa svenaiva nyagrhyata | pürvä- 
caryaprabhävena svamähätmyädhiropanam | prakhyäpayadbhir gurubhih $raddhayeti yad ucy- 
ate | tatkhyäpitaiva saptähät sa vipanna iti frutih | dirghavyädhihate tasminn upapattih katham 
bhavet. 1 have proposed the emendation räjadharmavasamvadah for the reading r4jà dharma- 
vafamvadah seen in STEIN's edition because it both removes the defect of the subject’s being 
stated twice in the same sentence (ks#fvarah and räjä) and provides an apt adjectival qualifi- 
cation of the former (‘submissive to his religious obligations as a king’), räjadharmah being à 
term of art for the special obligations imposed on rulers by the Dharmaéästra, which include 
that of ensuring the punishment of wrongdoers. 

166Texts of the Mantramärga regularly specify seven days as the period for which a fire- 
sacrifice for such a siddhih must be maintained, saying that its effect comes about at the end 
of that time; see, e.g., Kubjikämata 23.151: sadä kruddhena kartavyam nigraham saptaväsaraih: 
Picumata, {.70v4 (14.226cd): saptarätrena devesi märayed “ripupuñgavam (ripu conj. : vapu 
Cod.); Picumata, f.251r3 (55.58ab): räjänan tu vasam kuryät saptaräträ(n) na samsayah: 
Vinäsikha 198c—199b: juhuyät saptarätram tu yasya nämnä tu sädhakah | vidvisto dréyate loke 
esa vidvesanam param; Uddämaresvara 1.5 1cd: saptarätraprayogena sarvasatrupranä$anam. \ is 
for this reason that I have understood Kalhana's use of the verb #5-grb- (nyagrhyata) to refer 
to the kind of ritual known as a nigrahakarma, as in the first of these examples of seven-day 
hostile ceremonies. 


282 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


reign accords, as we shall see, with other evidence of the chronology of these 
Gurus.! Moreover, the cakramelakah to which Kalhana refers and that STEIN 
tentatively suggested in his translation of the Räjatarañgini might be a place- 
name, is in fact a Kaula ritual, ‘a gathering (-melakah) of à circle (cakra-) of 
male initiates and low-caste Yoginis with a strongly orgiastic character. 

The ritual is set out in detail as one of the Krama’s periodic ceremonies 
in the KG/ïkulakramärcana of Vimalaprabodha, the Guru of the Nepalese king 
Arimalla (r. 1200—-1216),!% under the name czkrakridä.\® The sponsor invites 
the Guru and male initiates of the three grades to a house together with sixteen, 
eight, or four Yoginis of specified castes, mostly or exclusively low, beneath the 
rank of Südra.!7° He sets up a [wine-]pot, worships the Goddess in it with the 


167See p.412. 

I68That Vimalaprabodha was the Guru of Arimalla is stated in the colophon reported by 
Perecx (1984, pp. 81-82) of a manuscript of the Amréefvarapäjà of Abhayamalla, Arimalla's 
successor, penned in A.D. 1216. It describes Arimalla as frmadvimalaprabodhapädaprasädäl 
labdhäbhiseka- ‘consecrated by the favour of the venerable Guru Vimalaprabodhæ. 

1 Kälikulakramärcana  #.20r2-21rl, 21r5-v3:  athäcäryasädhakaputrakasamayijanän 
yoginikulasahitän ämantrayet. yathàä brähmanï paukkasi dhvajini antyajà cakrini *chippini 
(corr. : chippina Cod.) saunaki ksatrini mätañgr carmakäri dhivari mahämati(h) $adri 
vaisyi vesyà dhävaki nartakï ity uttamayoginikulam. dhivari dhvajini chippini paukkast car- 
makäri antyajà nati vesyà iti madhyamayoginikulam. dhivari dhvajini chippint paukkasï 
ity adhamayoginikulam. yathàä  Sobhanagrhe kumbham  samsthäpya  svestakramasahitäm 
tatra  devim  sampüjya  pañcavähamandalopari  balipätram  nivefya  samayahrdayena 
tädanaproksananiriksanäbhyuksanasamikaranädikam  sthänasya  krtvä  äsanäni  samsthäpya 
pratyekaikäsane pañcakäläsanän sampüjya guhyahrdayena pädapraksälana*pürvakam (corr. : 
pürvvaka Cod.) taträsane upavesayet. upaviste sati mahäsamayahrdayena vämävartakramena 
dväräd dväram yävad avicchinnäm *“surädhäräm (corr. : suradhäräm Cod.) dadyät. tata äcäryam 
guruparamparäyätam siddhakramena sampüjya sädhakän virakramena putrakän pithakramena 
samayinah ksetrakramena *yogini$ (corr. : yogini Cod.) catuhkramäbhyantare pratyekaikakra- 
maikena püjayet. tilakakajjalasindürapuspavasträlamkäram yathäkramena svasvavidyayà dattvä 
päträni jyesthänukramena pañcämrtädisahitäni pañcavähamandalopari puratah  sthäpayet. 
khänapänalehyacosyädikam guhyahrdayäbhimantritam puratah sthäpayitvä samayacchommakam 
sarvaih saba bhäsed yathà nA HA srstau KiTi HIT1 séhitau KRE KRE samhäre ARA ARA anäkhye 
KULURU KULURU bhäsäyäm. upasamhärasamkhyäkramena devatätarpanam krivä samayabalim 
dadyät. … (E21rl-5). tatah pürvoktäm vai “*bhäsäm (corr. : bhäsäm Cod.) samuccärya 
päträni däpayet, vämahastena grhniyät. ädau $Saktes tadanantaram sarvesäm. evam tridhä. 
pürvasamskrtacarukam lelibämudrayä *pradipam (conj. : paridipam Cod.) ca bhaksaniyam. 
tadante yathäsukhena  $rikramasadbhävoktakramena  cakrakridä. samäptyante pañcaväham 
sampüjya daksävartena dhäräm nipätya madhyänte samayabalim dattvàä cakrasthänam go- 
mayenopalipya puspena püjayet. iti cakrakridävidhih. 

170The source of the list of sixteen Yoginis is K4/kulakramasadbhava, f. 10r12-12 (4.47c—49): 
brähmant “pukkasi (puskasi Cod.) caiva dhvajini antyajà tathä | 48 cakrini ca tathà *chippi 


Alexis Sanderson 283 


deities of his preferred Krama phase, places the vessel for the bali offering on a 
Mandala diagram in which he has worshipped the [goddesses of the] Five Flows 
(pañcavähamandalam), ritually prepares the ground of the site, sets out seats 
for each of the guests on it, installs and worships the five deities from Brahmä 
to Sadäsiva on each, so transforming them into thrones for the installation of 
Bhairavas or goddesses, washes the feet of each guest, invites them to be seated, 
pours a continuous stream of liquor around the periphery of the site from door 
to door, moving from right to left, and worships the Guru, Sädhakas, Putrakas, 
and Samayins with the Mantras of the Siddhas, Viras, Pithas, and Ksetras re- 
spectively, and the Yoginis with the Mantras of the four phases from Emission 
to the Nameless, one for each, so that the Mantra of each phase is used four 
times if they are sixteen. Then he gives each a forehead mark, collyrium for the 
eyes, vermilion powder, flowers, cloth, and other offerings, using the Mantra 
with which each has been worshipped, sets before them cups [of wine] with 
the five nectars and the rest!”! on the Five Flow Mandala in the order of their 
seniority, together with various foods and drinks, addressing each of the guests 
with the arcane utterances known as chommakäni for each of the five phases, 
from Emission to the Nameless and the Pure Light (bhäsa).”? After gratifying 


(corr. : chippi Cod.) fauniki (em. : faundikr Cod.) “ksatriyi (corr. : ksatrini Cod.) tathä | 
mätañgt carmakärt ca dhivari ca mahämate | 49 füdri *vaisyi (corr. : vaisä Cod.) tathäà vesyà 
*dhävakï (em. : väyaki Cod.) nartakï tathà | etäs tu püjayet tatra jätyahamkäravarjitah ‘He 
should worship without pride of caste [Yoginis of] the following [groups]: brahmin, Pukkasa 
untouchable, liquor-seller, Antyaja untouchable, potter, dyer, butcher, Ksatriya, Mätañga un- 
touchable, leather-worker, fisherman, O wise one, Südra, Vai$ya, courtesan, washerman, and 
dancer.” Vimalaprabodha’s mahämatih, which appears to raise the total to seventeen, is due to 
a misconstrual of the vocative mahämate in 4.48d. The same verses are Yonigahvara, f. 9r3-5 
(vv.113-115b), which support the emendations pukkasï, faunikï, and ksatriyi but have kandukï 
(corr. : kandukï Cod.) ‘barber, f. ” in place of cakrini and the error mahämatih. They are followed 
by a verse specifying the Yoginis to be invited in the option of four as in the K&/ïkulakramärcana 
(115c-116b): catväri-m-athavä püjyà yathävibhavavistaraih | dhivari dhvajini chippr pukkast ca 
caturthikä ‘Or he may worship four, as abundantly as his resources allow, one from each of the 
following castes: fisherman, liquor-seller, dyer, and Pukkasa untouchable’. For chippi ‘dyer or 
‘cloth-printer see the evidently cognate words with this meaning in various Indo-Aryan lan- 
guages in TURNER 1966-71, p.273b (4994) under *chapp- (/*chipp-) ‘to press’. 

171 For the identity of the body-products called the five ‘jewels’ or ‘nectars see SANDERSON 
2005, pp. 110-114 (footnote 63). 

l72These five chommakani are as follows: HA HA, HITI HITI, KRE KRE, ÂRA ÂRA, and KULURU 
KULURU. Î propose that their language is Dravidian: (1) with HA HA for Emission/Creation cf. 
Tamil 4- ‘to come into existence’; (2) with HITI HITI for Stasis/Maintenance cf. Tulu hidi ‘a hold, 
grasp, handful”, Kannada pidi ‘to seize, catch, grasp’; Tamil péti ‘to grasp, cling to’; (3) with kRE 


284 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


the Krama’s deities in the order of progressive withdrawal he presents a food 
offering on the ground to placate the classes of male supernaturals that inhabit 
the Säkta power-sites and the various classes of non-human Voginis, ending 
with an invocation to the Goddess. With the same chommakäni he passes the 
guests the wine cups with his left hand, refilling them twice, serving the prin- 
cipal Yogini first and then the rest.!/* They should also eat the sacramental 
substances and the dough lamps (dipacaruh) that are considered a substitute 
for human flesh.!”# After that, group revelry (cakrakridä) should follow. When 
it has ended the sponsor should worship the goddesses of the Five Flows, pour 
out another stream of wine around the periphery, this time from left to right, 
place a second food offering on the ground at the edge of the central area, pu- 
rify the site by smearing it with cow-dung mixed with water, and then honour 
it with the offering of a flower at its centre. 

An idea of the revelry envisaged may be gained from the fourth Sarka of 
the /ayadrathayämala, where the ritual, described immediately after chapters 


devoted to Krama worship,!7 is termed a virameläpah ‘a gathering of Viras’:!76 


KRE for Withdrawal cf. Tamil karai ‘to dissolve, become gradually attenuated’; (4) with Ara 
ARA for the Nameless, in which the three preceding phases are transcended in a state of blissful 
pervasion, cf. Tamil är ‘to become full, be satisfied”, Kannada #r ‘to abound, be filled’; and (5) 
with KULURU KULURU for the Pure Light, representing final quiescence, cf. Tamil kwlir ‘to feel 
cool, get numbed (as in death), satisfed”, ‘to sit, rest’, Kannada kuir to be cool or cold’; and 
Malayalam kulir, kulur ‘coldness, cool, refreshing’. 

173Vimalaprabodhas text says ‘first the $akti and then all” (ädau $aktes tadanantaram 
sarvesäm). 1 surmise that the Sakti is the the consort of the Guru. 

1740n the dipacaruh see Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 11 (Ahnika 29), p.51, IL. 16-19 (quoting 
Jayadrathayämala, Satka 4, £. 125v1-3 [for ädhära- there read ädhäre]). For its being a sub- 
stitute for human flesh see Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 11 (Ahnika 29), p. 39, L. 11. 

175$ee footnote 84 on p. 260. 

176 Jayadrathayämala, Satka 4, f. 206v3-207vS (Viratändavavidhipatala, vv. 5-30b): ä$ritya 
faranam guptam sarvabädhävivarjitam | su$obham *kusumämodasudhüpagandhamantharam 
(kusumämoda em. : kumbhamämoda Cod.) | 6 kulaparvam samäsädya virameläpam äca- 
ret | nimantrayet tatah sarve bhairaväcärapälakäh | 7 samayajñà devibhaktäh samtustäh 
kramatatparäh | samayinah putrakä$ ca sädhakä desikäh pare | 8 yoginyo yäh prabu- 
ddhäs ca *bhaktä va tadaläbhatah (em. : bhaktäpatädalabhatah Cod.) | “äniya väpy asa- 
hitän tämbülädiyutän kuru (conj. : äntya täpyasahatämvrätädiyutäm kuru Cod.) | 9 äsa- 
nâny atra deyäni “yathävat (em. : yathä tat Cod.) kramayogatah | püjyäni pranavenaiva 
gandhadhüpasragädibhih | 10 “*atropavesayet (em. : tatopavesayet Cod.) samyag yathäcakra- 
niyogatah | guränäm prathamam cakram sädhakänäm dvitiyakam | 11 trtiyam puträkänam 
syäc caturtham “samayisv atha (em. : samayesv atha Cod.) | yogininäm pañcamam syäd evam 
kuryät kramena ca | 12 sarvavirasamäyoge tatra ävartayed girih | pañcäsärna*mayim $aktim 
(em. : maya Saktih Cod.) kälï sà sakalävyayä | 13 navavirasamäyogas (em. : nacavirasama- 


Alexis Sanderson 285 


On the day sacred to the Lineage [of his Mother-goddess the sponsor] should 
celebrate a Virameläpa in a pleasant, secluded house that is free of all distur- 
bances and full of the scent of flowers, fine incense, and fragrant powders. He 
should invite all those who maintain the observance of Bhairava, who know 
the discipline, are devoted to the Goddess, contented, intent on the Krama, 
Samayins, Putrakas, Sädhakas, Gurus, and Yoginis, the last enlightened or, if 
such cannot be found, at least devout. When he has brought those finitiates 
there, together with the Yoginis] *or even without them (corj.) he should pro- 
vide them with betel nuts and the like and offer them seats in the proper order 
[of precedence]. He should [first] worship these seats with the Pranava (oM), 


yogam Cod.) tasyäntah pravijrmbhate | tena tad virameläpam püjayet *paramesvari (corr. : 
paramesvart Cod.) | 14 arghaih puspais tathà dhüpais candanägurucarcitaih | pratyekam ar- 
cayet tatra yathävibhavayogatah | 15 praticakrasya madhyastham püjayen “madyabhairavam 
(em. : madhyabhairavam Cod.) | krsnalohitaraktäksam paramämodavasitam | 16 mahäna- 
ndakaram $restham jagadunmädakärakam | evam sampüjya madhyastham päträny esäm pra- 
pürayet | 17 mahäkusumapürnäni pañca*ratnänvitäni (conj. : ratnacitäni Cod.) ca | pascäd 
vividham ähära(m) tesäm deyam atandritam | 18 yad yasyäbhimatam devi tat tasya *vitare 
Sakrt (conj. [Aï$a] : vicaret sakrt Cod.) | nänä mämsäni citräni bhaksyäny uccävacäni ca | 19 
lehya*peyäni (corr. : pehyäni Cod.) cüsyäni pänäni vividhäni ca | katutiktakasäyäni madhu- 
rämläni yäni ca | 20 evamädi-anckaïs ca tarpayec cakrapañcakam | madhyähne bhüya sam- 
tarpya yävad änanda*mantharam (em. : manthanam Cod.) | 21 fato hy arghaïs tathà geyair 
vinävamsasvanais tathà | *rotrotsavakarais (tent. conj. : frotrodakakarais Cod.) citrais tarpa- 
yec cakrapañcakam | 22 tatas taccakragà ra$myah prollasanti sutejitäh | sphuranti mahadä- 
nandà viläsasatasamkulä(h) | nrtyanti ca hasanty uccaih valganti kridanotsukäh | 23 pata- 
nti dhävanti *vamanti (conij. : vasanti Cod.) sarve vepanti khidyanti layanti tatra | jalpanti 
manträni rahasyam anye sanmarmayuktäni vacämsi cänye | 24 *chekoktayas (conj. : kekokta- 
pas Cod.) cäpi vicitrarñpäh parasparam te pravadanti devi | kecic ca Tkekäracanävir eti fke- 
cic ca mudrävalim ärabhante | 25ab kecic ca haulägamajair viläsaih samsthänakair nartanam 
ärabhante | 26 kecit tändavam ärabhanti subhatäh kecic ca Ysarvoddhatäh Ykecid bhairava- 
bhävanähitamanà jalpanti *kävyam (conij. : kälam Cod.) pare | kecid *bähum anekadhä (tent. 
conj. : dvädasanekadhä Cod.) pracalitam kurvanti tatroccakaih kecid rodanatatparäh kim aparam 
kecid Tvrajanty ävilamf | 27 kecit *pañcaviläsajam (jam conj. : jà Cod.) rasavaram bhuñ- 
janti tatrotsukäh ke citfprävaranäni cakravaranaihf*samdarsayanty (corr. : samdarsayaty Cod.) 
udbhatam | kecic Tcakravinirgatenafsahasà svadeham älambati | kecid väntam “adanti (con). : 
athamvi Cod.) ghora*vapusah (conj. : vapusam Cod.) *kecit tu hy atyutkatam (conj. : kä cittru- 
tantotkatam Cod.) | ke cin maithunam ärabhanti ca pibanty atrodbhavam nirbharäh | 28 evam 
viravarendravandyacarane meläpam atyuttamam | viräkhyam pravitatya ra$minikarän uccaih 
samutpadyate drstvà yat prabhavanti tatkrama*parä (conj. : varä Cod.) kim vä *bahu (em. : 
bahur Cod.) varnyate | samcärakramanirbharäh priyatame *parve tathaikäsayäh (conj. [Aia] : 
pamcaitathaikäsayä Cod.) yad yasya prabalopadesa*karanam (conj. : kara + Cod.) maudrakramo- 
diritam | tat tasya pravijrmbbhate param aho satyam na *caivänrtam (em. : caivämrtam Cod.) | 
29 viratändavam etat te mayà samupavarnitam | yenä$u krtamätrena sarvasiddhyarhatä bhavet | 
30 kramaÿñänaikanipuno bhavaty eva hi *sädhakah (em. : sädhakam Cod.). 


286 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


presenting them such offerings as scented powder, incense, and flowers. Then 
he should invite the [guests] to sit on them, each in the appropriate circle. The 
first circle is of Gurus, the second of Sädhakas, the third of Putrakas, the fourth 
of Samayins, and the fifth of Yoginis. In this way he should gradually accomplish 
the Union of all the Viras (sarvavirasamäyogah). As he does this the [sponsor- 
ing] Sädhaka (girih) should repeat the Power that consists of the fifty sounds [of 
speech]. [For] this is eternal Kälï in her immanent form. The Union of the *Nine 
(conj.) Viras becomes manifest within it.!7” Then, O goddess, he should hon- 
our the assembly of Viras (virameläpah) with offerings of guest water, flowers, 
incenses, and pastes of sandal-wood powder and camphor. He should worship 
each [participant] in this [assembly] to the extent that his wealth permits. In the 
centre of each circle he should worship the Bhairava that is Wine (Madyabhai- 
rava), dark red and red-eyed, redolent with the best of fragrances, the cause of 
the highest joy, the best [of liquids], the intoxicator of the whole world. After 
worshipping it thus in the centre he should fill cups for them [from it], which 
should [also] be well provided with the flowers of the human body and the five 
nectars. Then with great attentiveness he should serve them foods of the vari- 
ous kinds. Again and again, O goddess, he should give them whatever it is that 
they desire: meat of various sorts, diverse foods of the masticable variety, both 
exquisite and commonplace, foods to be licked, drunk, and sucked, drinks of 
many kinds, acrid, pungent, astringent, sweet, and sour. With various [offer- 
ings] such as these he should gratify the five circles. Then at midday he should 
gratify them again until they are overflowing with joy. Then he should please 
the five circles with guest water, songs, and diverse music of the lute and flute 
to delight their ears. At this the rays [of their awareness] shine forth with great 
intensity, vibrant, blissful, looded by so many delights. They dance, laugh out 
loud, and leap about eager to revel. They collapse, run, vomit, tremble, become 
weary, and faint. Some voice Mantras, others the secret [teachings], and others 
words that contain the core teachings [of the Krama]. [Some] exchange clever 
*banter with double meanings (conj.), and some Ÿ...?. Some assume series of 
Mudräs. Some begin to dance with playful gestures [and] postures taught in 
the Kaula scriptures. Others, who are warriors, commence the [wild] Tändava 
dance [of Siva], and some ?...T. Others focus their minds in méditation on 
Bhairava, others give voice to *poetry (conj.), some “hold their arms above their 
heads in various postures and sway them from side to side (conÿ.), some abandon 
themselves there to loud weeping, and others become Ÿ...?. Others there ea- 


I77The justification for the emendation of the manuscript's reading nacavira- here to navavira- 
is that it may refer to nine Viras as the regents of the nine groups of the fifty sounds: the vowels, 
the seven consonant groups, and the final «sa. But the matter is not certain. It is tempting to 
propose sarvavtra-. In either case the idea seems to be that the recitation of the goddess as the 
syllabary embodies internally the Union of Viras that the sponsor is establishing externally. 


Alexis Sanderson 287 


gerly devour the excellent liquid *that arises from the five Viläsas (conj.). Some 
vigorously display ?...Ÿ. Some suddenly suspend their bodies ?...?. Some, per- 
sonifying [A]ghora, eat vomit, and others *faeces (atyutkatam) (conj.).V8 Some 
will engage in copulation and drink its product when replete. O you whose feet 
are worshipped by the foremost of Viras, when in this way it has expanded to 
the utmost the fused mass of the rays [of its consciouness] the supreme Virame- 
pa comes into being. By beholding it [initiates] become intent on this Krama. 
What need is there for lengthy instruction? My beloved, [by engaging in this 
gathering] *on the sacred day (conj.) they are filled with the cyclical Krama, 
their minds as one. Whatever mighty teaching proclaimed in [this Satka on] 
the practice of the Mudräs a person has received becomes completely clear to 
him [through this means]. Behold, the truth. This is indeed no lie. I have taught 
you this wild dance of the Viras (vzratandavah), by celebrating which a Sädhaka 
quickly becomes able to accomplish any siddhih and supremely adept in the 
gnosis of the Krama. 


Neither the K%/5kulakramärcana nor the Jayadrathayämala uses exactly 
Kalhanas term cakramelakah (‘the circle gathering”) for this ritual, the former 
calling it cakrakridä (‘the circle revelry”) and the latter vzrameläpah (‘the gath- 
ering of heroes”) (= viramelakah). But the term does occur in Kashmirian liter- 
ature in what is evidently the appropriate sense in a story of the supernatural 
in the Kathäsaritsägara of Somadeva. There a band of Yoginis is said to go at 
the onset of night to a cakramelakah in Cakrapura and to return from it at 
its end.” Moreover, in the Kaula Kubjikämata we find the related expression 


l78For the use of the term atyutkatam in this sense see Nifisamcära, f.7v1-3, quoted 
in SANDERSON 2005a, p.112, Il. 31-33). For ritual tasting of the body's excretions in ex- 
treme ‘non-dual practice” (advaitäcärah, nirvikalpäcärah) see, e.g., Nisisamcära f. 34v (11.9c- 
10b): *ztyutkatam fivambuñ (em. : atyutkata Sivammuñ Cod.) ca prâtar utthäya mantravit | 
astramantrena *“samsodhya (corr. : sam$odhyam Cod.) *mrnälämrtasamyutam (mrnälämrta em. : 
mrnämrta Cod.) | krtvä tu präsayen mantri yadicchet siddhim ätmani ‘ After rising at dawn the 
Sädhaka should purify excrement and urine with the Weapon-Mantra, combine it with phlegm 
and taste it if he desires siddhih for himself. It is also seen in a less testing form in the Krama 
in the vatikäpräsanam taught as an element of daily practice in the Yomigahvara, vv. 212-221. 
This requires initiates when preparing the chalice for daily worship to swallow a pellet (varikä, 
gutikä) made from substances that include excrement (vivaksäram) and urine (fvämbu)."The 
preparation of this pellet is detailed in K4/kulakramärcana, f. 24v3-25v2. The pellet, we are 
told there, should have the size of the kernel of a jujube fruit (f. 24v5: badarästhisusammitäm). 

179 Kathäsaritsagara 123.212-213b: tatkälam cätra janämi tato mätrganäntarät | nirgatya 
Joginigrämah parasparam abhäsata | adya cakrapure smäbhir gantavyam cakramelake “Then that 
time [of the onset of night] I noticed a band of Yoginis who came out from that group of Moth- 
ers and said to each other “Today we have to go to a cakramelakah in Cakrapura”; 123.221: 


288 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


yoginicakrameläpah (‘a circle gathering of Yoginis’), described as loud with the 
sound of dancing and music. !#° Everything therefore, points to the conclusion 
that the protagonists of Kalhanas report are our Krama Gurus Hrasvanätha and 
Cakrabhänu: their names, the reign to which Kalhana assigns them, the identi- 
fication of the cakramelakah, its place in the Krama, and its strongly antinomian 
character. 

It may be thought surprising that Hrasvanätha/Viranätha, a revered figure 
of a tradition whose literature appears to be so concerned with practices for 
the attainment of liberation-in-life, should be depicted as seeking revenge for 
the punishment of Cakrabhanu by performing an aggressive Tantric ritual. For 
Kalhana certainly does not question the tradition that Viranätha performed 
the ritual of chastisement against the king but only that it was the cause of the 
latter’s death. But undertaking such rites is certainly not inconsistent with his 
standing as a Guru of the Krama. We have seen that Abhinavagupta reports 
Eraka to have devoted himself to the pursuit of supernatural power before he 
wrote the Xramastotra; but more striking, because it pertains directly to the 
present case, is the fact that a text of the Krama itself supports Kalhanas re- 
port of Hrasvanätha*s involvement in this domain in an incidental remark in 
the course of a discussion of an option of abbreviating the Krama worship by 
omitting three of its phases: !#! 


Those who achieve the highest rest within that [unobscured (nirävarana-) state] 
simply by [performing those phases of worship up to the circle of the Multitude 
(vrndacakram) that are known collectively as] the Oral Instruction do not need 
to worship the circles of Emission, Stasis, and Withdrawal, but proceed, it is 


athäsmin pascime yäme yoginyas cakramelakät | ägatya täh svayuktyä mäm hrivaivodapatan 
nabhah ‘Then during this last watch of the night the Yoginis returned from the cakramelakah 
and flew up into the sky by means of their miraculous power, taking me with them’. 

180 Kubjikämata 25.18ab: yoginicakrameläpam nrtyagitaraväkulam. 

18lMahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 8.24-28: kathanäd eva yesäm tadvisräntir jàyate parä | *te 
srstisthitisamhäracakräpeksäm (te srsti conj. : srsti Ed.) na kurvate | vrndakramänantaram 
tair anäkhyam cakram isyate | srstyädicakratritayam tanmate naiva püjyate | asmanmate 
“tu (conj. : pi Ed.) rad api “päripürnyärtham (conj. : paripürnärtham Ed.) isyate | 
etatsamärädhivasät prabhävo hi pravartate | etadvimarfa*sambhütam (conj. : sambhüta Ed.) 
virävalyäditarpanät | äsid *vämanavirasya (em. : vämanaviryasya Ed.) *vidvesastambhana- 
dikam (vidvesa conij. : yadvisnu Cod.). For the emendation vidvesastambhanädikam in place 
of the evidently corrupt reading yadvisnustambhanädikam ., e.g., Kirana, £.71v2 (50.14cd): 
*vastkaranavidvesau stambhanädy (vasï corr. : vasi Cod. e vidvesau conj. : vidveso Cod.) 
adhamä matäh; Somasambhupaddhati, vol. 3, p.47, v.55ab: märanoccätanadvesastambha- 
närtham tu daksine; Amsumadägama 13.36cd: vasyäkarsanavidvesastambhanoccätanädikam:; 
and Kriyäkälagunottara, . 46v1-2: uccätanam tathà karmam vidvesam stambhamäranam | 
kilanam cäñgabhedam ca kurute cintitena tu. 


Alexis Sanderson 289 


held, directly from the phase of the Multitude to the circle of the Nameless. In 
their view, then, these three [intervening] circles are not necessary. But in my 
view they should be included, for the sake of completeness. For immersion in 
them is the source of [supernatural] power. It was through his deep awareness 
of these, by gratifing the sequence of Viras (vzrävali) and the rest [that are to be 
worshipped in them], that the Vira Vämana [was able successfully to accomplish 
the rituals that] caused dissension [among our enemies] and immobilized [their 
armies] (vidvesastambhanädikam).\#? 


This evidence should caution us against the tendency to be misled by 
the focus apparent in this or that branch of the surviving $aiva literature 
into assuming that the groups who produced and followed these texts were 
equally restricted in the range of their rites. Just as the Saiddhäntika and non- 
Saiddhäntika domains were less disjunct in practice than the doctrines artic- 
ulated by their leading theoreticians, so, we see, a Guru of the Krama, for all 
the apparent dedication of his core tradition to purely transcendentalist self- 
realization, could draw as occasion arose on a wider range of practice for prag- 
matic purposes. In this case the rites in which he is said to have excelled have 
a close relation to his role as a servant of the state. For in the light of Kalhanas 
report that Hrasvanätha was Yasaskara’s minister of war and peace it surely can- 


182Propitiating the deity for immobilization (stambhanam) is not restricted to this context. 
The texts speak also of väkstambhanam ‘paralysing speech’, garbhastambhanam ‘preventing a 
foetus from being born’, and of stopping wind, water, or fire (v4yutoyägnistambhanam); see, 
e.g, Picumata, £. 35V1-2: stambhane sarvabhütänäm *väyutoyägnistambhane (coni. : väyustobhä- 
gni Cod.) | stambhane parasainyasya *väcah stambhe (conj. : väcastambhes Cod.) tathaiva ca | 
äsanastambhane caiva garbhädinän tathaiva ca | Sastam pipilikämadhya(m) aksasütram varä- 
nane. Three kinds of stambhanam, to stop the onset of an enemy army, to silence the speech 
[of an opponent], or to prevent the birth of a child [no doubt as a future dynastic rival], are 
taught in /ayarathayämala, Satka 3, £. 101v4-5 (14.126127): stambhayed gamanodyuktam api 
sainyam Satakratoh | evamvidhena vidhinä väcasam stambhayisyati | garbham vä (deva) devesi 
*tambhayen (corr. : stambhaven Cod.) nätra samsayah. But protecting the kingdom by im- 
mobilizing the army of the enemy so that it cannot advance is much the most commonly 
mentioned, often being listed on a par with vidvesah, uccätanam and other primary pragmatic 
propitiations (karma), which implies that when no specific target of stambhanam is mentioned 
it is to be understood as parasainyastambhanam ‘immobilization of the army of an enemy’; cf., 
e.g., Väladhärin, Kriyäsamgrahapaddhati, f. 91v2-3;: fäntike paustike caiva vidvesädikramena tu | 
stambhane *parasainyänäm (corr. : parasainyäni Cod.). To propitiate the deity for vidvesahl vi- 
dvesanam is to seek to protect ones own side by turning one allied enemies against each other; 
see, e.g., Paippalädavasädisatkarmapaddhati, p. 6, IL. 7-9: fatrus ced *anyavidvistah (em. : anya- 
vaddhistah Ed.) syäd anyadvesatatparah | tato au nihsapatnah san räjyabhogam samasnute | 
tasmäd râjà visesena ripudvesanam äcaret. 


290 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


not be thought coincidental that an author of the Krama, when remembering 
with approval his predecessor’s expertise in this ancillary domain, should have 
singled out for mention these rites of state protection. 

There are other reports of liberationist Gurus engaging in destructive rites 
of this kind, which, while hagiographical and therefore unreliable as records of 
history, nonetheless demonstrate that the co-existence of these extremes was 
not considered aberrant. A striking parallel is found in the Great Perfection 
(rDzogs chen) tradition of the rNying ma pa Buddbhists of Tibet, which has 
much in common with the Krama by virtue of its emphasis on enlightenment 
through direct experience of the Great Primordial Purity (gzhi ka dag chen po), 
this being conceived in a manner strongly reminiscent of the Krama as an in- 
nate, self-established state of unbounded freedom (ye grol) that manifests dif- 
ferentiation in consciousness but is untouched in its essence by the dichotomies 
of cognition and the cognized, conceptual and non-conceptual awareness, lib- 
eration and bound existence (nirvänam and samsärah). For an early authority 
in this tradition, gNubs chen Sangs rgyas ye shes, is remembered for having de- 
stroyed a rebel army through the power of aggressive Mantras (ngan sngags) #5 

Both the Krama and rDzogs chen present themselves as the ultimate ap- 
proach to reality, transcending all lower levels of revelation. The Krama identi- 
fes, as we shall see, a level of higher practice within itself that by reaching the 
goal through pure intuition transcends the gradualist system of Krama worship, 
while that system is said to transcend the Käli worship of the Uttarämnäya, 
which itself is presented as the summit of a subordinate Säkta hierarchy that 
leads down to its base in the non-Säkta Saiva traditions. !#* Similarly rDzogs 
chen, which like the Krama culminates in practice for sudden enlightenment, 
locates itself as the Atiyoga teaching at the summit of a hierarchy that descends 
through the teachings of the Anuyogatantras, Mahäyogatantras, Vogatantras, 
and Ubhayatantras to the Kriyätantras, which in turn are ranked above the Sü- 
tras of the Mahäyäna substrate. But neither the Krama nor rDzogs chen cuts 
itself off from these lower levels. For they are essential to their survival. This is 
partly because both draw their meaning from these wider contexts as gnostic 
disciplines that transcend the Tantric systems from within. But it is also because 
the systems defined as lower provide these Säkta and Buddhist Tantric adepts 


183$ee AcHarD 1999, pp. 17-22. He is said to have been ordained by Säntaraksita, therefore 
during the reign of Khri srong Ide bstan (r. 755-797), and to have founded a community of 
lay Tantric initiates (bid., p. 17). 

184 For this hierarchy see footnote 363 on p. 342. 


Alexis Sanderson 291 


of sudden enlightenment with the means of operating on other levels as occa- 
sion demands and patronage expects. Thus gNubs chen Sangs rgyas ye shes was 
also learned in the Anuyoga- and Mahäyogatantras; and these are the probable 
source of the Mantras, no doubt of the deities Vajrakïlaya or Yamäntaka, with 
which he is said to have destroyed the rebels.!#° 


The Sripithadvädasikà 


Attributed to Cakrabhänu we have only one short text, the Sripithadvädasika, 
and no reports of other works. This text is not mentioned by name in any 
Kashmirian source, nor does the author confirm his identity by stating his po- 
sition in the Kashmirian Krama’s transmission. But it is included in a codex 
which, though Nepalese, contains other Kashmirian Krama works from this 
lineage, #6 a line is quoted from it without attribution in a text of Krama in- 
spiration by the Kashmirian Ramyadeva, *” and the author describes himself 
in the final verse as ‘one whose body is adorned with [pieces of] human bone 
and a skull-bowl’, * which agrees with the report already mentioned that the 
Kashmirian Cakrabhänu was a Mahävratin ascetic.!#° Furthermore, it contains 
a verse which brings to mind that ascetic’s punishment by Yaéaskara:!?° 


When [again] may I follow my path in the company of proud Viras at the onset 
of night, my mind made blissful through withdrawal, behaving +... f ofthe 
Devikula?!?1 


185See ACHARD 1999, p. 19, footnote 30. 

186$ce the details of the Kälikäkulapañcasataka ms in the bibliography, p.435. 

18 Sripithadvädasikä, v. 3cd (f.93v5-96r1) is quoted in his commentary on v.47 of the 
Bhävopahärastotra: “nirastasästrärthavikalpajalà (Ed. : nirastasastäsavikalpajälä Cod.) “devyah 
(Ed. : devyäh Cod.) $masäne karavirakäkhye. 

188 Sripithadvädasikä, f. 95r1-3 (v. 12 and colophon): pithäravindadalakam $ivasaktigarbham 
virästhikandalavibhäsitavigrahena | stutvä mayà $ubhaphalam yad aväptam adya tenäsu 
fkà samäptä. 

18 Arnasimha, Mahänayaprakasa, v. 157, cited in footnote 194 on p. 292. 

10 Sripithadvädasikä, f. 94v1-2 (v.8): râtryägame garvitavirasärdham (garvita em. : gavita 
Cod.) samhäranänanditacittavrttih | devikuläŸ+ syaTvicestitah fsyän1märgänuyäyt bhavitä kadä- 
ham. 

111 can offer no compelling emendation for the whole of the corrupt reading devikuläf+ 
syavicestitahsyänt. Perhaps the final part was -vicestitah san. 1 see no acceptable solution to 
devikulä + sya if 4 and sya are sound. If one or both are corrupt, the possibilities of restoration, 
such as devikuläcäryavicestitah san, are too numerous for any one of them to carry conviction. 


292 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The Krama Lineage from Cakrabhänu to Arnasimha 


The Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a and its Sanskrit commentary venerate this 
unrepentant Guru as the first of the Order of the Disciples (syaughah), follow- 
ing Mangalä, who alone constitutes the Order of Siddhas (siddhaughah), and 
the Human Order (mänavaughah), which comprises [Jñäna]netra, the Räjñi 
[Keyüravati], and Hrasvanätha; and it declares that he initiated eight disciples, 
one of whom, Räjñi Iéänï, was the source of the lineage that led to the author 
of the commentary.!?? 

From the spiritual descendants of Cakrabhänu we have the As#kä of his 
disciple Prabodhanätha, the Paramärcanatrimsika"® and Cittasamtosatrimsikà 
of Näga, and the Mahänayaprakäsa of Nägas disciple Kuläcärya Arnasimha. 
The last of these works provides the details of the line of succession that enables 
us to assign them to it. Its author reports that the tradition has reached him 
through two lines of descent (gurusamtatih) from the two among Cakrabhänw's 


pupils whose names survive, Iéäni and Prabodhanätha: 
1. Iäni — Nandaka — Sajjana — Someévara — himself. 
2. Prabodha — Jaiyaka — Pañkaka — Näga — himself. 


Two of these he describes as ascetics who, like Cakrabhänu, observed the [Käpä- 
lika] Mahävrata: [int (pañcamudrävibhüsitä), and Jaiyaka (mahavrati). Pra- 
bodha he describes both as an ascetic (#4podhanah) and, like Hrasvanätha, as 
the foremost of Viras (virendrah).1%* 


1920ld Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a 9.5 and commentary. On the Kashmirian use of the term 
Räjñi for a female Säkta (— Modern Kashmiri r6%") see SANDERSON 2005a, p. 126, footnote 
91. 

13Verse 2 (f.34v5-6) is quoted by the South Indian Krama author Mahesvaränanda 
(Mabärthamañjariparimala, p.108: yad uktam arcanätrimsikäyäm). 

1% Arnasimha, Mahänayaprakäsa, Æ. 119r5-121r4 (vv. 152-169): 152 udgitha*pithaja (em. : 
pithayä Cod.) srimanmañgalänandanirbharä | sadasadbhäsanävesavarjitä täm aham $raye | 
153 fatah $rrmacchivänandanäthaguruvaram sadä | lokottaramahäjñänacaksusam pranamämy 
abam | 154 $rimatkeyüravatyäkhyà pithajajñänapäragä | khacakracärini yeyam täm aham 
naumi bhaktitah | 155 mahäviravaro yo säv frimadvämanasamÿjñakah | devidhämni sada- 
rädhas tam vande kramabhäskaram | 156 tatah $rimaccakrabhänur devatänayadesikah | 
mahävratadharo yas tam vande ‘ham paradhämagam | 157 $rimadifänikäkhyä yà pañcamu- 
drävibhäsità | akramakrama*samtänakovidäm (samtäna em. : santänä Cod.) täm namämy 
aham | 158 mahänayaparajñäna*vibhäsitamanäh (conj. : vibhaüsitah Cod.) sadä | $rr- 
mannandakanämä yas tam namämi khadhämagam | 159 $rimatsajjananämänam “raha- 


Alexis Sanderson 293 


The Astikä of Prabodhanätha 


It is unlikely that the Assikä that has reached us, a hymn to the Goddess in 
eight stanzas, is the work of a Prabodhanätha other than that mentioned by 
Arnasimha. The text has come to us in the already mentioned Nepalese codex 
containing other Kashmirian Krama works, and although no attributed cita- 
tion from it occurs in the surviving Kashmirian literature the first two verses 
commonly appear in the Kashmirian recitation-text of the Bzhurüpagarbhasto- 
tra, a hymn to Svacchandabhairava that is attributed along with a frame-text 
to the Lalitasvacchandabhairava, and whose recitation is a standard preliminary 
in Saiva ritual in Kashmir.!® The two verses are placed at the end of the hymn 
proper and in this position enable it to reflect the two visualization-texts that 
are recited before it, these being not only of Svacchandabhairava but also of his 


consort Aghoreévari: !°6 


You I praise, the unborn beloved of $iva in the lotus of [my] heart, seated in 


syakramanirbharam (rahasya corr. : rahasyam Cod.) | bhedäbhedakalañkais tu varjitam pra- 
namämy aham | 160 nirmalasphatikaprakhyahrdayam vigatämayam | $rimatsomesvaram 
vande mahäsäsanapäragam | 161 tencha krpayàä mahyam sampradatto mahäkramah | 
yenäham bhavanirvänakalañkair nävrito ‘nifam | 162 atraiva kathyate smäbhir dvitiya 
gurusamtatih | pithoditamahämnäyarahasyakramanirbharä | 163 fricakrabhänupädais tu 
paramärthärthapäragaih |  krtaprasädo virendrah $riprabodhatapodhanah | 164 tenähi- 
taprasädas tu jaiyakäkhyo mahävrati | jhaänasamkränti"nirbhräntih (conj. : nibhräntah 
Cod.) svänandänandananditah | 165 tenäpi “ripañkakäkhyo (corr. : $ripañkakäkhye 
Cod.) dattasrikramasäsanah | bhavatrdbhräntivibhräntividhvamsoccandadidhitih | 166 tenäpi 
frinäganämä desikapravarägranih | *krtaprasädah (em. : krtaprasädo Cod.) paramählädo- 
dayavighürnitah | 167 tenäpy aham “mahämnäyavare smin (em. : mahämnäyavarosmin 
Cod.) paramädbhute | abhisiktah krpäfäntacitten“ävrtatejasä (em: ävrittatejasä Cod.) | 168 
ittham proktà samtatis tu dvitiyaisä mahänaye | nirävesasamävesa*camatkäraughanirbharä (coni. 
[= v. 3d; see here footnote 356 on p.338] : camatkärädyanirbharä Cod.) | 169  ittham 
paramparodbhütah sadgurukramavistarah | sthito ‘yam divyasiddhäkhya*manujätakramens ca 
(manujäta em. : manujñäta Cod.). 

195Sce, e.g., Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f. 5r11—16 (at the commencement of the initiation cere- 
mony, after the worship of Gane$a and Pustakavägiévari): #ato vighnaräjam pustakavägifim ca 
suprasannäm bhävayitvà taddattam sväbhiväñchitam varam bhävanayä grhitva $ribhairavanätha- 
prasannikaranäya mantraräjagarbham $ribahurüpagarbhastotram pathet; ibid., $. 9x12-14: tatas 
ca $ribahurñpagarbhastavaräjapäthänantaram sadadhvadiksädhiväsärambhabh. 

16 Astikä, wvv. 1-2 (N, f.96v1-3) and the modified Bahuräpagarbhastotra, vv. 35-36 (K): 
“arvakäranakaläpakalpitolläsasamkulasamädhivistaräm (sarva K : sadya N) | härdakokanada- 
samsthitäm api tväm pranaumi $ivavallabhäm ajäm (härda K : harmma N) | sarvajantu- 
brdayäbjamandalodbhütabhävamadhupänalampatäm (sarva K : sadya Ne mandalodbhüta K : 
mandalodbhuta N) | *varnabhedavibhaväntarasthitäm (K : varnabhedavigatälivallabhäm N) 
tväm pranaumi “bhavajälabhedinim N\ : fivavallabhäm ajäm K). 


294 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


deepest consciousness on your throne that is full of the radiance created by all 
the Causes. You I praise, who are ever eager to drink the sweet wine exuded 
by the lotus-Mandala in the innermost awareness of all living creatures, hidden 
within the pervasive power that is the variety of sounds, rending the snare of 
bound existence. 


Since the context is the Krama the Causes intended here are probably the seven 
ascending deities Indra, Brahmä, Visnu, Rudra, Iévara, Sadäéiva, and Bhairava 
that form Kälrs throne in the worship taught by the Xä/kulakramasadbhäva, 
becoming lifeless (pretäh) in her presence, resorbed as her state prevails, or, in 
the idiom of the primal sacrifice in the Karavira cremation ground, offered as 
sacrifices to her, only Bhairava remaining intact, alive but comatose. |? 

A verse from another, unnamed hymn to the Goddess by Prabodha is cited 
by Ramyadeva and Jayaratha:!°8 


You transcend whatever nature Ï may conceive as higher than you. Nor can 
I conceive of any reality, however low, in which you are not present in your 
entirety. 


His identity with the Krama author is certain. For Arnasimha calls the latter 
Prabodha the Ascetic (virendrah $riprabodhatapodhanah) and both Ramyadeva 
and Jayaratha refer to this Prabodha in the same way, the first calling him Ascetic 
Prabodhanätha (#apasviprabodhanäthah) and the second simply ‘the venerable 
Ascetic ($ritapasvi). Another verse has been cited by Siva[svämin] Upädhyäya, 
who calls him similarly the King among Ascetics (sapasviräjah). That this is 
from the same hymn is not certain; but it is probable, since both verses are in 
the Âryä metre:!?” 


197 Kälikulakramasadbhäva, £. 1v3 (1.19): for text and translation see p. 261; and f. 3r6 (1.80c- 
81): satas tu *sarve (corr. : sarvva Cod.) tatrasthäh pasutve kalpitäh sakrt | mahäbhairava ekas tu 
sammüärcchan tisthate tu *sah (em : yah Cod.) | anye tu käranäh sarve bhaksitäs tatra lilayä. But 
when read as praise of Aghoresvari in the context of the recitation of the Bahuräpagarbhastotra 
the Causes would be understood as five in accordance with the system of the Svacchanda, the 
same without Indra and Bhaïirava (Brahmä to Sadäsiva). That these two verses have been added 
to the Bahurüpagarbhastotra is apparent from their absence from the text as it appears together 
with its frame in the commentary of Anantaéakti (Bahuräpagarbhastotravisamapadasamketa) 
and the Kalädiksäpaddhati À, #. 5v1-9r10. 

I98Ramyadeva on Bhavopahärastotra, vv. 4-5 (p.10), and Jayaratha on Tanträloka 4.125 
(vol. 2, p.131): parataratayäpi rüpam yad yat kalayämi tat tad adharam te | adharataräpi na 
kalanä sà käcid yatra na sthitäsy abhitah. 

19 Viñänabhairavavivrti, p.90, IL 19-22: suvisamamamatädamsträvidalitajanadhairyasonita- 
pipäsuh | aham iti pifäca esa tvaismrtimätrena kimkaribhavati. 


Alexis Sanderson 295 


It is enough to turn our thoughts to you to tame the ‘T”, this demon that thirsts 
to drink the blood that is the sense of men, tearing them open with its terrible 
fangs, belief in ‘mine’. 


The Paramärcanatrimsikà and Cittasamtosatrimsikà of Näga 


As for Näga, he identifes himself as the author of the two -trimsikä texts in 
their final verses*®° but does not confirm his identity as a member of this lin- 
eage by naming his Guru. However, it is unlikely that they are not by the Näga 
whom Arnasimha identifies as the pupil of Pañkaka, since both works use the 
terminology of the Kashmirian Krama. Their subject is the attainment of en- 


lightenment through sudden immersion in the dynamic purity of consciousness 
(sähasasamädhih):*"\ 


Is that [true] worship if in it one does not experience the surge of expanded 
consciousness within each and every movement of cognition, taking hold of 
the trance of sudden enlightenment, flooded with radiant, pure awareness? 


a process articulated in the language of the Krama and with reference to ele- 


ments of its cyclical model of the flow of cognition, but without delineating 


the phases of the Kramas distinctive sequence of meditative worship:°? 


200 Paramärcanatrimsikà, #.40v7—41r4 (31 and colophon): anavacchinnacidvyomaparama- 
mrtabrmhitah | nägäbhidho vyadhäd etäm paramärcanatrimsikäm. iti frimahämähesvaranäga- 
vipascidviracità paramärcanatrimsikà samäptà and Cittasamtosatrimsikä, f. 49r3-6 (v.31 and 
colophon): nirävaranacidvyomaparamämrtanirbharah | nägäbhidhänas tad idam cittasam- 
tosakam vyadhät. iti frinägavipascidviracità cittasamtosatrimsikà samäptä. 

201 Paramärcanatrimsikà, Æ.35v5-36r1 (v.7): yatra sähasasamädhisamsrayah prasphuradvi- 
malabodhanirbharah | sphitasamvidudayam na vindate sarvavritisu kim etad arcanam. For 
the Krama concept of sähasam, literally ‘violent assault, aggression” see, e.g., Chummä- 
samketaprakäsa, f.3r1-2 (vv.28c-29b); mahoddäma sähasam padam acyutam | samäru- 
hya hathäd asmi suprabuddhadasänvitah; Vätülanäthasütra 1: mahäsähasavrttyà svarüpala- 
bhab; Vätülanäthasätravrtti, opening verse: samghattaghattanabaloditanirvikärafänyätifänyapa- 
dam avyayabodhasäram | sarvatra khecaradr$ä praviräjate yat tan naumi sähasavaram guru- 
vaktragamyam; ibid, concluding verse: #i paramarahasyam vägvikalpaughamuktam bhava- 
vibhavavibhägabhräntimuktena samyak | kriam anupamam uccaih kenacic cidvikäsäd akalita- 
parasattäsähasolläsavrttyä; Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 2.28-29: alamgräsakramah so ‘yam mahä- 
sähasajanmabhüh. See also Mälinivijayavärtika 2.86: mahäsähasasamyogavilinäkhilavrttikah 
puñjtbhütasvarasmyoghanirbharibhätamänasah; — Tanträloka 5.84: mahäsähasasamyogavi- 
lnäkhilavrttikah | puñjibhäte svarasmyoghe nirbharibhüya tisthati. 

20 Paramärcanatrimsikä,  #.35v3-S  (v.G):  khecariprabbrtipañcakätmanà  vyäptim 
ambaragatäm nibhälayan | hrdvikäsasubhagäm bhaväpado yatra muñcati na kim tad ar- 
canam. 


296 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Is that [true] worship, in which one does not let go of the travails of ones un- 
liberated existence by gazing directly at the dynamism that, beautiful in the 
unfolding of the heart [of awareness], pervades the sky [of consciousness] as the 
[cycle of its] five [flows] from Khecari to [Vyomavämesvari]? 


This is the ‘true worship’ and ‘delighting of the mind’ that give the works 
their titles. In the second Näga celebrates his own attainment of this enlighten- 
ment through the oral transmission (kathanam) from master to disciple that the 
Krama opposes to the worship of the phases as a higher means of liberation:?°° 


By great good fortune I stand today flooded with the blissful relish of the nec- 
tar of the unlocated consciousness that surges up from [its] unfettered, spotless 
ground, astonished by the fruition of the instruction in the inexpressible prac- 
tice that I obtained from the heart of my true teacher’ oral teaching. 


The Mahänayaprakä$a of Arnasimha 


Arnasimhas Mahänayaprakä$a, though permeated by this spirit of direct in- 
sight, reviews the successive phases of the Krama worship that constitutes 
the base of practice, explaining how each reflects the core structure of con- 
sciousness, leading progressively from the contemplation of this in the body 
(pithacakram) by means of the preliminary worship of the Pitha Uddiyäna, its 
Karavira cremation ground, its site-guardian (Ksetrapala) Balotkata, the As- 
sembly of Yoginis/Sakinis therein (#eläpah), and the Great Sacrifice [that it 
enacted] (”4häyägah), to the worship of (1) the circle of the five Flow God- 
desses (vähadevyah) Vyomavämeévari, Khecarï, Bhücarï, Samhärabhaksinï, and 
Raudresvart (pañcavähacakram), (2) the circle of Illumination (prakäsacakram) 
in which the faculties reach out towards the object, (3) the circle of Bliss (4nan- 
dacakram), in which the faculties incorporate the objects of the senses, (4) the 
circle of Embodiment (märticakram) in which that object-awareness reverts 
into the perceiver’s awareness of himself as their perceiver, (5) the circle of the 
sixty-four Siddhäs (vrndacakram), in which that self-awareness reverts to its en- 
lightened core, (6) the worship of the Guru lineage beginning from Mangalä 
as the leader of those sixty-four, and finally the extroversion of the enlightened 
state realized in the vrndacakram and embodied in the lineage through the four 
circles of (7) Emission (srsticakram), (8) Stasis (sthiticakram), (9) Withdrawal 


20 Cittasamtosatrimsikä, . 48v2-5 (v. 29): svacchandanirmalapadoditanirniketasamvitsudha- 
rasacamatkrtinirbharo smi | distyädya sadgurumukhämbujamadhyalabdhänuccäryacärakathano- 
dayavismito smi. On enlightenment in the Krama through oral transmission see p. 332. 


Alexis Sanderson 297 


(samhäracakram), and (10) the Nameless (the anäkhyacakram of the thirteen 
Kälis), in which the perfect interpenetation (sämarasyam) of the inner and outer 
states is fully realized. 


The Cidgaganacandrikä of Srivatsa 


From the same lineage comes the Cidgaganacandrikä of Srivatsa. In the form 
of a hymn to Kälï it covers the same ground as Arnasimha*s work but also goes 
beyond it in detail and incidental elaboration. For example, while Arnasimha 
describes only the nature of the circle of the Nameless Srivatsa provides a treat- 
ment of each ofits thirteen Kälis, building on the verses dedicated to them in 
Eraka’s Kramastotra.®% More than à third of its 312 verses are closely related 
to Arnasimhas text, and these parallels are best understood as rephrasings of 
Arnasimhas formulations in a more poetic, tighter style.? 

Srivatsa tells us that the Krama lineage extends from Sivänanda to Soma 
comprising both the Order of the Human Masters (mänavaughah [Sivänanda, 
Keyüravati, and Hrasvanätha]) and those from Cakrabhänu onwards, that is to 
say, the Order of the Disciples (#syaughah),°% and that he himself had received 


204 Cidgaganacandrikä (CGC), vv. 224-250. Cf. Arnasimha, Mahänayaprakäsa, ff. 125v3- 
128r4 (vv. 212-236). The lost Xramastotra’s verses on the thirteen Kälis are preserved through 
quotation in Jayaratha’s Tanträlokaviveka as follows, in the order of their worship (päjäkramah) 
as taught in all the Krama scriptures: (1) vol. 3, p. 158, IL. 13-16 (Srstikaln) — CGC 221-224; 
(2) p. 163, II. 5-8 (Sthitinäsakali) — CGC 225-226; (3) p. 167, IL. 1-4 (Samhärakäli) — CGC 
227-228; (4) p.160, L. 16-161, I. 2 (Raktakäl) — CGC 229-230; (5) not quoted but men- 
tioned on p. 202, Il. 1-2 (emend suakälim in Ed. to sukälim) (Sukali) — CGC 231; (6) p. 165, 
IL 10-13 (Yamakäli) — CGC 232-233; (7) p. 169, IL. 9-12 (Mrtyukäli) — CGC 234-235; 
(8) p.173, Il. 16-19 (Bhadrakäl) — CGC 236-238; (9) p.181, Il. 9-12 (Paramärkakäli) — 
CGC 239-240; (10) p. 178, Il. 10-13 (Märtandakäli) — CGC 241-242; (11) p.183, Il. 8-11 
(Kälägnirudrakäl) — CGC 243-246; (12) p. 185, IL. 4-7 (Mahäkälakäln) — CGC 247-248; 
(13) p. 188, Il. 1-4 (Mahäbhairavaghoracandakäli) — CGC 249. 

2051 have noted the following correspondences: Cidgaganacandrikä (CGC) 75-80 + 
Arnasimha (A) 8-13; CGC 85-93 + A 20, 22-29; CGC 100-177 + A 30-31, 33-37, 
40-58, 61-69, 75-82, 84-85, 87-89, 91-94, 96-98, 100-103, 105-112, 114-116, 118-— 
120, 122-134, 137-139, 141-145, 147-151, 170-178, 180-209, 211-221, 226c-227, 233, 
236-240, 243-245, 248; CGC 250 + A 227; CGC 290-296 + A 237-249. 

206The verse of the Cidgaganacandrikä that mentions the lineage of Krama Gurus is in- 
tractably corrupt in its edition, like much of the text, and I offer only a partial diagnosis of its 
errors (v. 300): yzb fivätprabhrti somapascimas tvatkramaikarasiko gurukramah | *mänavaugha 
(conj. : änanägram Ed.) iha cakrabhänuto *yas tad etad ubhayam tvad äyayau \conj. : yas tvam 
etad ubhayam tvayä yayàä Ed.]) ‘From you has come the line of Gurus devoted solely to your 
Krama, from $iva [Sivänanda] to Soma, both the Mänavaugha and that from Cakrabhänu’. 


298 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


the tradition from Soma's son.” If this Soma is the Somesvara that Arnasimha 
has identified as one of his two Krama Gurus, then Srivatsa, as the pupil of 
his son, will have been approximately a generation later than Arnasimha; but 
nothing compels this identification.?°# 

In spite of the intimate connection with Arnasimhaàs Mahänayaprakä$a 
it is doubtful that the text was composed in Kashmir. The only recorded 
manuscripts of the text are South Indian and all the citations of the text known 
to me occur in South Indian works or in late medieval authors familiar with 
those works.2* Moreover, Srivatsa declares his connection with Pürnapitha, 
in verses that convey in spite of their corrupt state that he came to that place 
to propitiate the Goddess and then composed his hymn.?!° This is one of the 


For the distinction between the Human Order and the Order of Disciples that has suggested 
the emendation to mänavaugha of änanägram, which yields no appropriate sense that I can 
discern, see p, 292, and footnote 221 on p.302. 

207 Cidgaganacandrikä, v. 304ab: somaputram Ÿ apanesya Ÿ madgatas tvatkramo ‘dya kim api 
stuto mayà ‘Today I have hymned in part your Krama that has come to me *from* (?) Somas 
son. 

28RAsTOGI (1979, p. 196-197) assigns Srivatsa to A.D. 1125-1175 by proposing his identity 
with the poet $rivatsa mentioned as a contemporary by Mañkha in his Srikanthacarita (25.81- 
82). I see no reason to accept this. It rests on the flimsiest of arguments, namely the identity 
of the names and the fact that the author of the Cidgaganacandrikä has written in the Kävya 
style. 

209Maheévaränanda quotes wv.5, 23, 108, 117, 121, 128, 148, 195, 197, and 223 in 
his Mahärthamañjariparimala (pp.27, 161, 98, 90, 91, 93, 96, 148, 119, and 126), 
Amrtänandanätha vwv. 9, 13, 32, 40, 72, and 212 in his Yoginthrdayadipikä (pp. 51, 173, 11, 
94, and 18), Maheévaränandanätha, v. 212 in his Saubhägyänandasandoha (p.161), and Kaiva- 
lyä$frama a verse not included in the edition in his commentary Saubhägyavardhanï on the 
Saundaryalaharï, p.5 (amba tävakapadadvayärcakas tvanmayo bhavati nâtra vismayah | yas 
tvayaisa vivaso vasikrtah $aktir eva samabhüc chivah svayam). Another verse not included in 
the edition has been quoted in the South Indian Ævarapratyabhijnäsätravimarsinivyäkhya, p.9, 
IL 1-5 (fricidgaganacandrikäyäm ca: ädimäntimagrhitavarnaräsyätmikäham iti yà svatah prathà | 
mantraviryam iti sädhitägamais tanmayo gurur asi tvam ambikä. The text has also been cited by 
Bhäskararäya in his commentary on the Lalitäsahasranäma, pp. 57 and 157. 

210 Cidgaganacandrikä, vv. 307c-308b: pürnapitham “*upagamya (conj. : avagamya Ed.) 
marñgale “tvatprasädanakrte (conj. : tvatprasädam akrte Ed.) mayä krtah | esa cidgaganacandrika- 
stavah “kim na (conij. : kin nu Ed.) väñchitam asûta mäm prati‘O Mañgalä, what wish has the 
Cidgaganacandrikä not granted me, this hymn that I have composed to propitiate you after 
*coming to* (conj.) Pürnapitha?”; v. 312: *särnapithe krtavidhis (conj. : pürnapitha krtamsiddhes 
Ed.) *tvadbhävastavam (tvad conj. : tad Ed.) ädarät | *väsanärtham (conj. : vänarärtham Ed.) 
mahäguhyam $rivatso vidadhe Ysatuf ‘*After having completed the rites [of propitiation] in 
Pürnapitha (conÿ.) Srivatsa has composed [this] most esoteric hymn to your nature in order to 
inculcate it [in himself]. 


Alexis Sanderson 299 


four principal Säkta Pithas, better known as Pürnagiri, the other three being 
Uddiyäna, Jälandhara, and Kämarüpa. Though its exact location does not ap- 
pear from our sources, the Xumärikhanda of the Manthänabhairava places it 
in the Bhairavä$rama on a mountain in Desh, that is to say, in the west-central 
Deccan Plateau, and the Kuwbjikämata locates it more narrowly in the forests 
of the Sahya mountains (sahyädrih), that is to say, in the northern part of the 
Ghats that bound this region on the west.?!! 


The Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a and its Sanskrit commentary 


Another Mahänayaprakä$sa, also called Mahärthaprakä$a, has come down to us 
from this lineage, comprising verses in Old Kashmiri by one Sitikantha.?!? The 
work is accompanied by a Sanskrit commentary, which the editor asserts to 
be by the same author." There is certainly no statement of separate author- 


2 Manthänabhairava, Kumärikhanda, on the Pitha of Pürnagiri, f. 19r3: kva ci(d) desam 
tathà ramyam desänäm uttamam “viddhi (conj. : nidhih Cod.) | disädaksinadigbhäge daksinä- 
pathamandalam: f. \9V8: bhairaväs tatra pañcäsat pürnagiryäm samägatäh | tena tad bhairavam 
ksetram bhairavisiddhidäyakam: f. 20r8: evam devyäh svarñpena *pürnapitham (corr. : püvva- 
pitham Cod.) udährtam | pürnävuä prakatä jñeyä. Pürnagiri is equated with Sahya by an un- 
named Pa$cimämnäya source quoted without attribution by Maheévaränanda on Mahärtha- 
mañjari 39: $rnoti $abdam olambe preksate puskaradvaye | karälambe ‘bhidhatte ca sahye jighrati 
gandhavat | mätañge tu mahäpithe vyäpnoty akhilam i$varr. Olamba etc. in this verse corre- 
spond to Oddiyäna, Jälandhara, Pürna, and Kämarüpa, as can be inferred from the parallel in 
Satsähasrasambhitä 2.20, which associates the first four of same faculties with these Pithas: $ro- 
tukämä tu oddäkhye vaktukämä tu jälake | pustyärthe caiva pürnäkhye kämäkhye ceksanecchayä. 
Cf. Kubjikämata 2.63-72 (=Satsähasrasamhitä 415.62-71), where the place is called ‘the great 
Sahya forest’ (63d: gatä sahyam mahävanam). This reports that the Goddess created the moun- 
tain there and that as its Pitheévarï (724) she is called Pürnä (70d: pärnarüpini) because she filled 
it with nectar (69c, 70cd). In an earlier publication (SANDERSON 1987, p. 14b) I have written 
that $rivatsa was probably of Sucindram (Pürnajyotihksetra, Pürnasabhä), an important $aiva 
temple centre at the southern extremity of the subcontinent. I withdraw this theory. 

220ld Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a 14.1ab: päveta iha kamu pabhusa pasäde $itikanthasa gata 
jammu kitäthu | tena mi mahajana khalitamasäde te märäve mahanayaparamäthu ‘Since he has 
mastered this Krama by the grace of the Lord the human birth of $itikantha has fulfilled its 
purpose. Therefore I [have turned to the composing of this work and thus] enabled the pious 
too to attain *without error* (?) awareness of the true nature of the Mahänaya. 

213The editor, Mukunda Räm Sästri, prints the following words, evidently his own, before 
the text proper: atha mahänayaprakäsah frimanmahämähesvaräcäryaräjänakasitikanthäcärya- 
viracitah proktäcäryenaiva vivrtas ca ‘Here begins the Mahänayaprakä$a composed by the vener- 
able Mahämähesvaräcärya Âcärya Räjänaka Sitikantha and commented upon by the said Âcärya 
himself. 


300 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


ship. But there are elements in the text itself that make it unlikely that this was 
an auto-commentary. In an introductory verse not included with those of the 
published text the commentator declares that in order to expound the ultimate 
nature of the Mahärtha he will make an effort (xdyamah) to explain the vernac- 
ular words of this work.?!# It is unlikely that one about to explain his own words 
would refer to the undertaking in such terms. Moreover, there are instances in 
the commentary in which he offers multiple meanings of which some seem 
forced,?!* and one at least where the explanation is so awkward that I suspect 
that the author has either misunderstood the text or is offering a literal trans- 
lation of a word that has reached him in an already corrupted form.2!f Finally, 
though he refers to the author of the verses throughout in the third person he 
once refers to himself in the first, if my emendation is correct.?!7 

As for the date of the work, Sir George Grierson, the distinguished scholar 
of the New Indo-Aryan languages, assigned the author of the verses, whose 
authorship of the commentary he does not question, to the latter half of the 
fifteenth century.2!8 In doing so he was following the Kashmirian Sästri Pandit 
Nityänanda, who had informed him that the Sitikantha who composed this 
Mabänayaprakäsa was the person of this name who during the reign of Hasan 
Säh (r. 1472-1484) composed the commentary -zy4s4 on the Bälabodhini, 
a commentary by his countryman Jagaddhara on the Sanskrit grammar X3- 
tantra. But Nityänanda $Sästr?s opinion was based on nothing more than the 


214xar Ms of Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa between vv. 4 and 5: mahärthaparamärthasya 


vyäkhyäyai tatprakäsake | granthe pabhrastasabdänäm kurve satkathanodyamam ‘With the pur- 
pose of expounding the ultimate nature of the Mahärtha I shall make an effort to give a true 
explanation of the vernacular words in [this] text that illuminates it’. 

25Thus on Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa 1.3 he explains neräji famaväñt in three ways: 
coming to rest (Samaväñi) in (1) the pure (nzräjike vimale), (2) [her] own kingdom (nije säm- 
râjyamahotsave [i.e. nije räjye]), and (3) that in which the kingdom [of differentiated states] has 
disappeared (rzräjye nastaräjye). The second of these interpretations is altogether implausible 
and the third strained. 

2161n Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a 9.5 we are told that just as Siva’s head was the point 
of descent to earth for the Ganges so Mañgalä was the point of descent pzthadisäna. The com- 
mentary glosses this word as pithadisäm ‘for the directional quarters of the Pithæ. This refer- 
ence to the directions makes no sense in the context. What we expect here is something like 
‘for the teachings of the Pitha’. Perhaps pifhadisäna is to be understood as pithädisäna (Skt. 
pithädesänäm) with à shortening of vowels seen elsewhere in these verses (see GRIERSON 1929, 
$ 11) or pithopadi$äna (Skt. pithopadesänäm). Cf. Modern Kashmiri wëpadïsh ‘instruction’. 

27See footnote 239 on p. 305. 

218See GRIERSON 1929, pp. 73-76. Grierson’s dating and the single authorship of the verses 
and commentary are accepted without question by Rasrogr (1979, pp. 220-224). 


Alexis Sanderson 301 


name $itikantha, which is too common for this coincidence to prove identity. 
Moreover, the author of the Bälabodhininyäsa recounts his scholarly accom- 
plishments in its introduction, yet makes no reference to expertise in esoteric 
Saivism, let alone to his authorship of the Mahänayaprakäsa, but only to his 
mastery of the brahmanical disciplines of grammar and logic. Nor does the 
commentary on the Mahänayaprakä$a show any signs that it was written by a 
scholar who had specialized in these subjects to an advanced level. Furthermore, 
the grammarian tells us that he was a member of the distinguished family of 
the Räjänakas of Padmapura (modern Pämpar/Pampur),?! but we have no ev- 
idence that the author of the Mahänayaprakä$a was a Räjänaka of any patrilin- 
eage. Had he been a Räjänaka we would expect to see this title accompanying 
his name in the colophon, which identifies him simply as Sitikanthäcärya. 
With the collapse of this identification we are left with no means of dating 
the text other than to consider its contents and language. It contains no cita- 
tions of other works but it does provide an approximate prior limit by giving 
the traditions preceptorial line. As we have seen, it states that Mangalä was the 
source of the three Gurus of the Human Order (mänavaughab), that they were 
followed by [Cakra]bhänu, and that he was the source of the eight Disciples.??° 
The commentary explains that the Human Order comprises [Jñäna]netra, Räjni 


29 Räjänakavamsaprasamsa, #.9, I. 22-13 (vv.6—9), in which Sitikantha tells us that he 
visited various centres of learning outside Kashmir in order to master various Sästras, was 
honoured by Sultän Muhammad of Gujarat (r. 1458-1511), studied Nyäya in Gorakhpur 
from Srinätha and Patañjalis Mahäbhäsya in Benares from Varadeévara before returning to 
Kashmir, where he undertook to write this commentary at the private request of Zayn al- 
Âbidin, finishing it in A.b. 1472, during the reign of Hasan Säh: 6 yodhäcaryasuto ‘rjuno 
jani jagatkhyäto garisthair gunair yasmäc chrisitikantha ity abhidhayä jato mi vidyänidheh | 
nänäsästravinirnayäya bahusas firthäntaräny abhramam püjäm gürjaranäthamahmadasuraträ- 
näd aväpam paräm | 7 $rigoraksapure ‘dhigatya vibudhät tarkam param karkasam $rinäthäd 
adhikäsi fesaracitam mimämsayàä mämsalam | bhäsyam $rivaradesvarät svavasatim präpto rthito 
‘ham rahah frimajjainanrpena so ‘tra karavai vyäkhyäm satäm khyätaye | 8 yo bälabodhinyabhi- 
dhäm maniïst jagaddharo yäm vitatäna vritim | tannaptrkanyätanayänujo vyäkhyämy aham täm 
$itikanthako ‘Tpam | 9 try[3]añka[9visva[13]mite $äke [=Saka 1393] verse muniyugaih [74] mite 
[=Saptarsi (45)471 | nabhasyasitasaptamyäm samäpto nämanirnayah. 

220OId Kashmiri Mahanayaprakäsa 9.5: harasiru jina gañgi avatäran 1à jänu mañgala 
pithadisäna | sä mänavaugha tristhäna kulärana bhänupäda astana Sisyäna ‘Just as the head 
of Siva was the point from which the Ganges descended to earth so Mañgalä for the teachings 
of Uddiyäna. She was the source of the three stages of the Human Order. [Then came] the 
venerable Bhänu [the source] of the eight Disciples’. The commentary identifies this Bhänu as 
Cakrabhänu in its comments on the next verse. 


302 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


[Keyüravati], and Hrasvanätha,?! thus agreeing exactly with the account of the 
lineage in Arnasimhas Mahänayaprakä$a. Wf the eight that followed are under- 
stood as eight successive preceptorial generations then we will have an approx- 
imate prior limit in the twelfth century. But the next verse suggests that the 
author means eight co-disciples, because, playing on Cakrabhänu’s name and 
employing a common simile for the dawning of enlightenment it refers to him 
as the sun (khänuh) and to these disciples as lotuses opened by his light.??? This 
brings the prior limit back to some time early in the eleventh century. This, 
of course, does not establish a posterior limit, because it does not follow from 
the fact that Sitikantha’s account of the lineage ends with the eight disciples of 
Cakrabhänu that he was the direct pupil of one of them. 

As for the language of the text we might suppose that Grierson, who de- 
scribes it as old, “belonging to the period when Prakrit, in the Apabhraméa 
stage, had just merged into the language that finally became the Käshmiri of 
the present day”,2# would have rejected Nityänanda $ästris identification of 
its author if he had thought the late fifteenth century implausible on linguistic 
grounds. Evidently he saw no difficulty in accepting that this stage of Kash- 
miri, far removed though it is from the modern language, should have been 
reached so late. He was aware that the Kashmiri verses of the Saiva poetess Lal 
Déd (Lalishôri, Lallädevi, Lalläyogini), though she lived in the fourteenth cen- 
tury (1335-1376), show a form of Kashmiri that with the exception of few 
archaic forms is virtually indistinguishable from the modern vernacular. But 
he swept aside the implication that Sitikantha's verses must therefore have been 
written much earlier by asserting that the language of Lal Déd must have been 
modernized through its transmission in the oral culture of Kashmir. With this 
objection disposed of there was nothing to oppose his dating, since he was not 


221Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a, commentary on 9.5: s4 ca siddhaugharüpä *mänavaughe 
netraräjñihrasvanäthetitriräpasya kulasya ovallivisesasya (conj. : mänavaughanetraräjni brasvanä- 
thetitriräpasya kuläranih kulasya ovallivisesasya Ed.) aranih trayänäm agninäm ivotpattisthänam 
‘And [Mañgalä], who constituted the Siddha Order, was the fire-churning stick for the triple 
lineage, the distinguished preceptorial line in the Human Order comprising [Jñäna]netra, Räjñi 
[Keyüravati], and Hrasvanätha, just as the real] fire-churning sticks are the source of the three 
[$rauta] sacrificial fires’. 

229 6: asta müci mahadyu yäkheta va bammu pajapatina nikhiläna | arunodaya diñmandala 
täkheta bhänu vikäsaka $isukamaläna ‘Bhänu [/the sun] caused the lotuses that were [these] 
disciples to unfold, just as $Siva (Mahädeva) does to his eight Mürtis, or Brahmä to all the 
Prajäpatis, [or] the rising sun to the quarters of the sky. 

22 GRIERSON 1929, p.73. 


Alexis Sanderson 303 


aware of any evidence of the existence of Kashmiri in earlier centuries. But there 
is such evidence, and it shows that Kashmiri was already a distinct language in 
the early eleventh century. 

The great Khwärizmian scientist and polymath al-Birüni (973-1050+), 
who did not enter the valley himself, but evidently had Kashmirians among 
his informants, refers to a number of Indian festivals and related matters under 
vernacular names that are unmistakeably Kashmiri. He tells us in his ‘Descrip- 
tion of India’ (Zarikh al-Hind), written around A.b 1030 after he had accom- 
panied his patron Sultän Mahmüd b. Subuktakin from Ghazhna to India, that 
in the month of Asädha “there is a fast-day holy to Väsudeva called Devasini 
(2), Ze. Deva is sleeping, because it is the beginning of the four months dur- 
ing which Väsudeva slept”.22{ The name ascribed to this rite corresponds to 
Modern Kashmiri dv-wasun, meaning ‘God’s going down [to sleep]’. He also 
225 that the day in Kärtika that commemorates the god's re-awakening 
is “called Deotthinf, .i.e. the rising of the Deva”, which corresponds to Modern 
Kashmiri dv-wôthun. ‘God's getting up’. The verb wôthun is the antonym of 
wasun and among its uses is ‘to get up (from one bed)’.2% Among other ex- 


tells us 


amples are gan ‘log’ in “certain pieces of wood called gana (?) which the water 
of the river Vitastä (Jailam) carries”; pôh ‘the month Pausa and wor“ ‘a kind 
of spiced cake” in “péhaval”, which he defines as à sweet dish eaten in that 
month; wahäran ‘the act of spreading out” in “vuhara” for the flow as opposed 
to the ebb of the ocean; güra-tray in “gaur-t-r” for the third lunar day of the 
light half of the months Mägha and Vai$äkha sacred to Gaurï; and har ‘a group 
of young sprouts’ and wü/' ‘a pregnant woman’ in “harbäli” for a women's fes- 
tival in Bhädrapäda in which seeds sown in baskets are offered when they have 
sprouted.??7 

Abhinavagupta (f. c. 975-1025), stating the view that human language, as 
opposed to Mantras, is a matter of convention (s4mketika-), gives examples of 
how the same combinations of sounds have entirely different meanings in dif- 
ferent languages, and cites examples from Tamil, the language of the Saindha- 
vas, and Kashmiri. His example for the last is krära for husked grains of barley, 


224$4cHau 1964, vol. 2, p.176. 

25 Jbid., p. 177. 

26GRIERSON 1932, s.v., p. 1160b26-27. 

227SacHau 1964, vol. 2, pp. 181, 183, 104, 179, and 180; GRIERSON 1932, pp. 287b24, 
305b17-25, 684a24 and 1137a5-6, 1105b9-13, and 343b1-3 and 1113a35-36. 


304 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


wheat, or rice® with which we may compare Modern Kashmiri dôda-krür' 


f. (milk-krär”) ‘a certain kind of rice-plant .?*” He also alludes to the Kash- 
mirian vernacular when commenting on Anandavardhanas advice that poets 
should avoid any juxtaposition of syllables that might arouse vulgar thoughts 
in the minds of listeners (asabhyasmrtihetuh). He advises poets to write, for 
example, kuru rucim rather than rucin kuru.®° The unstated point of this ex- 
ample is surely that the juxtaposition of the syllables cé ku would bring to mind 
what must have been a word corresponding to the Modern Kashmiri éékh f. ‘a 
woman pudenda (used only in obscene abuse)”.2 

Finally, Ksemendra, whose dateable literary activity falls between À.p. 1037 
(Brhatkathämañjari) and 1066 (Dasävatäracarita), tells us that he has included 
words from the local language (defabhäsä) in his sketches of various unsavoury 
characters in the 8th chapter of his Desopadesa;"*? and several words are in- 
deed present there that can only be Kashmiri or which make good sense only 
if so understood. The first that I see in this passage is ghata in 8.12 in mock- 
ery of a Säkta brahmin: ghatagalagalagalasabdair galapüram bhairavam piban 
bhattah. The phrase makes no sense if the word is Sanskrit (‘pot’), but excellent 
sense when recognized as Modern Kashmiri gh ‘choking caused by too eagerly 
drinking’:2* ‘the brahmin drinking Bhairava (i.e. wine), filling his throat, with 
the sound gala gala gala of choking caused by drinking too eagerly. The dif- 
ferences between ghata and g‘th are inconsequential, since Kashmiri does not 
distinguish between aspirated and unaspirated voiced consonants and aspirates 
the unvoiced consonants k, p, f, f, and é when these end a word. Then there are 
meläkalama- (8.40), in a passage on an ignorant scholar, which is meaningless in 


28 Parätrisikävivarana, p.227, IL. 16-18 (p.125 in Ksrs ed.): yatha däksinätyäh caurasabdena 
odanam vyapadifanti saindhaväs tu tenaiva dasyum odanam tu krürafrutyà tayà tu käfmirikà 
vitusitayavagodhüimatandulän iti ‘...just as southerners say caura- for cooked rice, but the na- 
tives of Sindh use the sound caura for a brigand and krära for boiled rice, while the Kashmirians 
use krära for husked grains of barley, wheat, or rice’. 

22GRIERSON 1932, p. 189b11-14. The caura of the ‘southerners corresponds to Tamil and 
Malayalam coru ‘boiled rice (Burrow and EMENEAU 1984, s.v.). Cf. Indrabhüti, /#änasiddhi 
15.2: corasabdo [yathä] loke *bhaktärtham (conj. : bhaksyärtham Ed.) pratipädayet | kesämcic 
coram “eväha (conj. : ähuh Ed.) tantre py evam padäs tathä. 

230]n his Dhvanyälokalocana on 2.11: yathä kuru rucim iti kramavyatyäse. 

231GRIERSON 1932, p. 1068a40-—41 

232 Desopadesa 8.1: ekatra samksiptadhiyà prakirnajanavarnanam | desabhäsäpadair misram 
adhunä kriyate mayä ‘With the intention of concision I shall now give in a single [chapter] a 
description of miscellaneous persons that will include [some] words from the local language’. 

233 GrIERSON 1932, p.311a9-11. 


Alexis Sanderson 305 


Sanskrit but apposite Kashmiri, since in that language #17] f. means ‘ink’, and 
mil-kalam ‘an ink-pen; %* navadarakäri (8.45) describing a crooked accoun- 
tant, which yields no apposite sense in Sanskrit but if dera is read as Kashmiri 
derides him for setting new tariffs or fixing the scales to his advantage;?** and 
vali ‘finger-ring , Modern Kashmiri w6ÿ' f., 2% in kusatilaräjatavalikalitakara. 

I see no reason, therefore, to think that the Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa, 
though not by the fifteenth-century grammarian, must have been composed so 
late. A date early in the history of the Kashmirian $aiva literature, close to the 
limit of the early eleventh century set by the texts account of the Guru lineage, 
is entirely possible. Indeed it is plausible in the light of the considerable distance 
between this Old Kashmiri and the modern language, which, even if we accept 
Grierson’s view that Lal Déd’s Kashmiri has been modernized—and I see no 
strong reason to do so—is certainly present in the verses of the poetess Habba 
Khätün in the sixteenth century. 

As for the author of the commentary, he reports, as we have seen, that 
the line of succession (p#ramparyam) that had reached him began from Räjñi 
I$äni, indicating thereby that there were several intermediate preceptorial gen- 
erations.?” The sources that he cites include a lost hymn (Srorramälà) com- 


234GR1ERSON 1932, pp. 564b48-50 and 565b39-41. 

2% Modern Kashmiri dar m. ‘price, rate, tariff, market or current rate; a large, fixed pair of 
scales for weighing heavy loads (GRIERSON 1932, p. 234b10-14), and dar-karun ‘to calculate 
the weight of anything by weighing an aliquot part thereof by measure and multiplying by the 
number of parts (GRIERSON 1932, p. 234b18-21). 

236GRIERSON 1932, p. 1107a30-31. This change of / to j is regular in Kashmiri; cf. kawoÿ" 
‘cremation-ground attendant from käpälikah in that sense (see, e.g., Räjataranñgini 7.44ab); 
môl! ‘father, but m6j% ‘mother from mahallakah/mabhallika ‘venerable one’; kïj' f. ‘pes, spike’ 
from kilika; muj® f. ‘a radish’ from mälika; shôj' f. ‘she-jackal’ from srgalikä; and züj# f. ‘a fine, 
delicate net’ from jélika. 

2371 have emended. The published text gives kufatilaräjatavalih kalitakarä. 

28 Further clarification of these matters would be possible by studying the Kashmiri of the 
Bänäsuravadha, composed by Bhattävatära during the fifteenth century (BüHLER 1877, p. 90), 
c. 1446. The only known manuscript, dated 1020 Hijri (a.p. 1658), was acquired in Kashmir by 
Georg BÜHLER and is now in the Bhandarkar Oriental Research Institute in Pune. I regret that I 
have not yet seen it. This work, I imagine, would not be open to the argument of modernization 
that was applied by Grierson to the poetry of Lal Däd and might also be extended to that of 
Habba Khätün, since her verses too became part of Kashmiri oral tradition. 

2#Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a, commentary on 9.5: bhänupädah astänäm $isyänäm 
(corr. : sadantam päramparyanidänam Ed.) ‘The venerable [Cakra]bhänu was the Lord of the 
Eight Disciples, one of whom, the Räjñi Iéänï, is the source of the line of succession that ends 


306 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


posed by himself, #° verses from an unnamed Krama scripture or scriptures 


#1 an unattributed verse found in the Ürmikaulärnava 


) 242 
2 


not otherwise known, 
(a scripture of a related form of the Kälikula 
unknown works of the post-scriptural Krama, of which the Räjkä and Püjati- 
laka are named.?# The only authors of approximatly known date that he cites 
are Jñänanetra and Utpaladeva®# but this takes us no further in establishing 
his period, since Utpaladeva, the later of these, flourished around the middle of 


and passages from otherwise 


the tenth century. He cites a verse that is attributed to Srivatsa, * but nothing 
requires us identify that Srivatsa with the author of the Cidgaganacandrikä. 
The text and its commentary stand apart in the Kashmirian Krama litera- 
ture in a number of respects. This, for example, is the only source therein whose 
account of the course of worship does not culminate in the fourth phase, that 
of the Nameless (anäkhyakramah), but adds à fifth, the phase of Pure Light 
(bhasäkramah)# following in this respect the model of worship taught in the 


in myself. 

24001]d Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a, pp. 47, 1. 16-48, L. 2 (yat stutam stotramäläyäm mayaiva). 

210ld Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa, p. 6, 1.7: p. 7, IL 9-10; p. 16, Il. 4-5; p. 29, 12-13; p. 39, 
IL. 1-2 and 7-12; p.42, 15-16: p. 43, IL 1-2; p. 45, IL 3-4, 6-7, 9-10, 12-13, 15-16: p.111, 
Il. 11—12. 

220ld Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa, p.10, IL. 4-5, = Ürmikaulärnava, f. 5r4-5 (1.90c-91b). 
This scripture, also called Bhogahasta, teaches a form of the Kälikula related to that of the Krama 
texts (£. 10v7 [2.6]: äkéam kälikramämnäyam bhogahasteti vifrutam) and claims to have been 
revealed first by Minanätha in Kämarüpa and then taken by Siddhas to Kaulagiri (Kolhapur) 
in Karnataka; see SANDERSON 2005, pp. 133-134 and footnote 111. 

28OlId Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa, p.20, IL. 11-14; p.21, IL 2-4, 5-9, and 16-17; p. 24, 
IL 6-9; p.32, IL 10-13 (in Old Kashmiri, attributed to an unnamed Siddha [y4d siddhapädä 
ädidisuh)}); p.43, IL 5-8; p.55, Il. 5-8 (attributed to the Räjikà); p. 58, Il. 8-15; pp. 62, L. 15- 
63, L. 4; p.79, IL. 34. On p. 141 he refers to à variant order of Krama worship taught in the 
Päjätilaka. 

240ïd Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa, p. 6, 11. 14-15, = Kälikästotra, f. 91r1-2 (v. 6); p. 12, IL. 5 
6, = Utpaladeva, Sivastoträvali 16.1; p. 12, IL. 16-17 (not traced). 

25The verse is cited (p.12, IL. 8-11) as that of ‘a certain learned scholar (kascic ca vipascid 
äba). The attribution to Srivatsa accompanies a citation of the same verse in a marginal com- 
ment in a Kashmirian manuscript of the Naresvarapariksäprakä$a ($rivatso ‘py äha); see Warson 
2006, p. 246. 

260]d Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a 11.2-5 and commentary. The content of this phase is 
unclear. The commentary explains that it contains four sub-phases, calling them the differ- 
entiated (sakalah), the differentiated-cum-undifferentiated (sakalaniskalah), the undifferenti- 
ated (riskalah), and the all-containing (parah) (p.123, IL 3-5: catväro hy asmin bhäsäkrame 
*akalasakalaniskalaniskalaparäkhyäh (em. : sakaläsakalaniskaläniskalaparäkhyäh Ed.] *kramä 


lem. : krama Ed.] mahäkramam avabhäsayanti); that there are twelve constituent goddesses 


Alexis Sanderson 307 


Kälikulakramasadbhäva rather than the K4/ikulapañcasataka. However, it fol- 
lows the latter in the preceding phases, giving thirteen Kälïs in the fourth rather 
than the former’s seventeen. This illustrates in striking fashion a characteristic 
of the post-scriptural Krama as a whole, namely its readiness to innovate, à fea- 
ture that was no doubt justified in terms of its distinctive narrative of ongoing 
revelation through direct contact with the Yoginis of Uddiyäna conceptualized 
in these texts as the sudden unfolding in the meditator’s visionary conscious- 
ness of his own inner reality. The text is also remarkable for the richness of 
its reading of the structures of worship not only in terms of the natural flow 
of cognition but also in mapping them on to a model of the flow of energy 
within the body itself. Further, it gives detailed instructions found in no other 
text on a four-day course of training in the worship of the Krama following 
initiatory transmission (szmkramanam), in which the initiate worships day by 
day the deities of the four phases from Emission (srs#kramah) to the Name- 
less (anäkhyakramah), each accompanied with the worship of the Pitha-circle, 
a segment of the Guru lineage, the phase of Pure Light (bhäsäkramah), and the 
Samayavidyä of one hundred syllables that rectifies any defects in the preced- 
ing worship, followed by instruction in a five-day session in which the initiate 
together with his female consort (4%#;) worships the five deity phases one by 


(cakrinyah) in the first, six in the second, three in the third, and one in the fourth; that 
all the twelve and four of the six have Mantras of eighteen syllables; that the remain- 
ing two of those six and all of the three have Mantras of fourteen syllables; and that 
the goddess of the fourth and highest sub-phase has one of nine syllables, which it calls 
the Kulavidyà (ekaiva kulavidyä navärnaiva). The relevant section of the K%/kulakrama- 
sadbhäva having been lost, we turn to the K%/kulakramärcana for clarification but find 
that its arrangement of deities differs. There (Æ. 14v6-15r2: bhäsäkramapüjaävidhih) one is 
to worship twelve goddesses (Mantrakäli, Hamsakäli, Kramakäli, Jfänakälr, Dämarakäli, 
Cakrakäli, Omkärakäli, Gaganakäli, Ekabhäsäkäli, Sabdakäli, Balakälï, and Rddhikäli), then 
eight (Bhäsäkäli, Bhäsähamsakäli, Bhäsäcandakäli, Bhäsädämarakäli, Bhäsäyogakäli, Bhäsa- 
gaganakäli, Bhäsäsvarakäli, and Bhäsä-rksakält), then seven (Süryakäli, Candrakäli, Ag- 
nikäli, Väyukäli, Vyomakäli, Manahkäli, and Sarvakäli), then the nine-syllable Vidyä in its 
seventeenth-syllable form through the separation of its conjuncts (MA-E-KHA-PHA-RA-MA-HA- 
CA-NA-DA-YA-O GA-E-$A-VA-RI), the 100-syllable Samayavidyä (see footnote 247 on p. 308), and 
finally the unseparated nine-syllable Vidyä (KHPHREM MAHACANDAYOGESvARI). Only the num- 
ber of the first phase and the nine-syllable Vidyä at the end coincide. Nor do the Mantras 
in the Kä/kulakramärcana, with the exception of the nine-syllable Vidyä, show the requisite 
number of syllables. Maheévaränandas comments on the phase of Radiance in the Mahärtha- 
mañjariparimala (pp. 101-104) are too abstract to clarify these details beyond the use of the 
seventeen-syllable Vidyä (sodasädhikä: perhaps the separated form of the nine-syllable is in- 
tended) and the nine-syllable Vidyä. 


308 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


one with dough lamps (dpacaruh, prakäsacaruh), each with the Pitha-cycle, a 


segment of the Guru lineage, and the Samayavidyä.?* 


The Anonymous Mahänayaprakäsa 


A third Mahänayaprakä$a, of unknown authorship, has been published from 
Trivandrum on the basis a single Keralan manuscript.#8 It too is proba- 
bly Kashmirian, since it has been cited by Jayaratha in his commentary on 
the Tanträloka and by Siva[svämin] Upädhyäya I in his commentary on the 
Vijñänabhairava® and drawn upon by Sivasväamin Upädhyäya II in his S- 
varätrirahasya.®® The editor reports with approval hearsay evidence that the 
author was Abhinavagupta.#! But though the work shows a style and sophisti- 
cation not unworthy of him, the claim thatitis his is fatally undermined by the 


27Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a 13.15. On the Samayeévari/Samayavidyä/Samayä of one 
hundred syllables see 11.6-9. The author does not give the Vidya itself, but states that it has 
100 syllables divided into sections of 2, 15, 69, 2, and 12, for four sub-phases within the 
phase of the Nameless (Srstyanäkhyasamayeévari to Suddhänäkhyasamayeévari) followed by 
the phase of Pure Light (Bhäsäsamayeévari). This is evidently the Samayavidyä taught in partly 
encoded form in Kälkulapañcasataka 6.19-30. For that has 100 syllables and consists of seg- 
ments of the length indicated by our author. These are not conveyed explicitly, but they are 
nonetheless made apparent by four occurrences at the appropriate places of the syllable PHAT, 
which generally occurs at the end of a Mantra, with PHAT svAHA at the end of the whole. De- 
coded, with the addition of Dandas to mark the segments, it is: KHPHREM PHAT | MAHÂCANDE 
CANDAMUKHI CANDAYOGESVARI PHAT | CANDADUHKHAVIMOCANI SARVASAMAYALOPAVIGHATANI 
TEJOVATI AMRTAMÜRTE ASIDDHASADHANI SIDDHI-RDDHIPRADE NA$AYA SARVADOSAN ABHIMATAM 
ME PRAYACCHA SARVE SARVAGE ARÜPE SARVARÜPE HRIM PHAT | KHPHREM PHAT | HÜM KROM 
KSAM SARVAVIDYESVARI PHAT SVAHA. The function of the Samayavidyä is to promote the fruition 
of the worship that precedes it by removing any impediments to that fruition caused by de- 
fects in performance; see SANDERSON in the discussion after GoupriaAn 1986, pp. 161-163. 
The segments of the lineage of Gurus are six: (1) the paraughah (= the five Vähadevis), (2) the 
divyaughab (= the Siddhas and Yoginis of the prakäfacakram, änandacakram, and mürticakram), 
(3) the mahaughah (= the sixty-four Pithe$varis/ Säkinis/Siddhäs of the vrndacakram), (4) the 
siddhaughah (= Mañgalä), (5) the mänavaughah (= Jhänanetra, Keyüravati, and Hrasvanätha), 
and (6) the Ssyaughah (= Cakrabhänu and his eight disciples). In the four-day course 4-6 are 
combined and in the five-day course 5 and 6. 

#8The editor, K. Sämbagiva Sästri, reports that the manuscript, on palm-leaf in the Malay- 
alam script, belonged to Brahmagri Näräyanan Bhattatiripäd of Parambürillam, Thiruvalla, and 
judges that it is about four hundred years old (Mahänayaprakä$a |Triv.], introduction, p. 3). 

29 Tanträlokaviveka on 4.125, vol. 3, p. 128, IL. 12-18 (= Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 9.15-18b); 
Vijñanabhairavavivrti, p.67, IL. 10-13 (=7.127-128), and Il. 18-19 (=7.144). 

250Sce footnote 319 on p. 329. 

#1 Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.), introduction, p. 2. 


Alexis Sanderson 309 


fact that Jayaratha cites it as representing the view of unnamed others, namely 
that there are thirteen Kälis in the phase of the Nameless and not twelve as 
Abhinavagupta has taught in the passage on which Jayaratha is commenting.?*? 
This text is distinguished from the other two works with the same title by 
the depth and subtlety of its explanations of the course of Krama worship as 
embodying a process of the unfolding of sudden enlightenment in which con- 
sciousness devours its own content and subjectivity (alamgräsah, hathapäkah) 
to burst forth into the mind and senses as a transfigured mundane experience 
in which the polarity of Liberation and bondage is obliterated. It also stands 
apart by reason of its containing a sophisticated and learned philosophical ar- 
gument for the position that the object of cognition has no existence outside 
the cognition itself, as the basis for the soteriologically correct perception of 
the cyclical low of consciousness personified in the goddesses of the Five Flows 
(vähadevyah) from the inner ground of pure potential before the arising of 
object-cognition (Vyomavämesvari) to the return to that ground (Raudrarau- 
dreévari) at its end;?* and for an eloquent reconciliation of the Krama’s Säkta 
perspective on itself as the ultimate revelation within its Saiva context, namely 
that the Goddess of the Krama is that point at the core of Siva’s nature that he 
himself cannot objectivate:?* 
(104-5b) Maheévaras repose within himself is the highest state of self- 
awareness. But by the finest of distinctions there shines a state even higher than 
that. This is the Goddess-ground, in which even the Lord cannot see his way. 


22 Tanträlokaviveka on 4.125, vol. 3, p. 128, IL. 10-11, introducing the unattributed citation 
of Mahänayaprakä$a (Triv.) 9.15-18b: nanv asyà parasyäh samvido ‘nyair anayaiva bhañgyä tra- 
yodasätmakatvam uktam. yad uktam: … ‘It may be objected that others following exactly the 
same approach have asserted that fully expanded consciousness has thirteen aspects. As has 
been said: 

23 Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 3.1-93. 

24Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 3. 94-111. 3.104111: mahesasyätmavisräntih parähamtätmikä 
hi yä | tasyà api parävasthà bhati saksmaprabhedatah | 105 tad devidhäma yaträsau käm- 
disiko vibhur bhavet | bhävabhävau prakäse ‘ntah pratisthäm adhigacchatah | 106 sa cäpi 
sakaläpeksäfünyäyäm ciccamatkrtau | täratamyädikalanäväsanävedhadürage | 107 paravisrä- 
ntiparyante spi vifrämyati svatah | paraprakäsavifräntidasäyäm api ye sthitäh | 108 vasanä- 
vedhasamskärä bhäväbhävobhayätmakäh | *antas tän grasanikrtya (conj. : atas täm asanïkrtya 
Ed.) ya vifräntir anuttarä | 109 sä devï kathyate tasyà nayo au devatänayah | *yaträvate (em. : 
yaträpate) “pariksino (Ed. : pariksinä Cod.) *vitañko (em. [cf. here 1.1d and 3.82a (avatätañka- 
), and commentary introducing Bhävopahärastotra v 1: niruttaranirniketanävatavitañka-] : "pi 
tañko Ed.) au nayas tatah | 110 yà kälagräsavisräntis tad rñpam paramesituh | yà tadvisrän- 
tivifräntis tad deviräpam isyate | 111 ittham *süksmeksikärñpo (em. : süksmeksitärñpo Ed. : 
säksmiksitäräpo Cod.) bhedo *yam (em. : yat Ed.) paramesayoh | aikye ‘pi darsitah samyak- 
pratitipariuddhaye. 


310 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


(105c-106) Being and non-being are grounded in the light of all manifestation, 
and that is grounded in the ecstasy of consciousness void of all dependence, 
which in turn comes to rest spontaneously in the limit of the self-groundedness 
of that all-encompassing [light], where the impressions of the influences left in 
consciousness by awareness of degree and the like are completely absent. (107- 
109) What we mean by ‘the Goddess’ is that untranscendable ground that re- 
mains when it has devoured even the subtlest traces of the impressions of these 
influences, positive, negative and both, that persist even within the state of the 
self-groundedness of that all-encompassing light. This path of [meditating on 
the cycles of] the deities [of cognition] is precisely the path of the Goddess [so 
defined]. It derives from that abyss in which all imprints are obliterated. (110) 
The nature of the Supreme Lord [Siva] is the self-groundedness that devours 
awareness [of degree and the like]. We define the nature of the Goddess to be 
the point in which that itself comes to rest. (111) Thus though the Supreme 
Lords, male and female, are [objectively] one and the same, a subtle experien- 
tial difference between them has been revealed in order to perfect the correct 
perception [of this fact]. 


With the practical details of worship it is little concerned, but it conveys that 
initiation is to take the form of the tasting of the Kaula sacramental substances 
(carupräfanam) at the commencement of the process of oral instruction and 
worship. It also teaches that the phase of the Nameless (znakhyakramah), in 
which its course of worship culminates, is to be realized in the experience of a 
female consort, wine, and meat.?*6 

The work mentions Hrasvanätha, and quotes from the Xramastotra of 
Eraka, the Svabodhodayamañjari of Vämanadatta, and the Âvarapratyabhi- 


jñäkärikä of Utpaladeva.?*” It was therefore composed no earlier than about 


2% Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 2.4-5: prâdhänyena sthito loke vyavahärah kriyätmakah | atah 
pithakramaÿjñaptis tanmukhenaiva kathyate | anenaiväfayenädau carupräfana*pürvakam (corr. : 
pürvakah Ed.) | gurunä sampradäyasya bhäjanam kriyate pafuh ‘For the most part our mundane 
experience is active by nature. It is therefore through this that instruction is given in the [five- 
aspected] process of the Pitha phase of worship. And it is with this in mind that the Guru 
transforms the bound soul into a receptacle of the transmission by having him consume the 
sacramental substances’. 

256 Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 9.35-51b. 

27Hrasvanätha is mentioned under the name Vämanavira in 8.27, quoted in footnote 140 
on p.276. The Kramastotra of Eraka is quoted in 6.27 as the Sumvitstotra of the Hymno- 
grapher: stotrakärasyedam eva sthitam cetasi yaj jagau | *samvitstotre (corr. : samvitstotraih 
Ed.) *samälokam (em. : samäloka Ed.) pramänärthapramätr*gam (em. : dah Cod. : tab 
em. Ed.) ‘This is what was in the mind of the Hymnographer when he sang of the sin- 
gle light in the means, object, and agent of cognition’. This refers to a line attributed 


Alexis Sanderson 311 


950. However, I propose that though it does not cite Abhinavagupta directly it 
was influenced by doctrines set out by him in his Zanträloka and therefore that 
it is unlikely to have been written before the first half of the eleventh century. 

This influence is apparent in the texts explanation of the hierarchy of the 
Krama’s means of Liberation, and its account of the Kälis that are to be wor- 
shipped in the last phase, that of the Nameless. As for the first, it teaches 
that liberation-in-life (j#vanmuktih), the Krama’s goal, comes through an ex- 
treme descent of Siva’s power (atitivrah Saktipätah, atisaktipätah) that brings 
about complete immersion in the reality of consciousness. This descent it sub- 
divides into three degrees, mild (#rduh), moderate (madhyah), and intense 
(atimätrah), also calling them respectively mahätivrah, mahätivratarah, and 
mahätivratamah.”® 


When fämbhava- immersion has been established through the most intense 
(atitivra-) descent of power then liberation in life has been attained and as a 
result everything is experienced as identical with the nectar of the bliss of the 
self. When this extreme descent of power gets under way we find that there ap- 
pears within it a subtle experiential differentiation into [three degrees:] intense, 


middling, and mild. 


These qualify their recipients for the Krama’s three ascending methods of 
liberation: (1) through the worship of the Krama (p#janam), (2) through oral 
instruction (kathanam), and (3) without the help of either of these, through 
direct transmission (szmkramanam).?° The last it characterizes as a sudden un- 
folding of enlightenment brought about by a non-verbal fusion with the Guru’s 


to the Kramastotra by Sivopädhyäya in Vijñänabhairavavivrti, p.140: tato ‘svaro rkasomäg- 
nikaläbtjaprasätibhäk | udety ekah samälokah pramänärthapramätreah iti. arthah prameyam. 
iti frikramastotrasamvädät …. 1 have emended the reading pramätrtah following this citation 
and Abhinavaguptas unattributed quotation of the same in Parätrifikävivarana, p.204, 1.25, 
who also cites it as the words of “the venerable Siddha” in Ævarapratyabhijnävivrtivimarsint, 
vol. 3, pp. 71-72 (yathoktam siddhapädaih). The expression stotrakärah (Hymnographer’) for 
Eraka is also seen in the *Kramavamsävali quoted in Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p. 191, IL. 3-6. 
Utpaladeva’s Kvarapratyabhijñäkärikä (1.5.11cd) is quoted in 3.64 without attribution: ane- 
naiväsayenokto yuktitattvavicaksanaih *prakäso rthoparakto (corr. : prakäsärthoparakto Ed.) pi 
sphatikädi*jadopamah (corr. : jälomapam KEd.). The first verse of Vämanadatta’s Suabodhodaya- 
mañjari is quoted as the oral teaching of the Siddhas (#3 siddhamukhämnäyayuktyà) in 9.52c- 
53b. 

28 Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 1.78: atitivrasaktipätäd ärüdhe ämbhave samävese | svanandä- 
mrtarñpam jivanmukteh *“prakalpyate (conj. : jivanmukteh prakalpate Ed.) vifvam | atimätra- 
madhyamrdutäbhedenäpi pravartamänasya | sûksmeksikäprakäro ‘pi vilasati tasyatisaktipätasya. 

29 Mahänayaprakä$a (Triv.) 1.3-29a. 


312 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


awareness, which needs no additional practice to establish and maintain it:260 


This is the non-sequential process of the Ground of the Primordial (puräna- 
dhisthänakramabh) 1 Y is the highest limit of the Mahärtha, in which the dis- 
tinction of self and other has dissolved. 


and:262 


This is the process of [immersion] without means, being free of perturbation 
[even] by the latent impressions of the distractions that are reasoning, obser- 
vance, and the rest. One in whom it is established is the king among Yogins. 
He is free of all obscurations, beyond the level of transcending or seeking to 
attain. He needs nothing else to establish [this, since it is] his own true nature. 


The Guru glance is sufficient to bring about an unimpeded, spontaneous 
understanding of the flow of the enlightened ground of consciousness in all 
the aspects of its operation expressed in the circles of powers that make up the 
course of worship.?5? 


Through the violent impact of the Guru’s glance he achieves unimpeded aware- 
ness in all the phases, from that of the Pitha to [that of the Nameless]. 


In the method of oral instruction the same spontaneous understanding un- 
folds with the help of the Guru’s transmission of the Krama’s aphorisms:2 


In the most extreme [descent of power] (mahätivratame), that rests in self- 
experience [alone], unimpeded awareness dawns for one without descending 
to the processes of instruction or [worship]. And when the more extreme 
(mahätivratare) gets under way [that awareness] dawns as a result of the Guru’s 
teaching, from nothing but his oral explanation of the aphorisms, of which the 
first is “[No sooner] seen [than] lost”. 


20 Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 1.9-20, 24. 1.11: so yam *puränädhisthänakramah (conj. : pu- 
ränädhisthänah kramah Ed.) kramavivarjitah | mahärthasya parä nisthäà galitasvaparasthitih. 

261CF. the term gdod ma gzhi or gdod ma gzhi ‘Primordial Ground, Ground of the Primordial” 
that denotes the central concept of the Great Perfection (rDzogs chen) tradition of the rNying 
ma pa Buddhism of Tibet as developed by the tenth century; see KarMaAy 1988, p. 119. 

22 Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 1.13—-14: yukticaryädiviksepaväsanäksobhavarjitah | anupäya- 
kramah so ‘yam yasya *rüdhah sa (em. Ed. : rüdhasya Cod.) yogirät | sarvävarananirmukto 
bänädänapadojihitah | sthitaye svasvarñpasya nänyat kimcid apeksate. 

23 Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 1.16bcd: gurudrkpätasähasat | pithakramädau sarvatra visuddhis 
tasya jäyate. 

24 Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 1.20-21: mahätivratame + + + + svänubhavasthite | kathanädi- 
kramätità visuddhis *tasya (conj. : tatra Ed.) käsate | mahätivra*tare (em. : tame Ed.) cäsmin 
pravritte gurusäsanät | “drstanastädisamketakathämaätrat (em. : drstädrstädisamketamäträ Ed.) 
prakä$ate. For the topic of enlightenment through oral transmission see pp. 332 er seq. 


Alexis Sanderson 313 


and in the method of worship the nature of consciousness dawns through med- 
itative propitiation of the goddessess embodied in the cyclical flow of cogni- 
tion 

In the [merely] extreme (mahätivre) the nature of the self dawns through the 
method of worshipping the goddesses of cognition that shine forth in every state 
of mundane experience, flowing outwards and inwards with each successive 
object of awareness, their contraction dissolved as they merge with the great 
void. 


The first access to enlightenment is said to be completely devoid of concep- 
tual awareness (2kalpah), while the other two are defined against it as methods 
in which one relies to a greater or lesser extent on this awareness. In the case 
of oral instruction the conceptual element, though present, is subordinate to 
non-conceptual intuition, whereas in the process of worship it dominates and 
one must gradually transcend it through the intensification of the insight it 


embodies until finally direct, non-conceptual realization ensues:26 


For some, in whom awareness of their identity has taken root without even the 
slightest trace of conceptual thought, knowledge dawns without dependence 
on any means of bringing it about. For others knowledge dawns in which the 
non-conceptual is dominant, as the result of an ever fainter conceptual aware- 
ness based on the [Guru’s] instruction in the aphorisms and the like. And for 
some non-conceptual knowledge relies on the processes of worship and the rest, 
coming about only through and after conceptual awareness. 


This exposition is influenced, I propose, by the theory of the four means 
of Liberation set out in descending order of excellence by Abhinavagupta in his 
Tanträloka, namely the fimbhavah, $äktah, and änavah modes of immersion 
in Siva (samävesah) with ‘immersion without [the repeated practice of any] 
method” (anupäyah samävesah) added at the summit of the first.” Our text 


25 Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 1.22-23: prakäsante (em. Ed. : prakäÿate Cod.) mahätivre vyava- 
hära*dasasu yäh (em. : daräsu yäh Ed.) | pratyekavisayävrttyà bahirantarmukhodayäh | samvid- 
devyo mahävyoma*samghattatrotitärgaläh (conj. : samghäditrotitäsfaläh ®) Ed.) | täsäm pajana- 
vicchittyà svarñpam samprakäsate. 

26 Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 1.24-24: vikalpaväsanäsanyaprarñädha*svatmasamvidah (em. 
Ed. : ssätmasamvidah Cod.) prathate kasyacij jñänam anapeksitasädhanam | udriktani- 
rvikalpämsarn mandamandavikalpatah | prathate kasyacij jñänam samketädikathäsrayaät | 
püjanädikramäpeksam Ysamsthite + + kasyacit | vikalpasämanantaryän “nirvikalpam (em. : 
nirvikalpah Ed.) pravartate. 

247See Tanträloka 1.140-245 (preliminary analysis [1.171-213: Sämbhavah; 214-220: 
fäktah, 221-241: änavah; 242-245: anupäyah), and Âhnikas 2 (anupaäyah), 3 (Sämbhavah), 
4 (Säktab), and 5 and following (4navah). 


314 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


teaches enlightenment through non-conceptual transmission in terms that echo 
Abhinavaguptas conception of the highest means by defining it as a $ämbhavah 
samävesah that transcends all methods (azupäyah), and while it does not use 
the terms f%ktah and änavah to define its two lower methods, those of oral in- 
struction and meditative worship, its analysis of these follows the same the- 
oretical model, for Abhinavaguptas presents his $kta- and 4nava- methods 
as means of reaching non-conceptual revelation (nérvikalpakah säksätkärah) 
through the progressive refining of conceptual awareness of ultimate reality 
(vikalpasamskärah), through insight alone in the case of the f%kta- method and 
through that supported by ritual worship and other forms of action in the case 
of the änava-2$8 Our texts subdivision of the highest degree of the descent of 
power (atisaktipätah) into three levels also echoes the Zanrräloka, by adapting its 
doctrine of nine degrees of the intensity of this descent, in which three degrees, 
intense (#vrah), moderate (madhyamah), and mild (mandah), are subdivided 


by themselves.26? 


As for the texts treatment of the Kälis of the phase of the Nameless, at 
first sight that differs fundamentally from Abhinavaguptas, since, as we have 
seen, it teaches that they are thirteen in number in accordance with the tradi- 
tion of their worship in all texts other than the Xä/kulakramasadbhäva, which 
teaches seventeen, while Abhinavagupta reduces the number to twelve in keep- 
ing with his position that there is no transcendental reality beyond the twelve 
but one consciousness that is both one and twelve according to perspective.?”° 
Our text could not drop one of the Kälis, as Abhinavagupta has done, in order 


28$ee Tanträloka 4.1-7 for the doctrine that the essence of fäktah samävesah or Säktopäyah 
is the refining of conceptual thought of reality (vikalpasamskärah) through thought alone until 
it transcends itself to become non-conceptual intuition, and Tanträloka 5.1-6 for the doctrine 
that änavah samävesah or änavopäyah is this same process when it cannot sustain itself through 
thought alone but must resort to other means. 5.3-4c: vikalpah kasyacit svätmasvätantryäd eva 
susthirah | upäyäntarasäpeksyaviyogenaiva jäyate | kasyacit tu vikalpo sau svätmasamskaranam 
prati | wpäyäntarasäpeksah ‘For some conceptual thought becomes fully stable through it own 
free agency alone, without having to rely on any additional methods. But for others it needs 
such additional methods to develop itself”. This mode of immersion is called 4zavah because 
these additional methods are limited and diverse. 5.6: nifcayo bahudhà caisa tatropäyäs ca bhedi- 
nabh | anusabdena te coktä düräntikavibhedatah ‘And this [process of the attaining of] certainty 
is manifold, and the means to it are many, some being closer to [pure thought] and others less 
so. It is for this reason that they have been termed contractions (anwh). On the methods of 
änavah samävesah see p.372. 

29 Tanträloka 13.129c-254b, ending with the report that he owes this classification into nine 
to his Guru Sambhunätha, which is to say that it has no scriptural foundation. 

270See his Kramastotra and Tanträloka 4.148—180b. 


Alexis Sanderson 315 


to make the highest (Mahäbhairavacandograghorakäli) the twelfth rather than 
the thirteenth, because its exegesis is tied to the order of worship (päjäkramab), 
in which this Käli is in the centre of a circle surrounded by the other twelve, 
whereas Abhinavaguptas exposition of these goddesses is free of this constrain- 
ing context, being concerned, as Jayaratha puts it in a long and tendentious 
justification of this discrepancy, not with their order in worship, which could 
hardly be contradicted in a Krama text, but with their natural order in con- 
sciousness (samvitkramah).?7 However, our text reveals that it is aware of the 
Abhinavaguptan position, because it says that the thirteenth is distinguished 
from the twelve only figuratively (#pacäratah), being in fact no more than the 
common essence of the twelve, the ground in which the distinction between 
them is dissolved, and that it is included for separate worship only because it 
is the realization of this inner unity pervading the twelve that is the ultimate 
goal:?”? 


The ground in which the [separate] identities of these twelve goddesses are dis- 
solved, which we refer to figuratively as the thirteenth goddess, is present as the 
highest object of worship, because it is this that is the goal. 


Furthermore, the text has adopted Abhinavaguptas understanding of the 
nature of the twelve. Jhänanetranätha presents these as the three successive 
states of emission, stasis, and withdrawal, each subdivided into four stages, 
namely the same three followed by a fourth state, which he terms [final] 
rest (visramah).®" Thus they are understood as the flow of cognition passing 
through emission of emission, stasis of emission, withdrawal of emission, the 
[final] rest of emission, emission of stasis and so on through to the [final] rest of 
withdrawal.27# The same model is seen in all other Krama sources that address 


271See Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, pp. 127, 1. 6-134, L. 17. The core of JayarathaSs answer to the 
Krama%s objection that there should be thirteen rather than twelve Kälis is that there could only 
be thirteen in reality rather than worship if the thirteenth were separately manifest and that 
since that thirteenth could only be fully expanded consciousness (parä samvit) it would follow 
that the twelve, if other than that, would not be manifest at all, since all manifestation is of 
that one consciousness. There would then remain nothing but a single consciousness void of the 
manifestation of its dynamic structure (niräbhäsaiva samvid ekaivävasisyeta) (p.129, Il. 1-11). 
Jayaratha introduces the distinction between the order of worship (päjäkramah) and the order 
in consciousness (samvitkramah) in pp. 161, L. 16-162, L. 9, saying that the Krama scriptures 
and the great Gurus following them have taught the former in order to conceal the latter. 

27 Mahänayaprakä$a (Triv.) 9.60-61b: 4säm dvädasadevinam svarüpavilayävanih | trayodasiri 
yä devi kathyate hy upacäratah | upädeyatayä saiva paropäsyatayä sthitä. 

273See p. 272. 

274 Kälikästotra, vv. 8—9. For text and translation see footnote 123 on p. 271. 


316 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


this matter, namely the Mahänayaprakäsa of Arnasimha,?7* the Old Kashmiri 
Mahänayaprakä$a and its commentary,?”* and the Cidgaganacandrikä.?77 The 
Trivandrum Mahänayaprakä$a gives the same explanation, in terms that echo 
the Kälikästotra, but modifies it by identifying the emission, stasis, and with- 
drawal that are subdivided into four with the fields of the object of cognition 
(prameyam), its means (pramänam), and its agent (pramäta) .?’# 


The single nature of the self permeates its states as the object, means, and agent 
of cognition, these being one with emission, stasis, and withdrawal. They in turn 
are fourfold through their multiplication in each case in accordance with the na- 
ture of the self by the phases emission, stasis[, withdrawal], and [the withdrawal 
of withdrawal]. This fourfold expansion [in each], from emergence (#dayah) 
[through manifestation (avabhäsanam) and internalization (carvanam)] to the 
devouring of time (kälagräsah) has a single ground. Therefore, because these are 
the principal [aspects ofthe cycle], there are thirteen goddesses to be worshipped 
in the circle of the Nameless. 


25 Mahänayaprakä$a, f. 126r3-v4 (vv. 217-221): paräd *vyomno (conj. : yunmo Cod.) jharity 
eva sphuritänanda*ghürnitä (em. : ghürnnitäh Cod.) | yäkramaspandalahari vidyullekheva cañ- 
calä | 218 tasyà udayasamsthänasamhärodrekakalpanà | trividhà samakälena proditä kalano- 
hità | 219 taträpi *triprakärayäm kalpanäyäm (coni. : triprakäräkhyäkalpanäyà Cod.) samanta- 
tah | pratyekasah “svarñpe (conij. : svaräpo Cod.) hi srstyädikramasamiñake | 220 *caturärmi- 
citam (coni. [cf. Cidgaganacandrikä 174] : caturthormisitam Cod.) rüpam udyogädivibhedatah | 
evam dvisatkasamvittikramo bhäti nirävrtah | 221 srstikälyädibhedena prathito * navadhih (em. : 
ravadhih Cod.) parah | nirälambavikäsaikamahimä satatoditah. 

2760Id Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a, p.118, L. 11-12 on 10.7 (patteka saha antara dasa räji 
mülahade samya cukhanda | akkai ädideva *jagi [em. : jaga Ed.] bhäji todasa sattadasäksara 
canda [= Skt. pratyekam sahäntar dasä räjate mülahrade samyak catuskhandä | ekaivädidevi jagati 
bhräjate trayodasï saptadasäksaràä candi] ‘Within the primordial lake [of consciousness] an inner 
four-fold state shines in each of these [phases] by including [the others]. The Primordial God- 
dess, seventeen-syllable Candï, shines undivided throughout the world [that they manifest] as 
the thirteenth”): i# srstikramasya srstisthitisamhäränäkhyagarbhibhävabh. evam sthitisamhärayoh 
‘In this way the phase of emission incorporates emission, stasis, withdrawal, and the Nameless. 
Likewise stasis and withdrawal.’ 

277Vv. 173-175. 

278 Mahänayaprakä$a (Triv.) 9.15—18b: ekam svasvarüpam hi mänameya*pramätrtäh (em. [fol- 
lowing citation in Zäanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.128] : pramätrtah Ed.) | sargävatärasamhä- 
ra*mayir (em. [following the same citation] : mayair Ed.) äkramya vartate | 16 svasvarñpa- 
nugunyena pratyekam kalanävasät | srstisthityädibhedais ca caturdhä “tä api (em. [following the 
same citation] : api täh Ed.) sthitäh | 17 kälagräsäntam udayäc caturdhà *vibhavo (em. [fol- 
lowing the same citation] : vihito Ed.) hi yah | tasya vifräntir ekaiva tato devyas trayodasa | 18 
*anäkhyacakre (em. [following the same citation] : anyäkhyacakra Cod. : anäkhyacakra em. Ed.) 
prädhänyät pñjanïyatayà sthitäh. 


Alexis Sanderson 317 


This is exactly the schema found in Abhinavaguptas treatment of the twelve 
Kälis in his Zanträloka.”"” The substitution of this triad of cognition for the 
older triads of emission, stasis, and withdrawal, will, knowledge, and action, or 
Siva, Sakti, and the individual soul (narah) is indeed one of the most striking 
characteristics of his Trika exegesis. 

This was not the only work of the author of the Trivandrum Mahänaya- 
prakä$a, though no other survives. He tells us here that he had written a com- 
mentary on the /Kramaljstotrabhattäraka [of Eraka] #° and, while outlining the 
hierarchy of the means of Liberation, that he will restrict himself to expounding 
the course of Krama worship since the essentials of the higher method con- 
sisting simply of oral instruction in the Krama’s aphorisms have already been 
explained at length in another work. It is probable, though not certain, that 
this explanation was contained in another work by the same author.?#! 


I shall now duly reveal to some degree on the strength of [my ..] this process 
of worship that begins with the sequence of the Pitha, that embodies both se- 
quence and non-sequence, that is radiant with the tradition of the method of 
the successive phases of the expansion of the cycle [of cognition], lest this oral 
teaching of the Gurus should be lost with the passage of time, because the es- 
sentials of the method that consists solely in oral instruction in the aphorisms 
beginning with “It is [no sooner] seen [than] lost” have been expounded at 
length in another [work]. 


The Kramaviläsastotra 


One other work dealing directly with the Krama%s course of worship survives: 
the unpublished Xramaviläsastotra. ts author abjures identification, a usage 


27 Tanträloka 4.123c-125, 148-172. 

280 Mahänayaprakä$a (Triv.) 9.68-69: anyair ävarakatvena ye bhäväh parivarjitäh | tair eva 
jhäninäm ittham jàjvaliti parä citih | etadarthänusärena stotrabhattärake mayä | sphutam ye 
vivrtäh lokäs tat… “Thus the highest consciousness blazes up for the enlightened through the 
very entities that others have avoided as obscuring [consciousness]. The verses in the /Kramal]- 
stotrabhattäraka that I have clearly explained in accordance with this teaching ...”. The codex 
unicus of our text breaks off at this point. The expression Srotrabhattäraka is used for Eraka's 
Kramastotra elsewhere in this literature, e.g, in Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.223, 1. 11; Maha- 
rthamañjariparimala, p. 122, 1.20. 

281 Mahänayaprakä$a (Triv.) 1.35-36: drstanastädisamketakathämätrasya marma yat | tat pra- 
pañcitam anyatra yad atah sämpratam manäk | etat püjanam akramakramamayam pithakra- 
mopa*kramam (er. : kramah Ed.) cakrolläsavibhägayuktighatanäsat*sampradäyojivalam (em. : 
sampradäyojivalah Ed) | *mä gäl luptim (em. : mä gäl luptam Ed.) ihedr$am gurumukham käla- 
kramäd ity atah samyak "TT" navasäd asmäbhir unmilyate. 


318 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


seen elsewhere in the literature of the Krama, referring to himself simply as 
“someone”? In its opening verse the work offers homage to the whole course 
of worship in all its phases and constituents as the dynamic aspects as the sin- 
gle void of consciousness, then to the void alone, then to the four aspects of 
worship, namely the tasting of the sacramental substances (caruh), the prac- 
tice of the sensual ritual (c4r4h, caryä), the esoteric Mudräs (mudrä), and the 
Mantras (r4vah),% and finally to each phase of the course of worship, up to 
that of the Nameless. In this course the text bears witness to a tradition that is 
not seen in the other texts discussed here. While in those the first phase, that 
of the Pitha, comprises worship of Uddiyäna, its cremation ground Karavira, 
its Ksetrapala, the Assembly, and the Great Sacrifice, here it comprises only 
four elements: worship of the Pitha, the cremation ground, the Ksetrapäla, and 
Manñgalä as the revealer of the Krama.28% Moreover, while this phase is followed 


282 Kramaviläsastotra, f.102r5-v1 (v.27 [last]): itham etad adhigamya kenacit svastutir 
*visayavrndabhävanä (conij. : visayandabhävanä Cod.) | yena vifvam anifam $iväsivaprojihita- 
kramaviläsasamstutam. frikramaviläsastotram samäptam iti. 

283 Kramavilasastotra, .98v4—99v1 (vv. 3-7): sarvasarvamayasarvacarvanenäpi yasya jagatäm 
na trpyate | tam carum “hrtacaräcaroccayam (con. : hatacaräcarocccare Cod.) cärucarvanacitim 
namämy aham | 4 bhäti yayà “satatam (conj. : fatam Cod.) sphuradarcir bhäsurakäntir 
*ayam (corr. : iyam Cod.) *sumahägnih (su conj. : sa Cod.) | #äm api *samhrtavisvaviläsäm 
(samhrta em. : samhata Cod.) naumi nijäm asamäm iha caryäm | 5 yena ghattitam idam 
jagat*trayam (conij. : trayäc Cod.) *cärucäracaturäkulakramam (cärucära em. : cäracäru Cod.) | 
*visvabhäsurakulakramena (bhäsura conj. : mäsuma Cod.) tam *rävam asmi (conj. : rävara$mi 
Cod.) satatam samänatah | G vyomni yo jhatiti naiva “laksyate (corr. : laksate Cod.) naiva cäpi 
(+) tadujjhitakramät | tam *vibhinnasakaläkalärgalam (rgalam coni. : regalà Cod.) naumi mau- 
dram atiraudram ädarät | 7 yatra vi$vam idam akramakramaprakramena *hrdi (conj. : hati 
Cod.) samcaraty alam | tam “caräcarasamuccayärcisam (conj. : carävarasamuccayorcciyäm Cod.) 
naumi râvam atirävacaryayä. On these four aspects see Cidgaganacandrikä 73 and Mahärtha- 
mañjariparimala, p.106, Il. 11-20. 

284 Kramaviläsastotra, f. 99v1—-100r1 (vv. 8-11): yatra *mürtimadamürtimatkramavyutkramo- 
dayavirämabhäsuram (amürtimatkrama conj. : amürttimakra Cod. e bhäsuram conj. : bhäsurä 
Cod.) | bhati *rafmicaya*cakram akramam (conj. : makramakramam Cod.) naumi pitham 
iha tam niräsrayam | 9 *sarvasamhrtimahänalänale (samhrti conij. : samhati Cod.) yatra visvam 
idam eti bhasmasä(t) | tac chmasänam iha bhisanolbanam rävasamkulamahäcitim numah | 10 
yo *mahänalamaricivisphuratsphärahärakabalotkato ‘kramät (visphurat conj. : visphura Cod. e 
härakabalotkato ‘kramät conj. [see the citation of the Mantra of the K%/kulakramärcana in 
footnote 286 on p.319, in which the Ksetrapäla is named Mahäsamhärabalotkata] : säraka- 
balotkatakramät Cod.) | tam $masäna*vasatim sphuradrucim (conj. : tat $masänavasatesphurad- 
rutih Cod.) ksetrapälam *aham (em. : iham Cod.) ugram “änatah (em. ännatah Cod.) | 11 
Yasyäh sphuraty esa (corr. : yasyäsphurattesa Cod.) mahä*maricih (em. : marici Cod.) samhära- 
cakrakramanena rävah | niruttarajñänakrtävabhäsäm $rimañgaläm asmi *samänatas (corr. : 


Alexis Sanderson 319 


there by the worship of the five flows or voids (pañcavähacakram, khapañcaka- 
cakram), the twelve rays of the prakäacakram, the sixteen of the 4nandacakram, 
the seventeen of the mwärticakram, and the sixty-four of the vrndacakram, here 
the arrangement differs: after the first the märticakram precedes the prakä$a- 
cakram and änandacakram: it is extended by the worship of an amürticakram 
seen nowhere else; and between the Zrandacakram and the vrndacakram wor- 
ship of the Guru is inserted.?% This approximates the course of worship set out 
by Vimalaprabodha in his K%/kulakramärcana on the basis of the Kä/ïkula- 
kramasadbhäva. That lacks the amürticakram but has the mürticakram precede 
the prakäsacakram and änandacakram: it gives the same four constituents in the 
worship of the Pitha, though it adds a fifth element after them, the [Bhairaval] 
who embodies Mahäkalrs weapon-Mantra;256 and it prefaces the first phase of 
the worship of the vrndacakram, that of the sixteen Jhänasiddhäs, with that of 
Mañgalä, who is indeed the Krama’s Guru, being the source of Jhänanetra*s 
revelation.#” The worship of the mürticakram before the prakäsacakram and 


samännatas Cod.) täm. 

285 Kramaviläsastotra, f. 98v1-3 (v.1): yat kham pañcamahämaricikhacitam “cäturyacarya- 
ñcitam (caryä conj. : caccä Cod.) mürtämürtamahäprakäsasahitam $ridvädasäkuñcitam | 
ftamkalyamvapufra$misodasavrtam vrndakramälamkriam $ripithäñkamahämasäna*nilayam 
(conj. : nicayam Cod.) vande mahaughäñkitam; and f.100r1-101r1 (vv. 12-18): yädyana- 
batahatojjhitakramä (kramä em. : krama Cod.) pañcadhä jagati rävabhästhitih | naumi 
*pañcavidharasmipäjanaprakramaprasarasähasena täm (pñjana conj. : päjanam Cod.) | 13 
yatra süryasasivahni*täpakavyäpako (conj. : täpakävyäpako Cod.) layalayo (conj. : bhaya- 
bhayo Cod.) viräjate | rafmicakrafnicayoghanähatämt mürticakram amalam namämi *tat 
(corr. : im Cod.) | 14 yasya maricicayasya samastavyastavikäsa*niräsaghanasrih (em. : nira- 
faghana$ri Cod.) | bhäty anukhandam “udagram ajam tac (conj. : adusramajänta Cod.) 
cakram amürtimalam pranato ‘ham | 15 yasyà sà jagati sarvagà “thitir bhäti (em. : sthi- 
tibhiti Cod.) nityam aviluptavigraham | tan namämi varapithasamsthitam dvädasäbham iha 
rasmimandalam | 16 yäbhir asya jagato nirantaränugrahakramavidhir vidhïryate | Suddhabo- 
dhavibhavaprabhäbhidhäs “tä (em. : tan Cod.) namäni *gharintr visärinih (em. : gharinivisä- 
rint Cod.) | 17 *yam (conj. : yo Cod.) vilokya sabhayäbhayabhrama(h) Säntim eti sahasaiva 
satkramah | tam gurum sadasadädikalpanäniraräsivadavänalam numah | 18 jñänamantra- 
va(ra) melakollasacchäktasämbhavaviläsacaryayä | vrndacakram iha yat sthitam sadä pañcava- 
hbamayara$mi naumi *tat (em. : täm Cod.). 

286 Kälikulakramärcana, f. Sx3—S: pürvottaramandale HRiM $RIM HÜM ODDIYANAPITHAPADA 
madhye. HRIM $RIM HÜM MAHAPRADIPTICAKRESVARISRIMANGALADEVI AMBAPADA pürve. 
HRIM $RIM HÜM MAHAKARAVIRASMASANAPADA dakse. HRIM $RIM HÜM MAHÂSAMHÂRABALO- 
TKATAKSETRAPALANATHAPADA #ftare. HJSRAUM MAHAKALIKASTRAPADA pascime. 

287 Kälikulakramärcana, f. 8r3-v1: sodasajñänasiddhacakrapäjävidhih. yathä pascime mandale 
(0) HRiM $RIM *MAHAMANGALA-AMBÂPADA (em. : mahämandalä-ambäpäda Cod.). (1) HRim 
$RIM SAUNDINI-AMBAPADA pürve. (2) HRIM $RIM JYESTHÂ-AMBAPADA. (3) HRIM $RIM KANDUKI- 


320 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


änandacakram is also seen in the Mahärthamañjari of the South Indian Säkta 
Mahesvaränanda.°#® 

These facts are not sufficent to show that the text is not Kashmirian, since 
we know from the *Kramavamsävali that there were Kashmirian Krama lin- 
eages whose procedure was based like that of this text on the X%/kulakrama- 
sadbhäva* However, it must be said that there is no certainty that it is a 
product of this region, even though the phraseology of the text makes this very 
probable, ?°° 


Krama works. 


as does its presence in a Nepalese codex with other Kashmirian 
291 


AMBÂPADA agnau. (4) HRIM $RIM PATTAKI-AMBÂPADA. (5) HRIM $RIM KÜRMA-AMBÂPADA daksine. 
(6) HRiM $RIM DHAMANI-AMBAPADA. (7) HRIM $RIM GANDHAKÂARINI-AMBAPADA nairrte. (8) 
HRIM $RIM MÂTANGI-AMBÂPADA. (9) HRIM $RIM CAMPAKA-AMBÂPADA pascime. (10) HRIM $RIM 
KAIVARTINI-AMBAPADA. (11) HRIM $RIM MATTAKAMINI-AMBAPADA väyavye. (12) HRIM $RIM 
SUTYAKA-AMBAPADA. (13) HRIM $RIM BHAKSAKI-AMBAPADA wftare. (14) HRIM $RIM NABHAKSAKI- 
AMBAPADA. (15) HRIM $RIM $SRAUTIKA-AMBAPADA $äne. (16) HRIM $RIM RÜPIKA-AMBAPADA. 

288 Mahärthamañjari 37cd: sattadaha phälanette väraha ccholaha a annanettesum (= Skt. sap- 
tada$a phälanetre dvädasa soda$a cänyanetrayoh) ‘Seventeen in the eye in the forehead, twelve 
and sixteen in the other two eyes’. On which he comments (-parimala, p.87, IL. 6-7): phälo 
lalätam. tadgate netre saptadasa $aktayah. tac ca mürticakram ity ämnäyate ‘The phälah is the 
forehead. In the eye thereon there are seventeen powers, and this is called the märticakram. 

289 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p. 192, IL. 3-6: srikramasadbhävädikasästräsayatas ca patrika atra | 
$ristotrakärabhäskarakuladharapürväsu samtatisu ‘Authorizations in these lineages that descend 
from [Eraka] the venerable author of the /Kramajstotra, Bhäskara, and Kuladhara follow the 
doctrine of the Kramasadbhaäva and [related texts]’. 

20Note, eg, (1) yat kham pañcamahämaricikhacitam (f.98v1, v.la); cf. Bhuvana- 
mälinikalpavisamapadavivrti, f. 1312-13: svabhävamayanänävidhollekhamaricikhacitam; (2) 
câturyacaryäncitam (£. 98v1, v. la); cf. Kälïkulakramasadbhäva qu. in Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, 
p.190, IL 12-15: kramatrayänäm yac cakram ghoraghorataram mabat | kälarñpam *maricyä- 
dhyam (conj. : maricyädyam Cod.) tvästram kalpäntakäntagam | äcaret tu mahäcäracätu- 
ryenaiva tatra ca | yà kalä ghoraghorogrä tasyäh sà turyagä $ivä; — Kramastotra qu. Tantra- 
lokaviveka, vol. 2, p.188, IL 1—4: kramatrayatvästramaricicakrasamcäracäturyaturtyasattäm:; 
Räjatarañgini 7.279: mahäsamayasamcäracaturair yair abhititah | ganyate svaprabhävograir 
bhairavo ‘pi na nirbhayaih:; (3) cärucäracaturäkulakramam (£. 99r2, v. 5b); cf. Jñänakriyädvaya- 
fataka, . 4V2-3 (v.20cd): éaccärucaryà kathanam samkrämah spar$a äntarah; (4) anähata- 
batojjhitakramät (£. 100r1-2); cf. Prabodha, As#ika, f. 97r12, v. Scd: naumi vägvibhavamantra- 
mätaram tväm anähatabatojjhitäm fiväm; Mahänayaprakä$a (Triv.) 7.147ab: äkrsya ghattayaty 
uccair anähatahatojjhitah. 

21See p.435. 


Alexis Sanderson 321 


The Khacakrapañcakastotra 


In addition to this we have one other surviving but unpublished Krama text 
that evidences a course of worship that deviates from the norm seen in the ma- 
jor Kashmirian sources, though in this case the evidence is indirect. This is the 
Khacakrapañcakastotra, the ‘Hymn to the Five Voids’. Written in the scriptural 
register of Sanskrit it is declared in its colophon to have been an oral transmis- 
sion originating in Oddiyänapitha from “all the Yoginis” of that sacred site.??? 
A narrative that precedes the hymn itself tells us that the occasion of the hymn's 
creation and first transmission was, exactly as in the Krama scriptures’ account 
of their revelation, the “Great Assembly” (mahämeläpah) of Yoginis in the Kara- 
vira cremation ground.** Here too, as in the Kashmirian post-scriptural texts, 
they are led by Mañgalä, but they are one hundred and seventy rather than 
the sixty-four of the standard account. Five sets of seventeen assemble in five 
circles (bhäsäcakram, khecakram, dikcakram, gocakram, and bhücakram) corre- 
sponding to the Five Voids of the title, thus eighty-five in total, presided over by 
the five goddesses that govern these Voids (Vyomesr, Khecarï, Dikcarï, Gocari, 
and Bhücari). From these arises a second set of eighty-five, the first set in the 
sky (the khacakram) and the second on the earth (the bhäcakram).?%% After they 


22 Khacakrapañcakastotra Ms À, f. 89v3—4 (colophon): ii $ri-oddiyänapithavinirgatam sarva- 
yoginipranitam mukhänmukhavirnirgatam mahärthakramajñänärtham $rikhacakrapañcakasto- 
tram samäptam. 

23 Khacakrapañcakastotra Ms B, f.lv (vv.7c-8): $ripitha uttaränta*sthe (conj. [Aia 
sandhi] : sthä Cod.) “astapithasamudbhaväh (asta em. : abja Cod.) | karavirasmasäne 
tu ckacakrasamägatäh | mahämeläpamilitä yägakridotsave sthitäh (yägakridotsave em. : 
yogakridätsavai Cod.) ‘In the venerable Pitha of the north [the Yoginis] originating from 
the eight Pithas came together in a single circle in the Karavira cremation ground. Joining 
in the Great Assembly they participated in the celebration of the Great Sacrifice’. In sup- 
port of the emendation “astapitha- for abjapitha- see Kälikulakramasadbhäva, £. 2V1 (1.53- 
55b): astau pithäs tu ye proktäh sarvapithesu cottamäh | tatrasthäs tu imäh sarvä äga(tä)s 
tu svabhävatah | astäv astagunä divyäh svabhäva*darsanotsukäh (conj. : dasatsukäh Cod.) | 
catubsasti(r) mahäbhimäh sarva*viresanäyaka (em. : sarvvavirepranäyaka Cod.) | mahä*yage 
(em. : yogai Cod.) tu vai rudra udyuktä(s) tu vidhänatah; and — Sitikantha, Mahänayaprakäsa 
9.2: asta pitha astav astagune astäste *cuhasta (em. GRIERSON [1929, $ 64] : cuasta Ed.) ma- 
baugha. 

2%The variant scheme is driven by the multiplication of the five levels, shared with the stan- 
dard model of the 64 Säkinis of the vrndacakram, by seventeen, that being the number of the 
sounds in the nine-syllable Vidyä of Kälasamkarsini (KHPHREM MAHÂCANDAYOGESVAR —MA- 
E-KHA-PHA-RA-MA-HA-CA-NA-DA-YA-O-GA-E-$A-VA-R); cf. Devidvyardhasatikä f. 8v4-5 (vv.91c- 
92b): kule tam navadhä yojya kaule saptadasäksarà | navavarnavibhedena jñeyà sà sodasädhika. 
For the name of each Yoginiï in each subset of seventeen in the first eighty-five begins with one 


322 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


have sung their hymn the eighty-five in the sky dissolve, leaving the remaining 
eighty-five to transmit it to Bhairava. 

It is probable that this too is a product of Kashmir. For in spite of its scrip- 
tural style and consequent deviations from the grammar of the most learned 
Sanskrit, its opening verses venerate not only Mangalä but also Jñänanetra- 
nätha.?6 Moreover, the hymn contains two sets of goddesses attested to my 


knowledge only in Kashmirian Saiva tradition.??” 


of the seventh sounds. At the centre of these eighty-five is their leader (cakranäyikä), the god- 
dess Mañgalä, associated with the culminating M [MA-] of the first kHPHREM. From her flows all 
authority through initiation in the Krama (adhikärah): pañcäsitis tu *khecakram (corr. : kham 
cakram) tanmadhye cakranäyikà | mañgaläkhyä tu ya devt sädhikärakart tu sà (ms À, f.76v1-2, 
v. 40). 

25 Khacakrapañcakastotra Ms À, f. 87r4-1 (vv.146—47): evam stutvä mahävidyà yoginyah 
sarvapithajäh | dviprakärakramodbhütäh pañcasaptadasotthitä(h) | prathamäs cakrasambhatäh 
stutim krivä layam gatäh | aparäh pañcacakrasthà bhairavasya prakäsitam. 

26 Khacakrapañcakastotra Ms B, f.1v3—4 (v.3): samarasapadalino nihsvabhävaikavirah 
Yamitasakalabhävo (Samita corr. : samita Cod. e bhävo corr. : bhäve Cod.) jñänadrstiprakäsah | 
viditaparamatattvo labdhavijñänasaukhyo rasitaparamabodho jñänanetr*äkhyanäthah (em. : 
äthyanätha Cod.) ‘The Nätha Jñananetra has merged with the level where all experience is 
one. He is the solitary Hero of that beyond essence, he in whom all phenomena have been 
brought to silence, radiant with the vision of his gnosis, who has realized the ultimate real- 
ity, who has attained the bliss of understanding, who has relished the highest enlightenment. 
The term #ihsvabhäva- ‘without self-hood’, so familiar in Mahäyänist literature, is much used 
in the Krama. See, e.s., Kä/kulakramasadbhäva, Ÿ. 915 (3.93cd): nihsvabhävam niraupamyam 
nirlaksyam nihprayojanam; Kälikulapañcasataka À, {. 5r2-3 (2.6ab): nihsvabhävasvabhävam ca 
dvaitädvaitavivariitam: Yonigahvara, f. 7r1-2 (v. 88): etat svarñpam kalthiltan ni(h)svabhävam 
svabhävagam | kälinäm paramam güdham mahävyomäntabhäsakam; Kaulasätra {. 2v5: bhäva- 
bhütasamvidäm ante nibsvabhävatäparyavasänam; Chummäsamketaprakäsa, £. 5v4-5 (v.73ab): 
akulam gurubhih proktam nihsvabhävam sadoditam. 

27Thus Khacakrapañcakastotra Ms À, f.75r5-v2 (vv. 130-131b): maricijväladhümräbhe ra- 
pane *täpanadyuti (conj. : täpane dyuti Cod.) | “*päcani (corr. : päcant Cod.) havyavähe ca 
(corr. : havyaväjña ca Cod.) *tejobhäsi (conij. : tejobhäpi Cod.) namo ‘tu te | Satadhäme maha- 
dhäme visvadhäme tamontike. These are the twelve solar Saktis worshipped in the Kashmirian 
Sivadipasräddha as the retinue of Samkarsanadevi (= Kälasamkarsani), with the exception that 
there we have Padmagarbhä rather than Vi$vadhämaä (Karmakända, vol. 4, pp.416-7; phot. 
reprod. in CHANDRA 1984, pp. 237d-238a): Marici, Jvälini, Dhümrä, Tapini, Täpinï, Päcini, 
Havyavähä, Tejovati, Satadhämaä, *Sudhämä (corr. : svadhämäyai Ed.), Padmagarbhä, and 
Tamopahä. The Jayadrathayämalaprastäramantrasamgraha gives this same set as the retinue of 
the Mata goddess Ardhacakreévari whose Kalpa is taught in Jayadrathayämala, Satka 2, #. 87r8-— 
88v9 (Patala 17), giving the Mantra of the central goddess as HAM RJHRÈM DHAMANTAKÂLI SAH 
and those of the twelve surrounding her in the same form, but substituting the twelve vowels in 
order (4 to Ü, E to AU, AM, and AH) for the ï of RJHRIM and the names in place of DHÂMANTAKALI 


Alexis Sanderson 323 


The Bhävopahärastotra and its Commentary 


Other Kashmirian works survive that, though they tell us nothing concerning 
the details of the Krama worship, are nonetheless imbued with or influenced 
by the Krama: the Bhavopahäravivarana of Ramyadeva, son of Jyogdeva,?”® the 
Sivarätrirahasya, also called Sivarätrinirnaya, of Upädhyäya Sivasvämin II, and 
the anonymous /ñänakriyädvayasataka. 

As for the first, the author of the hymn on which it comments, Bhattäraka 


Cakrapäninätha,*”” was, like Cakrabhänu, Int, and Jaiyaka, a Mahävratin, as 
he himself declares: °°° 


Supreme Lord, witness of all, accept [this] hymn from me whose thoughts are 
free of pride, disdain, and possessiveness, whose head is [now] placed on the 
throne that is your feet, my body covered with ash, a human skull in my hand. 
A nameless (ka cit) ascetic has composed [this] transcendent hymn of the inner 
worship of Sambhu, lord of the wheel of consciousness, after retiring to [the 
cremation ground,] the grove of the Mahäpäsupatas. 


and:?01 


followed by + KALAKALI (FF. 18v7—19r3: HAM RJHRAM MARICIKALAKALI SAH etc.). 

The hymn also invokes the two sets of four goddesses that are held in the Kashmirian tradi- 
tion to be Saktis of the central deity of the Daksinasrotas (Bhairava) and Vämasrotas (Tumburu) 
respectively (v.135cd, 137ab): siddhe suske *kajäbhe ca (con). : kajäbhäve Cod.) utpaläkhye 
namo Stu te | jaye ca vijaye devi jayantï câparäjite. The third goddess of the first set of four is 
Raktä ‘the Red” in all other sources. My emendation £ajäbhe ca gives a synonym ‘She who has 
the colour of the red lotus’. I have accepted as an Aiéa licence the reading jayanti where gram- 
mar requires the vocative, since jayanti would be unacceptable, creating a completely iambic 
posterior Päda. For evidence that the first of these sets and its combination with the other are 
peculiarly Kashmirian see SANDERSON 2005b, pp. 287-281. 

28 The name of his father is seen only in the colophon. Ramyadeva identifies himself and his 
teacher in the closing verse of the commentary. 

29For his title Bhattäraka, denoting a $aiva ascetic with authority over others, see 
Ramyadevas commentary, p.2, 1. 11 (bhattärakapädäh). The name Cakrapäni is not found 
in the hymn itself but is given by Ramyadeva, who finds it alluded to in the hymn%s last verse 
in ciccakranäthasya ‘lord of the wheel of consciousness’, stating that the author is thereby sug- 
gesting his identity with the object of his worship (Bhävopahäravivarana, p.44, IL. 3-5). 

300 Bhävopahärastotra, vv. 46-47: stotram grhäna paramesvara visvasäksin mänävamänamama- 
tojjhitacittavrtteh | mattas tvadañghriyugapithanilinamauler bhasmävagunthitatanor nrkapäla- 
pâneh | 47 mahäpäsupatodyäne ka$cid viframya täpasah | cakre ciccakranäthasya fambhor bhäva- 
nutim paräm. 

301 Bhävopahärastotra, v. 6: tvatpädäbjarajahpütacitäbhasmavibhäsitat | grhäna mattah $ri- 
kantha bhävapüjäm akrtrimäm. 


324 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Srikantha, accept this true mental worship from me who am adorned with the 
ash of funeral pyres that has been purified by the pollen of your lotus feet. 


His hymn addresses Siva and has no explicit Krama content. Nonetheless, there 
are elements of double meaning within its three opening verses of obeisance 
(ramaskäraslokäh) that reveal that the author was indeed writing within this 
tradition: 


(1) Obeisance to Bhava, the bestower of Liberation who withdraws the body of 
Time through the array of the [twelve] solar powers (säryakaläjäla-), enthroned 
(-pithäya) on (/whose Pitha comprises) both the throne and the enthroned. (2) 
Obeisance to Siva, who garlanded with the lotuses that are the [sixteen] powers 
[latent] in the new moon embodies the highest bliss (-Zranda-), whose form is 
unmanifest (/in whom the wärtih is withdrawn) (avyaktamürtaye). (3) Obei- 
sance to Hara, the supreme self who manifests the mass of the bonds, immerses 
himself within them, dissolves them, and remains concealed in the innermost 
core of Mantra. 


I propose that this alludes to the phases of the Krama% course of worship: those 
of the Pitha, the five Flow Goddesses that are its basis (pañcavähacakram), the 
twelve solar powers of the circle of Illumination (prakä$acakram), the sixteen 
lunar powers of the circle of Bliss (4randacakram), the circle of Embodiment, 
that is to say, of the re-emergent ego (w#rticakram), and its resorption [into 
the circle of the Multitude (vrndacakram), and, in the third verse, the four 
phases of Emission, Stasis, Withdrawal, and the Nameless. Ramyadeva does 
not offer this interpretation but he does read the work as a text of the Krama, 
finding its doctrines wherever his ingenuity and the resources of the flexible 
Indian ars interpretandi permit him to do so. Indeed he takes the very concept 
of the hymn, as an expression of worship in which the acts and offerings of the 
external cult are translated into mental enactments of immersion in the deity 


(bhävapäjà), to be grounded in the Krama%s tradition of oral instruction:*°? 


302 Bhävopahäravivarana, p.2, I. 1-12: ha hi niruttaranirniketanävata*vitañkälamkavalita- 
sakalakalpanäkulaparamabhaïravasatattvam (em.  vitañkasamkalitasakalakalanäkula Ed.) 
aväcyaväcakam “avarnanirvarnam (em. : avarnanirvarnanam Ed.) “anädyantam anantar- 
bahiräpam (em. : anädyanantam antarbahiräpam Ed.) apüjyapüjakam api prasaradädyod- 
yantriävatärakramävatäritapañcavähamayäkrtrimapüjyapäjakakramena *protsphuratity (em. : 
protsphuratiti ritir Ed.) avigitamukhasampradäyasaranisamanugatà sarvägamäntarghumaghumä- 
yamänà Srivijñänabhairavädisu svakanthenaiva bhagavatä nirnïtà frisvatantrabhattärakädisu ca 
akrtvà mänasam yägam ityädiväkyair dhvanitä mänasayägänatirekint (em. : mänasayägätirekini 
Ed.) sarvabhävopahrtih. täm eva bhattärakapädäh stotramukhena prakatayanta ädislokenä- 
säcayanti. The emendation to -alamkavalitasakalakalpanäkulaparamabhairava- is prompted by 
Sivasätravimarsini, p.18, 1. 11-12: sakalakalpanäkulälamkavalanamayatväc ca bhairavah. For 
Ramyadevas dependence on the passage see footnote 315 on p. 327. 


Alexis Sanderson 325 


The highest Bhairava cannot be transcended, is beyond all contexts, and with- 
out imprint in the abyss of his being, having completely swallowed the manifest 
world of every constructive cognition. Being void of signs and what they signify, 
being free of both of the sounds of speech and of that which transcends them, 
being without beginning or end, interior or exterior, [the primordial ground] 
that he constitutes is untouched for us by [the artificial (krtrimah) relation of] 
the worshipped and the worshipper. Nonetheless it does manifest itself as a 
natural and spontaneous (4krtrimah) process of [interaction between itself as] 
worshipped and itself as] worshipper when it takes the form of the various un- 
foldings of the Five Flows [embodied in the order of Krama worship], these be- 
ing brought into play as the actively flowing state of primordial energetic agency 
surges up [within it]. The ‘offering up of all phenomena’ [which gives the work 
its title] is in line with this established oral teaching. It resonates indistinctly in 
all the Saiva scriptures, [but] is openly taught in such as the Vijñänabhairava, 
and evoked in such as the Suacchanda in statements such as ‘Unless he first does 
mental worship .….”.%% Intending to clarify through his hymn this process of 
offering up all phenomena [into $Siva], which is none other than that mental 
worship, the venerable Bhattäraka alludes to it in his first verse. 


His position as an exponent of the Krama is also apparent in his cita- 
tions of the works of others. These, apart from three quotations from Räjänaka 
Utpaladeva, one from the Saiddhäntika Kälottara,Ÿ® and one from the Span- 
dakärikä of Kallata, #6 are from works of the Krama Gurus Eraka, Hrasvanäatha 
(Vämanadatta), Cakrabhänu, and Prabodhanätha,°” and from the Kälikula- 


38He alludes to Vijanabhairava, vv. 1-16, ending evamvidhe pare tattve kah püjyah kas ca 
trpyati ‘In a supreme reality of that nature who is there that can receive päjä offerings and who 
that can be gratified lin the fire of sacrifice]? 

304 Svacchanda 3.32c-33b: akrtvä mänasam yägam yo nyam yägam samärabhet | afivah sa 
tu vijñeyo na moksäya vidhïyate ‘Know that anyone who undertakes the other{, external] wor- 
ship without having first done mental worship is not a $iva and [therefore] is not fit to attain 
liberation’. 

3% Bhävopahäravivarana, p.16, 1113-16 (= Sivastoträvali 16.29); p.26, IL14-17 
(= Sivastoträvali 13.16); p. 43, IL. 16-17 (not known); p. 30, IL. 3-4; p. 30, IL. 3-4 (= Sardhatri- 
fatikälottara 1.6c—-7b). 

306 Bhävopahäravivarana, p.30, 1. 14 (= Spandakärikä 2.1a in Ksemaräja's numeration). 

307(1) Kramastotra (Bhävopahäravivarana, p.3, 1.14, citing Päda c of the verse on Maha- 
kälakäli without attribution; see Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p. 185, L. 15); (2) Suabodhodayama- 
ñjart 19cd (Bhävopahäravivarana, p.19, 1.9 [unattributed]: buddhavat sarvarägi syät sarvadvesyo 
tha bhairavah); (3) Sripithadvädasikà (Bhävopahäravivarana, p. 43, citing v. 3cd without attri- 
bution), and (4) an unnamed hymn by the ascetic Prabodhanätha (Bhävopahäravivarana, p. 10, 
IL 5-8). 


326 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


based scripture Väjasaneya.°® 
He also includes passages from his Advayadvädasikä,*® six otherwise un- 


known works by himself, some of whose titles and contents reveal their Krama 


510 and one from an unnamed work by his unnamed son, which also 


311 


context, 
pertains to the Krama. 

At the end of the work he declares that he has received empowerment from 
the Pitheévaris, and that this occurred through oral transmission from his Guru 
Yogänanda,*!? à remark that reveals that initiatory empowerment in the Krama 
was seen as the re-enactment of the original revelation in Uddiyäna and that the 
lineage of Krama Gurus was perceived as an internally undifferentiated stream 
of consciousness multiple from generation to generation only in outward ap- 
pearance. Thus in his penultimate verse he can say: 


I bow to the line of Gurus, the sole cause of salvation, the expansive circle of 
the rays [of enlightenment] that has come from that whose form is beyond 
perception.?1? 


308Quoted in Bhävopahäravivarana, p. 6, I. 9-12 (väjasaneyabhattärikäyam api). That this 
scripture is a work of the Kälikula or of one greatly influenced by it appears from two 
verses cited from it by Ksemaräja in his Svasürravimarsini, pp. 136, 1. 13-137, L.3: tathà 
ca Sriväjasaneyäyäm: ya sà $aktih parä süksmä vyäpini nirmalä $iva | $akticakrasya janani 
paränandämrtätmikà | mahäghoresvari candä srstisamhärakärikà | trivaham trividham tristham 
balät kälam prakarsati. The last line is evidently a semantic analysis ofthe name Kälasamkarsant. 
Cf. Paryantapañcäsikà 42: trivaham tripatham tristham kälam sà karsati svatah | bahis tatas cät- 
maniti friparà kälakarsini. See also the Kälikula-based Trika text Deyäyämala paraphrased in 
Tanträloka 15.335c-338 and the direct citation by Jayaratha on that passage (Tanträlokaviveka, 
vol. 9, p. 169, L. 18): s& graset trividham kälam kälasamkarsint tathà. 

30Cited in p.41, Il. 13-16. This work, under the variant title Paramärthadvädasikä has been 
wrongly attributed to Abhinavagupta; see RAGHAvAN 1980, pp. 76-77. 

3101) Akulakälikätrimsikä: p. 8, IL. 5-8 (L. 9: ityädyasmadviracitäkula*kälikätrimsikokta- (ka- 
likä em. : kaulikà Ed.), p. 38, Il. 14-7; (2) Akramakallolakärikä: p. 4; (3) Krtäntatäntisäntistava: 
p.41, IL 8-11; (4) Cakresvarabhairavästaka: p.29, IL. 3-6; (5) Sivaravastotra: pp. 10, 17-11, L. 2; 
and (6) Sivarätrivicaravärtika: p. 34, IL. 14. 

31 Bhävopahäravivarana, p. 6, I. 4-7, on the sequence-transcending goddess (kr$4) enthroned 
above Siva. 

32 Bhävopahäravivarana, p.44, IL 10-13: yogänandäbhidhänadvijavaravadanäyaätapithesi- 
devipädävadyotitäjñäpranayanajanitänantasotsähaharsah | stotre bhävopahäre vivaranam akarod 
ramyadevo dvijanmä janmädyäyäsabhañgapravanamatilasatsadrahasyopadesah ‘This commen- 
tary on the Bhävopahärastotra has been composed by the brahmin Ramyadeva, in whose mind 
intent on putting an end to the torments of birth and [death] the true secret instructions are 
radiant, in whom joy of endless vigour has arisen from his practice of the empowerment re- 
vealed by the venerable Pitheévari goddesses, which has been passed on to him from the lips of 
Yogänanda, the foremost of brahmins’. 

31 Bhävopahäravivarana, p. 44, IL. 6-9: adrstavigrahägatam maricicakravistaram | anugrahai- 


Alexis Sanderson 327 


and the first three aphorisms of the Krama-based Kaulasütra can declare to the 
same effect: 


(1) There is but one Guru, the uninterrupted transmission of the rays [of en- 
lightened consciousness] passed on to us through the initiatory lineage (ovallih). 
(2) There is but one deity, the reality that they have perceived. (3) The power 


of its consciousness is nothing but the state of [their] innate self-awareness.° 14 


As for the date of Ramyadeva we can deduce from his citations of other au- 
thors that he was later than Prabodhanätha, who, as a pupil of Cakrabhänu, is 
likely to have been active around 975. However there are elements in his termi- 
nology and phrasing that suggest strongly that he knew the works of Ksemaräja 
and is therefore unlikely to have been active before the eleventh century.*!° 
About his Guru Yogänanda we know nothing more, though it is conceivable 
that he is identical with the person ofthis name whom Abhinavagupta has listed 


among his teachers.?16 It has been claimed that Ramyadeva is identical with the 


kakäranam namämy aham gurukramam. 

F4 Kaulasñtra, f. \v4: avicchinnam ovallikramäyätamaricisamkrämanam evaiko guruh | tad- 
upalabdham eva tattvam eko devah | tasyaikä sahajähambhävabhümis cicchaktih. Cf. the South 
Indian Maheévaränandas Pädukodaya quoted in his Mahärthamañjariparimala, pp. 15-16, es- 
pecially p. 15, 11. 21-23: 54 ca svabhäväd ekah sann aneka iva bhäsate | ärabhya mañgalädiptisi- 
vänandädikam kramam | ambänäthapadädhyäsät päramparyena pjyate ‘And this though really 
one appears to be many and is worshipped sequentially beginning with the series that begins 
with Mañgalädipti and $ivänanda [- Jñänanetra] through the superimposition of the epithets 
-ambä [after feminine names] and -nätha [after masculine: HRiM $RIM MAHAMANGALADIPTI 
AMBÂPADA. HRIM $RIM SIVANANDANATHAPADA etc.]’. 

315The novel expression prasaradädyodyantriä (p.2, 1.4, in the passage cited in 
footnote 302 on p.324) echoes Ksemaräja, Sivasätravimarsini, p.50, 1.1: parapra- 
käsah akrtakodyantrtätmanoccärena dhävati prasarati ity arthah and p.18, IL 8-12: yo 
yam prasaradrüpäyà vimarfamayyà samvido jhagityucchalanätmakaparapratibhonmañjjanarüpa 
udyamah sa eva sarvasaktisamarasyena asesavisvabharitatvät sakalakalpanäkulälamkavalana- 
mayatväc ca bhairavo …. The passage in bold beginning sakala- has been adapted by Ramyadeva 
in the same passage; see here footnote 302 on p. 324. The first of the introductory verses speaks 
of the Bhairava who is consciousness (bodhabhairavah) being worshipped on all sides by the 
goddesses that are the sense-faculties (karanesvaryah). The expressions bodhabhairavah and its 
synonym cidbhairavah are a feature of the works of Abhinavagupta and Ksemaräja; see Mälinivi- 
jayavärtika \.42d (bodhabhairave); 2.147a (cidbhairava-); Tanträloka 1.123b (bodhabhairavab); 
4.23c: cidbhairavävesa-; Netroddyota on 10.14 (cidbhairava-); on 19.162 (cidbhairavanäthasya); 
Bhairavänukaranastotra 2a (cidbhairavam); 48b (cidbhairava); Svacchandoddyota, introducing 
8.1 (bodhabhairavasya); Mañgala verse of commentary on 11 (svacchando bodhabhairavah). 

#16 Tanträloka 37.60-62: *ämardasamtatimahärnavakarnadhärah saddaisikairakavarätmaÿa- 
vämanäthah (ämarda em. : änanda Ed.) | frinäthasamtatimahämbaragharmakäntih $ribha- 


328 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


scholar of that name who is mentioned as a contemporary by the Kashmirian 
poet Mañkha early in the twelfth century. Nothing excludes that date, but the 
identification rests on the name alone and is fatally undermined by the fact that 
Mañkha praises him not as a Saiva but as a master of the Vedänta who wrote a 
commentary on the Jstasiddhi [of Vimuktätman].°!” 


The Sivarätrirahasya of Sivasvämin Upädhyäya 


The Sivarätrirahasya of Sivasvämin, probably the Sivasvämin Upädhyäya [II] 
who was active during the reign of Ranjit Singh (1819-1839), gives an es- 
oteric reading of the deities, the various vessels and other ritual substrates, the 
offerings, and timing of the worship to be conducted by Kashmirians on the 
thirteenth lunar day of the dark fortnight of the month of Phälguna, the high 
point of the annual Sivarätri festival (hérath). The interpretation takes the outer 
elements of the ritual and translates them into symbols of structures in the body, 
senses and mind merging into and arising from $iva in union with the Goddess 
as the pure, dynamic consciousness that is the innermost ground of the wor- 
shipper’s awareness, making contemplation of these structures the power that 
animates and bestows efficacity on the outer processes. The Krama provides the 
symbolism of the cone-shaped Liñga of baked clay known as the sañé pôtul" in 
Kashmiri. Said here to be five-faced and termed the pañcaputtalaliñgam, its 
five faces are equated with (1) the five elements of the worship of the Pitha, 
from the Pitha itself, through the cremation ground (fmasänam), the Site- 
Guardian (Ksetrapäla), and the Assembly (meläpah) to the sacrifice (y4gah), 


tiräjatanayah svapitrprasädah | traiyambakaprasarasägarasäyisomänandätmajotpalajalaksmana- 
guptanäthah | turyäkhyasamtatimahodadhipürnacandrah *risaumatah (em. : frisomatah Ed.) 
sakalavit kila $ambhunäthah | $ricandrasarmabhavabhaktiviläsayogänandäbhinandasivasaktivi- 
citranäthäh | anye pi dharmasivavämanakodbhatasribhütesabhäskaramukhapramukhä maha- 
ntah (4) Vämanätha, son of the excellent Guru Eraka, [my] helmsman over the ocean of the 
[Saiddhäntika] Amardaka lineage, (2) the son of Bhütiräja, initiated by his father, [my] sun 
in the vast sky of the Srinätha lineage, (3) Laksmanaguptanätha, disciple of Utpala, the dis- 
ciple of Somänanda, [my Visnu] lying on the ocean of the lineage of Trayambaka. (4) the 
omniscient $Sambhunätha, disciple of Sumati[nätha], [my] full moon over the ocean of the 
Kaula lineage, (5) Candra$arman, (6) Bhavabhaktiviläsa, (7) Yogänanda, (8) Abhinanda, (9) Si- 
vaéakti, (10) Vicitranätha, and other great [scholars] such as (11) Dharmagiva, (12) Vämanaka, 
(13) Udbhatasri, (14) Bhüteéa, and (15) Bhäskaramukha’. On the emendation $rsaumatah for 
Srisomatah see SANDERSON 20052, pp. 132-133, footnote 106. 

#17 Srikanthacarita 25.32-33. The claim is Rasrocrs (1979:192-193). 

3180n his date see footnote 653 on p. 423. 


Alexis Sanderson 329 


(2) the five gross elements from ether to earth, (3) the five sense-objects from 
sound to odour, (4) the five Cause deities from Sadäéiva to Brahmi, (5) the 
five Krama goddesses Vameévari, Khecarï, Dikcarï, Samhärabhaksini/Gocari, 
and Raudraraudesvart, (6) the corresponding fives phases of cognition: initial 
urge (#dyamab), illumination (avabhäsanam), internalization (carvanam), the 
devouring of time (kälagräsah), and final quiescence (viräntih), and also (7) 
with five manifestations of each of the five material elements in the worship- 
per’s body.*!? The unacknowledged source on which the text is drawing is the 
chapter on the phase of the worship of the Pitha in the Trivandrum Mahänaya- 
prakäsa °° 


The Jñänakriyädvayasataka 


As for the third and last of these works, the /#%änakriyädvayasataka (A Hun- 
dred [Verses] on the Unity of Knowledge and Practice”), its subject, as its title 


5 Svarätrirahasya, f. 3118-19 (v. 84cd): pañcaputtalalingasya püjanärtho ‘yam iritah: f. 3v1- 
12 (vv. 89c-96): vimr$yam pañcadhà rüpam caitanyakulapañcake | 90 mrnmaye puttale dehe 
pañcadhätvam smrtam budhaih | prathamam pranavah pitham vyoma vämesvari tathä | 91 
sadäsivodyamau caiva pithadehah prakirtitah | tatah $rikhecart devi väyuh spar$o vabhäsanam | 
92 fvarah *käladäh*ätma (em. : ätmä Cod.) $masänam cintayed idam | prakäsänandarüpasya 
ksetrasya pariraksanät | 93 meläpayägayugmena ksetrapälo ‘bhidhiyate | rüpam $ridikcart tejo 
mahärudro ‘pi *carvanam (em. : darfanam Cod.) | 94 vyäptam “samhärabhaksinyä (samhära 
em. : smsära Cod.) sämarasyätmakam jalam | ukto meläpafabdena pañcavähopadesakaih | 95 
raso jalam *gocart (corr. : khecari Cod.) ca kälagräsas ca kesavah | alamgräs*ätmako (corr. : àt- 
make Cod.) yägo raudra*raudresvarisritah (corr. : raudrisvarisritah Cod.) | 96 prthivi gandho 
bhücari ca visräntir ätmabhüs tathà | anudbhinnacidäbhäsakulapañcakagocaram. Having given 
the correspondences between the faces and the Kramas five aspects of internal awareness it goes 
on in f. 3v12-17 (vv. 97-100) to show the correspondences with the body of the worshipper. 
Here five entities are listed for each of the five gross elements from ether to earth, down to 
nails, hair, flesh, bone, and skin for earth. He sums up (£. 3v17-20 [v. 101-102b]): evam cin- 
nâthadevasya pañca vakträni püjayet | pindasyäpi tayos caikyajñänam liñgasya pajanam | na 
mrnmayasya liñgasya püjanam moksasiddham ‘In this way he should worship the five faces both 
of the Lord who is Consciousness and of the body. To worship the Linga is to know their untiy. 
Worship of the Liñga of clay [alone] bestows neither liberation nor powers’. 

320 Mahänayaprakä$a (Triv.) 2.1-29b. The dependence is evident from the agreement in con- 
tent, but also from verbal parallels. Thus cf. käladähätma $masänam (922) with käladähaikabhüh 
saisà $masänam khecari matä (2.15Scd); prakäfänandarñpasya ksetrasya pariraksanät (92d) 
with etadrüpam param ksetram prakäsänandabhümigam | pälayelt] (2.18abc); vyaptam 
“amhärabhaksinyà sämarasyätmakam jalam | ukto meläpasabdena (94abc) with sämarasyät- 
manû saisà pratyävrityà samantatah | bhaksayaty äntarasparsäd atah samhärabhaksint (22c- 
23b); and alamgräsätmako yägo raudraraudresvarisritah (95cd) with raudraraudesvari yägas tas- 
mäd isto gurättamaih | alamgräsakramah so ‘yam mahäsähasajanmabhüh. 


330 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


indicates, is the necessity of engaging in non-dualistic Saiva practice only ifone 
possesses a proper understanding of the doctrine and is sincerely committed to 
its soteriological purpose. Though in general an unmarked expression of Saiva 
non-dualism, it is coloured by Krama language: 

Homage to [Siva], whose vast awareness manifests the all-pervading display of 
the [universe of the] six paths, who is [also] the sun that forcibly devours the 
mass of all [those] phenomena. 


Obeisance to him whose nature is to liberate all, glorying in the sequence of the 
Five Flows [that are the goddesses beginning with Vyomavämesvari]. 


All-pervading, beautiful with the bliss and light that flows forth [in him] with 
eternal vigour, who manifests the three worlds as the expansion of the sequence 
of his circles of power, who remains immersed in the core where existence and 
non-existence have dissolved, who is ever eager to devour [into nonduality] 
direction, place, time, form, and all other [aspects of the manifest]. 


It emphasizes Krama methods of enlightenment:*° 


The Krama teaching passed on by the Guru, [participation in] a gathering of 
Siddhas and Yoginis, their sensual practice, oral instruction, [non-conceptual] 
transmission, internal sensation … 


… through the most intense descent of power, or by force ofof one own insight, 
as the result of practising the Guru [oral] instruction, by worship, or by study 
of scripture, or by direct transmission of the knowledge of a perfected Yoginï or 
Siddha, or by immersion in the blissful sensation of à new consciousness. 


32 Jñänakriyädvayasataka À, f.2r3-5 (v.5): sadadhvavitatasphäravisphäranamahädhiye | 
namah samastabhävaughahathälamgräsabhänave; À, {. 2r7-v1 (v.7ab): pañcavähakramodagra- 
sarvänugrahadharmine; and À, f. 12r6-v4 (vv. 71-72): vibhub prasaradamlänaprakäsänandasu- 
ndarah | fakticakrakramasphäravisphäritajagattrayah | pralinasadasadbhävamadhyavisramama- 
ntharab | digdesakäläkärädikavalikäradiksitah. 

32 Jfänakriyädvayasataka À, f. 4v1-3 (v.20), in a list of methods of enlightenment: para- 
mparyakramämnäyo yoginisiddhamelakah | taccärucaryä kathanam samkrämah sparsa äntarah: 
£.13r2-4 (v.75c-77): sutivrasaktipätena svavimarsabalena vä | 76 *gurüpadefänusthänäd arcayä 
Sästrato pi và | nispannayoginisiddhajñänasamkramanen« va (B, f. 10r2-3 : lacking in A) | 77 
navinaciccamatkärasparsävesavasena vä. The distinctive expression svavimarsabalena occurs in 
the Kä/ïkulakramasadbhäva, £. 2r11 (1.49cd): prechämi paramam devi svavimarsabalena tu; and 
£ 12v 9-10 (5.44ab): 54 vidyäm tava vaksyämi svavimarsabalena ca. Cf. f.1v2 (1.17c-18b): 
svavimarsadasäntasthä tisthate paramesvart | käli tu bhairavärädhä mahäkälakaläsint. 


Alexis Sanderson 331 


and it pours scorn on hypocrites who use the language of the Krama as an 
excuse for licentious behaviour:*?? 


Adopting misconduct they make love to others wives declaring constantly that 
it is wrong to impede the inclination of the powers [of consciousness]. They are 
deluded in constant relish of the objects of the senses, saying that the goddesses 
of their faculties are [thus] filling the Lord that is consciousness with the objects 
of their enjoyment. 


The manuscripts of this work that I have seen do not record the name of 
its author. But it was very probably Sillana, the author of another unpublished 
text, the SuZtmopalabdhisataka. For the phrasing of the two works is remark- 
ably similar.** As for the time of its composition, that can be determined at 
present only within very wide boundaries. A prior limit in the tenth century is 
set by the fact that it imitates a verse of a hymn by Utpaladeva.*?° In another 
verse there is a striking similarity of phrasing with a verse in the Mahänaya- 
prakä$a of Arnasimha, which would bring the limit up to the late eleventh 


32 Jfänakriyädvayasataka À, ff.7v7-8r6 (vv. 43-44): necchävighätah kartavyah $aktinäm 
iti samtatam | kathayanto duräcäräh kämayante parastriyah | 44 cinnätham karanesvaryah 
svabhogaih pürayanti nah | ity äcänäh pramuhyanti visayäsvädasamtatau. 

324(1) Jñänakriyädvayasataka (] KAS) £. 5r1—2 (v. 23cd): virikhalä parà Saktir hetuh svätmo- 
palabdhaye; cf. Svätmopalabdhisataka (SUS), f. 12r4-5 (v. 102): ty äptasivasadbhävabhäva- 
garbhasya sünunä | fatakam sillanenedam krtam svätmopalabdhaye: (2) JKAS, f. 16r3 (v. 94ab): 
tesäm ananyasämänyaparamaisvaryasälinäm: . SUS, f.1r6 (4cd): namah svatantratodära- 
paramaisvaryasäline; (3) JKAS, f. 5vG-7 (v.28ab): zktih sambadhyate tivrä svatanträ svaraso- 
ditä; cf. SUS, f. 3v2-3 (v. )27: tathaiva nirapeksinyà svarasoditaya vibhoh | mohanidräprasakto 
Di pasuh $aktyä prabodhyate; (4) JKAS, f. 4r1-2 (v. 17ab): bhävanägurusästrebhyah sadasad- 
vastuniscayah: cf. SUS, f. 5v3 (v. 46cd); buddhyävabudhyate sadasadvastuni$cayam: (5) JKAS, 
f. 4r3—4 (18ab): pratitih svätmasattäyäm sahajänubhavakramah; cf. SUS, f. 6r4-5 (v.S1cd): 
tathäsya svätmasattäyäm pratitir upajäyate; (6) JKAS, f. 12r6-7 (v.G69cd): vibhuh prasarad- 
amlänaprakäsänandasundarah; cf. SUS, f. 6v5 (v. S6cd): sarvatah prasaratsphärasvaprabhä- 
bharasundarah; (7) JKAS, f.12v3-4 (v.71ab): digdesakäläkärädikavalikäradiksitah; Œ. 
SUS, f. 6v4 (v. 56ab): kavalikrtadigdesakäläkärädikalpanah: cf. (8) JKAS$, £. 12v2 (v.70ab): 
pralinasadasadbhävamadhyavisramamantharah; cf. SUS, f.6v2-3 (v.55ab): parämrtarasä- 
svädanirbharänandamantharah: (9) JKAS, f.2r2-3 (v.4c): durvijñeyarahasyäya; cf. SUS, 
f.7v4 (v.65a): durvijñeyarahasyatväd; (10) JKAS, f. 2r1-2 (v. 4ab): caräcarajagatsphära- 
sphurattämätradharmine; cf. SUS, f. 6r6 (v. 53ab): sphuraccaräcarasphäranänäkäraparigrahab. 

35 Jfänakriyädvayasataka, f. \v4— (v.2) (äsannäya sudüräya guptäya prakatätmane | sulabha- 
Jätidurgäya nama$ *citräya $ambhave [unattributed quotation in Subhäsitävalr, v. 22] and 
f215-7 (v.6) (udriktäya prafäntäya kathinäya dravätmane | mäyävine vifuddhäya namah 
svädhinasaktaye) draw on Sivastoträvali 2.12: mäyävine vifuddhäya guhyäya prakatätmane | 
säksmäya visvarñpäya namas citräya $ambhave. 


332 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


century, if it were not that the direction of borrowing is uncertain.??6 The 
posterior limit is set by unattributed citations in the Séurikusumäñjalitikä of 
Räjänaka Ratnakantha, completed in A.b. 1681, and in the Kashmirian an- 
thology Subhäsitävali of Vallabhadeva.*** The date of the latter is uncertain but 
it cannot have been earlier than the fifteenth century, since it includes verses 
by Räjänaka Jonaräja, who died in A.D. 1459/60.°?° 


THE HIGHER KRAMA OF THE ORAL INSTRUCTIONS 


We have seen that the unknown author of the Trivandrum Mahänayaprakä$a 
teaches that the attainment of the goal through the Krama’s course of meditative 
worship (päjanam) is the lowest of three means of enlightment, that the highest 
is a non-conceptual transmission (samkramanam), a sudden and definitive rev- 
elation of the Primordial Ground (puränädhisthänakramah, anupäyakramah) 
brought about by à non-conceptual (rirvikalpaka-) transmission from Guru 
to disciple, and that between that and Krama worship is a method of oral in- 
struction (kathanam), in which self-realization is initiated by the Guru through 
instruction in a corpus of aphorisms designed to project the recipient with 
a minimum of conceptualization into direct, non-conceptual enlightenment 
(sähasasamädhih) without recourse to the gradualist path of Krama worship. We 
have also seen this higher method claimed by Näga as the source of his 
own enlightenment, invoked by Ramyadeva as the basis of Cakrapäninäthas 


32There is a close parallel between f. 2v1-2 (v.7cd) (mohatämisravidhvamsapracandamahase 
namah) and f.15v4-5 (v. 94cd) (te mohadhväntavidhvamsacandamärtandamürtayah) on the 
one hand and f. 120v5 (v. 166cd) of Arnasimhas Mahänayaprakä$a (bhavatrdbhräntivibhränti- 
vidhvamsoccandadidhitih}) on the other. 

327 Ratnakantha quotes vv. 24-26 in his Stutikusumäñjalitika on 30.39 as the work of a scholar 
of the Âgamas (ägamavidah). According to the opening and closing verses of this commentary 
it was begun in $aka 1602 (4.D. 1680/1] and completed in Vikrama 1738 (a.p. 1681/2). 

328Vv. 1, 2, and 4 have been included by Vallabhadeva without attribution as vv. 21-23 in 
the section of his anthology devoted to verses of religious obeisance (namaskärapaddhatih). 

32 Subhäsitävali, v. 3038 (srijonaräjasya) = Jonaräja, Räjatarañgini 696. The date of Jonaräjas 
death is recorded by his pupil Srivara in Jainaräjatarañgint 1.6: frijonaräjavibudhah kurvan räja- 
tarañginim | säyakägnimite varse fivasäyujyam äsadat ‘The learned Jonaräja attained union with 
Siva while still writing his Réjatarañgintï in the year [Laukika 45]35°. Subhäsitävali, vv. 621 and 
3038 are attributed to Jonaraja with the title Räjänaka. That anthology also contains numerous 
verses by the fourteenth-century Kashmirian poet and grammarian Jagaddhara. The latters 
approximate date is determined by the fact that Räjänaka Sitikantha reports in his Balabodhi- 
ninyäsa, completed during the reign of Hasan Säh (r. 1472-1484), that he is the son of the 
daughter of Jagaddharas grandson. 


Alexis Sanderson 333 


Bhävopahärastotra, and mentioned among the means of liberation in the /%4- 
nakriyädvayasataka. 


The Chummäsamketaprakä$a of Niskriyänandanätha 


The tradition of oral instruction to which these authors refer is preserved in 
the unpublished Chummaäsamketaprakäsa of Niskriyänandanätha. This work is 
a Sanskrit commentary that transmits and explains one hundred and five brief 
aphorisms in Old Kashmiri consisting of from one to three words, which it 
calls variously the chummaäh, chummaäpadani, samketapadani, and padäni.%° 
The term chummaä is seen in the non-Saiddhäntika $Saiva Tantras, generally 
of the Vidyäpitha, and the Buddhist Yoginitantras (/Yoganiruttaratantras), ap- 
pearing also as chumma-, chummaka-/chummakä-, choma-/chomä-, chomaka- 
/chommaka-, and chommakä-/chommakä-. 1 1n those sources the term denotes 
words or hand-signals by means of which initiates recognize each other or com- 
municate secretly.*? The word is, I propose, Middle Indo-Aryan, deriving from 
Old Indo-Aryan chadman- ‘a disguise”.®* Here in the Krama the word means 
rather ‘esoteric instruction or knowledge’. It is in this sense that it appears in 


330 Chummäsamketaprakäsa #. 2v10-3r1 (27-28b): yogyas tvam sanmate putra durgame smin 
mahäkrame | ity uktvä krpayävisto bodhayäm äsa mäm prabhuh | kimcilce] chummopadesam tu 
samketapadavistaram: £. 3189 (36-37): parataram aniketam tattvamärgasthitam te | nirupama- 
padachummäsampradäyam samantät | svarasavasatayäham tvatkrpäghrätacittah | prakatatara- 
vacobhir darsayämy ä$u nünam: f. 1319 (218ab): pañcädhikasateneha padaugho yab sthitah parab; 
Ananta$akti on Vétälanäthasätra, p.2, Il. 2-3: frimadvätülanäthasya “pithesvaryas chummäpa- 
daugham (em. : pithefvarya ucchusmapädaugham Ed.) uktvä. For this emendation see foot- 
note 374 on p. 345. 

31 Tanträloka 29.37 (chummä/chumma-), Svacchanda 15.1, Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 12, 4h- 
nika 29, p.28 (chummakä), Netratantra 20.39 (chummaka-); Picumata, f. 245r2 (53.98d): 
cchomakädya(ñ)galaksanaih; ibid., (53.99a): cchommakä “kidr$ä (corr. : kidrfo Cod.) deva; 
f.246v3 (15.163a and colophon): cchommakäm ….cchommädhikäras; f. 290r4: cchomädhikäro; 
Hevajratantra 1.7.1: atha chomäpatalam. 

332 Picumata, f. 24512 (53.99): chommakä *kidrsä (corr. : kidr$o Cod.) deva kulänäm sädhaka- 
sya ca | prajñäyate yathà bhrätä bhagini va visesatah; Hevajratantra 1.7.1: atha chomäpatalam 
vyäkhyäsyämah. yena vijñäyate bhrätä bhagini ca na samsayah; Ksemaräja, Svacchandoddyota, 
vol. 6, p. 126: chummakä tatsamayänupravistasamcityà päribhäsiki samjñä; Netroddyota, vol. 2, 
p.233: dgamikapäribhäsikanämäni; Känhapäda, Hevajratantrayogaratnamälä on 1.7.1: chomä 
milicchä yogininäm samketenäbhisamayajalpanam; Caryämeläpakapradipa, p.87, 11. 6-7: käya- 
chomäväkchomäsamketena vyavahärah kriyate; Laghvabhidhäna, Ÿ. 24v4: iti $riherukäbhidhäne 
bhaksahomabalikriyähastacchomävidhipatala ekatrimsatimah. 

33 Through chañüma- by analogy with the development of pomma- from padma- through 
paüma-; see PiscHeL 1900, $$ 139 and 166; Siddhahemacandra 8.1.61, 8.2.112. 


334 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Modern Kashmiri éhômb (£), being glossed in Sanskrit by Pandit Mukunda 
Räma Sästri in Grierson’s dictionary (1932) as gädhavijñänam ‘hidden knowl- 
edge’ and in English as ‘secret knowledge (by which the accomplishment of 
some difficult task is rendered easy), private experience. 

That the language of the Chummäs is Old Kashmiri is not apparent in the 
majority of them, since these consist of unmodified (#4#sama-) Sanskrit nominal 
stems, most with the nominative singular ending -# seen in the masculine in 
Old Kashmiri (for Sanskrit masculine and neuter) but also in Apabhraméa, as 
in the first four: lrigu abhijñänu | aranisamudäyu | cakrefimelaku | kälagräsu 
“The point of fusion is the means of recognizing [the self]”; ‘It arises from the 
attrition of the two] kindling sticks’; ‘[There comes about] the merging of 
the goddesses of the circle’; ‘Temporal sequence is devoured’.%% However, that 
the language is Kashmiri is established by sound changes, morphology, and 
vocabulary. In the first category we see -#7 to -c7 and -#j to -cci in the following 
three Chummäs: (1) panthävadhüci, glossed:%% 


Though sporting everywhere absolutely unimpeded, with no fixed abode, by 
virtue of the pervasive manifestations of cognition, he comes at last like a trav- 
eller (pänthavat) to the pure (avadhütikäm) and beautiful (añcitäm) flow that 
cannot be entered, that is untainted [by these wanderings] that are like water 
that rests upon [but does not dampen] the lily-pad. 


(2) macci umacci, glossed:# 


Because consciousness surges up with innate autonomy she becomes reckless, 
taking on ever-new forms and devouring them all [from moment to moment]. 
She gives no thought to what is right or wrong, being constantly fickle. But 
when this same [consciousness] is sated she completely transcends this madness. 
[For] when [in this way] she catches sight of the highest Siva he tames her 
recklessness. For this reason consciousness, who never deviates from [this] her 
[inner] nature for those blessed [by her favour] has been called mattonmattä 
‘mad [and] free of madness’. 


33 Chummäsamketaprakäsa ff. 319, 3v3, 3v5, and 3v8. 

335 Chummasamketaprakäsa, £. Gv8—9: *panthävadhüct (pantha conij. : panthä Cod.) sarvatra 
ramamäno pi niyatäsrayavarjitah | samvidulläsavibhavair anirodhatayäbhitah | 92 präpnoti 
vrttim agamäm pänthavat tv avadhätikäm | nirlepäm puskaradalasthitavärivad añcitäm. 

336 Chummasamketaprakäsa, f.Tr1-3: macci umacci. svasvätantryodayatayä nirvicäratvam 
dgatà | samvin navanavollekharäpint sarvabhaksini | 94 yuktäyuktavicärais tu varjità cañcalä 
sad | yäà sthitä nirbharä saiva proccair unmattatäm gatà | 95 paramam $ivam älokya tadvasr- 
krtacäpalä | mattonmattä citih khyätä satäm apracyutä tatah. This indicates that #nmattikä is 
to be understood as ‘beyond wildness” (#dgatam mattam mattatä yasyà sonmattikà). 


Alexis Sanderson 335 


and (3) athict thiti, glossed:*°7 


The eternal stasis is the impenetrable, unshakeable domain of the Nameless in 
which the stasis that is the emergence of differentiation is dissolved. 


Niskriyänandanätha, then, takes pänthävadhüci to be equivalent to Skt. päntho 
vadhütim and to mean ‘[Like a] traveller [he reaches] the pure [state]”, macci 
umacci to be equivalent to Skt. mattikonmattikä and to mean ‘[First she is] wild 
[; then she is] tamed”, and athict thiti to be equivalent to Skt. asthityà sthitih or 
asthitau sthitih and to mean ‘[True] stasis [comes about] through [or in] the 
cessation of stasis. These readings are in keeping with the change of dental 
r to é before ÿ-mäträ (< O1A/MIA -), i, ë, or y that is distinctive of Modern 
Kashmiri.%% Moreover, the ending -7 for the instrumental or locative singular of 
a feminine noun whose stem ends in -/ is as in the Old Kashmiri of the Maha- 
nayaprakä$a, which exhibits in vicez (10.2) (Skt. vrésyä) both this morphology 
and this sound-change.**? The stem #hiri (Skt. sthiti-) is also seen there,**? and 
though in that text feminine #/7-stems such as #hiti- normally take the ending 
-a in the nominative they do not always do s0.%#! 


Also indicative of Old Kashmiri are rami ekäyanu, glossed:%*? 


He who is the one ground, perfect and all-pervading, plays without falling from 
his nature as he performs every action of every kind throughout the universe. 


33 Chummasamketaprakäsa, f. 10v6-7: athict thiti. 163 bhedonmesasthitir yatra layam yata- 
game pade | aprakampye niräkhyäkhye sà sthitih sthitir avyaya. 

38GRIERSON 1929, $ 8. With macc7 and unmacci we may compare Modern Kashmiri mic 
‘mad’ in the feminine as against mo“ in the masculine. 

339 GRIERSON 1929, $$ 173 and 206. 

#0 Mahänayaprakäsa 3.5d: thitinistha; 6.5b: thitimaya. 

31 For the nom. sg. in -4 of j/i-stems in the Mahänayaprakäsa see, e.g., kälasamkarsana (4.6a), 
<—Skt. kälasamkarsant; raudresara (5.4a), <-Skt. raudrefvart; uppatta (6.4b), <-Skt. utpattih; 
sista (3.5b), <-Skt. srstih; and $satta (6.4c), <-Skt. $zktih, Cf. Modern Kashmiri bäm ‘land’, 
Skt. bhümih; büth ‘sacred ash”, + Skt. bhütih; gath ‘motion, + Skt. gatih; gäth‘knot, <— Skt. 
granthib: räth "night, + Skt. rätrih: séd ‘success, <— Skt. siddhih; shëktth ‘power, <— Skt. faktih: 
and shéth ‘the sixth day of the lunar fortnight, + Skt. sasthr. But the ending in -£/ is preserved 
in the Mahänayaprakäsa in utti (12.70), <-Skt. uktih); and para fatti (3.5a), <— Skt. parä faktih. 
In the Chummäs in all the numerous instances of stems in -j the final vowel is retained. This 
is consistent with but not proof of their being earlier than the Mahänayaprakä$a. 

32 Chummasamketaprakäsa, f. 4178: rami ekäyanu. S\ yatas tatas tu sarvatra sarvakarma 
yathà tathà | kurvan nirämayo vyäpt kridaty ekäyano ‘cyutab. 


336 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


and asphura ulati, glossed: ** 


The formless, unlimited Sakti of which we speak in this [system] is this eternally 
open ultimate ground free of all [phenomena], free of all obscurations, its nature 
the absence of radiance, into which the radiance that is the manifestation of 
infinite cognitions dissolves. 


The -; ending of the two verbs rami and wlati is that seen in the Mahänaya- 
prakä$a for the third person singular of the present indicative, and the verbs 
themselves survive in the modern language as ramun ‘to play and wultun ‘to 
revert, to turn back’. The two Chummäs, then, are clearly Old Kashmiri, and 
mean respectively ‘He who is the one ground plays and ‘[Radiance] reverts into 
non-radiance’. 

Other proofs are catta- ‘cutting in caftaniscatti ‘cutting and its ab- 
sence” (Modern Kashmiri éath ‘cutting’, éata-cath ‘cutting or tearing apart’), 
glossed:% 


Cutting is the vanishing of the breath and non-cutting is its [re-Jactivation. 
Here this one being is the arising of both.” 


kbita khita ‘having repeatedly devoured” (khëth khëèth, the Modern Kashmiri 


doubled conjunctive participle with the same meaning*#), glossed:%*? 


The diverse [reality] that pervades the universe is called food when it has been 
partly dissolved by the rays of ones awareness, because then one experiences 
[one consciousness simultaneously as] the devourer, the devoured, and [act of 
devouring]. 


38 Chummasamketaprakäsa, f. \0r8-v1: asphura *ulati (conj. : ulatti Cod). 155 anantasam- 
vidvisphärasphurattà layam ägatä | yatra sarvojihite dhämni pare nityavikasvare | 156 asphura- 
ttäsvarüpe Smin sarvävaranavariite). 

F4GRIERSON 1929, $ 231, e.g. kari (Skt. karoti) (3.6d etc.); jayi (Skt. jayati) (1.5d). In Mod- 
ern Kashmiri this form in -; has been replaced by a participial construction with the present of 
the auxiliary verb; but it survives as the 3rd sg. of the future and conditional. 

%%So in Modern Kashmiri su rami/wultti ‘he will/may play/turn back and 54 cchu 
ramän/wulfiän ‘he plays/turns back’. 

346 Chummasamketaprakäsa, . \2v4—5, 203ab: cattaniscatti. cattah pränavinä$as tu niscattah 
pränaghattakah | sa eveha vinirdistah cattaniscattakodayah. 

347Cf. p. 340. 

F8GRIERSON 1932, s.v. khyon!“!, p. 427al0. 

349 Chummasamketaprakäsa, f. \2v3—4: kbita khita. 202 yad visvavibhavam citram isallinam 
svacitkaraih | tad eva bhoktrbhogyädibhogäd bhuktam ihocyate. 


Alexis Sanderson 337 


ditto nitto ‘seen [and] vanished’ (Modern Kashmiri dyüth" [stem dith-], past 
participle passive of déshun ‘to see’, and #ärh", past participle of the intransitive 
nashun ‘to be destroyed, vanish?),?° glossed:*! 


Thus when this universe of differentiation, from the fire of the aeon [at its base] 
to Siva [at its summit], has been seen but once through correct instruction it 
immediately vanishes into the state of non-dual consciousness. 


and lhapravähi, glossed:7? 


A lähab is so called because through its power it constantly bestows (/3-) em- 
bodiment as the extroverted state of rise and perdurance and then by the same 
means suddenly removes [that state] (-ha-). It is called à Zhapravähah ‘a läha- 
flow when it endures. This manifestation of [violent] expansion followed by 
[sudden] transcendence that characterizes a {ähapravähah is the non-sequential 
indestructible path of no reflection. It shines uninterrupted as the shining forth 
of the ‘void’ that is the nature of the self. 


The last, I suggest, is connected with Modern Kashmiri lahaprähl lähapräh mn. 
‘an attack of hysterical fever or a cataleptic condition brought about by some 
sudden terror (looked upon as a kind of demoniacal posssession which attacks 


babies and pregnant women) ,#? 


and präh m. ‘possession by a demon (be- 
lieved to cause fainting, madness, fury, fever, etc.}.354 It appears in the light of 
these meanings and the gloss of Niskriyänandanätha that the Chummä means 
‘seizure and trance’, having in mind a state of spirit possession which first man- 
ifests itself as a state of excessive fury and immediately after that as a state of 
prolonged catalepsy, using this figuratively to point to means of sudden en- 


lightement in which a state of extreme excitation is the point of entry into the 


350GRIERSON 1932, pp. 254b1-2 and 656a45-50. For the ending o instead of the usual # in 
Old Kashmiri for the nom. sg. of nouns originally masculine or neuter see GRIERSON 1929, $ 
159. 

31 Chummäsamketaprakäsa, f. 13167: ditto nitto (em. : dibbo nibbo Cod.). 214 ittham 
bhedamayam sarvam kälägnyädi fiväntakam | tattvena vyapadesena sakrd yad drstam akramät | 
215 satksanän näfam àyäti tad evädvayacitpade. 

32 Chummäsamketaprakäsa, f. 12v5-7: 204 Saktyodayasthitisphäravigraham lati yas sadà | 
tenaiva harati ksipräd yato lähas tatah smrtah | 205 sa eva pravahadräpah praväha iti kathya- 
te | avinä$asvabhävo yo nirvitarkakramo ‘kramah | 206 lähapravähikä seyam hänivrddhimayi 
prathà | svabhävagaganäbhäsaräpäcchinnaiva bhäsate. 

33 GrIERSON 1932, p. 515b11-16. Sanskrit gloss: bhüravesah. 

F4GRIERSON 1932, p.757a43-b13. Sanskrit gloss: bhätädyavesah. 


338 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


tranquil core of consciousness. 77° 


The commentary includes a frame-text in which the author presents himself 
as having received these aphorisms on which he is commenting in a miraculous 
revelation from a Siddha. In the opening passage of the text as it survives—the 
first folio side (1v) is lacking—Niskriyänandanätha relates that the Siddha*s 
favouring glance caused him to fall to the ground in a trance in which he ex- 
perienced the core of consciousness:%°6 
Through the glory of his glance I collapsed on the ground like a felled tree and 
in a flash attained the incomparable state that is free of the external and inter- 
nal faculties, inaccessible to the means of knowledge, free of defects, beyond 
the influence of time or its absence, beyond the lights [of the object, medium, 
and agent of cognition] yet pervading them, unlocated, neither sequential nor 
non-sequential, overflowing with the flooding rapture of the ultimate joy of the 
contactless, beyond bliss, beyond the means of immersion, free of the errors of 
‘is and ‘is not’, free both of conceptual and non-conceptual awareness, with a 
nature that transcends [all levels of] cognition, free of the stain [even] of the 
latent impressions [of what it transcends]. 


After a long time he is roused by the Siddha from his rapture and, astonished by 
what he has experienced, full of joy, freed from ego, and feeling the emptiness 
of all the knowledge he had acquired up to that time, he asks the Siddha to 


teach him how the state he has experienced can become permanent: 


35 Just such means are taught in Spandakärikä 1.22. 1 take the ending -7 in this Chumma 
and cattaniscatti to be that of the nom. pl. of 4-stems. In the Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa 
it is usually -7 (GRIERSON 1929, $$ 191-192), but there are also a few instances of -e (ibid., 
$ 193). That the same ending should be -7 in the text of the Chummäs may be attributed to 
the fact that for speakers of Kashmiri both e and 7 are pronounced as the latter (sbid., $ 20), 
which has lead to the two vowels being confused in Kashmirian manuscripts, as, for example, 
in Kalädiksävidhi, f. 226r14-v1, where we see frideksädevim for sridiksädevim (see footnote 71 


on p. 255). 
36 Chummasamketaprakäsa, f. 211-3: [.….ta\ddrkpätamahodayät | bhümau sampatitah ksipräc 
chinnamüla iva drumah | 2 niruttaropamä bhümir bähyäntahkaranojihitä | aplrlameyà 


nilrältañkä *käläkälakalottarä (käläkäla corr. : käläkala Cod.) | 3 adhämadhämavibhavä 
nirniketäkramäkramä | asparsaparamänandacamatkäraughanirbharä | À niränandä nirävesà 
sadasadbhramavarjitä | *nirvikalpävikalpä (conj. : nirvikalpavikalpä Cod.) tu samvidujjhita- 
dharmini | 5 präptà mayà jhagity eva väsanä[ñja]navarjiltà]. 

37 Chummäsamketaprakäsa, f. 2547: tatraiva bahukälam tu sthito ‘ham niscaläkrtih | G akas- 
mât tu prabuddho smi tatprasädavasän manäk | apürvasamvidählädacamatkärens ghürnitah | 
7 sthito ‘ham vismayävisto nityänandena nanditah | Sästraprapañcavimukho gatähampratyayo 
yadä | 8 tadä mayä siddhanäthah samprstah pustakänvitah | ‘yà käcid bhür mayä nätha durgamä 
tvatprasädatah | 9 anubhütä nirätañkä täm yathà sarvato ‘bhitah | samlaksayämi satatam tathà 
kathaya me prabho. 


Alexis Sanderson 339 


In that state I remained unwavering for a long time. Then, unexpectedly, by his 
favour, I came round somewhat. I was reeling from the rapturous experience of 
the bliss of that extraordinary consciousness, filed with wonder, ecstatic with 
the eternal joy [of my awakening], now averse to the elaborations of the Sästras 
and freed from all sense of self. Then I addressed a question to the Siddha Lord 
(Siddhanaätha) [who was standing there] with a manuscript [in his hand], saying 
“Tell me, my master, my lord, how I may perceive at all times, completely, on all 
sides, the unprecedented, defectless level so hard to reach that I have experienced 
by your favour”. 


The Siddha remains silent, but casts into the sky a glance which causes the 
essence of speech to emerge from the highest void and take form as Atavila: 8 


Then that great-souled one, who remained completely silent, cast a glance 
brimming with the non-sequential into the depths of the sky and through its 
power the unlocated, transcendental Word that is one with $iva, that transcends 
the [levels of ] its immanence [from Pasyanti, through Madhyamä] to audible 
speech, came forth from the highest void. It is this that we mean by the Bhairavi 
whose nature is unlocated. It has also been called Atavila, the supreme being 
who embodies the eternally manifest void, who embodies fusion with the radi- 
ances of that most extraordinary consciousness, because at that very moment it 
bestows (-/4) permanently and in non-duality the supreme wilderness (aravi-) 
beyond the [three] lights that is one with that Bhairavi, free of all obscurations. 


Atavila®®” points to a manuscript that the Siddha is showing in his hand and 


explains that the two boards that enclose it are the two breaths and the two 


38 Chummäsamketaprakäsa, À. 2x7-v1: 10 mahätmanä tadà tena maunasthena viesatah | 
ärdhve vyomni yatah ksiptà drstir akramanirbharä | 11 tadadhisthänatas tasmät paräkäsat 
samutthitä | Sivasyäbhinnaräpä tu parä vag aniketanä | 12 *vaikharyantakulottirnä (conj. : 
vaikharyantä kulottirnä Cod.) samastäsrayavarjitä | bhairavt saiva vikhyätä nirniketasva- 
räpini | 13 “adaiva (conj. : tadaivai Cod.) bhairavi*räpam (corr. : räpam Cod.) 
nirdhämaparamätavim | sarvävarananirmuktä(m) läti nityam abhedatah | 14 atavilas samä- 
khyäto nityoditakhamärtibhrt | apürvataracidbhäbhis säma[ra]syavapuh parab. 

391 surmise that the origin of this unusual name is a narrative in which Atavila was a Sid- 
dha who had assumed the appearance of à member of à forest (afavi) tribe. Such a narrative 
is seen in the Krama in the case of Vidyänanda, the disciple of Niskriyänanda, who is de- 
scribed in the *Uftaragharämnäya section of the Ciñcinimatasärasamuccaya as äbararüpadhrk 
‘having the appearance of a $abara (7.182-83 given in footnote 63 on p.252). The same is 
reported of the Siddha Lokeévara in the literature of the Buddhist Yoginitantras. He is said to 
have assumed the appearance of a Sabara (Sxbararñpadhärinä) while practising the Sädhana of 
Vidyädhari-Vajrayogini (Guhyasamayamälä, f. 87r1-v6). Sabara (/Atavisabara [Mahäbhärata 
6.10.46c]), Pulinda, and Bhilla, are the usual names applied to such tribal people in Sanskrit 
literature, where they are portrayed as fierce dark-skinned hunters living in the mountainous 
and forested region of the Vindhya who plunder passing travellers and propititate the goddess 


340 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


aspects of the Goddess, transcendent (kr$ä) and immanent (p#rnä), and that he 
must tear these two asunder and behold the ultimate void (mahäsünyätisanyam) 


that lies between them as his real nature:30° 


Then [Atavila] deriding me said, “Why are you so proud? What is [the value 
of] this snare of learning? Still you have not shaken off your delusion. Behold 
this manuscript in the hand of Siddhanätha. O you who have mastered the 
Krama, know that its tightly bound five-hood [knot] is the power embodied in 
the five sense-faculties and that its two encircling rings are waking and dream- 
ing. Learn in brief the nature of these its two boards. The outgoing breath with 
its seven flames is held to be the upper, and the lower has the form of the in- 
going. Eternally I am truly present, O brahmin, as these two flows. The two 
boards are [also] known as the awakening of the sequences of immanence (ku- 
lam) and transcendence (kaulam) and as the two immersions that are the active 
and quiescent expansions. Above is the expansive power{, the full-bodied god- 
dess] whose nature is extroversion. Below is this power of Siva that devours{, the 
goddess] whose body is emaciated. Break open these two boards and through 
your awareness [alone] behold between them the great void beyond the void, 
that is free of both the transient and the eternal, that is without sensation, the 
ultimate emptiness, unlocated, unsurpassed, transcending all, unmanifest, eter- 
nally present in everything, the destroyer of Emission, Stasis, Withdrawal, and 


Durgä Vindhyaväsini with human sacrifices. The hypothesis that the name Atavila points to 
another instance of this primitivist theme gains further support from the fact that Adabilla, 
which, given that MIA voices o1A medial # (Pkt. adavï), the common alternation of v and b, 
and the Law of Morae, is probably the same name, occurs with Sabara/Pulinda in Tanträloka 
29.38 and the Kwlakridävatära quoted by Jayaratha in his commentary on that verse in a list 
of six Lodges (gharam), namely Sabara/Pulinda, Adabilla, Pattila, Karabilla, Ambi/Ambilla, 
and $arabilla, associated with the six sons of Macchanda and Koñkanämbä. These Lodges are 
followed by six Pallis. Palli is the standard term in Sanskrit for a Sabara settlement: see, e.g., 
Kathäsaritsägara 1.2.135-137; 1.5.42; and 12.31.19. 

360 Chummasamketaprakäsa, f.2v1-8: proväca prahasan mäm sa kimartham tvam samu- 
ddhatah | Sastrajälam idam kim syäd bhräntir nädyäpi te cyutä | 16 pasyemäm pustikäm 
vipra siddhanäthakarasthitäm | asyäh pañcaphano yas tu sthito drdhanibandhanah | 17 
pañcendriyamayim Saktim viddhi “tam (em. : täm À) kramapäraga | valayau dvau sthi- 
au yau tu tau jägratsvapnavigrahau | 18 imau yau pattakau dvau tu tau $rnusva samäsa- 
tah | ärdhvapattakarñpas tu prälnalh sapltaÏsikhah smrtah | 19 adhahstha(h) pattako yas tu 
samsthito pänavigrahah | pravähadvayarüpo ‘ham samsthito dvija tattvatah | 20 kulakaula- 
kramonmesarüpau dvau paltta]kau smrtau | udriktafäntavisphärasamävesamayau tv imau | 21 
ärdhvasthà pürnavibhava Saktir unmesadharmini | adha(h}sthà kr$adeheyam gräsint $aktir ais- 
vart | 22 bhittvaitat pattakayugam madhly]e pasya vimarsatah | mahäfanyätisanyam tu ksara- 
ksaravivarjitam | 23 aspar$am paramäkä$am nirniketam niruttaram | sarvlo]ttirnam anäbhäsam 
sarvaträvasthitam sadä | 24 srstisthityupasamhärakälagräsäntakam param | sarvävarananirmu- 
ktam svasvarñpam svagocaram. 


Alexis Sanderson 341 


the [Nameless] devouring of time, supreme, free of all obscurations, the nature 
of the self, present in the self”. 


This instruction pushes Niskriyänanda into the experience of the ultimate re- 
ality and frees him once and for all from the ‘snare of the Sästras’ that had held 
him in bondage. The Siddha then pronounces him fit to receive the oral in- 
struction and transmits the Chummas to him. Niskriyänandanätha undertakes 
to explain them to his pupil, declaring that by the Siddha's favour they enabled 
him to achieve Liberation through forcible immersion in the state of sudden 
enlightenment (séhasam padam);*°1 


Thus in an instant I experienced directly the most transcendent reality [and] 
abandoned altogether the snare oflearning in its entirety. The wise Siddhanätha, 
who [likewise] had let go of all the elaborations of Sästric knowledge, looked at 
me and said .., “My son with excellent understanding, you are [now] worthy 
to enter this inaccessible Great Krama”. With this, being filled with compas- 
sion, the Lord made me understand completely the wondrous teaching of the 
Chummäs with the full expanse ofthe samketapadäni that is hard to grasp [even] 
for the greatest of meditators. As a result I suddenly ascended to the great un- 
fettered, eternal domain of sudden enlightenment, in the state of one who is 
fully awakened. In the same way I shall explain to you fully the unique, most 
extraordinary, indefinable [knowledge] that I have attained by Siddhanäthas 
favour in that wondrous reality. You have *wandered to (conÿj.) every Pitha*(? 
constantly established in *Brahman (conj.). [Yet] still you have not achieved 


361 Chummasamketaprakäsa, Æ.2v8-—3r6: ittham parataram tattvam säksätkrtya mayäkramät | 
tyaktam sarvam a$esena Sästrajälam samantatah | 26 tyaktasästraprapañcena siddhanäthena dhi- 
matà | drstas tu tatksanät tena [......bhälsitah | 27 yogyas tvam sanmate putra durgame smin 
mahäkrame | ity uktvä krpayävisto bodhayäm äsa mäm prabhuh | 28 kimcilc] chummopadesam 
tu samketapadavistaram | durbodham tu mahäyogipravaränäm samantatah | 29 yatas tas- 
män mahoddäma sähasam padam acyutam | samäruhya hathäd asmi suprabuddhadasänvitah | 
30 ittham apy adbhute tattve siddhanäthaprasädatah | präptam *mayä (conj. : tvayä Cod.) 
anirdesyam vikalpaughaviläpakam | 31 yad apürvataram kimcit tat te vaksyämy asesatah | 
bhränto (conj. : bhakto) 5i sarvapithesu *brahmany avasthitah (conj. : brahmanyevasthitah Cod.) 
sadà | 32 tvayädyäpi na visräntih samyag “asädità parä | samdigdhäm matim äfritya kim 
paryatasi putraka | 33 yogyas tvam parame jñâne yatas tasmäd alam bhava | pravaksyämi 
mukhämnäyam yathà präptam yathäkramam | 34 darfanämnäyameläpavarjitam satatoditam | 
püjyapüjakasambandhaprojihitam paratattvatah | 35 ekägramanasonmesavimar$ena mahämate | 
rabasyapadavistäram vijñeyam vitatam frnu. 

362The manuscrit reads bhaktosisarvapithesu ‘You are devoted to all the Pithas’. I find this sus- 
pect, since it is not the Pithas themselves that are the object of devotion but the Goddesses and 
Yoginis located in them. I have conjectured bhränto 5i sarvapithesu ‘You have wandered to every 
Pitha, because wandering is the action most appropriate in this context and because immedi- 
ately after this statement Niskriyänanda will be told that there is no need for him to continue 


342 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


perfect rest. Why continue to roam with confused mind, my disciple? You are 
now fit for the highest wisdom. So cease. I shall teach you in due order the 
oral transmission that is beyond of the schools of philosophy, the [Sakta] Âm- 
näyas, and [even] the Melaäpa [doctrine] ,763 ever active, in ultimate truth void 


to wander. For this wandering in the Pithas, that is to say, from Pitha to Pitha, see Tanträloka 
29.40: iti samketäbhijño bhramate pithesu yadi sa siddhipsuh | aciräl labhate tat tat präpyam 
yad  yoginivadanät ‘If knowing these conventions he wanders about the Pithas in quest of Sid- 
dhi he soon attains from the lips of the Yoginis whatever goal he seeks’; and Timirodghätana, 
Ê.36v3—4: bahudesagatà ka$ci ksetrapithäni paryate | varse dvädasavarsle vä yogi]ni naiva pasy- 
ati | susamskrto pi devesi bahugranthärthapanditah | bhrame pithopapithäni akrtärtho nivartate 
‘A person may wander to the Ksetras and Pithas in many lands, [but] in a year or [even] twelve 
see no* Vogini (conj.). Even though correctly initiated and well-versed in the meaning of many 
texts he may wander to the Pithas and Upapithas and return without his purpose achieved”. I 
have not corrected kasci to kascit, paryate to paryatet, or bhrame to bhramet in this passage of 
the Timirodghätana because cases in which final # is treated as though it were silent for the pur- 
pose of Sandhi are not uncommon in the register of Sanskrit evidenced in non-Saiddhäntika 
scriptural texts, as, for example, in the Brahmayämala, f. 194v1: Sodhaye dhvänam (for Sodhayed 
adhvänam; nyase ‘tmänam (for nyased ätmänam. 

363The Âmnäyas referred to here are the Säkta Amnäyas of the Four Directions (Pärvamnäya, 
Pascimämnäya, Daksinämnäya, and Uttarämnäya). The term Meläpa, denoting the highest of 
the levels of knowledge to be transcended, lying beyond even the Uttarämnäya (the Kälikula), 
denotes the teachings of the Krama [as opposed to those of the oral instructions]. We find the 
Krama referred to as the Meläpa doctrine in the Mahänayaprakä$a (Triv.), 9.63: *meläpadarsane 
(corr. : melävadarsane Ed.) by atra pratyaksajñänagocare. For this hierarchy up to the Krama see 
the commentary on the Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa on 1.5a (paryantäna pari paryanti 
… Yakku [Cod. : akka Ed.] mahäthu jayi aniketu ‘The unique, unlocated Mahärtha …reigns 
supreme within the highest limit of the limits’): paryantavartinäm ämnäyänäm yah para utkrstah 
uttarämnäyah tato pi “pañcatrimsabhedabhinnäd (pañca conj. : sat Ed.) yah paryantah prän- 
tavarti navacakrasampradäyah so ‘yam mahärthah ‘The Uttarämnäya, divided into thirty-five 
elements, is the highest [of the limits, i.e.] the foremost of the Âmnäyas that are at the limit 
[of knowledge]. The limit beyond even that, located at the very summit, is the Mahaärtha, 
this tradition of [the Krama with] the nine circles [that constitute the phases of worship}’. I 
have ventured to emend the edition’s sattrimsa- ‘thirty-six to pañcatrimsa- ‘thirty-five’ because 
in the Devidvyardhasatikä the goddess begins her request for instruction by saying that she 
has already been taught the system of Käli worship that has thirty-five divisions (£. 2r3 [v. 8cd]: 
pañcatrimsatibhedena kälibhedam mayä frutam) and because Vimalaprabodha presents his X%4- 
kulakramärcana as teaching the same on the basis of the [lost] Pañcacämarasekhara (£. 1v4): 
samviksya vidhivaj jñatvä pañcacämarasekharam | pañcatrimsatibhedädhyam vaksye $rikälikä- 
rcanam. The reading in the Devidvyardhasatikä Ms is pañcavimsati- rather than pañcatrimsati.. 
But I have emended it to the latter because it is pañcatriméati- that is given in this verse as it 
appears in the same passage in the Yonigahvara (£. 2r3 [v. 10cd] and, with a redactional variant, 
in Kälikäkrama (f. 179v2 [v. 2ab]: pañcatrimsatibhedena kälikulam mayä frutam). The corrup- 
tion sattrimsa- of pañcatrimsa- in the Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a is readily explained as an 


Alexis Sanderson 343 


of the relation of worshipped and worshipper, just as I myself received it [from 
Siddhanätha]. Wise one, learn with one-pointed mind by virtue of awareness 
of the vibrant openness [of your consciousness], the full expanse of the secret 
[Chumma]padas. 


The Chummaäs with their commentary follow. 


The *Trimsaccarcärahasya (/Präkrtatrimsikà) attributed to the Pithesvaris 


The Chummäsamketaprakä$a also contains dispersed within it according to con- 
text but without gloss or commentary thirty verses in Old Kashmiri, which it 
claims to be songs transmitted by the Pitheévaris [of Uddiyäna] to supplement 
the instructions in the Chummaäs. It calls them Kathäs (Oral Explanations) or 
Carcäs (Meditations):564 


Victory to the miraculous (ko pi) unborn, ever-manifest glory of the Carca 
songs (giticarcä) that have come from the lips of the Pitheévaris. For it cul- 
minates in the non-sequential [ground] through the sequence of worship, in- 
struction, and transmission, leading to the void of unsurpassed awareness, 
transcending the relation of words and their meanings.*® This incompara- 
ble instruction that has come forth directly from the source now shines in 
its fullness forever through the supreme collection of one hundred and five 
[Chummaä]padas given here supplemented by the esoteric teaching of the thirty 
Carcäs (Trimsaccarcärahasya). Xt opens up with full intensity in the awareness of 
the great [only] through oral transmission. 


The title Trim$accarcärahasya has been adopted for convenience from this 
passage. However, it is probable that it is this work that is referred to 


unconscious substitution of the much more familiar number of the Saiva Tattvas. 

364 Chummasamketaprakäsa, f. 1317-10 (vv. 216-219): püjasamkrämakathanakramenäkrama- 
ltat]parah | pithevarimukhäyätagiticarcämahodayah | 217 ko py anuttaracidvyomapräpakah 
satatoditah | väcyaväcakasambandhanirmukto jayatäd ajah | 218 pañcädhikasatencha padaugho 
yab sthitah parah | trimsaccarcärahasyena nirbharas tena sarvadä | 219 carceyam bhäti nitaräm 
samyaggarbhägatäsama | vakträdvaktrakramenoccais satäm hrdi vijrmbhate. 

3 Their origin from the Yoginis of Uddiyäna is also conveyed by the last of the thirty, the 
Gitikathä, £. 13v1-2: *yith ägatu (conj. : pithägatu Cod.) *pithesari (em. : pethisari Cod.) vada- 
nà | gitikathà kamukta Tesa jha lakku Ÿ | anubhaveti nirupamacissadanà | samkämädi*kamä 
(conj. : kuräu Cod.) avikampu. The meaning of the whole verse is not apparent to me. But this 
much is probable: ‘...the Girikathä *taught in the Krama (?), came “hither (conj.) from the 
mouths of the Pitheévaris *after they had experienced [it] (?) from the domain of incomparable 
consciousness through the process of [worship, instruction,] and transmission’. 

366]c is also that given on the outer cover of the Berlin manuscript of the Chummäsamketa- 
prakäsa. 


344 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


by Siva[svämin] Upädhyäya I in his Viÿñänabhairavavivrti under the title 
Präkrtatrimsikä ‘The Thirty [Verses] in the Vernacular’. For that is a text on 
the Krama, since he directs his readers to a commentary on it by Bhattäraka 
(Präkrtatrimsikävivarana) for its multiple analyses of the Krama’s circle of the 
Müultitude (vrndacakram);*7 and there is a Kathä among the thirty in the 
Chummäsamketaprakä$a that would accommodate such analysis:%68 


Vrndakathä: 

Just as in the external world the stars together with the moon and sun shine eter- 
nally, so the pure mass of the rays (rafmivrndah) [of the vrndacakram] expands 
in the domain of the sensationless void of consciousness. 


If a manuscript of this work should come to light it will be welcome not only 
for its subject matter but also for the light it might shed on Old Kashmiri, at 
present poorly understood. 


The Vätülanäthasütra and its Commentary 


Closely related in content to the Old Kashmiri verses transmitted in the 
Chummäsamketaprakäsa, but written in Sanskrit, is the published Värilanätha- 
sätra, which has come down to us with a commentary of unknown date at- 
tributed to one Anantaéakti in its final colophon,*”? though in the text itself 
the author avoids stating his name, referring to himself in both the introduc- 
tory and concluding verses merely as “someone”, an authorial convention seen 
elsewhere in this literature and no doubt intended to express the position that 
those who articulate the truth of the Krama* sudden enlightenment are like 
that truth itself devoid of social identity.””° 


367 Vijñanabhairavavivrti, p.68, IL. 11-12: vrndacakranirnayas tu bahudhä bhattärakakrta- 
präkrtatrimsikävivarane vicäryah. 

368 Chummasamketaprakäsa, f. 3v, after v. 41: bahi yakhiti râji niccu gagani | täräcayu Safidi- 
nakarayutta | täkhiti aparisacinnabhasadani | *vikasi (conij. : vikaci) rasmi*vindu (corr. bindu 
Cod.) achutta | vrndakathä (= Skt. bahir yathä râjate nityam gagane täräcayah asidinakarayutah 
tathà asparsacinnabhahsadane vikasati rafmivrndo nirmalah). 

3 Värülanäthasätravrtti, p.19, IL 8-9: samäpteyam Srimadvatülanathasätravrttih. krtih $ri- 
madanantasaktipädänäm. The commentary by an Anantaéakti on the Bahurüpagarbhastotra is 
probably not by the author of the Väälanäthasütravrtti. Its phraseology and style are quite 
different and there is only one place at which it offers an interpretation in terms of the 
Krama (f. 13r, glossing tridasapüjyäya: frimaddarsane dvädasottirnadevidhämarüpatrayodasapa- 
ramaräpatvena püjya ity arthah ‘The meaning of tridasapüjya- in tridasapñjyäya is ‘to be wor- 
shipped as the highest, as the thirteenth, which is the ground of the Goddess beyond the twelve 
taught in the venerable [Krama] doctrine’). 

#0 Värülanäthasätravrtti, p.1., v.G: yoginivaktrasambhütasätränäm vritir uttamä | kenäpi 
kriyate samyak paratattvopabrmhitä ‘“Someone” will [now] write an excellent commentary 


Alexis Sanderson 345 


Thus “someone” who is free of the error of [believing in] the differentiation 
[manifest] in the expansion that is incarnate existence has correctly articulated 
the matchless, ultimate secret that transcends all words and concepts, through 
the process of the flashing forth of the sudden realization of the unconditioned 
ultimate Being as the result of the expansion of consciousness.71 


Each of its thirteen Sütras conveys an esoteric teaching, which like the Old 
Kashmiri verses in the Chummäsamketaprakä$a is called indifferently a Katha 
or Carcä; and all of these are among those covered in that text. Anantaéakti ap- 
pears to knows the work of Niskriyänandanätha. For commenting on the third 
Sütra, which teaches the instruction on the manuscript with its two boards 
(pustakakathà), he says that he will explain the means of attaining the ulti- 
mate that the venerable Gandhamädanasiddha taught Niskriyänandanätha by 
showing him the manuscript in his hand when he chose to favour him;*”? and 
he does so in terms that follow closely and further explain the details of the 
symbolism of the book and the separating of its boards set out in the verses 
of the Chummäsamketaprakä$a.*" That work refers to the Siddha who taught 
Niskriyänandanätha simply as Siddhanätha ‘The Siddha Lord”, but the name 
Gandhamädana reported by Anantasakti may well have been taken from the ab- 
sent opening verses of that work. As for the revelation of the Värälanäthasütra, 
Ananta$akti at the beginning of his commentary relates that the Pithesvaris 
first taught Vatülanätha the Chummaäs (chummäpadaughah) and then these Sü- 


tras.374 


nourished by the highest reality on the Sütras that have come forth from the lips of the Yoginis’; 
p.19, Il. 4-7: ÿti paramarahasyam vägvikalpaughamuktam bhavavibhavavibhägabhräntimuktena 
samyak | krtam anupamam uccaih kenacic cidvikäsäd akalitaparasattäsähasolläsavrttya. 

371We see the same explicit anonymity in the Bhävopahärastotra attributed to Cakrapäninätha 
by Ramyadeva (see here footnote 300 on p. 323: kaf cit), and in the anonymous Kramaviläsas- 
totra (last verse: ittham etad adhigamya kenacit). 

32 Värülanäthasätravrtti, p.4, 11. 4-6: $rimanniskriyänandanäthänugrahasamaye  $rimad- 
gandhamädanasiddhapädair akrtakapustakadarsanena yà parapade präptir upadistä saiva vitatya 
niräpyate ‘T shall explain at length the attainment ofthe highest level that the venerable Gandha- 
mädanasiddha taught by showing the manuscript of truth on the occasion of his favouring the 
venerable Niskriyänandanätha’. 

373Compare Värälanathasätravrtti, p.4, I. 7-20 with Chummäsamketaprakä$a, vv. 16c-24 
given above in footnote 360 on p. 340. 

SA Värülanäthasätravrtti, p.2, I. 1-7: ha kila saddarsanacaturämnäyädimeläpaparyantasa- 
mastadarsanottirnam akathyam api $rimadvätülanäthasya pithesvaryaf *chummäpadaugham 
(em. : pithefvarya ucchusmapädaugham Ed.) uktvä tad anu paramarahasyopabrmhitatrayodasa- 
kathäsäksätkäradr$à kramäkramästinästitathyätathyabhedäbhedasavikalpanirvikalpabhavanirvä- 
nakalañkojihitam kim apy anavakäfam param tattvam sütramukhenädifanti. | have emended 
the editions pithefvarya ucchusmapädaugham to pithesvaryaf chummäpadaugham because 


346 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Here, according to tradition (ki/a), the Pitheévaris first taught the venerable 
Vätülanätha the collection of the Chummäpadas, though [in truth its teach- 
ing] cannot be taught, being beyond all doctrines, beginning with the six 
Daréanas’”* and the four [Säkta] Amnäyas and ending with the Meläpa, and 
then taught [him] through the Sütras the extraordinary, highest reality into 
which nothing can enter, which is free of the stain of [the dualities of] sequence 
and simultaneity, existence and non-existence, the real and the unreal, plurality 
and unity, the conceptual and the non-conceptual, existence in the world and 
liberation, doing so by directly revealing to his experience the thirteen Kathäs 
nourished by the ultimate secret. 


At the end of his commentary he adds the detail that they revealed the oral tra- 
dition to Vatülanätha in the Sütras at the time of their Great Assembly (m4h4- 
meläpah), an allusion to their gathering in the Karavira cremation ground of 
Uddiyäna for the worship of the Goddess, as taught at the beginning of the 
Kälikulakramasadbhäva.®"S 


The Kaulasätra of Bhattasri Sitikantha 


Also connected with the Kashmirian Krama’s tradition of oral instruction is a 
collection of Sütras composed by a certain Guru Bhattaéri-Sitikantha. I have 
seen this only in a manuscript that prefaces the text with a remark by the copy- 
ist that his exemplar is fragmentary and that therefore what he is providing 
is only some of the Sütras of this work, which is divided into two sections, 
the Kaulasütra and the Kulasñtra.*”” Among them are five that are versions of 


ucchusmapäda could only be à person (‘the venerable Ucchusma”), which would be nonsen- 
sical here, because the terms chummäpada- and padaugha- (= chummäpadaugha-) axe seen in 
the Chummäsamketaprakä$a, and because the result is contextually appropriate. 

375] surmise that the six Dar$anas intended here are the Bauddha, Jaina, Vaidika, Vaisnava, 
Saura, and $aiva religious paths. 

F6 Värülanäthasätravrtti pp. 18, 1. 17—19, L. 2: saddarsanacaturämnäyameläpa( …) *trayodasa- 
kathäsäksätkäropadesabhañgyänuttarapadädvayatayä (trayodasakathä em. : kathätrayodasakathäà 
Ed.) kasyacid avadhütasya pithesvaribhir mahämeläpasamaye sütropanibaddho vakträmnäyah 
prakäsitah ‘The oral teaching (*that is beyond (?)) the six Daréanas, the four Säkta traditions, 
and the Meläpa, was put into Sütra form and revealed in oneness with the unsurpassed goal 
by the Pitheévaris at the time of the Great Assembly to a certain sage who had transcended all 
mundane conventions (avadhütasya) by teaching him to experience directly the [truth of the] 
thirteeen Kathaäs’. 

377 Kaulasätra, £. 1v1-2: om svasti prajäbhyah. om Srisäradä*devyai (corr. : divyai Cod.). atha 
kaulasäträntargatäni känicit süträni likhyante ädarsachinnabhinnatvät. The authorship is re- 
ported at the end of the manuscript, £. 5v6: krtir gurubhattasrifitikanthasyeti Subham. 


Alexis Sanderson 347 


Kathäs or Chummäs or the exegesis of these found in the VWäsälanäthasütra and 
the Chummäsamketaprakä$a: 


The teaching concerning the manuscript is that of opening the two boards.f’8 


Bhairava stands between the full-bodied and emaciated [forms of the] God- 
dess.57? 


The four goddesses Emission{, Stasis, Withdrawal,] and [the Nameless], who 
are Hunger{, thirst, envy, and thought], constantly delight their Lord as though 
with sanguinary sacrifice by offering up themselves to him.?#° 


78 Kaulasütra, f. 1v7: pattakodghätanam pustakopadesah; cf. Vätülanathasütra 3: ubhaya- 
pattodghattanän mahäsänyatäpravesah; Chummäsamketaprakä$a, f.2N6-7, v.22: bhittvaitat 
pattakayugam maldhyle pa$ya vimarsatah | mahasanyätisänyam tu ksaräksaravivarjitam: the 
Manuscript Kathä (pustakakathä) ibid., f. 316-7: … kulakaulikaputayugmu *vidära (em. : vicära 
Cod.) | ….pasu majji fanyata avikära ‘Break apart the two boards that are the Kula and the 
Kaulika .….behold the unchanging void between [them/’. 

379 Kaulasütra, f. 1v8: pürnakréämadhyago bhairavah. Cf. Chummäsamketaprakä$a, £.7v5, 
v. 105 (on Chummaä 40 [f 7v4-5]: pürna kisi ‘[She is] full-bodied [and] emaciated”): tham 
pürnasvarñpäpi mahägräsaikaghasmarà | sarvottirnaviyadvritim atyajanti kr$ä smrtä ‘In this way 
she is full[-bodied] by nature. But being altogether gluttonous in her Great Devouring she 
is nonetheless said to be emaciated, since [even as she devours all things] she never surren- 
ders her mode of existence as the all-transcending void”; and f. 2v3-6 (vv. 18c-21): &rdhva- 
pattakarüpas tu präfnalh sapltalsikhah smrtah | 19 adhahsthapattako yas tu samsthito pänavi- 
grahah | pravähadvayaräpo ‘ham samsthito dvija tattvatah | 20 kulakaulakramonmesarñpau dvau 
palttalkau smrtau | udriktafäntavisphärasamävesamayau tv imau | 21 ärdhvasthä pürnavibhava 
Sfaktir unmesadharmini | adhahsthä kr$adeheyam gräsint faktir aisvari “The outgoing breath with 
its seven flames is the upper board and the lower board is the ingoing. In reality, O brah- 
min, Ï am present as both these flows. The two boards represent the manifestation of the Kula 
and Kaula phases. They are the [two] states of immersion, that in which the extroversion of 
consciousness is active and that in which it has ceased. Above [as the upper board] is the fully- 
expanded Power, whose nature is extroversion. Below is the devouring Sakti of the Lord, her 
body emaciated”. The Sütra also alludes to the practice taught in Merra 18.120 of installing a 
Bhairava flanked by a full-bodied and an emaciated Sakti to mark the site of a cremation; see 
SANDERSON 2005b, p.267, footnote 92. 

S80Kaulasütra, f. 2178: prinayanti catasrah srstideviprabhrtayah ksudhädyä *balibhir iva 
(conj. : iva balibhih Cod.) *patim satatam (conij. : patisamtatah Cod.) svätmasamarpanens; cf. 
Vätülanäthasätra 9: devicatustayolläsena sadaiva svavifräntyavasthitih; Anantaéaktis commen- 
tary: devicatustayam ksuttrdirsyämananäkhyam: the Kathä of the Four Goddesses (devicatustaya- 
kathä) in Chummäsamketaprakäsa, Ÿ. 7178: manana ia ti$a ksuta ägüriti paramäkäapadi thiti- 
kitti | vittiprapañcu *“akame (conj. : akäme Cod.) püriti bhuji nira(va)kä$u avitti Thought, 
envy, thirst, and hunger, longing to be established in the domain of the highest void, having 
simultaneously satisfied themselves with all the diverse manifestations of cognition, relish the 
lacuna-less [consciousness] beyond cognition’; Räjikä qu. in the commentary on the Old Kash- 
miri Mahänayaprakäsa, p.55, IL 5-8: bhuktvä vifvam a$esam trptim na yadà gatah kulesänah | 


348 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The essence of the self is made manifest by removing the three shrouds.*$l 


When the twelve rays unite without force the confidence of their leader dis- 
solves. [This] one [among the twelve therefore] disappears. So there is a breaking 
of the circle caused by a deficiency in [their] discipline.**? 


And there are others that are Katha-like and bear on the Krama but have no 
direct parallels in those works: 


There is but one Guru, the uninterrupted transmission of the rays [of en- 


lightened consciousness] that have come to us through the initiatory lineage 
(ovallih) #83 


The [Goddess] that rules the wheels [of powers] emerges there from within, 
intoxicated by drinking the juice of the six elements [of the body].%% 


The one true oral instruction is the revelation of the highest reality. 


The teaching of the Krama is the sequence of states, namely that consciousness, 
flowing eternal like a river, manifests four states [in every cognition]: Emission, 


[Stasis, Withdrawal] and [the Nameless].586 


In two introductory verses the author first praises the sage Durväsas as the 
incarnation of Rudra (rwdrävatärah) and as the guiding light of this tradition, 


devyä tadà svadehas carur atra niveditah kulädhipateh. 

381 Kaulasütra, f. 317: kañcukatritayäpavarjanät svarüpaviskärah; {. Vätülanäthasütra 6: tri- 
kañcukaparityägän niräkhyapadävasthitihs Chummaäsamketaprakäsa, £. 6r6: bhütabhävanakañcu- 
kavilaye apäri anäkhya*gagani (em. : gamani Cod.) vi$ämu) ‘When the shrouds of the gross 
elements, subtle elements, and negation have dissolved there is rest in the limitless void of the 
Nameless. 

38 Kaulasütra, À. 3v1-2: dvädasamaricinäm priyameläpe näyakävastambhavicyutir ekäpayät 
samayalopajà cakrakhandanä; cf. the Chummäsamketaprakä$a’s Kathä of the Incomplete Cir- 
cle (khandacakrakathä), £. 5v1-2: pasari *pasari (conj. : pamari Cod.) militi *ciccakkasa (con. : 
miscakkasa Cod.) mañja bhuñjiti niju upabhogu | ye pallatia samvitti athakka ma ya fthijyo 
khandamarici*mahogu (conj. : sahogu Cod.) ‘The Mahaugha of the rays of the Khanda[cakra] 
comes about when after uniting within the cycle of consciousness in each flow [of cognition] 
and relishing their respective fields of experience they revert and so eliminate one [of their 
number]. 

38 Kaulasütra, f. 1v4 (the first Sütra): avicchinnam ovallikramäyätamaricisamkrämanam evaiko 
gurub. 

384 Kaulasätra, f. 1v7-8, following on the instruction on the opening of the boards of the 
manuscript: fatra saddhäturasapänamattäntas cakresvari vijrmbhate. 

38 Kaulasütra, f. 28: paratattvasäksätkära evaikà västavi kathä. 

386 Kaulasñtra, f. 3V8-—9: cito nadivat pravähanityäyäs catasrah srstyädidasà iti dasäkramah kra- 
märthah. 


Alexis Sanderson 349 


and then explains that he is putting into Sütra form both the Kaula teaching 
composed by Mauninätha and other disciples of Srinätha and the Kula teaching 
that was first revealed to Durväsas as Niskriya (Niskriyänandanätha) and then 
studied and propagated by Unmattanätha.*” The Kula teaching is no doubt 
that of the Chummaäsamketaprakäsa and the Värülanäthasütra. The former does 


388 à does 


indeed make Niskriyänandanätha an incarnation of sage Durväsas, 
the *Urraragharämnäya, since it refers to Niskriyänandanätha as Krodharäja ‘the 
King of Wrath” and Durväsas irascible nature is the salient characteristic of 
his mythology.*°? Moreover, it is probable that Bhattaéri-Sitikantha’s Unmatta- 
natha is none other than Vätülanätha under a synonym, both wnmatta- and 
vätüla- meaning ‘mad’. The identity of the Kaula teaching of Mauninätha and 
the other disciples of Srinätha is unknown to me. But it too is evidently in 
the same tradition of oral instruction, since the author refers to it as ‘beyond 
the six philosophical systems’, a distinctive characterization that is also seen in 
the Chummasamketaprakä$a and the commentary on the Värälanaäthasätra. *” 
Since the name Mauninätha means ‘the Silent Natha it is possible that Bhattaéri 
Sitikantha is referring to the Siddhanätha who initiated Niskriyänandanätha 
according to the frame-story of the Chummäsamketaprakä$a. For the salient 
feature of the latters account of that initiation is that Siddhanätha remained 
silent when questioned. 


387 Kaulasütra 1v2—4: OM saddarsanätirikte rthe sütradhärabhuvam $ritah | rudrävatäro 
durväsäh stüyate Spar$akämasüh | *yac chrinäthamukhäravindamadhupäh (yac chri em. : yas $ri 
niskriye prathitam apy unmattanäthah kulam samcarcy*ävir abhävayat (conj. : + + vabhävayat 
Cod.) sad ubhayam sûtrair mayä badhyate. 

388 Chummasamketaprakäsa, f. 13v5-6, vv.222c-223: yah sa eva puräham tu durväsä näma 
visrutah | yab präk präptamahäjñänah siddhanäthaprasädatah | sa eväham tu samjäto niskriyo 
vigatasprhah. 

389See above, footnote 63 on p. 252. 

30E.e. Jayadrathayämala, Satka 2, f. 2r-v: rudrämsu(h) krodhanas tiksno durväsa(h) siddha- 
püjitah; Mahäbhärata 7.10.9ab: durväsä näma viprarsis tathà paramakopanah; 15.38.2: tapasvi 
kopano vipro durväsä näma. In Säkta $aiva texts he is commonly referred to as Krodha- 
muni; see, e.g. Uttarämnäyayajñakrama {. \8v: HRIM $RIM KHPHREM VIRANÂTHAYA SVAHA HRIM 
$RIM KHPHREM DA$AKANTHAYA 2 HRIM $RIM KHPHREM KRODHAMUNINÂTHA(YA) 2; Manthäna- 
bhairava, Siddhakhanda, Ÿ. 467v3: iti krodhamuniviracitam mahädandakam samäptam; Vidyà- 
nanda, Mityäsodasikärnavärtharatnäval, p.222, 1. 18-19: frimatkrodhamunibhattäraka iti $ri- 
maddurväsasa eväbhidhänam. 

37 Chummasamketaprakäsa, f. 3x, 32c-33b: pravaksyämi mukhämnäyam yathà präptam yatha- 
kramam | darfanämnäyameläpavarjitam satatoditam; Vätälanäthasätravrtti, p. 2, IL. 1-7: sadda- 
réanacaturämnäyädimeläpaparyantasamastadarsanottirnam. 


350 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The dates of the oral instruction texts 


The dates of these texts are obscure. The author of the commentary on the 
Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäfa quotes à passage with Krama content from 
a Kulasütra,°? and this is probably the work of Bhattaéri-Sitikantha.** For 
though the Sütra quoted does not appear in the text as known to me, that text 
is incomplete and the Sütra is similar in style and content to others therein.°* 

As for the dates of the texts on the Chummäs and the Kathäs, they them- 
selves contain no quotations and the only quotations of them known to me 
are of the Chummaäsamketaprakä$a in the Vijñänabhairavavivrti of Siva[svämin] 
Upädhyäya I and the Gäyatrimantravivarana of Sivalsvämin] Upädhyäya Il. 
These are very late works. The former was written during the period 1754- 
1763, while Sukhajivana was the Pathans’ governor of Kashmir,*” and the lat- 
ter during the period 1819-1839, while Kashmir was under the rule of Ranjit 
Singh of Lahore.*°6 


372Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a, p. 60, I. 7-9: kulapithakseträdivarnapañcapindapranava- 
vyapadesyam akhiläbhäsakaräpäyà ahambhäväbhimatasamvidah samä$rayabhütam ätmäyatanam 
arïram ‘The body, termed kwlam, the Pitha, the holy site, the first letter (a), the Pañcapinda 
(KHPHREM), and Pranava (oM), is the temple of the self, being the support of the awareness, 
identified with I-consciousness, whose nature is that it manifests all [that appears to it]”. For the 
Krama% correlation of the body with 4, KHPHREM, and om see Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa 
2.5-6, 4.2, and the commentary on 5.1; also Mahänayaprakäsa (Triv.) 9.64. 

393] see no reason to identify Bhattaéri-Sitikantha with the author ofthe Old Kashmiri Maha- 
nayaprakä$a. RAsTOGI (1979, p. 220-221) takes this identity for granted, guided, it seems, by 
nothing more than their sharing a personal name. But this proves nothing. Moreover, when the 
author of the commentary on Mahänayaprakä$sa has cited the Kulasütra he has not attributed 
it, as we would expect him to do in accordance with convention if the author on whom he is 
commenting or he himself had written it, using such expressions as yad uktam anenaiva and 
yad uktam mayaiva. 

3ACF, e.g., Kaulasätra, f. 2V7-8: äamukhävabhäsamänam akhilam ahambhäväspadam vicärya- 
mänam na kimcid apy ahambhävavisayah ‘No locus of I-consciousness presented to [conscious- 
ness] remains, when contemplated, the object of that I-consciousness’; f. 5vl: zdrgdevatädhäre 
kule cämumdäyatanam mukham ‘In this body (kule) that is the abode of such deities, the mouth 
is the temple of Cimundà. 

3%Sce footnote 652 on p. 423. 

3%6$ee footnote 653 on p.423. The Chummäsamketaprakäsa is quoted but not named in 
the Wijñänabhairavavivrti, p.67, IL. 20-23: niskriyänandanäthas tu karäñkinyä iti pathati yatha: 
karäs trayodasäkäräh … (= vv. 99-100, except that the quotation has rirälambam param varam 
where the Ms gives nirälambam nirämayam [100d]). Sivasvämin Upädhyäya II quotes the work 
by name in his Gäyatrimantravivarana, $. \7v: yat kimcid vägräpam kathämätram saiva gäyatri. 
vannavibina niruttaru “khassaru (em. : khasmarana Cod.) jagasa mülapakiti gäyatra | *repha- 


Alexis Sanderson 351 


The Old Kashmiri Chummäs and verse Kathäs are also of unknown date. 
Their language alone, as we have seen, does not imply that they were composed 
long after the major works of Kashmirian exegesis; nor does the absence of quo- 
tations before the eighteenth century imply that they and the -samketaprakä$a 
were composed close to that time, since we have an insufficient body of works 
from the preceding centuries in which absence of evidence might amount to 
evidence of absence.*”” We can discern at least that their tradition is older than 
the author of the Trivandrum Mahänayaprakä$a, since its unknown author re- 
ports that he or possibly another had explained the Chummäs (samketäh) in 
another work. It is conceivable that the sets of these known to him were dis- 
tinct from those that have survived. However, the one example that he cites 
is indeed found in the collection given by Niskriyänandanätha. For he refers 
to the Chummäs as ‘drstanasta- and others (drstanastädi-) Ÿ’* and this is ev- 
idently the aphorism that appears as the last of the hundred and five in the 
Chummäsamketaprakä$a in the form ditto nirto (Skt. drstam nastam),®” which 
Niskriyänanda explains as meaning ‘As soon as [the differentiated world] is 
perceived it disappears’:*% Moreover, the same aphorism is surely alluded to 
in a verse from a hymn by a certain Räma quoted by Räjänaka Räma in his 
Spandavivrti and, in a Krama context, by Abhinavaguptas pupil Ksemaräja in 
his Pratyabhijnährdaya:“ 


takärahakäravikassaru (repha em. : reka Cod. e vikassaru em. : vikasmaru Cod.) vannacitra 
ciñceya vicitra iti chummäsamketaprakäse (Skt.: varnavihino niruttarah khasvaro jagato müla- 
prakrtir gäyatri. rephatakärahakäravikasvaro varnacitra *.….{[?] vicitrah). The Old Kashmiri verse 
is Kathä 21 (Chummäsamketaprakäsa, £. 8v). 

S7RasroGr (1979, pp. 224-225) assigns Bhattäraka, Anantaéakti, and, by implication, 
Niskriyänandanätha to the period À.Db. 1700-1750. His reasoning, as far as one can detect 
it, is spurious. It appears to be that the works of Niskriyänandanätha and Bhattäraka must 
be of late origin because only Sivopädhyäya has mentioned them, and that Anantaéakti must 
belong to the same period because his and Niskriyänandanäthas works have similar contents. 
The precision of the period assigned is reached by substracting 25 years (one generation) from 
the date of Sivopädhyäya. 

38 Mahänayaprakä$a (Triv.) 1.34abc: drstanastädisamketakathämaätrasya marma yat | tat pra- 
pañcitam anyatra; 1.21cd: *drstanastädisamketakathämäträt prakäsate (drstanastädi em. : drstä- 
drstädi Ed. e mäträt prakäsate con). : mäträtra käsate Ed.). 

39 Chummäsamketaprakäsa, f. 1316: ditto natto (em. : dibbo nibbo Cod.). The reading of the 
manuscript is meaningless. The emendation proposed follows Niskriyänandanätha’s explana- 
tion in wv.214-215b, for which see p. 337. 

#00For his gloss on this Chummä see p. 337. 

401 Spandavivrti, p.135 (yad uktam stotre:) and Pratyabhijñährdaya on 11, p.25: (yathoktam 
$rirämena:) samädhivajrenäpy anyair abhedyo bhedabhüdharah | parämrstas ca nastas ca tvad- 


bhaktibalasälibhih. 


352 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The mountain of differentiated reality that others have not split even with the 
thunderbolt of Yogic trance disappears as soon as it is perceived by those em- 
powered by devotion to you. 


#02 this indicates a posterior 


Since Räjänaka Räma was a pupil of Utpaladeva, 
limit for some form at least of this aphoristic tradition around the middle of 


the tenth century. 


ABHINAVAGUPTA’S WORKS ON THE KRAMA 


Abhinavagupta composed a commentary (-vivrti) entitled Kramakeli on Eraka’s 
Kramastotra. No manuscript of this has come to light, in spite of claims that one 
exists or existed in a private collection in Srinagar.“® At present we have access 
only to a few quotations. The longest of these, given by Jayaratha in his Zantra- 
lokaviveka,*% is the source of the information given above that Sivänanda- 
nâtha (Jñänanetranätha) transmitted his teaching to Keyüravati, Madanikä, 
and Kalyänikä, that these jointly initiated Govindaräja, Bhänuka, and Eraka, 
and that the last was the author of the Kramastotra on which he is comment- 
ing. It also tells us that unlike Eraka, Govindaräja and Bhänuka abjured the 


#02 Spandavivrti, p.169, 1L5-7: sadvidyäsarasivibhäsamavarasphärotpaloccasayaprotsarpat- 
paripakvabodhamadhupenedam mayägäyi yat | rämenänupamapramodamadhuram baddhä- 
vadhänasya tac chrotuh kasya na cetanasya tanute vifräntim antah paräm'T, Räma have sung this 
[song] sweet with incomparable joy after drinking the nectar of the mature understanding that 
flows forth from the exalted mind of Utpala, that emanation [of enlightened consciousness] 
that is the finest pearl in the ocean of $iva’s wisdom. On what conscious being who hears it 
with fixed attention will it not bestow the ultimate inner rest?”. I have translated -paripakva- 
bodhamadhupena here as ‘after drinking the nectar of the mature understanding’; but the word 
madhupah ‘nectar-drinker is established by convention in the meaning ‘bee’. This undermines 
the possibility that the author wishes only to tell us that he has studied the works of Utpala 
rather than sat at his feet; for the metaphor of the pupil as a bee drinking the nectar of his 
teachers knowledge is too common for this choice of words to have been apt if the author 
were not Utpala® direct disciple. The final colophon too asserts this pupilage. 

403$ee Rasrocr 1979, p. 164, footnote 2, reporting that in 1963 Pandit Dinanäth Yach told 
him that a manuscript of the Kramakeli was in the possession of Somnäth Räzdän of Purshyar, 
Habba Kadal, Srinagar, but that the latter declined even to show it. 

#04 Tanträlokaviveka on 4.173ab, vol. 3, pp. 192, 1.4-193, L. 11, following the words yad 
uktam tatraivänena yathä. For this passage and a translation see footnotes 131 on p.273, 133 
on p.274, and 405 on p. 353. Other citations or reports of its contents: Parätrifikävivarana 
p.267, L. 5 (Ed. p. 236, IL. 13-14); Ksemaräja, Sivasrorrävalivivrti, p. 159, IL. 16-18; Tanträloka- 
viveka on 4.149, vol. 3, p. 162, IL. 6-7; and Mahärthamañjariparimala pp. 100, 1. 26-101, 1.7; 
p.122, 1.22; p.150, IL. 10-13; and p. 183, IL. 19-20. 


Alexis Sanderson 353 


quest for supernatural powers, devoting the rest of their lives to the instruction 
of disciples, that Govindaräja initiated a guru called Somänanda, who is evi- 
dently other than the famous author of the Sivadrsti, and that Bhänuka was the 
source of a lineage which passing through Ujjata, Udbhata, and a number of 
other unnamed teachers bestowed initiation on Abhinavagupta himself. 
Although little of this work has survived one striking feature of it emerges 
from Jayaratha’s commentary on the Zanträloka. The Kramastotra taught that 
there were thirteen Kälis in the phase of the Nameless, and this is in accor- 
dance with what we see in the Xä/ïkulapañcasataka, the Kälikästotra of Jhäna- 
netranätha, and the three texts with the title Mahänayaprakä$a, indeed in all 
the works considered here except the K%/ïkulakramasadbhäva, which stands 
apart by teaching the worship of seventeen Kälis in this phase.“ Vet Abhinava- 
gupta presents a text of the Kramastotra that teaches only twelve, lacking 
Sukäli between Yamakalï (the fifth) and Mrtyukalï (the seventh). This revision, 


49 Tanträlokaviveka on 4.173ab, vol. 3, pp. 192, L.10-193, L.1: saträdyah präptopadesa 
evaivam manasy akärsid etävaty adhigate kim idänim krtyam astiti. ittham ca nisthitamanàä yäva- 
jjivam upanatabhogätivähanamätravyäpära etadvijnänopadeapätra “isyopadesapravanah (Sisyo- 
padesa em. : Sistopadesa Ed.) arïiräntam pratyaiksista. sa cedam rahasyam $risomänandäbhidhä- 
näya gurave samcärayäm babhüva. dvitiyo py evam ästa. tasyaiva caisà *rimadujjatodbhatädinä- 
nâäguruparipätisamtatir (ujjatodbhatädi conj. : ujjatodbhattädi Ed.) yatprasädäsäditamahimabhir 
asmäbhir etat pradarsitam ‘Of these [three disciples] the first[, Govindaräja,] realized that now 
that he had gained all this knowledge nothing remained for him to achieve, and having decided 
this he waited for death, engaging in such action as was necessary to carry to completion the 
experience already in train [as the fruition of his past actions], and devoting himself to instruct- 
ing such disciples as were fit to be taught this knowledge. He transmitted this esoteric teaching 
to a Guru called Somänanda. The second{, Bhänuka,] passed his time in the same way. It is 
from him that has descended this line of a number of successive Gurus beginning with Uijjata 
and Udbhata, by the grace of which I have been exalted [by initiation] and have given this 
explanation’. The rest of this quotation from the Kramakeli is given here in footnotes 131 on 
p.273 and 133 on p.274. It is unlikely that the Somänanda mentioned in this passage is the 
famous Guru of Utpaladeva and author of the Sivadrsti, since if it were the form in which he 
refers to him would have been more reverential. For whenever Abhinavagupta mentions him 
in his other prose works he affixes the respectful -p444h to his name. 

#06 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p. 190, IL 4-6: …frikramasadbhävabhattärake anäkhyacakre 
saptadasa devyah püjyatvenoktäh. The seventeen are Srstikäli, Sthitikäl, Samhärakäli, Rakta- 
käli, Sukäli, Yamakäli, Mrtyukäli, Bhadrakälï, Paramärkakäli, Märtandakäli, Kälägnirudrakäli, 
Mahäkälakäli, Krsakäli, Sarväntakäli, Sivakali, Krodhakäli, and Mahäbhairavaghoracandagra- 
sanakälï. This comprises the thirteen Kälis that make up the circle of the Nameless in the K%4- 
kulapañcasataka with the addition of the four Kälis given here in bold characters. See SANDER- 
son forthcoming 4 for the textual evidence for these names. 


354 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


7 was achieved, 


whose metaphysical significance has been considered above,“ 
by Abhinavagupta or a predecessor, by expunging the reading swkälim in the 
verse devoted to that Kälï and putting bhavänim in its place, a non-specific 
name of the Goddess that enabled the verse to be read as a second on Yamakäli, 
the deity who immediately precedes Sukal. 

To the objection that this disrupts the pattern of the hymn, which devotes 
only one verse to each Käli, Jayaratha responds that there is no such pattern, 
since there is also a second verse devoted to Kälägnirudrakäli. To the rejoinder 
that the verse in question is an interpolation, no doubt intended to undermine 
the argument from pattern, Jayaratha replies that he has seen it in Hrasvanätha’s 
autograph of his commentary on the hymn and, as though conscious that this 
alone is insufficient to disprove the claim that it is an interpolation, adds that 
there are so many variants in the text of the hymn found in the various com- 
mentaries on it, affecting not only individual words throughout the text but 
also the order of verses, that the opponent has no reason other than prejudice 
(pradvesah) to reject Abhinavaguptas bhavänim. He ends his tendentious ar- 
gument by insisting that it is impossible to adjudicate between the readings 
sukälim and bhavänim on purely textual grounds and that the decision to pre- 
fer the latter has therefore to be based on his inherited tradition of instruction 
(gurüpadesah). 

This last argument refers back to the claim that the tradition of twelve was 
that received by the three disciples Govindaräja, Bhänuka, and Eraka. To the 
objection that Jñänanetranätha himself taught that there were thirteen in his 
Kälikästotra and that therefore this tradition can only be an unwarranted de- 
viation in a branch of his spiritual descendants, Jayaratha replies that in fact 
Jhänanetranatha taught both twelve and thirteen in that work, so that both tra- 
ditions are valid options. That argument is empty, since the verse on the twelve 
states that the Goddess manifests twelve divisions while remaining grounded in 


h.%8 Since Jayaratha does not 


her own nature, which is evidently the thirteent 
cite any textual evidence that the tradition of twelve occurs earlier in this line 
of transmission—he would surely have done so if any were available, since that 
would greatly have strengthened his position as Abhinavaguptas defender —one 
is bound to suspect that all this is special pleading to justify a major innovation. 
The fact that he can cite a passage from “scripture” (ägamah) that appears to 


list only twelve Kälis would at least show that Abhinavaguptas view has a basis 


407$ee footnote 271 on p.315. 
208 Klikästotra, £. 90v5—91r1 (v. 5). For text and translation see footnote 125 on p.272. 


Alexis Sanderson 355 


in the tradition of the Kälikula if not in that deriving from Jñänanetranätha. 
However, even if the passage is genuine and earlier than Abhinavagupta, I sus- 
pect that it has been modified to serve this purpose. The first line, giving the 
parts of the first six names that proceed -kälï reads yat srstisthitisamhäraraktais 
ca yamamrtyubhih, which provides Srstikäli, Sthitikalr, Samhärakäli, Raktakäli, 
Yamakäli, and Mrtyukäli; but the conjunction ca is out of place and, more 
significant, the compound yamamrtyubhih has a plural ending rather than the 
dual it requires. The anomalies arose, I suspect, by dropping -s4- for Sukälï after 
yama- and then inserting the redundant conjunction to restore the metre (— 
-raktair yamasumrtyubhih), with the ungrammatical plural left in place as an 
instance of the deviations from standard Sanskrit that mark the Saiva scriptural 
(aia-) register of the language. “°° 

The deletion of Sukäli is not the only respect in which Abhinavaguptas 
account of the Kälis of the phase of the Nameless differs in his Xramakeli from 
the tradition of the Krama proper. He has also taught that their true order is 
other than that in which they are given in the scriptural account followed by 
the Xramastotra. Jayaratha explains that the conventional order is that of their 
worship (päjäkramah) and that it has been designed to conceal the natural order 
in which they unfold in the process of cognition (samvitkramah). Abhinava- 
gupta has not changed the sequence of the verses of the hymn, but Jayaratha 
reports that he has made clear the true order, that in cognition rather than 
worship, through various statements in his commentary, telling us, for example, 
after his explanation of the verse on Srstikali (1) that one must understand that 


in reality the Käli that follows her is not Sthitikali (2) but Raktakalï (4).1° 


49This elaborate defence of Abhinavaguptas doctrine of the twelve Kälis is set out in Tanträ- 
lokaviveka, vol. 3, pp. 189, L. 1-203, L. 11. The quotation cited as scriptural evidence for the 
doctrine of twelve Kälis is on p. 191, Il. 12-15. If the plural ending in the compound yama- 
mrtyubhih could be passed off as an element of the scriptural register of Sanskrit, then, it may 
be argued, there is no reason to consider the line suspect. However, while explicable as a reflex 
of the underlying vernacular—in all MA and N1A languages the dual was defunct— the use of 
the plural for the dual is very rare in Saiva literature in any context and I have noted no instance 
of its use in a Dvandva compound as here. 

#0 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p. 162, Il. 3-7: ata evägamaikasaranataya pravrtte pi Srikramastotre 
grantha*krtä (em. : krtäm Ed.) samvitkramam eva pradarsayitum tadvivrtau srisrstikälyädistuti- 
#lokavyäkhyänänantaram ‘friraktakälyà bhagavatyà atah param sthitih sambhävyate ityädy uktam 
‘I is for this reason that although the Kramastotra proceeds in complete dependence on scrip- 
ture [our] author has made various statements in his commentary on it after his explanation 
of verses of the hymn devoted to Srstikäli and the other [goddesses], in order to reveal [their 
true] order in cognition. Thus, for example, he has said [after his commentary on the verse 


356 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Abhinavaguptas departure from the mainstream Krama tradition in his 
treatment of the Kälis of the phase of the Nameless would indeed be some- 
what surprising if it had been formulated from within that tradition. However, 
in spite of Jayaratha’s insistence we lack clear evidence that it was. There is no 
good reason to doubt Abhinavaguptas claim that he had received initiation 
and instruction in the Krama at some point in his career; but since his surviv- 
ing Saiva exegesis is overwhelmingly in the context of the Trika and since his 
presentation of that system is deeply imprinted with elements of the Krama it 
is probable that some or all of his Krama work should be seen as work from 
within the territory of the Trika, work which being outside the authority of the 
Krama proper could adjust and rearrange Krama elements for its own purpose, 
as in this matter of the number of the Kälis of the phase of the Nameless. 

Abhinavagupta also wrote a Kramastotra, a hymn to $iva in thirty verses 
on the subject of true worship as the contemplation of the energetic nature of 
consciousness as manifest in the Kälis of the Krama’s phase of the Nameless. 
Here we see the revised number and order of the Kälis in full. There is a further 
novelty in his referring to the holder of these powers (4ktimän) under the name 
Manthäna-.“!! This is no doubt the Manthänabhairava that his pupil Ksemaräja 
places in this role.“!? I know of no scriptural authority of the Krama that makes 
Manthänabhairava Lord of its Kälis. But perhaps the source of this variant is 
the Kalpa of the Mahälaksmimata which ends the fourth Saska of the Jayad- 
rathayämala. For there Bhairava is visualized as Manthäna- at the centre of the 


array of Saktis, the innermost circuit of which does indeed consist of twelve.‘13 


on Srstikäli]: “It is implied that the position immediately after [her] is that of the goddess 
Raktakälr”. 

HT Kramastotra 28: anargalasvätmamaye mahese tisthanti yasmin vibhusaktayas täh | tam $akti- 
mantam pranamämi devam manthänasamiñam jagadekasäram. 

#2 Sivasñtravimarsini, pp, 26, 1. 14-27, 1.7; Spandanirnaya, p. 6, I. 5-9. 

#5 Jayadrathayämala, Satka 4, f.222r3-v3 (Mahälaksmimate cakradevyutpattimantroddhära- 
patalah, vv. 10-23): 10 adr$yavigrahäc chäntäc chivaäc chaktih samuithitä | sà ca dvädasa- 
bhedena samsthitä cakrabhedatah | 11 madhye sthitam mahädevam bhairavam vikrtänanam | 
fuddhasphatikasamkä$am tuhinädrisamaprabham | 12 sitakundenduvarnäbham $añkhagoksira- 
pâänduram | damsträkarälavadanam mahogram bhrkutimukham | 13 ärdhvakesam viräpäksam 
nâgayajñopavitinam | sarväbharanasamyuktam sarpagonäsamanditam | 14 suväsam krtti- 
vasanam gajacarmämbarävrtam | pañcavaktram dasabhujam tripañcanayanair yutam | 15 
kapälakhatväñgadharam khadgakhetakadhärinam | $aracäpakaravyagram fülapattisadhärinam | 
16 varadäbhayahastam ca nandantam $aktimadhyatah | kim tu raktamayam devam manthäna- 
tvena samsthitam | 17 kusumbharajasamkäsam dädimi*kusumäñcitam (em. : kusumärci- 
tam) | jätyähiñgulakaprakhyam nitambonnatapivaram (conj. : nitambatamuttamam Cod.) | 


Alexis Sanderson 357 


These are the twelve Yogeévaris that form the retinue of Para in the Trika, but 
Abhinavagupta considers these and the twelve Kälis of the Krama to be identical 
in nature‘! and this, after all, is a text of the Kälikula. 

The Krama also plays a role in his Bhagavadgitärthasamgraha, as the source 
of his interpretation of the Gitd's innermost meaning. Thus, for example:*! 


[In 11.18c Väsudeva is called] sättvatadharmagoptä ‘concealer of the religious 
practice of the Sättvatas. The Sättvatas are [so called in the meaning that they 
are] those who possess s4r-. Here s45- means (1) the truth (satyam) of the absence 
of any manifestation of distinction between the two [powers,] cognition and 
action and (2) the reality that is the light [of all], namely Being (swrrä). Their 
practice (dharmah), which transcends all other paths, is that of projecting and 
withdrawing. For they are constantly absorbed in [observing] the grasping and 
transcendence [by consciousness of its contents]. It is this that he conceals. I 
have given a more thorough analysis of the esoteric teaching (rahasyam) given 
in this chapter [of the Gzrä] in my commentary on the Devistotra. 


Thus Abhinavagupta takes the term satrvatäh here not in the common sense, in 
which it refers to Vaisnava devotees of Väsudeva, but to denote those engaged 
in the most esoteric of Saiva practices. That he means the Krama is indicated 
not only by the nature of the practice but also by his use of the term r7hasyam 
to refer to it. For we find the same term used elsewhere in this commentary in 
Krama contexts:116 


The deväh [here] are the functions of the senses, [called 4eväh] because it is their 
nature to play,*!7 [that is to say] the Karaneévaris, the goddesses well-known in 
the Rahasyagastra. 


18 ribaddhamekhalädämaghargharävalimanditam | manibhüsana$obhädhyam $iropädädibhis 
tathà | 19 suvesam vesasampannam divyagandhänulepanam | mahälävanyasamyuktam kimcid- 
vibasitänanam | 20 icchärüpadharam devam pare ksirärnave sthitam | devyäh svarüpasamyuktà 
*vähanäsvädisamyutäh (vähanäsvädi conj. : vähanäsvädi Cod) | 21 dvädasäre mahädevi frnu 
nâämän yathärthatah | siddhi(r) rddhis tathà laksmï dipti(r) maälà fivà tathà | 22 sumukhi 
*vänari (em. : cämari Cod.) nandà harikesï hayänanà | vifvefi ca samäkhyätä yogesvaryo 
mahäbaläh | 23 dvädasasvarabhedena samsthitä($) cakramadhyatah. 

HA Maälinivijayottara 20.46—47; Tanträloka 3.251-254b, citing the Trikasära. 

#15 Bhagavadgitärthasamgraha, pp. 118, 1. 18-119, 1. 5: sättvatadharmagopteti sat satyam kriyä- 
jñänayor ubhayor api bhedäpratibhäsätmakam tathà sattätmakam prakäfaripam tattvam vidy- 
ate yesäm te sättvatäh. tesäm dharmah anavaratagrahanasamnyäsaparatvät srstisamhäravisayah 
sakalamärgottirnah. tam gopäyate. etad eväträdhyäye rahasyam präyaso devistotravivriau mayä 
prakäsitam. 

#16 Bhagavadgitärthasamgraha, p.34, I.7-8 on 3.1la (devän bhävayata ‘contemplate the 
Devas”): deväh kridanasilàä indriyavrttayah karanesvaryo devatà rahasyasästraprasiddhäh. 

#17He alludes to a semantic analysis of devah ‘god’ from the root div ‘to play (divu kridäyäm) in 


358 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


and:'8 


But for those who know the Rahasya the meaning is as follows: the supreme 
ego-factor that exists beyond the intellect is the ultimate non-duality that is the 
non-dualistic awareness that everything is oneself. 


Here he alludes to the Doayasampattivärtika of the Krama Guru 
Hrasvanätha/Vämanadatta:*!°? 


Beyond the level of the intellect is this level of the ego-factor. This whole uni- 
verse is pervaded by it. It is this when penetrated that bestows liberation. 


which itself alludes to the Krama practice of penetrating through the ego-factor 
that comes to the fore in the märticakram into the ego-less non-duality that 
unfolds in the vrndacakram. The use of the term Rahasya to denote the Krama 
is also seen in the works of Ksemaräja.“?° 

That Abhinavagupta read the esoteric teachings of the Gr in terms of the 
Krama is confirmed by the South Indian Mahesvaränanda. At the end of his 
Mabärthamañjari he claims that when Krsna revealed his awesome cosmic form 
to Arjuna in the climax of the events narrated in the Gzà he did so while ex- 
periencing the timeless state of identity with Kälasamkarsani embodied in her 
seventeen-syllable Vidyä, that it was this state, the ultimate of the Krama, that 
he transmitted to Arjuna in order to rouse him from his reluctance to go to war 


accordance with the first of the meanings of that root listed in 4.1 ofthe Paninian Dhätupätha: 
divu kridävijigisävyavahäradyutistutimodasvapnakäntigatisu. See also Tanträloka 1.101—104b, in 
which he shows following the lost Sivatanusastra of Brhaspati how the word devah is appropriate 
to that which it denotes (anvarthah) in the first five and the last of these nine meanings. 

18 Bhagavadgitärthasamgraha, p. 44, I. 9-11 on 3.48a (evam buddheh param buddhva ‘having 
thus realized that which is beyond the intellect): rahasyavidäm tv ayam äsayah. buddher yah 
paratra vartate paro hamkärah Sarvam aham’ ity abhedätmä sa khalu paramo ‘bhedah. 

#9 Doayasampattivartika À, f. 8r18—19; B, f. Gr8 (v. 5): ahamkäramayi bhümir buddhibhümer 
par hi sà | tayä vyäptam idam sarvam saiva vyäptà vimuktida. 

#20$ee, e.g., Spandanirnaya, p.7, 5-6: tat khecaryñrdhvamärgastham vyomavämesigocaram iti 
rabasyanityà ‘in accordance with the position of the Rahasya [stated in] “That is in the domain 
of Vyomavämesvari in the path above Khecarÿ’; p. 20, Il. 20-23: yady api rahasyadrstau na kascij 
jadah karanavargo ti api tu vijñänadehäh karanesvarya eva vijrmbhante tathäpiha suprasiddha- 
pratityanusärenopadesyah kramena rahasyärthopadese nupravesya ity evam uktam ‘He has put the 
matter in these terms with the thought that although there is no “inert group of faculties” in 
the Rahasya doctrine—on the contrary [in that doctrine] the goddesses of the faculties manifest 
themselves as embodiments of consciousness—the student may be introduced to the teaching 
of the Rahasya doctrine indirectly by starting from the well-established [non-esoteric] under- 
standing [of their nature]. 


Alexis Sanderson 359 


with his own kin, and that it is this revelation that is the basis of all the Gzra's 
eighteen chapters.“?! He ends his exposition by appealing to the authority of 
“the renowned Abhinavaguptaæ”, saying that had explained all this at length in 
his Kramakeli “2? 

As for the commentary on the Devistotra, this has not come to light; but 
that it too was a work with Krama content is apparent from the context in 
which Abhinavagupta has referred to it in the passage in his commentary on 
the Gää translated above, namely as the source of a detailed exposition of his 
view that the eleventh chapter of that text, in which Krsna reveals his cosmic 
form, is in fact conveying the Esoteric Teaching (Rahasya) [of the Kramal]. Since 
Mahe$varänanda has reported that Abhinavagupta did exactly this in his Kra- 
makeli, we may wonder whether the commentary on the Devistotra is not the 
Kramakeli under another name. For the Kramastotra is indeed a devistotram, 
‘a hymn to the Goddess’, and it would somewhat surprising if Abhinavagupta 
had presented the same view of the Gita in detail in two separate works.“ 


ABHINAVAGUPTA AND BHÜTIRAJA 


These works belong to an early phase of Abhinavaguptas Saiva exegesis. The 
simplicity of the Bhagavadgitärthasamgraha, the narrow range of the sources 


SL Mahärthamañjari 70: enam cea mahattham jutthärambhammi panduuttassa | cholaha- 
sahassasatti devo uvadisaï mädhavo tti sivam (=Skt. enam eva mahärtham yuddhärambhe 
panduputrasya sodasasahasrasaktir deva upadisati mädhava iti fivam) ‘Y is exactly this Mahärtha 
that the god Mädhava with the sixteen thousand powers teaches to Arjuna at the beginning 
of the battle. [May this work, now completed bestow] salvation [on all]”; Mahärthamañjari- 
parimala ad loc., p.177, IL. 6-10: am enam eva sodasasahasrasaktih sodasädhikäviläsalaksanam 
akälakalitam $rikälasamkarsanïibhävam anubhavan .….arjunasyopadisati upädiksad iti yävat ‘He 
who possesses sixteen thousand Saktis teaches, that is to say, taught, this same [Mahärtha] 
to Arjuna while experiencing that identity with Kälasamkarsani that is the effulgence of the 
seventeen[-syllable Vidyä] and unaffected by time’; and p. 179, L. 15-16: eat sarvaträstädasa- 
dhyäyänusyñtam añgänñgibhävabhañgyà ‘This [teaching] pervades all the eighteen Adhyäyas [of 
the Gi] in the sense that it is principal and everything else ancillary to it. 

#2 Mahärthamañjariparimala, p.183, 1. 19-20: etad vitatya *vikhäte (conij. ; vikhyätaih Ed.) 
kramakelau kulägame | näthäbhinavaguptäryaih paryälocitam ädarat. 

#3K. C. PanDey has asserted (1963, p.40) that the hymn on which Abhinavagupta com- 
mented was the Devistotra attributed to the ninth-century Kashmirian poet and poetician 
ÂAnandavardhana. But that is implausible, since that Devistotra is Pauränika in content and 
style rather than Tantric. 


360 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


cited in it, and its authors modesty, ‘2 point to this conclusion, and, as we 
have seen, the Devistotravivarana is even earlier. 2° Moreover, at the time that 
Abhinavagupta wrote his commentary on the Gïfä it was Bhütiräja that he 
acknowledged as his Guru.“ That he was still early in his scholarly career at 
that time is consonant with the fact that Bhütiräja had also been the Guru 
of his father Cukhulaka (/Narasimhagupta).“? His Kramastotra, the earliest 
of his dated works, was composed in A.p. 991, twenty-four years before his 
Gvarapratyabhijñavivrtivimarsin. #8 As for the Kramakeli, 1 have pointed to 
the possibility that it is none other than the Devistotravivarana cited in the 
Bhagavadgitärthasamgraha and therefore among his earliest works; but we can 
say with certainty only that Abhinavagupta wrote it before he composed the 
Parätrisikävivarana, the second of his surviving works on the Trika, since that 
cites it. 42 


#4For this modesty see, e.g., p.51, L. 22-52, 1. 3: ity anena Slokena vaksyamänais ca Slokaih 
paramarahasyam upanibaddham. tac cäsmäbhir mitabuddhibhir api yathäbuddhi yathägurv- 
ämnäyam ca vivrtam. mukhasampradäyam antarena naitan nabha$citram iva cittam upärobatiti 
na vayam upälambhantyäh ‘The highest esoteric truth has been formulated in this and the verses 
that follow, and I, though of limited understanding, have explained it in accordance with that 
understanding and the tradition received from my teacher. I ask you not to find fault with me, 
for this leaves no impression in the mind, like a picture painted in the sky, unless one receives 
the tradition through oral instruction [by a Guru’. 

#25$ee p.357. 

26 Bhagavadgitärthasamgraha, p.186, concluding verses, 1-2: man kätyäyano ‘bhüd vara- 
rucisadr$ah prasphuradbodhatrptas tadvamsälamkrto yah sthiramatir abhavat sausukäkhyo #tivid- 
vâän | viprah $ribhätiräjas tadanu samabhavat tasya sûnur mahätmä yenämi sarvalokäs tamasi 
nipatitäh proddhrtàä bhänuneva | 2 taccaranakamalamadhupo bhagavadgitärthasamgraham 
vyadhät | abhinavah *saddvijalotakakrtacodanävasät (‘saddvija corr. : sadvija Ed.) ‘There was 
an illustrious [scholar called] Kätyäyana, the equal of Vararuci himself. Adorned by descent 
from him was Sau$uka, a brahmin of firm resolve and exceptional learning. After him came 
his son, the holy Bhütiräja, who like the sun has rescued so many that were sunk in darkness. 
Abhinavagupta, a drinker of the nectar of the lotuses that are his feet, has composed [this] 
Bhagavadgitärthasamgraha, at the urging of the pious brahmin Lotaka’. 

27 Jévarapratyabhijñävivrtivimarsini, vol. 3, p.405, IL 16-19: bhaträtriguptakulajätavaräha- 
guptajannäbhavac cukhulakah fivamärganisthah | $ribhätiräjavadanoditasambhusästratattväm- 
fusätitasamastabhavändhakärah ‘Cukhulaka, son of Varähagupta, a descendant of the lineage of 
Bhatta Atrigupta, devoted to the path of Siva, all the darkness of his bound existence completely 
dispelled by the essence of the reality of $iva’s teachings transmitted to him by the venerable 
Bhütiräja .….”. 

#28$ee footnote 597 on p. 411. 

#2%See Parätrisikävivarana, p.267, 1.5: vyäkhyätam caitan mayä tattikäyäm eva kramakelau 
vistaratah ‘l have explained this at length in the Kramakeli, my commentary on that text’. 


Alexis Sanderson 361 


The *Xramavamsävali reports that Bhütiräja, whom it identifies as one of 
the pupils of Cakrabhänu, taught the Krama to Abhinavagupta. This adds 
weight to the view that in the period during which Abhinavagupta wrote the 
Bhagavadgitärthasamgraha the Krama was indeed central to his Saivism. Ja- 
yaratha rejects the report. But his reason for doing so is simply that he con- 
siders it to be inconsistent with Abhinavaguptas adherence to the doctrine of 
the twelve Kälis. For he insists that Cakrabhänu did not teach this doctrine 
to any of his disciples, citing as his evidence the fact that Cakrabhänu’s teach- 
ing on this matter was still widely attested in Kashmir in the lineages derived 
from him, and adding that the author ofthe *Kremavamsävali himself confirms 
that Bhütiräja practised à different order of worship by writing that this Guru 
and his successors followed the X%/kulapañcasataka, which, like Cakrabhänu, 
teaches thirteen Kälis in the phase of the Nameless:#° 


And therefore we should reject as pure invention the claims of Gurus in our time 
who being ignorant that Abhinavaguptas preceptorial lineage is as it is [stated in 
the Kramakeli] have made, for example, the following assertion: “Another dis- 
ciple of Cakrabhänu was the Âcärya called Bhütiräja, who was the Guru of the 
Guru Abhinavagupta in the Kälinaya”. For Cakrabhänu never gave this teaching 
[seen in the Xramakeli] to any of his disciples, since we can see with hundreds 
[of Gurus] even today that a different teaching derives from him. Moreover, in 
that same [*Kramavamsävali] you yourself have attested that Bhütiräja’s order 
of worship in this [phase] differs, when you write there: “Bhütiräja and his suc- 
cessors, having adopted the doctrine of the Devipañcasataka .….”. If you hold 
that only twelve goddesses are required to be worshipped [by that text] in this 
[phase], then fit is clear that] you do not even know what it is that the Devr- 
pañcasataka teaches. So go. Ask your Guru. Why should I enlighten [you]? 


But this argument is inconclusive, since it rests on the dubious assumption that 
Abhinavagupta could not have adjusted the tradition of the Krama but must 


On the order in which Abhinavagupta composed his surviving works on the Trika (Mälini- 
vijayavärtika— Parätrisikävivarana— Tanträloka— Tantrasära) see SANDERSON 2005a, p. 124, 
footnote 88. 

830 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.193, 1. 13-p. 194, L. 8 : atas cäsyaivam gurukramam ajänänair 
adyatanaih ‘Sribhätiräjanämäpy äcäryas cakrabhänusisyo nyah | abhinavaguptasya guror yasya hi 
kälinaye gurutà” ityädi yad uktam tat svotpreksitam evety upeksyam. na hi fricakrabhänunä präyah 
kasyacid apy evam upadistam tanmülatayaivedänim *“anyasyopadesasya (conj. : asyopadesasya Ed.) 
Sata$o darsanät. taträpi câtra fribhütiräjasyänyathà püjäkrama iti “devipañcasatäsayam äfritya ca 
bhütiräjapürvänäm” ity abhidadhadbhir bhavadbhir evoktam. athätra dvädasaiva devyah püjy- 
atayà sthità ity abhipretam bhavatas tarhi fripañcasatikärtham api na jäniïse. tad gaccha. svagurum 
precha. kim asmadäviskrtena. 


362 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


have inherited his teaching from his predecessors. Jayaratha has in any case over- 
looked a passage that he himself has cited elsewhere from an unidentified lost 
work by Abhinavagupta. In that Abhinavagupta tells us that he is the inheritor 
of the “glorious lineage of the Siddhas from the Bhattärikä to Bhüti”. This can 
only be the lineage of the Krama, since no other tradition in this environment 
claims to have descended from a woman. The Bhattärikaä, then, is Manñgalä; and 
Bhüti is surely a bhimavat abbreviation for Bhütiraja.“! 

That Bhütiräja was indeed a Guru of the Krama, as the *Kramavamsavali 
reports, is indicated by two citations. Abhinavagupta himself quotes him in 
his Zantrasära for his metaphysical analysis of the meaning of the name Käli 
from the root ka/ in the meanings ‘to project’ and ‘to know’ ,“? and Maheévara- 
nanda quotes him in his Mahärthamañjariparimala as saying that the Mantra 
is identical with the Goddess herself because it emerges in its real nature by 
drawing all consciousness into itself.#? That this is the Goddess of the Krama 
is apparent from the context of the citation. He cites this remark immediately 
after citing a statement to the same effect from the Xramakeli: “The Mantra is 
identical with the Goddess herself, namely this sacred consciousness (bhagavati 
samvit) that has the nature described”; and the nature to which he refers is 
that stated in a line of the Xramastotra cited by Maheévaränanda immediately 
before this citation, implying that the latter is a comment on the former:* 


The Mantra rises radiant with the dissolution that is the [all-consuming] fire of 


81 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 1, pp. 28, 1. 18-29, 1.9 (on 1.9: jayati gurur eka eva $risrikantho 


bhuvi prathitah | tadaparamürtir bhagavän mahesvaro bhütiräjas ca ‘Victorious is $rikantha, 
manifest on earth as the unique Guru, and his embodiment{s] the venerable Mahesvara 
and Bhütiräja’): ...mahefvara iti yah $risamtatyardhatraiyambakäkhyamathikayor gurutayäne- 
nänyatroktah paramesa itifa iti ca. yad äha: bhattärikädibhütyantah $rimän siddhodayakra- 
mah | bhattädiparamesäntah $risamtänodayakramah | $frimän bhattädir i$äntah paramo ‘tha 
gurukramah | trikarñpas trikärthe me dhiyam vardhayatämtaräm ‘Mahe$vara [here] is the per- 
son he has identified in another work as his Guru in the $risamtäna and Ardhatraiyambaka 
lineages under the names Paramega and Ïa. As he states [there]: “May this threefold Guru lin- 
eage greatly increase my understanding of the teachings of the Trika: (1) the glorious lineage 
of the Siddhas, from the Bhattärikä to Bhüti, (2) the glorious lineage of the $risamtäna, from 
the Bhatta to Paramesa, and (3) the supreme lineage from the Bhatta to Î$a””. 

82 Tantrasära, p. 30, Il. 15-17. 

#83 Maharthamañjariparimala, p. 122, 1.23-24: bhattasribhätiräjenäpy uktam ‘“sarvakrodika- 
rena Sthitatväd devy eva mantrah”. 

834 Mahärthamañjariparimala, p.122, 1.22: srikramakeläv apy uktam: seyam evamvidhä bha- 
gavati samviddevy eva mantrah. 

3% Mahärthamañjariparimala, p. 122, 1. 20-21: sristotrabhattärake pi: ‘cidagnisamhäramari- 
cimantrah samvidvikalpän glapayann udeti” iti. 


Alexis Sanderson 363 


consciousness, eliminating all the conceptual constructions of [differentiated] 
cognition. 


The Mantra is not identified, but it is evidently the Krama’s seed-syllable 
KHPHREM. For the Xramastotra describes the manner ofits arising in conscious- 
ness (szmvitkramah) as follows:** 


Thus one should contemplate the awesome circle [of the syllable KHPHREM], 
which embodies total withdrawal, from the fire of the aeon (R) to the power 
of the circle (M), dissolving the phases [of cognition] as it swallows up the uni- 
verse and finally reaches the [ultimate] that resides in the void of [unlimited] 
consciousness. 


and Abhinavagupta refers to it as the samhärahrdayam ‘the heart of resorption’, 
contrasting it with ‘the heart of emission’ (srséhrdayam), the seed-syllable sAUH 
of the Trika's supreme goddess Paräbhattärika. “7 


#36 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.223, IL. 11-15: ata eva sristotrabhattärake pi “kälänaläd vyoma- 
kalävasänam cintyam jagadgräsakalälayena | cakram mahäsamhrtirapam ugram gatam cidäkä- 
fapadastham ittham” ityädinä samhärakramenaiväsyodaya uktah. 

37See Tanträloka 4.185c—189b (sAUH), 189c—191b (KHPHREM), 191cd: dam samhärahrda- 
Jam prâcyam srstau ca tan matam; 5.54c-74 (sAUH), 75-78 (KHPHREM). The seed syllable as 
stated cryptically in 4.189c-191b has been interpteted as RKkSKHEM (PApoUx 1990, p.424, 
footnote 117). This is also how it was understood by Swami Lakshman Joo when I studied the 
text with him. But this is incorrect. There is no such seed-syllable in the Saiva Mantraästra. 
There are in fact two errors here. The first derives from the published text of the commentary 
of Jayaratha, which refers to the second element as szmhärakundalinyätmakasyaitadräpalipeh 
kütavarnasya ‘the sound xs[a], which is identical with the Kundalinï of withdrawal and whose 
written form embodies this. The reading kära in kätavarnasya is, 1 propose, a corruption 
of kundala or krüra, which are both code-names for PH[A]. See Jayadrathayämala, Satka 4, 
f.20v2-3, in a chapter listing code-names for the sounds of the syllabary (varnanämapatalah): 
kundalam bhairavam rävam rävini yoginipriyam | kundalinätham atulam krüram vai bhi- 
mam añkusam | phakäram dhämadhämänam nämabhih samudährtam. Abhinavagupta himself 
probably had another of these code-names for PH[A] in mind, namely rävah ‘the resonance” or 
râvini ‘the resonator’, since he refers to the sound in question in the phrase antarnadatparäma- 
réasesibhütam, ‘reduced to nothing but an internally resonating awareness’, speaking of the state 
of the external in this phase, after it has been dissolved in the fire of awareness (= R[A]) (tar sad 
eva bahiräpam präg bodhägniviläpitam). The second error was to fail to understand that in this 
passage, as in the verse I have cited from the Kremastotra, the constituents of the syllable are 
stated not in their actual order as pronounced but in the order in which they are held to arise 
in consciousness (szmvitkramah), as explained by Jayaratha on this passage in Tanträlokaviveka, 
vol. 3, p.221, IL. 16-18: atra ca samvitkramenaiva $ripindanäthasya vyäptih. iti tadanusärenaiva 
tasyoddhärah ‘And in these [verses] the correspondence of the Pindanätha is in accordance with 
the order [of the arising of the phases corresponding to its components] in consciousness itself, 


364 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


The Svabodhasiddhi of Bhüti 


No work by Bhütiräja is known to have survived. However, there is a short un- 


published work that may be his. This is the Suzhodhasiddhi, which its colophon 


attributes to Sribhatta Bhüti.#*% The naming of the author as [Sribhatta] Bhüti 
rather than [Bhattaéri] Bhütiräja is not itself an obstacle. For we have seen 
Abhinavagupta use Bhüti for Bhütiräja in the unidentified work cited above;“? 
and Ksemaräja and Yogaräja have both referred to themselves as Ksema and 
Yoga.“ Moreover, the content of the text is consistent with its being a prod- 
uct of the Krama. Claiming oral instruction (gwrumukham) as its authority“! 
it teaches the attaintment of self-realization through the dissolution of the ac- 
tivity of the mind and senses brought about by coming to rest in one’s own na- 
ture through direct intuition of one consciousness (sv4bodhah) or own being 
(svasattä), a state that cannot be taught, that cannot be attained except through 
ones own innate capacity, and that once attained liberates from all concep- 
tual constructions, both experiential and theoretical. This is reminiscent of the 
Siddha-teachings of Hrasvanätha’s Suabodhodayamañjari and of the doctrine 


of sudden enlightenment taught in the Chummäsamketaprakä$a, Anantaéaktis 


and so he has raised it [sound by sound] following that order [rather than that of their pronunci- 
ation, i.e., in the order R-PH-KHE-M rather than KH-PH-R-E-M]”. That the error is not Jayaratha’s 
is evident from his citation in his commentary on these verses of à passage from an uniden- 
tified Krama text which shows a way of explaining the rise of the Mantra without deviating 
from the order of pronunciation" fivanabhasi vigalitäksah kaundilyunmesavikasitänandah | pra- 
jvalitasakalarandhrah käminyà hrdayakuharam adhirñdhah | yogi fanya iväste tasya svayam eva 
yoginihrdayam | hrdayanabhomandalagam samuccaraty analakotidiptam ‘His senses dissolved 
in the void (=KH[a] of Siva, with bliss fully expanded through the awakening of Kundalini 
(= PH[AJ), all the apertures [of his body] ablaze (= r[A]), immersed in the core of the heart of 
the beloved (=E), the Vogin rests as though in emptiness (= M). The heart of the Yoginï (<E) 
surges up in the sphere of the void of his heart (= M), brilliant as countless fires’. 

838 Svabodhasiddhi, f. S9r4—S: iti sribhattabhätiviracitä svabodhasiddhis samapta. 

43%ee footnote 431 on p. 362. 

#0Ksemaräja, Pratyabhijñährdaya, opening verse 2: ksemenoddhriyate sarah samsäravi- 
sasäntaye; Ksemaräja, Spandasamdoha, p.25, closing verse 3cd: ksemenärthijanärthitena 
vivriam $rispandasütram manäk; Ksemaräja, Sivastoträvalivivrti, p.355, closing verse 3cd: 
tasmäd guror abhinavät paramefamärteh ksemo niamya vivrtim vyatanod amutra; Yogaräja, 
Paramärthasäravivrti, p. 1, opening verse 2cd: vivrtim karomi laghvim asmin vidvajjanärthito 
yogah; Yogaräja, Sivästaka, f. 9v10-(v. 8ab): yogena caitanyasivah stuto yam fivästakeneti 
Sartrasamsthah | tenä$u sarvasya fivam karotu fivah *svahrnmadhyamadhämadhämä (sva corr. : 
su Cod.). 

#1 Svabodhasiddhi, f. 5913—4 (v. 33d, final words): namämy asamasundaram gurumukhopadi- 
stam $ivam ‘1 bow to the $iva of unequalled beauty taught to me in the oral instruction of my 
Guru’. 


Alexis Sanderson 365 


commentary on the Väsälanäthasütra, and the anonymous Mahänayaprakä$a. 
It also contains phrasing and terminology found in these and other texts of the 
Krama, including the Sripithadvädasikä of Bhütiräja’s Guru Cakrabhänu and 
the Krama-based Prajñäkälividhi of the second Satka of the Jayadrathayämala: 


Svabodhasiddhi, £. 56v2-6 (vv. 2-3): asesadar$anävesavisesädhivivariitam | sva- 
samvedanasamvedyam svastham vande param $ivam | nirastakalpanäjälavika- 
lpaughavighätine | namo ‘stu paramänandapadätitäya Sambhave ‘1 venerate the 
supreme Siva located in the self, who can be known only in self- experience, who 
is devoid of the mental torment of all specific doctrines. I bow to Sambhu, the 
destroyer of the flow of conceptual construction, free of the snare of the mind 
imaginings, transcending the level [even] of the highest bliss’. Cf. Chummä- 
samketaprakäsa, £. 3r2 (v.29cd): präptam *mayä (con) : tvayä Cod.) anirdefyam 
vikalpaughaviläpakam ‘T attained that undesignatable [reality] that eliminates 
the flow of conceptual construction’; Anantaéakti, Väsälanäthastravrtti, final 
verse: 4ti paramarahasyam vägvikalpaughamuktam ‘Thus [I have explained] the 
ultimate esoteric teaching that is free of the flow of conceptual construction’; 
and Cakrabhänu, Sripithadvädasikä 3cd (TesrIMoNIUM: unattributed citation 
by Ramyadeva on Bhävopahära 47): *nirastasästrärthavikalpajälä devyah $masäne 
karavirakäkhye (see footnote 187 on p.291) ‘[Supreme] are the goddesses [Jayà 
etc.] in the Karavira cremation ground[. For they are] free of the snare of concep- 
tual construction that is the doctrines of the Sästras’. For the notion that the ul- 
timate ground transcends the highest bliss see Chummaäsamketaprakäsa, Ÿ. 5v3- 
6, vv.71-73: (on the Chummä wkulapavesu ‘entrance into the transcendent 
ground’): nirävarananirdhämaniränandam nirä$frayam | paraprakäsam aspa- 
ndam $äntacinmätravigraham | nänäsaktikarasphäravisräntipadam acyutam | 
niyatänubhavaksinasvasvaräpaikagocaram | akulam gurubhih proktam nihsva- 
bhävam sadoditam | sa so ‘ham iti samkrämät pravesas tatra jäyate The Gurus 
[of the Krama] term Akula the unobscured [reality] that is free of the [three] ra- 
diances [of the object, means, and agent of cognition], beyond bliss, unlocated, 
the highest light, motionless, its substance nothing but quiescent consciousness, 
the stable point in which the expansion of the rays that are its many powers is 
grounded, located nowhere but in that nature of the self in which all specific 
experience is obliterated, beyond any [definable] essence, eternally present. En- 
try into that occurs by immediate transmission through the intuition that it 
is this that is one identity; Kä/kulakramasadbhäva, Ÿ. 4v2 (v.2.47c): *nitye 
fänye (em. : nityafünya Cod.) niränande ‘In the eternal void, beyond bliss’; and 
Kälikulapañcasataka À, f. 20r5 (5.22cd), on Kälï in the phase of the Nameless: 
ravimadhye niränandä cinmaricyantabhäsikä ‘Beyond bliss in the centre of the 
[twelve] suns, illuminating the limit of the rays of consciousness’. 


Svabodhasiddhi, F.5GV10-11 (v.6): mamäham iti hrdgranthicchedanaika- 


366 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


krpänikäm | spandäspandakrtagräsäm naumy aham fuddhasamvidam \ venerate 
that pure consciousness that has devoured both active and quiescent states, the 
knife that alone can cut through the hearts knots of ‘my’ and T. Cf. Jayad- 
rathayämala, Satka 4, f. 179r7-179v1l: *spandäspandakrtagräsä (spandäspanda 
conj. : sadäspanda Cod.) ‘[Pratyangira], who has devoured both the active and 
the quiescent states’; ibid., f. 168v4: spandäspandäntarodäraviryavyaktikalälayä 
‘[Natteévari], whose ground is the power of the manifestation of the exalted 
vigour that lies between the active and quiescent states’; Arnasimha, Mahänaya- 
prakä$a, f. 129v1-2 (v. 249): spandäspandaparispandasamdhänojihitavigraham | 
sarvaträvasthitam vande väcätitam anämayam ‘1 venerate that perfect reality be- 
yond expression that is present in everything, its nature free of the consciousness 
that is the oscillation of the active and quiescent. 


Svabodhasiddhi, f.56v11-12 (v.7): vyapadesavihinasya tattvasya kathanam 
katham | svasamvedanasadyuktyà gamyate yadi kena cit ‘How can the process of 
oral instruction convey that nameless reality. If some rare person grasps it then 
it is by the higher method of self-experience’; and f. 57r11-12 (v. 14): bodha- 
mätragrahah käryas suprabuddhena cetasà | tävad yävat svasämarthyät svanisthah 
kevalo bhavet ‘With fully awakened awareness he should take hold of noth- 
ing but his consciousness until by his own ability he comes to rest in the self 
and so attains liberation’. Cf. Mahänayaprakä$a (riv.) 1.20: mahätivratame + 
+ + + svänubhavasthite | kathanädikramätitä vifuddhis *tasya (conj. : tatra Ed.) 
käsate ‘In the most extreme [descent of power] (mahätivratame), that rests in 
self-experience [alone], unimpeded awareness dawns for him without his de- 
scending to the processes of instruction or [worship]’. 


Svabodhasiddhi, Ÿ.57r1-5S (vv. 9-10): wpeyapräptyupäyo ‘yam svabodha- 
jägarükatà | svabodhajägarükatvän nirvibhägä sthitir muneh | upäyo näparah 
kascit svasattänugamäd rte | täm evänusaran yogt svastho yah sa *sukhï (corr. : sva- 
khi Cod.) bhavet ‘This method of attaining the goal is to be constantly awake 
to ones own consciousness. By this means the sage achieves the state free of 
differentiation. There is no method other than holding to awareness of one 
own being. It is by maintaining awareness of this that the meditator will at- 
tain happiness, resting in the self. Cf. Jayadrathayämala, Satka 2, f. 101r3-4 
(Prajñäkälividhi, v. 24): *sukhena (corr. : mukhena Cod.) sädhyate sà tu svasattä- 
grahanena tu | prajñäyogena *yogesï (corr. : yogesi Cod.) siddhyate nänyathä kva 
cit ‘But by taking hold of one own being Yogeévari [Käli] is effortlessly accom- 
plished. It is by [this] meditation of direct insight that she is mastered and never 
otherwise’. 


Svabodhasiddhi, f.58r1-7 (vv.22-24): abhedabodhasambodhät  svarñpa- 
nubhavasthitim | vyutthitas san niruddho và labhate yas sa tattvavit | yasya 
sarväsv avasthäsu “svasthitir (corr. : susthitir Cod.) naiva lupyate | tasya kim 


Alexis Sanderson 367 


näma kurvanti Sästrabhramanavibhramäh | vigalitasadasadvikalpas sadasad- 
bhramajanitamohamuktätmä | jivann api janamadhye vigatabhayah sarvadä 
yogï ‘One is enlightened who by realizing undifferentiated consciousness 
attains stability in the experience of his own nature both when he has emerged 
from immersion and when he is in it. Of what benefit are agitated wanderings 
in the Sästras to one whose rest in the self is never interrupted in any state 
[of consciousness]? For him the conceptual constructions ‘is’ and ‘is not’ have 
ceased to exist. He is free of the delusion caused by the error of these two. Even 
while living in the midst of society [this] meditator is ever free of fear’. With 
v.24ab cf. Jñänanetra, Kälikaästotra, Ÿ. 90v1-2 (v.1): sitatarasamvidaväpyam 
sadasatkalanävihinam anupädhi | jayati jagattrayarñpam nirüpam devi te 
räpam ‘Supreme, O Goddess, is your formless form in the form of the three 
worlds, that can be attained [only] by the purest awareness and is devoid of the 
conceptual constructions ‘is and ‘is not’, free of all limiting adjuncts’; #bid., 
£.91vl (v. 10ab): sadasadvibhedasüter dalanaparä käpi sahajasamvittih; ‘{NYou, 
O Goddess, are supreme], that unique innate awareness that seeks to obliterate 
the projection of the difference of ‘is’ and ‘is not”; and Chummäsamketapra- 
käsa, F.2r3 (v.4): nirävesà sadasadbhramavarjitä | nirvikalpävikalpä tu 
samvidujjhitadharmint ‘{The level (bhämih)] that cannot be penetrated, free 
of the error of ‘is and ‘is not’, free of both discursive and non-discursive 
awareness, transcending the attributes of cognition’. 


However, while the identity of the author of the Suzhodhasiddhi with the Krama 
teacher Bhütiräja is not refuted by his being called Bhüti or by the nature of 
his works content, I see no evidence that makes this identity more than plau- 


sible. 2 


KRAMA WORKS KNOWN ONLY FROM QUOTATIONS OR REPORTS 


Several such works have already been mentioned above: a work by Ojaräja (per- 
haps a commentary on the K%/kulapañcasataka), Eraka’s Kramastotra, com- 
mentaries thereon by Hrasvanätha, the author of the Trivandrum Mahänaya- 
prakä$a, and others unnamed, an unidentified work by Hrasvanätha, Abhinava- 
guptas commentary Kramakeli, his Devistotravivarana, if that is other than 
the Kramakeli, the *Kramavamsäval, à hymn by Prabodhanätha or possi- 
bly two, the Räjikä, the Püjaätilaka, some verses from an unidentified Krama 
scripture or scriptures cited by the author of the commentary on the Old 
Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a, the Stotramälä by the same, a work probably 


#2There are other names in Bhüti- in Kashmirian sources. We have the Saiddhäntika 
Bhütikantha (see above, p.242), and the minister Bhütikalaéa (Kalhana, Réjatarañgini 7.26). 


368 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


by the author of the anonymous Mahänayaprakä$a on the oral instructions, 
the Präkrtatrimsikävivarana of Bhattäraka, the Akulakälikätrimsikä and Akra- 
makallolakärikä of Ramyadeva, a hymn by his son, and the hymn of a certain 
Räma that alludes to the Chummä ditto nitto.“*> To these may be added the 
Kramasñtra, from which we have a passage on how by means of the internal 
kramamudrä the meditator achieves immersion even when his awareness is ex- 
troverted,“#* a collection of verses (vimuktakäni) by a certain Bhatta Dimodara, 
from which we have à verse stating that the five Flow Goddesses liberate when 
perceived and bind when not, the Old Kashmiri Siddhasütra, of which we 
have a verse on the pervasion of the graphic constituents of the syllable om 


by the five elements,“*f a work by a Somaräja, pupil of Bhojaräja and grand- 


443$ee footnote 89 on p.262 (Ojaräja); p.273 (Erakas Kramastotra); p.276 (Hras- 
vanäthas commentary on the Kramastotra); p.317 (a commentary on the Kramastotra by 
the author of the Trivandrum Mahänayaprakäsa); p.276 (an unnamed work by Hras- 
vanätha); p.276 (unnamed commentators on the Kramastotra); p.352 (the Kramakeli); 
p.359 (the Devistotravivarana); p.273 (the *Kramavamsävali); p.294 (Prabodha's lost hymn 
or hymns); p.306 (the Räjikä and Pajätilaka); p.306 (some unidentified Krama scrip- 
tures and the Srorramaälä); p.317 (a work on the oral instructions); p.344 (Bhattärakas 
Präkrtatrimsikävivarana); p.326 (Ramyadeva’s Akulakälikätrimsikä and Akramakallolakärikà); 
p.326 (a hymn by the son of Ramyadeva); and p. 351 (a hymn by Räma). 

#44 Pyatyabhijñährdaya, p. 42, 1. 11—15 (yathoktam kramasütresu). 

#5 Pyatyabhijñährdaya, p.30, 1.6-7 (yathä coktam sahajacamatkäraparijanitäkrtakädarena 
bhattadämodarena vimuktakesu), emending vämesädyäh to vämesyädyäh. 

#6 The commentary on the Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$a, p. 32, 11. 8-12: yat siddhapädä 
ädidisuh: pithiva äpà “ti (em. : à Ed.) teju takäru su vätasatti tiryaga “avayava ti (corr. : avaya- 
vati Ed.) | nabhu rà pañca *akäru su ehuya sistipasaru äkalati (Skt.: prthivy äpas teja$ ca takäro 
vätasaktir tiryagavayavas ca. nabho rah. pañca akärab. esa eva srstiprasara äkalyate) ‘Earth, wa- 
ter, and fire are the #7 [shape], the power of air the cross-stroke, and ether the 77 [shape]. The 
five [combined] make the character 4. It is this that is considered the source of creation’. The 
character 4 in the Kashmirian script (Säradä) can indeed be visualized in this way, as a #4 with 
a ra pendent from the right end of its horizontal head-stroke and the two connected at their 
middle by a short cross-stroke. The first Pada is quoted again at p. 60, L. 1 and attributed to ‘the 
Siddha siddhasya subhäsitam. It is perhaps the source of this verse that the author of the anony- 
mous Mahänayaprakä$a has in mind when he refers to the Sütras of the Siddha (siddhasüträni) 
for the view that practising the Krama worship in full bestows supernatural abilities (8.28ab): 
püjanät khecaratvam hi siddhasñtresu gadyate. ätmajñänät pravartante yatheccham animädayah 
‘For it is stated in the Siddhasätra that worship leads to the ability to travel through the air. Self- 
realization enables one to manifest at will the [eight] supernatural powers, such as the ability 
to contract ones size’. 


Alexis Sanderson 369 


pupil of Hrasvanätha, “7 


a work by an unknown spiritual descendant of Naver- 
akanätha, one of the pupils of Keyüravati, “#8 and the Kälikäkrama. 

I have suggested above that the K%/ikäkrama may have been a scriptural 
text, though the verses cited lack the vocatives indicative of dialogue and any 
of the deviations from Paninian norms that would prove this.“ A certain lack 
of concision and awkwardness of expression suggest that it may be a work at- 
tributed to supernatural revelation rather than claimed by a human author. But 
they too prove nothing conclusively. In any case, the text shows a concern with 
philosophical dialectic that is conspicuously lacking in the other scriptures of 
the Krama. These qualities are evident in a passage that expounds the doctrine 
that the phenomena of experience have no reality apart from cognition: 
Cognition manifests itself both internally and externally in the form of various 
[phenomena]. The objects [of the mind and senses] have no existence apart 
from cognition. Therefore the world is of the nature of cognition. For no-one 
has ever witnessed the existence of an object apart from the cognition [of it]. 
Therefore it is settled that cognition itself has become these [objects]. By force 
of the contemplation of phenomena the identity with cognition that pertains 
to its objects [is established,] by means of negation and assertion with regard to 
the distinction between “is” and “is not”. Cognition and its object have à single 
nature because they are experienced simultaneously. 


The probable meaning of the awkwardly phrased penultimate sentence is that 
the existence of objects is inseparable from cognition because they are seen only 
when cognition is present and not when it is absent (vnvayavyatirekäbhyäm). 
There is nothing specific to the Krama in this, though Krama authors shared 
this view with other Saiva non-dualists and may well have been the first to adopt 
and adapt it from Buddbhist circles.“’! However, the Krama background of the 


#47 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, pp. 196, 1. 13-197, IL. 4: two verses in praise of Vämana (Hras- 
vanätha) and Bhojaräja. 

#48 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, pp. 196, IL. 1-10: two verses in praise of Keyüravati and Naver- 
akanätha. 

#49See p. 252. 

50 Svasñtravimarsini, p.118, IL 1-7: kälikäkrame pi: tattadrüpatayä jñänam babir antah 
prakäsate | jñänäd rte närthasattà jñänarñpam tato jagat | na hi jñänäd rte bhäväh kenacid 
visayikrtäh | jñänam tadätmatäm yätam etasmäd avasiyate | astinästivibhägena nisedhavidhiyo- 
gatah | jñänätmatà jñeyanisthä bhävänäm bhävanäbalät | yugapadvedanä jñänajñeyayor ekarü- 
patä. 

S1The KG/kramas position that cognition and its object have a single nature because 
they are experienced simultaneously no doubt rests on the oft-cited principle stated by 
Dharmakürti in Pramänavini$caya 1.55ab (Verter 1966, p.94): lhan cig dmigs pa nges paï 
phyir | sngon dang de blo gzang ma yin (sahopalambhaniyamäd abhedo nilataddhiyoh qu. e.8., 


370 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


text is apparent in the use of the expression kälagräsah ‘devouring of time’ in 


the following:*? 


A meditator will attain the state of Nirvana if by rejecting the mental activities 
of “is” and “is not”, resorting to the inner state [between those two], and tran- 
scending through non-duality the net of conceptual constructions, higher and 
lower, he rests always content in himself alone, intent solely on devouring time, 
immersed in the state of transcendental solitude. 


In Zanträloka 29.43 Abhinavagupta refers to “other Gurus and consorts 
taught in the Xälïkula”, saying that they should be called to mind though not 
explicitly worshipped in the system of Kaula Trika worship that he outlines 
in this chapter.** Commenting on this Jayaratha cites a passage of an un- 
named work by Abhinavagupta which identifies these as the five Gurus Vi$vay- 
oni, Jagadyoni, Bhävayoni, Prajäpatiyoni and Kulayoni, and their five consorts 
Viryayoni, Ksobhayoni, Bijayoni, Srstiyoni, and Sargayoni.* They are derived 
from the sequence of worship taught for the phase of Emission in the Krama*s 
Kälikulapañcasataka and in no other source.“ This, then, may be from an 
otherwise unknown work by Abhinavagupta on the Krama. 


THE TRIKA 


I pass now from the Krama and Abhinavaguptas Trika-based Krama to the 
Trika itself. The defining feature of its scriptures is that they teach the propitia- 
tion of the triad of goddesses Parä/Mätrsadbhäva, Paraparä and Aparä, who are 


Naresvarapariksäprakä$a p. 32]) ‘The blue [object] and the cognition of it are not other, because 
they are invariably cognized together’. 

2 Sivasñtravimarsini, pp. 133, L. 12-134, 1.2: nirasya sadasadvrttih samsritya padam änta- 
ram | vihäya kalpanäjälam advaitena paräparam | yah svätmanirato nityam kälagräsaika- 
tatparah | kaivalyapadabhäg yogi sa nirvänapadam labhet. The term kälagräsab is found passim 
in the Krama texts. It also appears in the works of Abhinavagupta (Mälinivijayavärtika 1.152- 
156; Parätriikävivarana, p.256, IL. 13-14; and Tanträloka 1.98cd) but no doubt under Krama 
influence. 

45329 ,43ab: anyäs ca tatpatnyah $rimatkalikuloditäh; 29.45ab: te visesän na sampüjyäh smar- 
tavyà eva kevalam. 

#4 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 11, Ahnika 29, p.33, IL. 10-11: yad uktam anenaiva: visvam jagad 
bhävam atho prajäpati kulam tatah | yonisabdäntakam proktam gurinäm pañcakam tv idam | 
viryam ksobho bijam srstih sarga itimäh Saktaya uktäh. 

55 Kälikulapañcasataka À, f. 12r (3.19-21a): tathänyam $rnu samksepä(d) durvijñeyam mahe- 
$vara | visvayonim jagadyoni(m) bhavayonim prajäpatim | pañcamam kulayonim ca patnis tesäm 
frnusva me | retayonim bijayonim srja(m) srstim tathaiva ca | pañcamam ksobhayonim ca. 


Alexis Sanderson 371 


enthroned, both in the Trika initiation Mandala and in the visualization that 
is a component of regular worship, on three lotuses resting on the tips of the 
prongs of a trident, with Parä/Mätrsadbhäva in the centre and the other two to 
her right and left.#56 

Both the Kälïkula and the Krama had influenced the Trika by the time 
of the exegetes. The later Trika scripture Devyäyämala had incorporated Käla- 
samkarsani as a fourth goddess above the three of the older tradition, a variant 
of Trika worship that is also found within the encyclopaedic scriptural tradi- 
tion of the Kälikula itself; and the 7rikasadbhäva had added the Kälis seen 
in the Krama’s phase of the Nameless to the pantheon installed in the Trika’s 
Mandala. 7 

While in the Krama we have an internally differentiated tradition with nu- 
merous authors, in the exegesis of the Trika proper we have only the works of 
a single author, Abhinavagupta, all on a single scripture, the Mälinivijayottara. 
The principal of these works are, in the order oftheir composition, the Mälinivi- 
jayavärtika and the Tanträloka. À third commentary, the Sripärvapañcikä, sur- 
vives only in citation. The first, comprising two chapters of 1135 and 335 
verses respectively, declares itself à commentary on the opening verse of the 
Mälinivijayottara but accomplishes this commentary in a form that covers the 
contents of the whole work, the first chapter covering the first seventeen chap- 
ters of the scripture and the second the rest. The Z4nträloka, comprising 5859 
verses in thirty-seven chapters (Âhnikas), offers itself as a comprehensive Pad- 
dhati on the Trika taught in the Mälinivijayottara. Much that is in the Mälinivi- 
jayavärtika appears again more or less revised in the Zanträloka,*° but there is 
important material in the former that was not repeated or reformulated, most 
notably the section 1.15-399, which presents a metaphysical explanation of 
the origin and differentiation of the principal divisions of the Saiva scriptures, 
based, I propose, on the account of the canon given in the lost Saiva scrip- 
ture Srzkanthiyasamhitäl Srikanthï in a long passage preserved in the Nryädi- 


456$ee SANDERSON 1986. 

#57On the influence of the Kälïkula and Krama on the scriptural Trika and the existence of 
variants of Trika worship in the Kälikula itself see SANDERSON 1986, pp. 188-204 and SANDER- 
son 1990, pp. 58-64. In the former I have called these two developments Trika Ia and Trika 
Ib. 

#58 AI] that survives of the Srzpärvapañcikä without doubt is a passage quoted and attributed 
by Jayaratha on Zanträloka 23.75 (etadvivarane eva pañcikäyäm). Abhinavagupta refers to it 
twice in his Parätrifikävivarana (p. 194, IL. 17-19; p.205, IL. 21-22). 

#9On the priority of the Malinivijayavärtika see SANDERSON 2005, p. 142, footnote 24. 


372 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


samgrahapaddhati of Räjänaka Taksakavarta. “6 

The Zanträloka is not a Paddhati in the narrow sense, that is to say, a detailed 
practical guide to the performance of the systems rituals. Rather it builds on the 
basis of the Mälinivijayottara à theory-rich account of his vision of the Trikas 
teaching of the nature of ultimate reality and the means ofits realization. These 
means include ritual, but since Abhinavagupta held to the view, in opposition 
to the Saiddhäntikas, that it is knowledge rather than ritual that liberates, he 
also teaches methods that do not descend to the level of ritual performance and 
rationalizes ritual itself as process of cultivating the insight that in his higher 
methods comes about through direct, non-conceptual intuition or the gradual 
refinement of a conceptual awareness of ultimate reality (vikalpasamskärah) to 
the point at which it transcends its conceptual character to become immediate 
experience (säksätkärah). 

He structures his account of the Trika’s means of Liberation in this way on 
the basis of three verses in the Mälinivijayottara that define three modes of im- 
mersion in $iva: non-conceptual (Smbhavah samävesah), through conceptual 
thought alone (äktah samävesah), and through meditational and ritual activity 
(änavah). “1 In the first chapter he sets out the fundamentals of his soteriology 
and its metaphysical basis, defining the three modes of immersion, adding a 
transcendent fourth, immersion without method (anwpäyah samävesah), mean- 
ing by that a sudden direct self-realization that once established requires no fur- 
ther application of means to sustain it. The second is devoted to this mode of 
self-realization, the third to non-conceptual immersion (Smbhavah samävesah), 
and the fourth to immersion through thought alone (f3krah samävesah). The 
methods that constitute immersion through meditational and ritual activity 
(änavah samävesah) are explained in chapters 5 and following. The medita- 
tional methods are taught first. The fifth chapter teaches visualization of the 
flow of the powers of consciousness through the faculties (dhyänam), medi- 
tation on the flow of the vital energies (pränatattvasamuccärah) with the help 
of the Mantras SAUH and KHPHREM, meditation on these and other syllables 
(varnatattvam), and internal Yogic posture (karanam). "The remaining methods 
are gathered under the heading sthänakalpanä ‘visualizing the positioning of 
internal structures in external substrates’. Chapter 6 teaches how the cycles of 


#60A transcript of this account has been published in HANNEDER 1998, pp. 237-268 from 
Ms Stein Or. d. 43 in the Bodleian Library, Oxford. This is a copy of the manuscript of the 
Nityädisamgrahapaddhati listed here in the bibliography. 

KL Mälinivijayottara 2.21-23. 


Alexis Sanderson 373 


external time and, by extension, the sounds of the syllabary circulate internally 
in the vital energy. Chapter 7 shows how the sequences of Mantras of various 
kinds are to be mastered by contemplative repetition within the cyclical flow of 
the breath (czkrodayah). Chapters 8-11 explain the order of worlds (bhuvanäd- 
hvä) (8), the order of the Tattvas (tattvädhvä) (9), the correlation between the 
order of the Tattvas and the Mälinivijayottara’s hierarchy of the categories of 
perceiver (pramätä) (10), and the order of the five Tattva-segments (kz/ädhvä) 
(11). These chapters look both backwards and forwards: backwards in as much 
as these structures of the worlds, Tattvas, and Tattva-segments are seen as ar- 
rayed within the microcosm, forwards in as much as a precise knowledge of 
these structures is ancillary to the officiant's performance of initiation, whose 
treatment will follow. Chapters 13 and 14 are preliminary to the discussion 
of that topic. The first analyses the nature of the ‘descent of [Siva’s] power 
(Saktipätah) that leads to liberation, directly or through initiation, and the sec- 
ond analyses the nature of the absence of this descent, the state of occlusion 
(irobhävah) that holds consciousness in bondage. “? 

The external practices of ritual, beginning with initiation, are the princi- 
pal subject matter from the 15th chapter to the 33rd. Chapter 15 teaches the 
ritual of worship in the form that it is to take when done by an officiant as a 
preliminary to initiation, the neophyte’s initiation known as the samayadiksä, 
and the rules of discipline that bind all initiates. The following chapters cover 
the full initiation known as the nirvänadiksä (16-17), an abbreviated form of 
initiation (18), the form of initiation to be performed for those close to death 
(sadyonirvänadiksä) (19), the procedure known as scales-initiation (#4/ädiksa, 
dhatadiksä) (20), initiation for the dead (mrtoddhäri diksä) (21), initiation af- 
ter conversion from another faith (Hrigoddhäradiksä) (22), the rituals for the 
consecration to office of Gurus and Sädhakas (äcäryäbhisekah, sädhakäbhisekah) 
(23), initiation during cremation (antyestidiksä) (24), and the ritual of making 
offerings to the deceased (äddhavidhih) (25). Chapters 26 and 27 teach the 
ritual of daily worship to be performed by initiates for the rest of their lives, in- 
cluding the procedure for the consecration (pratisthä) of Lingas and other sub- 
strates of personal worship. Chapter 28 covers worship to be offered on special 
occasions (raimittikavidhih) requiring the assembling and gratification of ini- 
tiates and Voginis (cakrayägah), procedures for gaining encounters with Yoginis 
(yoginimelakah), the procedures to be adopted in the Guru’s regular teaching 


#62See Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 4, p. 2, Il. 1-6. 


374 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


of the scriptures (vy&khyävidhih), penances (präyascittavidhih), and the ritual of 
the worship of the Guru (28). Having completed his treatment of the rituals 
of the basic form of the Trika, he devotes the 29th chapter to worship, initia- 
tion, and consecration in a higher, Kaula form of the same. It is in this context 
that he sets out as an option the system of Kälikula worship taught in the M4- 
dhavakula of the Jayadrathayämalé's fourth Satka. He then covers the Mantras 
(30), Mandalas (31), and Mudräs (32) of the system, and summarizes the sets 
of the Trika* ancillary deities (33), thus bringing his treatment of ritual to its 
end. Chapters 34 to 36 explain the relationship between the three methods of 
immersion (34), and give an account of the hierarchy of revelation (35) and 
of the transmission of the Siddhayogesvarimata, of which the Mälinivijayottara 
was considered to be the essence (36). Abhinavagupta ends his treatise with a 
chapter on the value of his composition (fästropädeyatvam) (37). He states the 
position of the Mälinivijayottara in the $Saiva canon: above the Saiddhäntika 
scriptures are those of Bhairava; within those the highest are the texts of the 
Säkta-orientated Vidyäpitha; of those the foremost is the Siddhayogesvarimata: 
and the Mälinivijayottara is the latters ultimate distillation. The value of the 
Tanträloka, then, lies in his view in the fact that as the systematic exposition of 
the teachings of this Tantra it conveys the highest essence of the entire Saiva 
revelation. He ends with an account of his patrilineal descent from Atrigupta, 
a learned brahmin of Madhyadesa who was settled in Kashmir by King Lal- 
itaditya (r. c. 725-761/2), of his intellectual history, the various Gurus who 
had taught him, and the circle of his disciples. Within the framework of this 
encyclopaedic treatment he has inserted numerous incidental discussions. Par- 
ticularly noteworthy are his treatments of the metaphysical basis of the Sanskrit 
syllabary (mätrkäcakram) in the 3rd chapter, of the gradations of Guru-hood 
in the 4th, of causality in the 9th, of objectivity (vedyatà) in the 10th, and of 
the nature of death and the destinies of the soul thereafter in the 28th. 
Though the Zanträloka is based on the Mälinivijayottara it reaches far be- 
yond that source to draw on a great number of scriptural texts from the whole 
range of the Saiva Mantramärga. Among texts of the Trika he cites principally 
the Siddhayogesvarimata, the Trisirobhairava [= Anämaka]), the Devyäyämala, 
the Tantrasadbhäva, the Kularatnamälä, the Trikasadbhäva, the Trikasära, the 
Bhairavakula, the Virävali, and the Paratrisikä. From the Kälikula he cites the 
Mädhavakula, the Kramasadbhäva, the Urmikaulärnaval Bhogahasta, the Käli- 
kula, and the Kälimukha“® The identity of the Kä/kula is not certain, but it 


463 Abhinavagupta refers to a text with this name as his source for the option of using a 


Alexis Sanderson 375 


is very probably the Xä/ikulapañcasataka.“® He also cites a number of Kaula 
texts of uncertain affiliation: the Anandesvara, the Utphullaka, the Kulagahvara, 
the Kramarahasya, the Khecarimata, the Gama, the Tattvaraksävidhäna, the 
Nandifikhä, the Nirmäryäda, the Nisätanal Nifisamcära, the Bhargasikhä, the 
Yogasamcära, the Yoginikaula, the Yonyarnava, the Sarvaviral Sarväcära, and the 
Haidara. Descending below this level in his herarchy of revelation he draws on 
the Picumatal Brahmayämala, the principal scripture of the Yämala division, 
and in the Daksina division on the Svacchanda to à great extent and inci- 
dentally on the Aghoresvarisvacchanda. Among scriptures of the Siddhänta he 
cites the Kacabhärgava, the Kämika, the Kälottara, the Kirana, the Diksottara, 
the Nih$väsa, the Paräkhya, the Pauskara, the Matañga, the Mayasamgraha, the 
Mukutottara, the Rauravasütrasamgraha, the Sarvajñänottara, and the Sväyam- 


sword, dagger, knife or clear mirror as ones substrate of worship (Tanträloka 27.44): khadgam 
krpänikäm yad và kartarim makuram ca và | vimalam tat tathà kuryäc chrimatkälimukhoditam. 
No text of this name has been mentioned elsewhere in the literature known to me, but it is no 
doubt either the Kä/ïkula or a text closely related to it. For we have a close parallel in K4/ku- 
lapañcasataka À, f. 18r5 (4.73), referring to the worship of the phase of Withdrawal: athavä 
churikäm sthäpya kartarim vä sudärunäm | mahämukuraprsthe (em. : mahämukutaprsthe Cod.) 
tu püjyà samhärabhairavi. 

464His quotation of the Kä/ikula in Tanträloka 35.33-34 (érimatkälikule coktam pañcasro- 
tovivarjitam | dasästädasabhedasya säram etat prakirtitam | puspe gandhas tile tailam dehe 
jivo jale mrtam | yathä tathaiva Sastränäm kulam antah pratisthitam) appears to be a con- 
densed citation of Kälkulapañcasataka B, f. 27r4-v1 (2.35-38): etad rahasyam paramam kulam 
jhätam na kenacit | faiväd bähyam idam deva pañcasrotovinireatam | 36 dasästädasabhedasya 
Saivasya paramesvara | antarlinam idam jñänam na jñätam tridasesvaraih | 37 sarvatra sam- 
sthitam deva sugñdham kulam uttamam | puspe gandha iväsaktam tailam yadvat tilädisu | 
38 tathaiva sarvasästränäm kulam antah pratisthitam. The citation in 13.306 (*kalkulavid- 
bau [conj. : kulakälividhau Ed.] coktam vaisnavänäm visesatah | bhasmanisthäprapannänäm 
ityädau naiva yogyatä) is close to Kälikulapañcasataka À, f.29v3-5 (7.51c-53b): täntri- 
känäm na Saivanäm na dadyäd vaisnavätmanäm | bhasmanisthäprapannänäm asthimälädi- 
dhärinäm | vedoktädikriyärädhidänadharmatapojusäm | tirthäframaprapannänäm na deyam 
päramärthikam, with the Kälikula’s vaisnavänäm visesatah being seen in a parallel passage 
in the Devidvyardhasatikaä, f. 4v4-5 (41c-42): tanträcäraratänäm ca siddhäntädikriyänvitäm | 
vedoktädikriyärädhäm vaisnavänäm visesatah | *laukikänäm (conj. [supported by Kälika- 
krama redaction: laukikä ca] : kaulikänäm Cod.) kriyä*yuktäm (em. [Aï$a gen. pl.] : yukräs 
Cod.) tebhyo *raksyam (corr. : raksam Cod.) mahäkramam. In 28.14c-15b he includes the 
Kälikula among sources that give information on the Kaula days sacred to the Mothers (kwla- 
parva) (kulaparveti tad brûämo yathoktam bhaïrave kule | haidare trikasadbhäve trikakälikula- 
dike). There is no such information in the K%/kulapañcasataka. However, the reading is suspect 
since if kälikulädike is correct, the #rika- that precedes is problematic, since it does not denote 
a specific text and no 7rikakälikula is known or probable. 


376 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


bhuvasñtrasamgraha, considering their prescriptions valid except where specific 
instructions in non-Saiddhäntika scriptures block their application for those 
initiated into the practice ordained in these more restricted traditions. His pur- 
pose is to formulate a position for the Trika than enables its followers to see it 
not merely as the highest revelation but as that which pervades and validates all 
others. The Mälinivijayottara was a fitting base for this project for two principal 
reasons. The first is that it offers a bridge from the Säkta ground of this exegesis 
to the Siddhänta since it shows striking continuities with the latter system. The 
second is that the 18th chapter of the Mälinivijayottara could be read as formu- 
lating the view that while the hierarchy of revelation leads upwards to culminate 
in the Trika, the highest revelation within the Trika itself, to be found in this 
chapter, transcends trancendence by propagating the position that all forms of 
Saiva practice, including that of the Siddhänta, are equally valid provided they 
are informed by the nondualistic awareness enjoined here.“ 

Though the Zanträloka is work of the Trika based on a text untouched by the 
Kälikula, Abhinavagupta reads the Kälikula-influenced strata of the tradition 
into the very core of his exegesis and develops this further in the light of post- 
scriptural Krama theory, though always doing so obliquely as though to conceal 
the purely Säkta ground of his Saivism from profane eyes,“ as examples from 
the opening chapters are sufficient to demonstrate. Thus the opening benedic- 
tory verse of the work reveals this character by showing in a veiled matter that 
the authors chosen deity (istadevatä) is Kälasamkarsanï.*° In the first chapter 
he alludes to the twelve Kälis as the fullest expression of Bhairava’s nature, pre- 
senting them in a syncretistic fashion as the three principal goddesses of the 
Trika subdivided by emission, stasis, withdrawal, and the [nameless] fourth.8 
In the third chapter, after defining the twelve vowels from À to AH (omitting RR 


#5On the hierarchical unity of the Mantramärga as formulated by Abhinavagupta and his 
commentator and the position that the Trika ultimately neither enjoins nor forbids any partic- 
ular form of Saiva practice, requiring only that the method adopted, whether it be, for example, 
the Saiddhäntika’s Liñnga worship or the Kaula rejection of that worship, should be animated 
by non-dualistic awareness, see my commentary on the second of the opening verses of Abhi- 
navagupta's Zantrasära (SANDERSON 2005a, pp. 102-122). 

#6On the place of the Krama in Abhinavaguptas Trika see SANDERSON 1995, pp. 53-62. 

467See SANDERSON 2005, pp. 101-102. 

#68 Tanträloka 1.107: tasya $aktaya evaitäs tisro bhänti parädikäh | srstau sthitau laye turye 
tenaità dvädasoditäh. Jayaratha on this verse, taking these twelve as the Kälis beginning with 
Srstikali: parädikäs tisrah Saktayah srstau sthitau laye samhäre turye anäkhye ca bhänti ….ekaikasyäs 
câtüräpyena srisrstikälyädyätmakatayà. 


Alexis Sanderson 377 


L L) as the principal circle of Bhairavas powers, he equates them both with the 
twelve Kälis of the Krama and with the twelve Yoginis that form the retinue 
of Parä in the Trika.“° In the same chapter he equates the Trika’'s syllabary- 
goddess Mälini with Kälasamkarsant as the highest state, saying that the first 
self-limitation that she manifests is that of her pairing with Bhairava, that is to 
say, of the relationship between her as power and him as the powerful, though 
in reality she transcends this duality.“”° The fourth chapter’s account of akrah 
samävesah, immersion in $iva through the refinement of conceptual thought, is 
centred on an account of the rise in consciousness of these same Kälis. Both the 
fourth and the fifth chapter teach the Krama*s seed-syllable KHPHREM on a par 
with the Trika’s sAUH; and when in the fifth Abhinavagupta teaches meditation 
on the flow of the powers of consciousness through the faculties (dhyänam), the 
powers are again the twelve and though they are not explicitly identified with 
the Krama’s Kälis it is clear that they are to be understood as these.{”! 

On the Zanträloka we have an extensive commentary written by Räjänaka 
Jayaratha in the thirteenth century.Ÿ? It is of great value to the student of this 
text, since Jayaratha tries to cite in full the scriptural passages that Abhinava- 
gupta frequently paraphrases in a condensed form. It has been described as ex- 
haustive. But this is an exaggeration. The coverage is uneven and often cursory, 
especially on matters of ritual where we would be grateful for more information 
than he seems to have possessed. Moreover, a number of scriptural sources on 
which Abhinavagupta had drawn were no longer accessible to Jayaratha and his 
Kashmirian contemporaries. He never declares this fact and no doubt expected 
no one to be in a position to deduce it. It is only the survival of manuscripts 
of these texts in other parts of the sub-continent that enables us to see that he 
lacked access to these texts, since his interpretations of Abhinavaguptas terse 
paraphrases, though always unhesitating, are sometimes wrong, 7 Nonethe- 


#6 Tanträloka 3.251-254b. 

#70 Tanträloka 3.232c-234; esà vastuta ekaiva parä kälasya karsint | $aktimadbhedayogena 
yämalatvam prapadyate. 

#7 Tanträloka 5.19c-36. Jayaratha on 5.26c-27b indicates that he takes the twelve to be the 
twelve Kälis by saying that the nature of the twelve has not been elaborated here because that 
has already been done in the preceding chapter. This can only be a reference to the treatment 
of the twelve Kälis in the fourth. 

#720n this dating see below, p. 418. 

#73For a demonstration of some of these concealed lacunae in his knowledge see SANDERSON 
forthcoming 4, in which these are considered in an analysis ofthe contraction of the knowledge- 
base of Kashmirian $aivism in the period between Abhinavagupta and recent times. 


378 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


less, within the limitations imposed on scholarship by a tradition obliged to 
maintain the fiction of undiminished knowledge, it is an impressive work. An 
earlier commentary by Subhatadatta, who gave initiation both to Jayaratha and 
to his father, the minister Srngäraratha, ‘4 has been lost, no doubt because Ja- 
yaratha’s commentary supplanted it.‘ 

After writing his Zanträloka Abhinavagupta produced in his Tantrasära à 
condensed and simplified coverage of its teachings for the benefit of those un- 
able to master that long and much more complicated work. His Tantroccaya, 
probably written after the Tantrasära, offers an even briefer version. These two 
works stay close to the content of the Tanträloka, but not to such an extent that 
we can see them as mere summaries. Thus in his treatment of Kaula worship 
in the 29th chapter of the Zanträloka Abhinavagupta teaches two Paddhatis, 
one based on the Mantras of the Trika and the other, as we have seen, drawn 
from the Mädhavakula of the Kälikula. But in the Tantrasära he substitutes a 
Paddhati based on the Parärrifikä, while in the Zantroccaya he prescribes a form 
of Krama worship. Here Candayogeévari, the name under which the Goddess 
is invoked in the Krama's principal Mantras, is worshipped as the thirty-eighth 
Tattva enthroned above Bhairava, the thirty-seventh (above the thirty-six from 
Siva to Earth of the common $aiva model), as the source of all emissions and 
resorptions, either surrounded by her retinue of twelve [Kälis] or solitary, as 
their totality. {6 

There is also the Tantravatadhänikä, à brief review of the contents of the 
Tanträloka in 99 verses, mostly restricted to what is covered in the first five 
chapters of that work. Its author identifies himself in the opening and closing 
verses as Abhinavagupta, but the attribution is doubtful, unless we take this to 
be another author with the same name. Two verses (2.12) have been cited by 
Jayaratha on Zanträloka 2.2, but without attribution. Ifhe had thought them to 


#74 Tanträlokaviveka, concluding verses 35-39. 

#5 From Jayaratha’s brother Jayadratha we have the Haracaritacintämani, a collection of ac- 
counts of $iva's deeds in the world of men, the majority of which are told in versions that 
associate them with local sites of pilgrimage and the local religious calendar. The Saivism of 
initiates transcends this level of common observance. But Jayadratha integrates it by introduc- 
ing these narratives with verses that present their content as symbolic ofthe higher truths taught 
in the $aiva scriptures. 

#6 Tantroccaya, p.177: tatra Saktitrayätmä yo Sau paramasivah saptatrimso bhairavas tam 
apy ullañghya tam äsanapaksikrtyästätrimsattami yäsau bhagavati paramasamvid uktä saiva 
*candayogefvaryätmikà (corr. : candayogisvaryätmikä Cod.) vifvagräsasrsticakravähint *dvädasa- 
bhir (corr. : dvädasäbhir Ed.) mariciräpäbhir devatäbhih saha kevalä và vifväbhedavrttyà püjya. 


Alexis Sanderson 379 


be the work of Abhinavagupta then we would expect him to have said so, that 
being his habit. The colophon of the Zantravatadhänikä supports this doubt, 
since it attributes it to ‘a certain Âcärya Abhinavagupta (frzmadabhinavagupta- 
cäryavisesa-), an expression that evidently does not refer to the famous author 
of the Zanträloka. 

We also have an extensive prose commentary (-vivarana) by Abhinava- 
gupta on the Parätrifikä, a short text teaching a form of the Trika known 
as the Anuttara, Ekavira, or Paräkrama, in which a simplified, essentializing 
form of worship and meditation is directed to Parä alone and her seed-syllable 
SAUH. This commentary was written between the Mälinivijayavärtika and the 
Tanträloka.*” À much shorter and markedly less brilliant commentary on this 
text, the ParätrisikälaghuvritilAnuttaravimarsint, has been published as his. But 
I see no reason to accept the attribution and good reasons not to do so.‘ 
The work is probably South Indian“? We also have a short commentary (- 
vivrti) on the text written by the Kashmirian Räjänaka Laksmiräma, also called 
Räjäna Lasaka/Läsaka (Lasa Käk Räzdän), at some time near the end of the 
eighteenth century or the beginning of the nineteenth. But this is ignorant 
of, or chooses to overlook, the true character of the text as instruction in the 
worship of, and meditation on, the Mantra of the Trika’s Parä, wrongly taking 
the Mantra to be the Aghora, that is to say, the thirty-two-syllable Mantra of 
[Sakala-]Svacchandabhairava,“%° thus assimilating the text to the Svacchanda- 
based cult of that deity, which, as we shall see, appears to have been the most 
widely established form of $Saiva ritual practice in Kashmir down to modern 
times. À verse in praise of that deity is the first of the two final verses of the 
work. His engagement with the tradition of the Suzcchanda and Netra is evi- 
denced by a composite manuscript which contains among a number of short 


#77On the place of the Parätrisikävivarana in the order of Abhinavaguptas works see SANDER- 
son 2005, p. 124, footnote 88. 

#78$ee SANDERSON 2005a, p. 142, footnote 24. 

#%The attribution is already seen in the Mahärthamañjariparimala of the South Indian 
Maheévaränanda (pp. 8, 52, 66, 114), who refers to it as the 7r%ikäsaästravimarsint (p. 114). His 
date remains to be determined, but from the sources he cites we can see that he cannot have 
been earlier than the twelfth century. On this form of the Trika in south India see SANDERSON 
1990, pp. 32-34, 80-82. 

#80 Parätriikävivrti, p. 14 on v. 26: aghoramantrena ca saptavimsativaram astottarasatäksamälä- 
pâädena mantritäm; p.15 on 28: caturdasaväram aghoräbhijaptena puspena; p.16 on 30c-32b: 
mahesvarim paräm devim aghoramantrena parayä bhaktyà atyädarena püjayet; pp. 11-12 on v. 21 
imposes the Svacchanda’s system of worlds (bhuvanäni). 


380 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Saiva texts two attributed to this author: a *Niskalasvacchandadhyänavivarana, 
an analysis in twenty-two lines of a verse of the Suzcchandoddyota that is used in 
the Kashmirian Paddhatis for the visualization accompanying the plenary obla- 
tion (pärnähutih) of Niskalasvacchanda, and an *Amrtefvaradhyänavivarans in 
seventeen lines on the opening verse of the Merroddyota, which is used in the 
same context for Amrtesvarabhairava. “8! 

Two other works by Abhinavagupta, though not narrowly tied to the 
Trika in a technical sense, were written on its basis. These are the Bodhapañ- 
cadasikä and the Paramaärthasära, à Saiva rewriting of the Siämkhya-Vedäntic 
ParamärthasäralAdhärakärikä attributed to Sesamuni. The latter has come 
down to us with a commentary by the ascetic Vogaräja, a pupil of Abhinava- 


#82 who has also given us the Sivästaka, a hymn to 


guptas pupil Ksemaräja, 
Caitanyaéiva, ‘the Siva who is Consciousness’. While the commentary on the 
Paramärthasära is devoid of esoteric references, the hymn reflects the Krama- 
orientated idiom of the author’s teacher Ksemaräja.“# 

Several other short works have been attributed to Abhinavagupta. Among 


these the Paramärthadvädasikä, the Mahopadesavimsatika, and the Rahasyapa- 


#81$ee *Niskalasvacchandadhyänavivarana, f. 91v3 (colophon): iti räjänakalasakäkena vivara- 
nam viracitam (the verse is Svacchandoddyota, vol. 3, p.177, IL. 16-19); and Armréefvaradhyä- 
navivarana, £.91v17 (colophon): ##; lasakäkakrtä vivrtih. For the use of these verses in the Pad- 
dhatis see, e.g., Sivanirvänapaddhati, pp. 256-257. 

##2The Trika in the technical sense, as opposed to the philosophical discourse of the Pra- 
tyabhijñä texts, appears at the end of the Bodhapañcadasikä (v. 15) in a reference to Bhairava, 
the identity of all things, seated on a lotus above the trident of the three powers of creative 
impulse, cognition, and action [i.e. Parä, Paräparä, and Aparä], and in the Paramärthasära in 
(1) v.4 (see also v. 41) in its reference to the four spheres (andacatustayam) that constitute 
the created universe, those of Sakti, Mäyä, Prakrti, and Earth, which is a classification drawn 
from and distinctive of the Trikas Mälinivijayottara (2.49); and (2) vv. 43-46, which should 
be understood as à metaphysical reading of sauH, the seed-syllable of the Trikas goddess Parä 
(cf. Tanträloka 4.186c-189b for this encoding). 

#3This orientation is apparent in the Sivdstaka's two opening verses, £ 9r16-20: yo ‘ntas 
*caran (em. : carat Cod.) pränabhrtäm hrdabje dhvanaty abhiksnam bhramaräyamänah | afnams 
ca Sabdädiparägam uccaih namo tu caitanyasiväya tasmai | 2 svadidhitinäm karanesvarinäm cid- 
arkamürtih samudetya madhye | gräsikaroty esa hathät trilokïm namo stu caitanyasiväya tasmai | 
‘Obeisance to Caitanyasiva, who resonates constantly like a bee in the lotus of the heart, mov- 
ing within all living creatures and eagerly devouring the pollen of the objects of the senses. 
Obeisance to Caitanyagiva. Behold: as the sun that is consciousness rises up in the midst of his 
rays, the goddesses that are the faculties [of sense-perception and action], he violently devours 
the three worlds [that are the objects, means, and agent of cognition]’. 


Alexis Sanderson 381 


ñcadasikà are certainly not his. The first is the work of Ramyadeva;“#{ and the 
second and third are evidently South Indian compositions.“® The attribution of 
the Anubhavanivedanastotra and the Dehasthadevatäcakrastotra rests on oral re- 
port alone, and the subject of the latter, the mental worship of Anandabhairava 
and his consort Anandabhairavi surrounded by the eight Mothers, has no paral- 
lel in Abhinavagupta*s other works. The Paryantapañcäsikä is attributed to Abhi- 
navagupta in its colophon, but it has not been cited in any Kashmirian source, 
nor has it come down to us, to my knowledge, in any Kashmirian manuscript. 
The manuscript transmission of the text is South Indian and the work appears 
to have been known only there.#% The Anurtarastikä and the Paramärthacarcä, 
survive in Kashmirian manuscripts with colophons that assert that Abhinav- 
agupta is their author. But I know of no evidence that confirms this assertion. 
Nor am Î aware of any that refutes it. However, the fact that Jayaratha cites a 
line from the former without attribution does not inspire confidence, since this 


goes against his usual practice when quoting Abhinavagupta.“#7 


484$ee footnote 309 on p. 326. 

#85 The Mahopadesavimsatika is for the most part a reworking and reframing of the first part 
(vv. 2-8) of the Nirgunamänasapäjà (RAGHAvAN 1980, pp. 70-75), which is one of the more 
than 300 hymns ascribed to Sañkara in the South Indian Smärta tradition under the spiritual 
authority of the Sañkaräcäryas of Srñgerï and Käñci. On South Indian features in the Rahasya- 
pañcadasikä see SANDERSON 1990, pp. 34-35, footnote 21. 

#86The text was edited by V. RAGHAvAN on the basis of a manuscript in Trivandrum that 
appears to be a codex unicus. It is mentioned as a work of Abhinavagupta in v. 20 of the South 
Indian Gurunäthaparämarsa of Madhuräja/Mädhura of Madurai, a verse found in both highly 
divergent recensions of the text, that of the Trivandrum manuscript and that of a copy of a De- 
vanägari manuscript in private possesion in Madras. It has been claimed that Madhuräja was a 
pupil of Abhinavagupta (PANDEY 1963, pp. 20-22) and if that were true this testimony would 
be compelling. But not one of the verses that mention Madhuräja/Mädhura is common to both 
recensions and none states that he was anything more than a devotee of Abhinavaguptas works 
and an adept in the Paräkrama, the system of meditative worship taught in the Parätrisikä. 
The only citations of the Paryantapañcäsikä that I have located are in the South Indian Maha- 
rthamañjariparimala of Mahe$varänanda, a work of c. 1300 (see pp. 412-416) and the South 
Indian Âvarapratyabhijñavimarsinivyäkhya, folio sides 8, Il. 18-19 and 9, IL. 7-8. In none of 
these citations is the name of its author stated. 

887 Anuttarästikä a is cited without attribution in Zanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.99, IL. 11-13: 
anibaddhasya “samsäro sti na tattvatas tanubhrtäm bandhasya värtaiva k&” ityädinyäyenälabdha- 
prarohasyäpi bandhasya kilanam … 


382 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


THE PRATYABHIJNA 


AI Abhinavaguptas exegesis proceeds on the basis of the doctrine of dy- 
namic non-duality newly developed on slight scriptural foundations by Ut- 
paladeva, the pupil of Somänanda, in his Kvarapratyabhijñnäkärikä, its two 
auto-commentaries (the -vrétih and the -wivrtih), the Ajadapramätrsiddhi, 
the Âvarasiddhi, the Sambandhasiddhi, and his commentary on Somänanda’s 
Sivadrsti. #88 That philosophically argued doctrine was transmitted through the 
latter’s pupil Laksmanagupta to Abhinavagupta, who in the final phase of his 
Saiva scholarship wrote commentaries on the key texts of this tradition: the 
Üvarapratyabhijñäsätravimarsini on the Üvarapratyabhijñäkärikä, and the vast 
Üvarapratyabhijñävivrtivimarsini on the Vivrti. Utpaladeva’s works elaborate 
their position for the most part in the pan-Indian language of philosophical 
debate, eschewing the esoteric terminology of the Trika or Krama. Nonethe- 
less, they were composed within a lineage of Gurus following those traditions. 
Somänanda wrote an analyic commentary (-vivrtih), now lost, on the Trika’s 
Parätrisika, 
mentary on this text; 


which Abhinavagupta studied before composing his own com- 
#1 and Jayaratha claims that this lineage from Somänanda 
through Utpaladeva and Laksmanagupta to Abhinavagupta was versed both in 
the Trika and in the Krama of the Kälikulapañcasataka.°? 

On Abhinavaguptas Âvarapratyabhijñävimarsini we have à commentary 
(Bhäskarï) written by Räjänaka Bhäskarakantha in the seventeenth or eigh- 
teenth century.*” That author has also left us the Cittänubodhasaästra, à com- 


#88On Abhinavaguptas superimposition of this doctrine on the Mälinivijayottara see SANDER- 
son 1992, pp. 291-306. 

For the evidence that the philosophical commentaries were written after the Trika com- 
mentaries see SANDERSON 2005, p. 124, footnote 88. 

#0 Abhinavagupta refers to it and quotes from it in his Parätriikävivarana, pp. 191, IL. 28-30; 
204, IL 8-9; 206, IL. 10-11; 207, Il. 20-22; 208, Il. 1-2; 216, IL. 27-28; 218, IL. 7-8, 26; 220, 
Il. 6-12; 225, IL. 12-14; 255, L. 31-256, L. 4; 279, IL. 14-16. 

#1 Parätrisikävivarana, p.285, IL. 29-30: frisomänandamatam vimr$ya mayä nibaddham idam 
‘T have composed this [commentary] after reflecting on Somänandas understanding [of the 
text]. 

#2 Tanträloka, vol. 3, p. 194, IL. 8—10: frrdevipañcasatike py asya srisomänandabhattapädebhyah 
prabbrti trikadarfanavad asya guravah ‘In the case of the Devipañca$ataka too his [Abhinava- 
guptas] teachers were as in the case of [the scriptures of] the Trika, from the venerable Soma- 
nanda onwards’. 

#3On his date see below, p.422. There is also the Âvarapratyabhijñäkaumudi of one 
Bhattäraka Sundara. I have not yet seen it; and I have no information concerning its date. 


Alexis Sanderson 383 


mentary (-#kä) on the Kashmirian Moksopäya (later expanded and vedänticized 
as the Yogaväsistha), and a free rendering into Sanskrit of Old Kashmiri Saiva 
verses by Lal Dëd (Zallesvariväkyäni). 


EXEGESIS OF THE VAMAKESVARIMATA 


From Jayaratha we have à commentary (-vivarana) on the Vämakesvarimata, 
also known as the Msyäsodasikärnava, the primary scripture of the Kaula cult 
of the goddess Tripurasundari. The commentary is technical, abounding in 
#% and as 
such suggests that Jayaratha was à practitioner of this relatively new tradition 
rather than of the Trika or the Krama, though he makes no explicit statement 
to that effect. He also quotes in this commentary from another work of his in 
this tradition.“ 

He refers to a number of earlier Kashmirian scholars of this system of wor- 
ship. He tells us that it was first propagated in Kashmir by I$varagiväcärya and 
Sañkararäéi, and then passed on through one Viévävarta to all subsequent Kash- 


mirian lineages down to the time of Jayaratha himself. ** He also mentions in 
498 


polemics against divergent views of the minutiae of ritual practice, 


this tradition the exegetes Räjänaka Kalyänavarman,“” Allata,* an unnamed 
author of a Värtika (värtikakärah), *” his own Guru’s Guru, 


refers to simply as the Guru.°° 


and someone he 


SA Vämakesvarimatavivarana, p. 1, v. 3: parakrtakukalpanämayatimirändhyäpohanäya manäk 
frivämakesvarimatam uddyotayitum mamodyamo ‘dyäyam ‘Today I commence this effort briefly 
to illuminate the Vämakesvarimata in order to dispel the blindness caused by the darkness of 
the fanciful interpretations [of this text] produced by others. 

19 Vimakesvarimatavivarana, p.58, IL. 8-12. On the relative modernity of this tradition see 
SANDERSON 1988, p.689 (= 1990, p. 157). 

#6 Vimakesvarimatavivarana, p.48, IL. 11-14: vastuto hy asya darsanasya etad eva äcäryadva- 
yam ka$miresv avatärakam. “tatas (er. : tanas Ed.) frivifvävartamukhenaiva laksyate yat tad evä- 
smatparyantam $isyaprasisyakramens sarvesäm eva präptam ‘For in fact it was these two Âcäryas 
that first propagated this system in Kashmir. It is their teaching, passed on through Viévävarta, 
that has been inherited by all without exception through a continuous succession of pupils and 
their pupils [and so on] down to myself”. In speaking of “these two Âcäryas” he is referring 
back to Iévaraéiväcärya, mentioned in p. 47, 1. 15, and Sañkararä$i, mentioned in p. 48, I. 2. 

#97 Vämakesvarimatavivarana, p.48, 1. 8—9; p. 117, 1.25. 

V8 Vimakesvarimatavivarana, p. 54, |. 4. 

89 Vämakesvarimatavivarana, p.9, I. 15-16; p. 12, IL. 19-23; p. 30, IL. 5-6 

VO Vamakesvarimatavivarana, p.19, Il. 6-15; p. 57, IL. 14-16. 

0 Vimakesvarimatavivarana, p.20, IL. 4-9 (guravo pi: …); p. 68, IL. 10-13 (guravo pi: ….).I 


384 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


None of their works has come down to us. As for their dates, we know lit- 
tle beyond the fact that they are known to Jayaratha in the thirteenth century. 
PaNDEY”®? dates the introduction ofthe system in Kashmir to the ninth century 
on the evidence (1) that Jayaratha quotes a verse which refers to Iévarasivacärya 
as the abbot of the Süramatha (Säramathädhipatih)® and (2) that the historian 
Kalhana records that a Matha of this name was founded for the benefit of as- 
cetics by Süra, while he was the minister of king Avantivarman, who ruled from 
855/6 to 883.%% I am unable to understand by what route other than thought- 
lessness this scholar arrived at the unstated position that if Tévaragiväcärya was 
abbot of this foundation then he must have been the first to hold that office and 
was therefore a contemporary of the founder. There is certainly no reason to 
think that the Süramatha had only one abbot and then ceased to exist. On the 
contrary we know that it was still in existence in the eleventh century.” The 
error is so blatant that it would be unnecessary to point it out were it not that, 
as so often happens in such cases, the date has been inadvertently repeated. 06 

As for the commentator Räjänaka Kalyänavarman, it is probable that he 
was Jayaratha’s great-great-grandfather.°°7 If so, then his active life may be dated 


5,8 and the introduction in Kashmir of 


approximately to the years 1125-117 
the system of the worship of Tripurasundari by Iévaraéiväcärya and Sañkararäsi 
to an unknown time before that, certainly after the founding of the Süramatha 
and almost certainly after the time of Abhinavagupta and Ksemaräja, that is to 
say, after c. 1050, since neither author shows any knowledge of the existence 


of this tradition and its primary scripture. Abhinavagupta is aware of a Kaula 


take these to be plurals of respect (ädare bahuvacanam). 

S02PANDEY 1963, p. 578. 

0 Vämakesvarimatavivarana, p.48, I. 19-20: yad bhavanto pi: “Srifüramathädhipater lebhe 
guruvaraparamparopanatam | cakram idam ifvarasivät pürväcäryo ‘smadrya eva pura” iti ‘As 
you yourselves [have declared]: “The first Acärya of my lineage received this Cakra, that had 
come down through the unbroken line of excellent Gurus, from I$varasiva, the abbot of the 
Süramatha”. 

SU Räjatarañgint 5.38. 

505Kalhana refers to the Süramatha as a place of sanctuary in the capital during the reigns of 
Abhimanyu (958-972) (Räjatarañgini 6.223) and Samgrämaräja (1003-1028) (ibid., 7.26). 

06Gxnozr 1999, p.700, in a note on Ifänasiva mentioned in Tanträloka 22.30, asserts that 
this author is “the same as Kvarasiva, the propagator of the Vämakesvarimata in Kashmir in the 
9Oth century”, referring the reader to PANDEY 1963, pp. 578-582. 

507 Vämakesvarimatavivarana, pp. 117-118. 

508 For Jayaratha’s date see below, p. 418. 


Alexis Sanderson 385 


tradition of worshippers of the Nityäs,®” but nothing requires us to identify 
that with the cult of Tripurasundari seen in the Vimakesvarimata/Niryäsodasikä- 
rnava, since there were earlier traditions of the worship of Tripura accompanied 
by nine Nityäs or by eleven Nityäs and Kämadeva, which though antecedents 


of this cult are certainly not to be confused with it.°12 


THE SAIVISM OF THE SVACCHANDA AND NETRA 


Two other major traditions of $aiva worship are evidenced in Kashmir: (1) 
that of Svacchandabhairava and his consort Aghoresvari, based on the Suac- 
chandatantra, and (2) that of Amrte$a[bhairava] and his consort Amrtalaksmi, 
based on the Nerratantra. The first of these texts is the principal scripture of the 
Daksina or Bhairava division of the Saiva Mantramärga and of its Mantrapitha 
subdivision.”!! The second presents itself as transcending the various divisions 


50 Tanträloka 28.123cd, referring to nityätantravidah followers of the Nityätantras for their 
calendar of Kaula special days (parvadinäni); also Parätrisikävivarana, p.238, Il. 25-26: yathä 
nityätantresv aikärätmakamohanabijaprädhänyahetuh. 

510Sce, e.g., Zanträlokaviveka, vol. 9, p.139, IL. 14-15, quoting a Mavanityävidhäna. The 
Manthänabhairavatantra speaks of the navanityägamäbh as a class of Tantras above the Pramäna- 
$ästras of the Läkulas (on whom see SANDERSON 2006) [and the Siddhäntas] but below 
the Bhairava Tantras of the left and right streams (Kwmaärikhanda, f. 213r: navanityägama- 
jhänäm Sivatattvam param padam; Siddhakhanda, f. 8V3—4: nityätanträni cibukäd pürvämnäyam 
lalätatah | pascimam sodasäntät tu tadürdhve na ca kimcana) and includes a cult of these Nine 
(navanityäkramah) (Kulanityä, Vajreévari, Tvaritä, Kurukullä, Lalitä, Bherundä, Nilapatäkä, 
Kämamanñgalä and Vyomavyäpini) with Tripurä as the tenth and their leader (Siddhakhanda, 
f.203r-v). Evidence of a system of eleven Nityäs survives in the scripture Misyäkaula, of which 
a single, incomplete manuscript has come down to us. Here the goddess Tripurä is worshipped 
surrounded by a circle of twelve deities comprising eleven Nityä goddesses and Kämadeva. The 
eleven Nityäs of this text are Hrllekhä, Kledini, Nandä, Ksobhanï, Madanäturä, Nirañjanä, 
Rägavati, Madanävati, Khekalä, Drävani and Vegavati; see Misyäkaula, £. 2157-21: + + + + tu 
nämäni kathayämi “tanüdari (cor. : tanodari Cod.) | hrllekhä kledini nandä ksobhant madanä- 
turà | nirañjanà [râgavati tathänyà ma)danävati | khekalä drävani caiva tathà vegavati varä | 
ekädasaità devyäs te madano dvädasa smrtab. Vs earlier prominence is indicated by the fact that a 
syncretistic text of the cult of Kubjikä, the Ciñcinimatasärasamuccaya, contains a section drawn 
from the Nityäkaula, or from some lost text closely related to it, in which it sets out this Yäga as 
the ‘teaching of the southern order (daksinagharämnäyah), grouping it with the cult of Kub- 
jikä, the Kälikula, and a form of unmarked Kaulism agreeing closely with that found in the 
Trika, which it calls the teachings of the orders of the North, West and East respectively. 

The Suacchanda is at the head of the list of Daksina Tantras in the Brahmayämala, as 
the first of eight -bhairava scriptures (f. 199r [39.33c-35b]: svacchandabhairavam devi krodha- 


bhairavam eva ca | unmattabhairavam devi tathä caivograbhairavam | kapälibhairavam caiva 


386 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


of the Saiva canon, teaching a system of worship that is universal and at the 
same time can be inflected to be practised in the context of any system of wor- 
ship by the substitution of appropriate deity-visualizations to accompany the 
Mantras of the core cult. These substitutions apply in the first instance to the 
Saiva divisions. Thus one can propitiate Amrteéa as Sadäéiva in the context of 
the Siddhänta, as Bhairava in that of the Daksina, as Tumburu in that of the 
Väma, and as Kule$vara in the Kaula cult of the eight Mothers. However, the 
cult of Amrtesa and/or Amrtalaksmiï is not limited to these divisions. It can be 
extended to absorb the worship of any deity male or female, including the Pañ- 
carätra’s Vasudeva, Sürya, Bhadrakäli, the Buddha, and the forms of Siva wor- 
shipped by or for the uninitiated laity. I have argued elsewhere that the Merra 
is providing in this way for a cult in the hands of a new class of Saiva officiants 
working in what was traditionally the professional domain of the brahmani- 
cal royal chaplain (räjapurohitah), specializing in rituals for the protection of 
the monarch and his family and taking over the performance of worship on the 
king’s behalf of the full range of deities whose worship is prescribed in the brah- 
manical calendar, including those of the major royal festivals of the Indrotsava 
and the Navarätra.°? 

These two cults, of Svacchandabhairava and Amrte$abhairava, appear to 
have been very well established in Kashmir. Indeed we may say that if any cults 
constituted the basic Saivism of the brahmins of the valley, it was these. For 
they form the basis of all the surviving $Saiva Paddhatis used as practical guides 
by Kashmir’ $Saiva officiants and other initiates down to recent times.”!? We see 
this, for example, in the Kalädiksäpaddhati, the detailed manual for Saiva initi- 


tathà jhamkärabhairavam | $ekharam ca tathä caiva vijayabhairavam eva ca). It is the first of 
the thirty-two Daksinatantras listed in the account of the $aiva canon that precedes the /%4- 
napañcäsikä in a Nepalese manuscript of the K&lottara recensions (Kälottara, f. 2r2-5 [v. 17— 
21]: 17 svacchandabhairavam canda(m) krodham unmattabhairavam | asitäñgam rurum caiva 
käpälisam samuccayam | 18 aghoram “ghoraghonam ca [conj. : ghonasamghoram Cod.] nis- 
samcära “diñmukham (em. : durmukham Cod.] | *bhimäñgam (conj. : bhimäsam Cod.) däma- 
rärävam bhimavetälavarddhakam | 19 ucchusmam Yvähikambelam $ekharam puspam adva- 
yam | trisiram caikapädam tu siddhayogesvarimatam | 20 pañcämrtalm) prapañcam ca yogint- 
jala*amvaram (corr. : sambaram Cod.) | vifvärikanthasamkocam tilakodyänabhairavam | 21 
evam dvätrimsat tanträni sottaräni ca ta\d) dvayam | catuhsastipramänäni daksinäsyodbhaväni 
tu. It is also the first of the sixty-four Bhairavatantras listed in the Srzkanthi (Tanträlokaviveka, 
vol. 1, p. 42, L. 5). For its position as the first of the Tantras of the Mantrapitha see p. 234. 

512See SANDERSON 2005b. 

5130n the fact that the Kashmirian $aiva Paddhatis are based on the Suacchanda and Netra 
see SANDERSON 2005b, p. 240 and footnotes 20-21. 


Alexis Sanderson 387 


ation, composed by Manodadatta in À.b. 1335/6 and subsequently elaborated 


51# and in such anonymous works as the Agnikärya- 


in more than one version, 
paddhati for the $aiva fire-sacrifice, and the Sivanirvänapaddhati for Saiva cre- 
mation together with the Paddhatis for the Saiva Sräddhas to be performed for 
the dead.°” 

It is also apparent in the Nisyädisamgrahapaddhati, a digest of passages bear- 
ing on daily (#itya-) and occasional (#aimittika-) Saiva worship compiled by 
Räjänaka Taksakavarta at some time after the eleventh century’!f from a wide 
range of scriptural texts and Paddhatis, a number of which survive only here.’!7 
For the passages he has chosen cover three modes of worship, that of the Sid- 
dhänta, and the two based on the Svacchanda and the Netra. 


LosT PADDHATIS 


Räjänaka Taksakavarta cites a number of Paddhatis, of which a few are evidently 
lost products of Kashmir. The Saiddhäntika Paddhati of Näräyanakantha has 
already been mentioned.5'# He also cites passages from a Paddhati by Visva- 
varta, and these reveal that it taught both worship of $iva according to the 


On the date of the Kalädiksapaddhati and its subsequent expansion see SANDERSON 2004, 
p- 362, footnote 34. 

515A volume published for local use containing the Sivanirvänapaddhati and the Paddhatis 
for the offerings of water to the dead and the subsequent Sräddhas is among the Sanskrit texts 
from Kashmir republished in photographic reproduction by Lokesh CHANDRA (1984). Also in 
this corpus of post-mortuary $aiva ritual is the Sivagopradänavidhi. 

5160n this prior limit of Taksakavartas date see below, p. 420. 

S17His digest contains passages from or references to the following scriptures: Aghoripañca- 
fataka, Adbhuta, Anantavijaya, Analasiddhänta, Anilasiddhänta (probably à scribal error for 
the preceding), Évarasamhitä, Ucchusmatantra, Umäyämala, Kälottara, Kirana, Kubjikämata, 
Gauriyämala, Gaurisvarägama, Cakresvaramatal Cilläcakrefvara, Caturvimsatisähasrä, Catus- 
pañcäsikä, Candrahäsa, Jayäsamhità (= Jayäkhyasamhitä), Dütidämara, Devyäyämala, Nandï- 
fvarävatära-Nihsväsa, Parägama (= Paräkhya), Pauskarapäramesvara, Brhatkälottara, Mañgala- 
#ästra, Matañga, Mayasamgraha, Mahälaksmimata, Mukuta, Mrgendra, Mrtyujitsärasamgrabha, 
Mrtyuñjaya (= Netratantra), Yaksinipäramesvara, Raurava, Laksmikaula, Lalitamahätantra, 
Väthula, Väjasaneyä, Vidyäpuräna, Vinäsikhottara, Sañkarabhairava, Sikhäkämesvara, Sikha- 
tantra, Sivadharma, Srikanthi, Sripürva (= Mälinivijayottara), Särasvatamata, Siddhayogesvari- 
tantra, Svacchanda, Sväyambhuva, Hamsapäramesvara, and Hätakesvara. He also cites the fol- 
lowing Paddhatis: Karmoddyota of Dharmagiva, Tanträloka, Näräyanakanthapaddhati, Brahma- 
Sambhupaddhati, Väimadevapaddhati, Vämadeviyalsamgraha], Visvävartapaddhati, an unnamed 
Paddhati by Vairocanäcärya, and Somasambhupaddhati. 

518See p. 244. 


388 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Siddhänta”!° and that of Amrtesabhairava following the Nerratantra.$ The 
passages cited do not allow us to conclude that it did not also include prescrip- 
tions pertaining to the worship of Svacchandabhairava or some other system or 
systems. The authors name, which is of a distinctively Kashmirian type, °°! and 
the absence of any reference to this work outside the Saiva literature of Kashmir 
indicate that this is a work of that region. 

Taksakavarta also gives extracts from the Paddhati of Dharmaëiva, called 
Karmoddyota. Because of its authors Saiddhäntika initiation-name we would 
expect it to deal only with the rituals of the Saiddhäntika Mantramärga. But 
in fact it is clear that it too had a wider scope. After setting out the va- 
rieties of rosary (aksamälä) appropriate to worship for various supernatural 
ends (siddhih), Dharmagiva teaches the procedure for its preparation for use 
(samskärah). After empowering it by repeating over it the principal Mantra and 
its auxiliaries, the worshipper should sprinkle it with water scented with cam- 
phor and sandalwood and then show the Mudraä. The last, it says, should be 
whichever is prescribed in the Kalpa that he is following.*?? This implies that 
it sets out general procedures that can be adjusted as necessary to accommo- 
date the propitiation of non-Saiddhäntika Mantras. The same appears from its 
treatment of the procedure for the repetition of Mantras (japavidhih), which he 
refers to as applicable to the pañcasrotah $aivam, which is to say, to the Saivism 
ofthe Mantramärga in its five branches, of which the principal three are the Sid- 
dhänta, the Väma, and the Daksina, opposing this to the Kula Saivism (kwlam) 
of the Säktas.*?? To the same effect he rules in this context that one should vi- 
sualize in one’s heart the iconic form prescribed for one’s Mantra in accordance 


SV Nityadisamgrahapaddhari, £. 35v1: ittham amantrapüjädau $rivisvavartabhäsitä | siddhä- 
ntadrstyà tv adhunä vacmi bhairavasäsane. 

20 Nityadisamgrahapaddhati, #.22v8-—9, 23rl: ity esa nyäsavidhi(h) siddhäntanayäsritah 
kathitah. sarvasrotahsamgrahasäräsayato ‘pi kathyate so ‘lpah ...$rivifvävarta (em. : vifvärta 
Cod.) eva hi jagäda nijapaddhatau. The Sarvasrotahsamgrahasära is the Netra. Other citations: 
Ê.13v6-14r2 (deväditarpanam proktam “Srivifvävartapaddhatau {corr. : srivisvesartapaddhatau 
Cod.]); and f. 32rl (&vähädiprayogo yam Srivifvävarta*bhäsitah (em. : bhävitah Cod.)-32r9. 

521O0n this and other Kashmirian names ending in -ävarta, -varta etc. see p.258. 

2 Nityädisamgrahapaddhati, f. 3715-37vV6 (aksamälavidhir hy esa karmoddyote nirüpitah); 
f37r12-vl: vinyasya daksine haste prsthe tasyäm japec ciram | sästam $atam hrdädinäm 
dasämsenäbhimantrayet | toyena secayet tena candracandanagandhinà | mudräm pradarsayen 
mantri nijakalpakramoditäm. 

52 Nityadisamgrahapaddhati, f. 41r10-—42r1 1 (karmo{ddyote] dhärmasive py evam japavidhi(h) 
smrtah); f. 4219: dvaite proktam idam jñänam sa dvaitärthe tato nyaset | pañcasrotasi saive smiñ 
japab proktah kule nyathä. 


Alexis Sanderson 389 


with the particular ritual system that one is following. *? 

That the systems envisaged by Dharmagiva include the worship of Bhairava 
can be inferred from a passage on the rising degrees of merit to be gained by 
bathing the Liñga with various liquids. For he begins with water and ends with 
wine (mrdvikärasah) 5? and bathing the substrate of worship with wine is a 
strictly non-Saiddhäntika practice, as Taksakavarta makes clear by following 
this citation with a passage from the lost Aghoripañcasataka. That teaches that 
wine and the like should be used to bathe any image in which non-dual Mantras 
have been installed, and may also be used in the case of natural (‘self-created”) 
Liñgas and the ovoid stones gathered from the bed of the Narmadä river known 
as Bänalingas, but never in the case of a fixed Linga fashioned by man and 
empowered with the Mantras of the Siddhänta. Non-dual Mantras here are 
evidently those other than the Mantras of the Siddhänta, and this is confirmed 
later in the passage when it states that one should gratify an image with wine or 
other fermented liquors when it has been empowered with the Mantras of the 
Väma, Daksina, or Trisiddhänta. The last of these is evidently the Trika under 


a synonym.??6 


SA Nityädisamgrahapaddhati, f. 41r10—11: yathä japam prakurvita tathä vyäptir ihocyate | 
samyamyäksäni manasà râjivasanasamsthitah | mülamantram samuccärya näde linam svakä- 
rane | dhyätvä hrdi svamantrasya svakarmaproktavigraham | säksmadehasya hripadme sivadehe 
visec chivam. 

58 Nityadisamgrahapaddhati, f. 34r1-3: *gävah (em. : yävaf Cod.) prthivyäm yävatyas tad- 
dänaphalatulyatäm | yäti liñge jala*snänäd (em. : snänä Cod.) “*cändhais (em. : gadyais 
Cod.) satagunam tatah | gandhasnänäc chatagunam kstrasnänam tatas tathä | dadhisnänam 
fatagunam tac câjyena tatah Satam | *sadyahpritidamrdvikärase (conij. : sadyafpititadrdvikärase 
Cod.) naitatsamam phalam | sädhakasya vinirdistam frimaddharmasivena tu. 

526 Nityädisamgrahapaddhati, f. 3413-7: advaitamantrayuktä ye tathà bänäh svayambhuvah | 
vämämrtädibhir dravyaih proktam tesäm tu tarpanam | na hi tat sthäpite liñge *siddha- 
ntamantrakalpite (em : siddhänte mantrakalpite Cod.) | jaläc chatagunam gändham gand- 
häc chatagunam payah | ksträc chatagunam dädhnam dadhnas Satagunam ghrtam | ghrtäc 
chatagunam (*vämam) (conj.) vämadaksinasäsane | ghrtatulyam madhusnänam dräksà ceksu- 
rasam samam | tasmäc chresthatamam snänam surayä väsavena và | trnägrabindumätrena liñga- 
“nänena tarpanam (conij. : snänesatarpane Cod.) | kriam bhavati tat tulyam asvamedhasataih 
samam | vâme kuryät trisiddhänte vihitam bhairave sadä | bhairave tu prapannänäm snänam 
snänam phalädhikam | aghoripañcasatake proktam etad dhi $ambhunä. 

Other citations from the Paddhati of Dharmasiva: f. 20r4—12, on the nature of the märtih 
that is the base for nyäsah; f. 46r1 (bähye tatra balim präha frimän dharmasiväbhidhah), on the 
bali offering; f. 55v9—10 (karmoddyote viseso yam $rimaddharmasivoditah), concerning the ritual 
preparation of the clarified butter for use in the oblations into the fire (gjyasamskärah); £. 57r14 
(kalasästakam uddistam $rimaddharmasivena tu), requiring eight vases to be placed around the 


390 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


À Paddhati by a Dharmaëiva has also been cited by Abhinavagupta in his 
Tanträloka. That this is the same work as the Xarmoddyota is probable, since 
Abhinavagupta refers to it as the Karmapaddhati, which is probably a metri- 
cally convenient abbreviation for *Kzrmoddyotapaddhati. He looks to it for its 
instructions concerning an expiatory fire-sacrifice to be performed before initi- 
ation in absentia. This gives a Mantra for the burning of the initiand's sins that 
was used for this purpose in the practice of the Saiva Gurus of Kashmir until 
recent times, a circumstance that adds to the likelihood that Dharmasiva was a 
Kashmirian.°?7 


To these may be added the Paddhati of Iinasiväcarya, of which we have 


sacrificial fire. 

527 Tanträloka 21.50-56b: $riman dharmasivo ‘py äha päroksyäm karmapaddhatau | 
paroksadiksane samyak pürnähutividhau yadi | 51 agnis citicitäfabdam sadhümam pratimuñ- 
cati | dhatte nilämbudacchäyäm mubhur jvalati fämyati | 52 vistaro ghorarñpas ca mahim dhà- 
vati cäpy adhah | dhvämksädyasravyasabdo va tadä tam laksayed guruh | 53 brahmahatyädibhih 
pâpais tatsañgais copapätakaih | tadà tasya na kartavyà diksäsminn akrte vidhau | 54 navätmä 
phatputäntahsthah punah pañcaphadanvitah | amukasyeti päpäni dahämy anu phadastakam | 
55 iti sähasriko homah kartavyas tilatandulaih | ante pürnä ca dätavyà tato smai diksaya gurub | 
56 parayojanaparyantam kuryät tattvavi$odhanam ‘And the venerable Dharmagiva has stated on 
the subject of initiation in absentia in his Karmapaddhati that if during this initiation when 
one correctly executes the plenary oblation the fire sputters and billows smoke, if it assumes the 
colour of a dark cloud, if it repeatedly flares up and subsides, if spreading, fierce in appearance, 
it runs out along the ground beneath it, or if it emits a harsh sound such as that of the cawing 
of a crow, then the Guru should understand that this is the effect of [major] sins such as brah- 
minicide and associated minor offences [committed but not expiated by the initiand]. In this 
situation he should not perform the initiation without first having done the following rite. He 
should make à thousand offerings into the fire of sesame seeds and rice grains, reciting [as he 
casts in each handful a Mantra comprising] Navätman with PHAT before and after, followed by 
five PHATS, then AMUKASYA PAPÂNI DAHAMI, and then eight PHATS. At the end he should offer a 
plenary [oblation]. Only then may the Guru perform through initiation the purification of the 
Tattvas that culminates in the fusion [of the initiand] with the highest [reality]. The Mantra, 
substituting the name of an initiand Sivasvämin, would be [oM] PHAT H-s-Kks-M-L-v-R-YÜM 
PHAT 6 SIVASVAMINAH PAPÂNI DAHAMI PHAT 8 [SVAHA], the numerals indicating the number of 
times that the preceding syllable should be repeated. This procedure is seen in the Kashmirian 
$aiva manual for cremation. There it is performed, as in Dharmasiva's Paddhati, before the 
purification of the Tattvas that is to be done at the time of cremation in the case of a person 
who has not received initiation while alive. See Sivanirvänapaddhati, p.274 (= CHanDra 1984, 
p.202b), IL 1-3, p.275 (= CHanpra 1984, p.202c), Il. 3-5: (ad anu) navätmahomah (HAT 
HASARAKSAMALAVAYAÜM PHAT SVAHA sahasram 1000 vä 100 và 10 hutvä. pürnä. tejo si PHAT 
PHAT AMUKASYA PAPANI DAHÂAMI SVAHA. …adiksitasya tativasodhanam kuryät. ähutinäm *1000 
sahasram 100 $atam vä (conij. : 100 Satam fatam vä Ed.) yathäsakti. äjyähutih $resthä. tadabhäve 
tilayavatandulaih. yathäsau prthvitattvam ävähya sampüjya cähunet.). 


Alexis Sanderson 391 


a single citation in the Zanträloka. That passage gives a ruling that excludes 
converts to Saivism from holding office as Âcäryas or Sädhakas, with the ex- 
ception in the former case of converts who achieve self-realization. In giving 
this ruling, Abhinavagupta tells us, änaéiva was explaining the meaning of a 
statement on this subject in the Trika’s Devyayamala.Ÿ$ The fact that it cites 
this source makes it likely to have been à Kashmirian work, since it is probable 
that the Devyäyämala too was a product of this region.”?? It cannot, however, 
have been a Paddhati on the Trika, since Abhinavagupta informs us that there 
was no such work when he composed his Tanträloka.5* 

It will have been noticed that Dharmaëiv{äcäry]a and Iéänaiväcärya have 
Saiddhäntika initiation-names, whereas all the Kashmirian Saiddhäntikas of 
the -kantha lineage, as well as all the authors of the Krama and Trika, refer to 
themselves and each other under their secular names. It is probable that the 
adoption of a new name at the time of initiation, or at least its public use, 
was the practice of ascetics, and that these two authors then provide an ex- 
ception to what I have identified in the introduction as the dominant charac- 
ter of the Saivism of the Kashmirian exegetes, namely that it is that of mar- 
ried householders.®! That there were Saiva ascetics in Kashmir as elsewhere 
in India is clear from local Literary sources. In Act 3 of Jayantabhattas topical 
play Agamadambara, written during the reign of Sañkaravarman (r. A.D. 883 
902), we encounter the ash-dusted abbot (bhattärakah) Dharmaëiva receiving 
Samkarsana, who as the king’s minister for the protection of religion through- 
out the land”*? has come to his hermitage to calm the anxiety of the Saivas of 
all divisions caused by the recent suppression of the followers of the licentious 
$aiva Black-Blanket observance (r2lämbaravratam), an event whose historicity 


328 Tanträloka 22.28c-31b. For $ridevyà yämaliyoktitattvasamyakpravedakah in 22.31ab (Ed.) 
read sridevyäyämaltyoktitativasamyakpravedakah ‘{$inafiväcärya,] who has correctly explained 
the esssence of what the Devyäyämala has taught [on this matter]. 

5%%See footnote 83 on p.259. 

530 Tanträloka 1.14-15: santi paddhatayas citräh srotobhedesu bhüyasä | anuttarasadardhä- 
rthakrame tv ekäpi neksyate | ity aham bahusah sadbhih Sisyasabrahmacäribhih | arthito racaye 
spastäm pürnärthäm prakriyäm imäm ‘There are various Paddhatis in abundance on [the prac- 
tice of] the various streams [the Siddhäntatantras, Vämatantras, Daksinatantras, Gärudatantras, 
and Bhütatantras]. But not one is seen on the procedures of the supreme doctrine of the Trika. 
Therefore, at the repeated request of my excellent disciples and fellow students, I am composing 
this clear and comprehensive treatise’. 

531See p.240. 

32 Agamadambara, p.132: faaläe vasumdhaläe dhammalaskädhiale niutte (= Skt. sakaläyà va- 
sundharäyà dharmaraksädhikäre niyuktah). 


392 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


is reported by Jayanta in his Nyäyamañjar. * It appears that Dharmaëiva is 
approached here as the official representative of all the Saiva persuasions, Päsu- 
pata, Kälamukha, Mahävratin, and Mantramärgic Saiva.$% From the eleventh 
century we have the testimony of the satirist Ksemendra. Writing for a Kash- 
mirian audience he mocks three Saiva ascetics in his Desopadesa: Nayanaëiva 
(= Netragiva), Rüpasiva, and Dhyänasiva.** The names suggest in the satirical 
context their inability to take their eyes off women (Eye-$iva, Eyefull-Siva, and 
Ogle-Siva) while at the same time being, like Dharmaëiva, regular Saiddhäntika 
initiation-names such as are found in inscriptions and $aiva literature. °% 

We also have references to and citations from a number of Svacchanda- 
based initiation Paddhatis, otherwise lost or not yet discovered, in Sivasvämin’s 
expanded text of the Kalädïksäpaddhati of Manodadatta, the initiation manual 
of the Saiva gurus of Kashmir. It quotes a passage from a metrical Paddhati by 
a Guru Vi$vävasu for its treatment of the preparation of the five products of 


533 Nyâyamañjari, vol. 1, p.649, IL 4-7: *asitaikapatanivitäniyatastripumsavihitabahucestam 
(asitaika em. : amitaika Ed.) | nilämbaravratam idam kila kalpitam äsit vitaih haïcit | tad apür- 
vam iti viditvä nivärayämäsa dharmatattvajñah | râjà fañkaravarmä na punar jainädimatam 
evam ‘King Sañkaravarman, knowing the essentials of [brahmanical] religious law, prohibited 
the Nilämbaravrata on the grounds that with its many acts committed by licentious couples 
wrapped up in a single black blanket it was an observance without precedent reportedly in- 
vented by certain dissolute rogues; but he did not act in this way against the Jainas and other 
[non-brahmanical religious]’. 

534 Açamadambara, p.188, 1. 10-11, in which the minister of religious affairs declares to 
Dharmaëiva as the government current policy of toleration of all the Saiva persuasions: #4d ime 
Saivapäsupatakälamukhà mahävratinas ca yathäsukham äsatäm ‘So these, the Saivas, Paäéupatas, 
Kälamukhas, and Mahävratins, may relax’. 

5% Desopadesa 8.46—47: nayanasivah khalväto + + + danturas ca rüpasivah | jatino visanti yage 
dhyänasivas tantramantrahinas ca | triphaläksälanavimalo dhäpädhyo bhasmamustihatayäkah | 
vesyänäm upadhänam dhanyo jatinäm jatäjätah ‘[ Three] Saiva ascetics, bald Nayanagiva …buck- 
toothed Rüpagiva, and Dhyänagiva devoid of [knowledge] of both the rituals and their Mantras 
[now] enter [before] the Mandala. The massed tresses of Saiva ascetics, cleansed by washing with 
nutmeg, areca nut, and cloves, richly fumigated with incense, their lice killed with fist-fulls of 
ash, are fortunate indeed, for they are prostitutes pillows. 

536 Thus among 49 initiated chanters of the Tamil hymns of the Teväram named as beneficia- 
ries in an inscription in the Räjaräjeévara (Brhadiévara) temple of Räjaräja I (r. 985-1014) at 
Tañjävür (South Indian Inscriptions 2, no. 65) there are 9 Dharmaëivas and 2 Netragivas; in the 
series of more than 95 12th-century images of named $iväcäryas in Därä$uram (L'HERNAULT 
1987, pp. 20-21, 31-35) there are 6 Dharmaëivas and 1 Netragiva; the Rajor inscription of 
A.D. 960 (Epigraphia Indica 3, no. 36) mentions a Rüpaëiva; and there is a Dhyänagiva in the 
preceptorial lineage of Aghoragiva as reported by the latter in his Duisatikälottaravrtti, in a verse 
given in GOODALL 1998, pp. xiv-xv. 


Alexis Sanderson 393 


the cow (pañcagavyavidhih) among the preliminary rites of initiation?” It fol- 
lows this with a quotation of the beginning of a passage on the same procedure 
from a prose Diksäkalpa. 8 The two texts are related but it is not possible to 
determine which drew on which.” The Kzlädiksapaddhati also quotes a prose 
Diksäkalpalatä, probably the same work, on the appropriate times of the year 
for the holding of initiation ceremonies**? and on the cutting off of the candi- 
date’s hair tuft (#khä) at the end of the purification of the highest of the five 
segments (kz/äh) of the cosmic hierarchy, the procedure taught in the latter 
passage being said to follow the teaching of the Svacchanda.\ It is also men- 
tioned together with an otherwise unknown text, the Diksäsärasamuccaya, as 
a source that does not support the view of an unnamed author of a certain 
Diksäpaddhati that at the end of the ritual that bestows brahmanhood dur- 
ing the first preliminary initiation (Ssyasamskärah, = samayadiksä) the officiant 


5% Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f. 20r11-v9 : atra ca visvävasuguravah: pañcagavyavidhaye ‘tha sam- 
bhavät pätrasaptakam upäharec chubham | mrnmayävadhimaneh samuksitam cästratah kavacato 
vagunthitam | präcy atho navapadim $ivädinà prärcya tattvanavakena madhyatah | supratisthi- 
tasusäntidiptimatsämrtätmakam atho saratnavat | pâtrapañcakam athätra madhyage varmama- 
ntritapayah Sikhänunà | pürvage dadhi ghrtam ca daksage cästramantraparimantritam nyaset | 
äpyage hrdanunätha gomayam gojalam ca firasätra saumyage | aïage kuajalam ca netratah 
saptasah samabhimantritam nyaset | paläni vedägnibhujendusamkhyäny añgusthato rdham kra- 
maso pi madhyät | hrdädibhih saptamabhäjane ‘tha sammisrayet täni kusäsanasthe iti. 

38 Kalädiksapaddhati À, f. 20v9—10: rathà ca diksäkalpe: atha pañcagavyavidhaye sambhavatah 
pâtrasaptakam hrdyam ityädy uktam. 

%The beginnings of both are so similar that one surely was drawing on the other: pañca- 
gavyavidhaye ‘tha sambhavät pätrasaptakam … Subham (Vi$vävasu's verse); and atha pañcagavya- 
vidhaye sambhavatah pätrasaptakam hrdyam (Diksäkalpa’s prose). 

40 Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f. 10v1—4: tatha sridiksäkalpalatäyäm: tatra Saranmadhuyogo vara iha 
diksävidhau tadapräptau varsäm vinänyadäpi na dosah. 

4 Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f. 166v15-167r7: tathà ca frisvacchandabhairavatantramatänusärena 
diksäkalpalatäyäm: atha satkäranakäranabhütäm vyäptrim anaupamyäm fuddhäm fäntyatitäm 
fikhägragäm Saspakotijalakanavad dhyätvä pränana$akter mundäntoccapravähinyäh chettum 
adhovahanätmabandhakatäm tadanukärinim dehe niskalasikhäbhimantritakartaryä Sisusikhäm 
chindyäd iti ‘And likewise in the Diksäkalpalatä in accordance with the position of the Sua- 
cchandabhairavatantra: “Then he should meditate on [the highest segment, that of] Säntyatità 
as the cause of the six causes [namely, Brahmä, Visnu, Rudra, I$vara, Sadäsiva, and Anäérita], 
all-pervading, matchless, and pure, [visualizing it] on the tip of the [candidate’s] hair-tuft as 
resembling à droplet of water on the tip of a blade of grass. Then in order to eliminate the ca- 
pacity of the power of the vital energy that flows up to reach the upper limit of the head to bind 
[the soul] by flowing downwards he should visualize the hair-tuft of the candidate as mirroring 
that [power] within the body and cut it away with a razor empowered by the recitation of the 
Sikhä [Mantra] of Niskala[svacchanda]”. This has in mind Suacchanda 4.217-218b. 


394 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


should have the initiand drink scented water mixed with ashes from the fire- 
pit as a substitute for the juice of the Soma plant, thus silently supporting the 
position of the Xx/ädiksäpaddhati that the officiant should simply imagine that 
he is making the candidate drink this liquid.”*? The same Diksapaddhati is crit- 
icized for ordaining that after the cutting of his hair-tuft the candidate should 
be purified not merely by bathing, as the Suacchanda requires, but by a bath 
preceded by the shaving of his hair (vapanam).$ The Kalädiksäpaddhati also 
quotes passages from a Gurupustaka, giving a prayer in verse in which the of- 
ficiant asks $iva to grant permission for him to proceed with initiation,“ the 
procedure for purifying the Mantras before the culminating act of fusing the 


82 Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f.101v12-16: etadante manasä somam pâyayet. manasä manobhä- 
vanayaiva. yat tu kenacid atra pâtre gandhodakam krtvä kundägnibhasmamisritam tac chisyam 
päyayed ity uktam likhitam ca svakrtadiksäpaddhatau tan nirmülatväd upeksyam $risvacchanda- 
tantraräje tadadar$anät somasambhudiksäkalpalatädisu diksäsärasamuccayagranthesu ca ‘At the 
end of these [rites that bestow brahmanhood] [the officiant] should mentally have [the initiand] 
drink Soma. Mentally means simply by imagining this in his mind. As for the position of a 
certain person that he should put scented water mixed with ash from the fire-pit in this vessel 
and make theinitiand drink it, which he has both taught and written in his Diksäpaddhati, that 
should be not be heeded, for it is not evidenced in the Suzcchandatantraräja, in such [Paddhatis] 
as Somasambhus and the Diksäkalpalatä, or in the Diksäsärasamuccaya’. 

53 Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f. 167v10-15: atra ca fisyam vapanam snänam ca kärayitva iti *yat 
(em. : y«h Cod.) kenäpi nijakrtapaddhatau likhitam (tan) nirmülatväd upeksyam. snänam sama- 
carec chisya iti frisvacchandatantroktyà $isyasya snänamätrenaiva $uddhir iti tikädäv api likhitvat 
“The statement bearing on this matter by a certain [Âcärya] in a Paddhati that he has composed’, 
namely “Having caused the candidate to be shaved and to bathe”, should not be heeded, be- 
cause it has no basis [in any authoritative source]. For the Suzcchandatantra says “Let the can- 
didate bathe” (4.219c) and in the commentary on that text and [related sources] we read that 
[his] purification is by bathing alone’. The commentary mentioned here is not Ksemaräja’s. For 
on this verse-quarter he comments only on the reason for the bath: chinnasikhatvät ‘because 
he is one whose hair-tuft has been cut of. 

M Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f.72:-v12: yathà gurupustake: “pürvam eva tvayà fambho niyukto 
‘ham Sivädhvare | guruh paräpare sthitvä lokänugrahakrd bhava | tvacchaktyäghrätahrdayo 
bhagavann amuko mayä | drstas tato ‘nugrahäya pravrtto ‘ham na lobhatah | tvam eva cätra 
bhagavan pramänam sarvakarmanäm | säksibhütah svayam kartä paramabh fañkarah sivah | tad 
visesena mâäm eva samadhisthäya samnidhim | vidhatsva yena tvatpädasamänakriyatäm iyäm | 
tvadäjñäm hrdaye krtvà karomi nikhiläh kriyäh | anyathà kartum ia hi lokesä api kim prabho | 
tvadädesäd diksaniyah Saktyävisto mayämukah | vibhor ävedayisyämi yad yat karma karomy 
aham | dehy äjñäm me jagannätha prasida bhagavan mama” iti. This text is that used at the 
beginning of the preliminary initiation (= samayadiksä) as taught in the Sisyasamskärapaddhati, 
an anonymous Paddhati for that ritual (f. 1v4-18). It is possible, therefore, that this Paddhati 
is an extract from the Gurupustaka itself. 


Alexis Sanderson 395 


) 545 546 
3 


candidate with Siva (yojanikä the procedure for that act of fusion,”*° and 
its Mantra.* On the laying down with a powdered cord of the design of the 
Navanäbhamandala, prescribed for initiation by the Svacchanda, it quotes first 
the Svacchanda itself and then a passage in verse to the same effect from the 
work of one $rikanthäcärya.** It is probable that this too was a Kashmirian 
Paddhati for initiation. 

Räjanaka Ânanda, in the encomium of his patrilineage (the Padmapura 
Räjänakas of the Gautama Gotra) found at the end of his commentary (-attva- 
vivrti), completed in 1654, on the Mahäkävya MNaisadhacarita, reports that his 
patrilineal ancestor Räjänaka Sitikantha composed the Gurupustikä at the re- 
quest of the king Samgrämasimha and also the Ka/palarä “for the pleasure of 
the learned”.** Samgrämasimha was probably the Cähamäna ruler of Sän- 
chor (Satyapura), whose son Pratäpasimha installed an inscription in 1387.° 
It is probable that these two works are the Xalädiksäpaddhatis Gurupustaka 
and Diksäkalpalatä, since the latter is also referred to in that work simply as 


the Xalpalatä in a passage that mentions these two as among the sources on 


5 Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f. 16911315: tathà ca gurupustake tantre: dhämno ‘nte Sodhayämy 
astram svähety ekaikayähutih. evam sarvatra. mülam tu fatajäpena $odhayed iti. 

46 Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f. 170r15-v4: 54 ca gurupustake tantre: iti hutva yojanikäm kuryäc 
chaivim pare $ive | ävesat kulajät kaulasäräd và sämarasyatah | vinyasya hrdayäkäse fimbhavyä 
krodhinidr$ä pränaspandäd änaväd và vyäpinisphärasamsphuräd iti. 

47 Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f.17515-15: OM HÜM PARAMASAIVE NIRANJANE PADE AMUKANUM 
YOJAYAMI VAUSAT. ti manasà yojanikämantram samdhäya pürnähutim pätayet. pürnähuty- 
ante manträksarakotim manträksarapräntam niyojayet. OM HÜM AMUKANUCAITANYAM NISKALE 
MANTRE YOJAYAMI HÜM NAMAH iti manasä mantrasya prânte yojanikäm krtvà Sisyam sammilita- 
mantram kuryât. tena caitanyamäträvasesayuktyà muktir bhavatiti guravah. iti gurupustake 
yojanikämantrah. 

588 Kalädiksapaddhati À, f. 90v9_: iti risvacchandabhairavamatam. tathà ca frikanthäcäryena 
päpabhaksanamatäntaram avalokyoktam yathä: …. 

S#Räjänaka Ananda in *Räjänakavamsaprasamsä À, f.2, IL. 16-19 (vv. 17-18: Sitikanthah 
sutas tasya sotkanthah Sivadarsane | “*samgrämasimhärthanayä (em. : samgrämasimhärcanayaä 
Cod.) cakre yo gurupustikäm | tasya kalpalatäkartur budhänäm pritaye sutau | adbhutäm yodha- 
Srikanthäv abhütäm siddhim ägatau ‘Sitikantha, the son of this [Modaka], devoted to the real- 
ization of $iva, composed the Gurupustikä at the request of Samgrämasimha and the Kalpalatä 
for the pleasure of the learned. He had two sons, Yodha and $rikantha, who both achieved an 
extraordinary degree of supernatural power [through their Saiva practice]. An incomplete and 
undated $äradä paper manuscript in 93 folios of a work entitled Gurupustikä has come down 
to us; (TriPÂTHI 1971, p.436: Ms. C 4115). But I have not yet examined it. 

550See Ray 1931-1936, vol. 2, p. 1141. The only alternative that I can see is the Cähamaäna 
of Läta who was the son of Sindhuräja and ruled c. 1215-45. But he is too early. 


396 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


which Manodadatta drew when he composed the original work of this name”! 


Manodadatta completed his Kalädiksäpaddhati in 1335/6°°? and the Räjanaka 
Sitikantha patronized by Samgrämasimha was, according to Räjänaka Ananda, 
the great-grandson of the Räjänaka Sitikantha who wrote the Bélabodhininyäsa. 
That work was completed in 1471. If we assume that the active life of its au- 
thor was approximately 1425-1475 and work backwards through time to the 
author of the Gurupustikä and the Kalpalatä, assigning twenty-five years to each 
generation, then the author of those two works will have been active in approx- 
imately 1350-1400. This is too late for his compositions to have been among 
Manodadattas sources. However, apart from the fact that the calculation by 
generations of twenty-five years is only a very rough and unreliable guide, the 
genealogy itself is questionable. While Räjänaka Ânanda makes our Sitikantha 
the son of Modaka and the father of Yodha and $Srikantha, and Yodha the grand- 
father of the author ofthe Bälabodhininyäsa, 
lineage, at least in the two manuscripts that I have seen, omits our Sitikantha, 
making Yodha the son rather than the grandson of Modaka.”** Furthermore, it 
is Sivasvamin, the enlarger of the Kalädiksäpaddhati, that claims that Manoda- 
datta used these texts, not Manodadatta himself. The expanded text contains 
a series of hymns of which the latest is the Szmbhukrpämanoharastava com- 


that author’s own account ofhis 


1 Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f. 9v13-16: $rimanmrgendragurupustakatantratanträlokasvatantra- 
matakalpalatädisäram ährtya samsayafamäya sadadhvadiksäsiksäm jagäda gururäjamanodada- 
ttah ‘In order to still doubts Manodadatta, king among Gurus, declared his instruction on the 
[procedure of the] initiation through the six paths after extracting the essence of the Mreendra, 
the Gurupustakatantra, the Tanträloka, the Svacchanda (svatantramatam), the Kalpalatä, and 
other [texts]’. 

552See footnote 514 on p. 387. 

55Räjänaka Ânanda in *Räjanakavamsaprasamsä À, #2, IL. 14— 3, 7 (vv. 16-22): *modakas 
(em. : sodakas AB) tanayas tasya Sivatattvaprabodhakah | vedäntavidyäsiddhäntavedt siddhapa- 
tham $ritah | 17 Sitikanthah sutas tasya sotkanthah fivadarsane | *samgrämasimhärthanaya (en. : 
samgrämasimhärcanayä Cod.) cakre yo gurupustikäm | 18 tasya kalpalatäkartur budhänäm pri- 
taye sutau | adbhutäm yodhasrikanthäv abhütäm siddhim ägatau | 19 $rikanthah präcyasamskä- 
raprakärän nirvikäradhih | kanistho ‘pi paräm nisthäm siddhatäm Saisave Srayat | 20 fivädva- 
yopadestäbhüj jyestho lokaduristahä | yodho *’hi (em. : vi Cod.) Sisyasamtatyä yo dhahkrtapra- 
jäpatih | 21 yodhäd bodhämbudher jätà *dvijaräjäh (corr. : dvijaräjà Cod.) *sadoditäh (em. : 
sadoditah Cod.) | arjuno ‘tha trinayano mahäratha iti trayah | 22 $itikantho rjunasuto vivavre 
bälabodhinim | samiksayärthatritayam cakre ca mahimastutau. 

SS#Räjänaka Sitikantha in *Réjänakavamsaprasamsà À, £.9, IL. 16-18 (vv. 4c-Sa): satputras ca 
modakah samabhavad vedäntasiddhäntavid dhyäyam dhyäyam iyäya devasadanam devam mrda- 
nipatim | tasmäd yodhagurur babhüva bhagavan. 


Alexis Sanderson 397 


posed by Räjänaka Ratnakantha in the seventeenth century, °* 


sequent inference that Sivasvämin was active during the time of or later than 
Ratnakantha is undermined by the fact that the hymns appear to have been 
clumsily inserted into the text, the instructions that precede them being re- 
peated after them to re-establish the flow of the Paddhati.*6 

The claim that the Saiva Guru Räjänaka Sitikantha was asked to compose 
his Gurupustikä by a king ruling in distant Sänchor in the far southwest of 
Rajasthan may surprise. But the later Sitikantha of this patriline reports in his 
Bälabodhininyäsa that his grandfather Yodha, the son of our Sitikantha accord- 
ing to Räjänaka Ananda, had given $Saiva initiation to a number of kings, en- 
abling them thereby to conquer their enemies and so enjoy long and prosperous 
557 He does not identify them; but Räjänaka Ananda’s report that the 
Gurupustikä was commissioned by Samgrämasimha (Sangram Singh) suggests 
that they may have been rulers of the Rajput kingdoms of Rajasthan. No king 
of Kashmir can have been among them since the country had been in the hands 
of Muslim rulers since 1339. 


though the con- 


reigns. 


The context is the ritual of paviträrohanam to be performed immediately after a post- 
initiatory consecration ceremony (abhisekah). Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f. 196v4-11: ity abhisekah. 
tatah paviträrohanam. abhisekänantaram sapariväram mantram yathäsambhavam samtarpya 
bhagavantam visesärcäbhi$ ca sampüjya paviträrohane “ca (corr. : ca bhagavatam bhagava- 
ntam Cod.) stutidandapranatyädimahotsavanrttagitaväditrarahasyärcanacarcäbhis bhagavantam 
samtosya pavitrakän püjayet. tatra stutir yathä: .……. The hymns that follow are the Bhairava- 
stotra of Abhinavagupta, called here Paramañivastuti and Bhairavadasaka (#.196v12-197v8), 
the Aparädhasundarastava ascribed to Sañkaräcärya (f.197v8-199r13), the Bhairavastotra of 
Räjänaka Sañkarakantha (ff. 199r13-200r5), the Sambhukrpämanoharastava of his son Räjä- 
naka Ratnakantha (Æ. 220r6-201v15), and a hymn attributed to Mahäkavi Pandita Jagaddhara 
(Æ.201v16-203r1) that is not among the thirty-eight of his Ssutikusumäñjali as commented 
upon by Räjänaka Ratnakantha in his -laghupañcika. 

6 Kalädiksäpaddhati À, f. 203r4-—5, after the hymns: iti stutibhih puspañjalin däpayitv fisyän 
dandapranatisf ca kärayitvà nrttagitaväditrarahasyärcanacarcäbhis ca $risivam samtosya pavitra- 
kän püjayet. This repeats the meaning and most of the wording of the passage that intro- 
duces the hymns in f. 196v8-11: ssutidandapranatyädimahotsavanrttagitaväditrarahasyärcana- 
carcäbhis bhagavantam samtosya pavitrakän püjayet. tatra stutir yathä: …. 

S57Räjänaka Sitikantha in *Rajänakavamsaprasamsä À, f. 9, IL 18—19 (v. 5): rasmäd yodhagu- 
rur babhüva bhagavän sampräpya diksäm yatah | prâjyam räjyam “apästavairinikaräs (apästa 
GovinDp KAULS transcript [em.] : ap4sya Cod.) cakrus ciram bhübhujah ‘His son was the Guru 
Bhagavat Yodha, having obtained initiation from whom kings were freed of their enemies and 
enjoyed long and glorious reigns’. 


398 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


KSEMARAJAS EXEGESIS OF THE SVACCHANDA AND NETRA 


That the cults of Svacchandabhairava and Amrte$a were already well established 
in Kashmir in the tenth century can be seen from the fact that both the Suac- 
chanda and the Netra received elaborate running commentaries from Abhinava- 
guptas pupil Ksemaräja: the Svacchandoddyota and the Netroddyota. The cen- 
trality of these two Tantras during this early period is evident not merely from 
the existence of these learned commentaries—he also refers to a long commen- 
tary on the Svacchanda by a Räjänaka Bhullaka, now lost”*#—but also from the 
fact that in both Ksemaräja stresses that his motive is to re-establish what he sees 
as the true, non-dualistic perspective of these texts, which, he says, had been 
overshadowed by the prevailing view, that of the Saiddhäntika dualists, an un- 
justifiable inroad into non-Saiddhäntika territory that had both imposed a less 
enlightened reading of their teachings and led to the suppression of elements 
of non-dualistic practice (advaitäcärah),**” such as the offering of fermented 
liquor to Svacchandabhairava, that were vital to the proper performance of their 
rites. Ksemaräja has also left us his Bhairavänukaranastotra, à hymn to Svaccha- 
ndabhairava in which he gives a non-dualistic reading of the symbolism of all 
the details of the visualization of this deity. 

As in the works of Abhinavagupta, the philosophical basis of Ksemaräjas 
exegesis was that of Utpaladeva’s system, but though he was a disciple of 
Abhinavagupta, the Trika enters very little into his analysis. The system of eso- 
teric Säkta doctrine and practice that animates his exegesis is rather that of the 
Krama. We could see this as evidence of a difference in religious perspective be- 
tween the teacher and the pupil, and there certainly are such differences —we 
should be wary of the tendency to assume in line with the religious theory of 
unbroken transmission that disciples were mere clones of their teachers—but 
it may be more accurate to say that both propagated Krama-based analyses, 
Abhinavagupta of the Trika’s Mälinivijayottara and Ksemaräja of the Svaccha- 
nda and Netra.5S 


V8E.g., Svacchandoddyota, vol. Sa, p.211, IL. 9-10: brhattikäkäraräjänakabhullakena …. 
59On advaitäcärah see SANDERSON 2005a, pp. 110-114, footnote 63. 
560 For evidence of Ksemaräjas reading the Krama, for him the highest of all religious systems, 


into his interpretation of the cults of Svacchandabhairava and Amrtesabhairava see SANDERSON 


1995, pp. 64-70. 


Alexis Sanderson 399 


OTHER Works By KSEMARAJA 


Ksemaräja extended his non-dualistic exegesis beyond the Svacchanda and Ne- 
tra, technical Tantras mainly devoted to the prescription of ritual, to a wide 
range of texts, all of which have in common that they have no concern what- 
soever with ritual but rather with devotional contemplation of ultimate reality 
as the means of its realization. Just as Ksemaräja brought non-dualistic exegesis 
to those Tantras that appear to have been most widely followed in Kashmir, so 
with these works he sought to propagate the doctrines of his tradition among 
an even larger constituency, that is to say, those who were Saiva by conviction 
and devotion but were not only those who had received formal inititation and 
were therefore engaged in the study of the Tantras and the performance of the 
rituals they prescribe. Thus he wrote à commentary on the Wiñänabhairava, 
a work of the Trika but one concerned entirely with methods of méditation 
that transcend the particularities of Mantra, Mudrä, Mandala, deity, and ritual 
procedure that are the true criteria for distinguishing between the systems that 
make up the Saiva Mantramärga.f! This texts simple single-verse instructions 
on a wide variety of meditations no doubt rendered it accessible to this broader 
audience, a surmise supported by the fact that it is often found in Kashmirian 
manuscripts for personal devotional use along with other short, less technical 
Saiva works. It is regrettable that only his commentary on the introductory 
verses has come down to us. Sivasvämin Upädhyäya I, searching for the text 
in the eighteenth century, could find no manuscript of the whole and wrote 
his own commentary on the remainder, appending it to the small portion of 
Ksemaräjas text that was accessible to him.°°? 

Ksemaräja also composed commentaries on a number of Saiva devotional 
hymns, namely the Sämbapañcäsikä, the Stavacintämani of Bhatta Näräyana, 
and the Sivastoträvali of Utpaladeva, a collection of hymns together with single 
devotional verses artificially arranged into hymns by later editors.>? The con- 


561The Trika background of the text is revealed in the introductory verses (1-23). 

362 Vñänabhairavavivrti, p. 143, IL 9-14. The surviving portion of Ksemaräjas commentary 
extends from its beginning to the end of the commentary on the last of the introductory verses 
(1-23, pp. 1-16. 

563Ksemaräja, Svastorrävalivivrti, pp. 1, L. 14-2, 1.4 (his introduction): Xvarapratyabhijña- 
käro vandyäbhidhänah $rimadutpaläcäryo Smatparamesthi satatasäksätkrtasvätmamahesvarah 
svam rüpam tathätvena parämrastum arthijanänujighrksayä (ca) samgrahastotrajayastotrabhakti- 
stoträny ähnikastutisäktäni ca känicin muktakäny eva babandha. atha kadäcit täny eva tadvyà- 
misräni labdhvä $riräma ädityaräjas ca prthak prthak stotrafayyäyäm nyavesayat. rivifvävartas tu 


400 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


text of the use of these devotional works is not well known. But if we may judge 
from recent practice in Kashmir it is probable that they were in use not only 
among initiates but also, and perhaps more typically, among lay devotees, who 
chanted them while attending Saiva rituals or when visiting $iva shrines. 

Then there are his commentaries on the Sivasätra and the Spandakärikä. On 
the first we have his Sivasütravimarsini, and on the second his Spandasamdoha, 
which comments only on the opening verse, and his Spandanirnaya, which 
comments on the whole work. Here too we find a strong commitment to 
Krama-based readings. Indeed he considers that the Krama is the very essence 
of the Spandakärikä.*% In the case of the Aphorisms of Siva (Sivasñtra) he does 
not make the same claim explicitly. However, it is implicit in his assertion that 
Vasugupta wrote the Spandakärikä in order to summarize the teachings con- 


565 


tained in that text,” ®” and Krama interpretation is to the fore in Ksemaräja*s 


vimsatyà stotraih svätmotpreksitanämabhir vyavasthäpitavän iti kila $räyate ‘The author of the 
Üvarapratyabhijña, my Guru’s Guru’s Guru, the Âcärya Utpala of venerable name, immersed 
at all times in immediate experience of the Siva that is one’s true identity, in order to meditate 
on his own nature and out of a desire to benefit those who sought [his guidance], composed the 
Samgrabastotra, Jayastotra, and Bhaktistotra, and also à number of single-verse poetic hymns for 
his daily devotions. Some time thereafter Rima and Âdityaräja received the latter mixed up with 
the former and then edited them in the form of a series of [multi-verse] hymns. It is reported 
that Vi$vävarta then [re-Jarranged them as twenty hymns with titles of his own invention’. It is 
Viévävartas edition that Ksemaräja follows, while recognizing its artificiality. For commenting 
on 1.2 he notices that the arrangement of the verses here is incoherent, since there is no voca- 
tive addressed to Siva in the previous verse to justify the expression bhavadbhakti- ‘devotion to 
you” in this. He puts this observation into the mouth of a critic and replies: ‘Ask this question 
of Vié$vävarta. I am concerned only with the explanation of each individual verse’ (p. 4, IL. 8-9: 
katham iyam stotrafayyeti frivisvävarta eva prastavyah. vayam tu süktavyäkhyänodyatäh). 

SG Spandanirnaya, p.74, I. 15-18: evam copakramopasamhärayor mahärthasamputikäram 
dar$ayan  tatsäratayä samastasäñkaropanisanmürdhanyatäm  asyäviskaroti  Sästrasya  $rimän 
vasuguptäcäryah ‘And by showing in this way that the Mahärtha encloses this Sästra in 
its opening and closing verses the venerable Âcärya Vasugupta reveals that it stands at the 
summit of all Siva’s esoteric teachings, since it has that [system] as its essence’. His view of 
the Krama basis of the first verse is set out at length in his Spandasamdoha. Ksemaräja wrote 
his Spandasamdoha, Spandanirnaya, and Sivasätravimarsint in that order; see Spandanirnaya 
p.6, 11. 1-2: nirnitam caivampräyam mayaiva prathamasütramätravivarane spandasamdohe; and 
Sivasñtravimarsini, p. 3, 1.79: tatpäramparyapräptäni spandasäträny asmäbhih spandanirnaye 
samyañ nirnitäni. $ivasüträni tu nirniyante. 

5 Sivasätravimarsint, p. 3, Il. 3-5: etäni ca samyag adhigamya bhattasrikallatädyesu sacchisyesu 
prakäsitavän spandakärikäbhis ca samgrhitavän ‘And having correctly mastered these [Sütras 
Vasugupta] revealed them to Bhattaéri Kallata and others who were his true disciples and sum- 
marized them in the Spandakärikä. 


Alexis Sanderson 401 


analysis of a number of its key aphorisms. 66 


Finally, we have his Pratyabhijñnährdaya, à text in the form of Sütras and an 
auto-commentary that claims to set out the essence of the doctrine taught by 
Utpaladeva in his Kvarapratyabhijñäkärikä in order to enlighten persons who 
are experiencing the urge to achieve immersion in Siva but lack the philosophi- 
cal training necessary to master the original works.*®7 Here too he privileges the 
Krama, propounding its distinctive contemplation of the cyclical dynamism of 


cognition as the very heart of that philosophical system. 8 


566$ee his commentary on 1.6 (sakticakrasamdhäne visvasamhärah), 1.11 (rritayabhoktà 
viresah), and 1.22 (mahähradänusamdhänän mantraviryänubhavah). In that on 1.6 he iden- 
tifies the ‘circle of powers’ (#zkticakram) as that of ‘the venerable $akti of Emission etc.’ (p.21, 
L. 4-5: frimatsrstyädisakticakra-). That he means the twelve Kälis beginning with Srstikäli can be 
inferred from his commentary on 1.11, since he states there that through continuous contem- 
plation of the circle of powers one enters the state of identity with Manthänabhairava (p.26, 
1. 14-27, L.7). For in the Spandanirnaya (p. 6, Il. 5-9) Ksemaräja identifies Manthänabhairava 
as the leader of the circle of these goddesses, glossing the description of $iva in the first verse as 
fakticakravibhavaprabhavam (acc. sg.): faktinäm srstiraktädimaricidevinäm cakram dvädasätmà 
samäbhas tasya yo vibhava udyogävabhäsanacarvanaviläpanätma kridädambaras tasya prabhavam 
hetum. tà hi devyah frimanmanthänabhairavam cakresvaram äliñgya sarvadaiva jagatsargädikri- 
däm sampädayantity ämnäyah [1 praise Sañkara] who is the source (prabhavah), the cause, of 
the pervasive manifestation, the energetic play that is [the cycle of] the urge to manifest, mani- 
festation, the subjective relishing [of the manifest] and dissolution, of the circle, the twelvefold 
group, of [his] powers, of the [twelve] ray-goddesses Srsti[käli], Rakta[käli], and the rest. For 
the teaching [of the Mahärtha] informs us that it is through their intimate connection with 
Manthänabhairava as the lord of their circle that they constantly accomplish the play of emit- 
ting, [sustaining,] and [withdrawing] the universe’. 

567 Pratyabhijñährdaya, p. 37, 11. 8—10: iha ye sukumäramatayo ‘krtatiksnatarkasästrapariramäh 
faktipätonmisatpäramesvara*samävesäbhiläsäh (conj. : samävesäbhiläsinah Ed.) katicid bhakti- 
bhäjas tesäm Kvarapratyabhijñopadesatattvam manäg unmilyate ‘Here 1 shall briefly reveal the 
essence of the teaching of the Xvarapratyabhijnaälkärika] for the benefit of those rare devotees 
who being of undeveloped intellect have not undertaken training in the severe discipline of 
philosophical argument, yet are experiencing an urge towards immersion in Siva emerging in 
themselves through the descent of [his] power’. 

S8This perspective is alluded to in the first of the benedictory verses: namah iväya satatam 
pañcakrtyavidhäyine | cidänandaghanasvätmaparamärthävabhäsine ‘Obeisance to Siva who, 
constantly engaged in his five functions, makes manifest the ultimate reality of one’s iden- 
tity pervaded by the bliss of consciousness’. The five functions are emission, stasis, withdrawal, 
obscuration, and revelation, following pan-$aiva doctrine. But in this work Ksemaräja teaches 
that from the esoteric point of view these are to be seen as operating within the flow of cogni- 
tion, explaining this operation first in neutral terms, though in the spirit of the Krama (Sütra 
10 and commentary), and then directly with Krama terminology (Sütra 11 and commentary). 
It is this Krama reading, I propose, that is intended in the opening verse, the first qualifier 


402 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


THE SIVASÜTRA, SPANDAKARIKÀ, AND THEIR EXEGESIS 


In addition to the commentaries of Ksemaräja on the Sivasätra and Span- 
dakärikä,*® we have a commentary on the former (Svasätravärtika) by Bhatta 
Bhäskara, and on the latter we have a brief gloss by Bhattagri Kallata (-vrti), and 
detailed analytic commentaries by Räjänaka Räma (Spandavivrti), [the Pan- 
carätrika] Bhägavatotpala (Spandapradipikä), and Bhattärakasvamin (Spanda- 
pradipikä). Others existed but have not survived, such as that by Bhatta Lollata 
reported by Ksemaräja. °° 

The study of the Svasärra in its own right is problematic. Many of its 
seventy-seven terse aphorisms are obscure in meaning both individually and 
in sequence, which has allowed considerable divergences between the inter- 
pretations of Bhatta Bhäskara and Ksemaräja. Moreover, they reveal no close 
attachment to the terminology and concepts of the Krama, the Trika, or any 
single scripture-based system so that we could clarify their meaning by drawing 
on its literature. One may say only that they present à creative epitome of doc- 
trine and trans-ritual practice drawing, probably eclectically, from Kaula tradi- 
tions that venerate Bhairava and the Mothers, teaching that the goal of practice 
is to realize that one is oneself the /zkri]cakresvarah, the deity that controls 
the diverse powers that constitute the universe of experience, establishing this 
realization first through withdrawal into the heart of consciousness and then 
through its expansion into the states that constitute the mundane awareness 
of the bound.””! This model of transcendence followed by an expansion that 


pañcavidhakrtyavidhäyine expressing the reason (hetau vifesanam) for the second: ‘Obeisance 
to Siva who [since he is] constantly engaging in his five functions [of the manifesting of the 
object (äbhäsanam), immersion in the object (r4krih), subjective awareness of the perception 
(vimarsanam), laying down the impression of the perception in memory (bäjävasthäpanam), 
and completely dissolving all trace of contracted consciousness (viläpanam)] makes manifest 
the ultimate reality of ones identity pervaded by the bliss of consciousness’. See also pp. 50, 
17-51, L. 1 (Sûtra 12 and commentary) on the five goddesses Vämeévari etc.; and pp. 58-59 
(Sütra 19 and commentary) on bringing about permanent immersion. 

56e also have two summaries of his Svasñtravimarsini: the anonymous Sivasätravrtti, and 
the Sivasütravärtika of the South Indian Varadaräja alias Krsnadäsa, pupil of Madhuräja, an 
ascetic of Madurai. 

70 Spandanirnaya, p.34, 1. 12-13. 

571 Sivasütra 1.5: udyamo bhairavah ‘Bhairava is the primordial dynamism [of consciousness]; 
1.6: Sakticakrasamdhäne visvasamhärah ‘When one assimilates the circle of [his] powers the 
universe is withdrawn’; 1.7: jägratsvapnasusuptabhede turyäbhogasambhavah ‘{Thereafter] there 
comes about the expansion of the Fourth [state back] into the divisions [of projected con- 


Alexis Sanderson 403 


causes the state of enlightenment to pervade the transcended is central to the 
Kälikula, and the Aphorisms may well have drawn it directly or indirectly from 
that source. But there is much in them that cannot obviously be derived from 
it and several elements that cannot be traced to any other known scriptural 
source. 

Since so much of the early Säkta literature has been lost or preserved only 
in quotations in the works of the Kashmirian exegetes it would be rash to try to 
assess the extent to which the aphorisms are a creative development. However, 
that they were thought to be so at a time when much more of that literature was 
current is implicit in the accounts of their origin given by the commentators. 
For these elevate them in a manner that allows for a degree of originality that 
would not be acceptable in a text claiming merely human authorship. Thus ac- 
cording to Räjänaka Räma and Bhägavatotpala the aphorisms were revealed to 
Vasugupta through oral transmission by a Siddha,”’? in the manner claimed for 
the Old Kashmiri Chummäs. According to Bhatta Bhäskara directions given to 
Vasugupta by a Siddha led him to discover the aphorisms on Mt. Mahädeva.° 
Ksemaräja too held that Vasugupta found the aphorisms on this mountain, but 
attributes the instruction that led to their discovery not to a Siddha but to Siva 
himself appearing to Vasugupta in a dream, thus lifting the text on to the level 


sciousness, namely] the waking state, dream, and dreamless sleep’; 1.8—10: jñänam jägrat | 
svapno vikalpäh | aviveko mäyä sausuptam ‘The waking state [here] is sense-cognition; the dream 
state is [one] conceptual constructions; the state of dreamless sleep is the absence of aware- 
ness [of transcendence], the state of inner self-concealment’; 1.11: #ritayabhoktä virefah ‘One 
who [continously] experiences [these] three [as the Fourth] is [Bhairava,] the Lord of Heroes’; 
1.21: Suddhavidyodayäc cakresatvasiddhih ‘The result of the arising of non-dual awareness is 
that one is established as the Lord of the circle of [his] Powers’; 2.7: mätrkäcakrasambodhah 
‘[Through the Guru the disciple] achieves realization of the circle of the Mothers’; 3.19: k4- 
vargädisu mähesvaryädyäh pasumätarah Mähe$vari and the [other goddesses] are the Mothers 
for bound souls, [being manifest] in the gutturals and the classes [of the sounds of the syllabary 
that combine as conceptual construction’. 

*”?Bhägavatotpala, Spandapradipika, p.83, I. 15: siddhamukhenagatam rahasyam yat ‘The 
esoteric teaching that had come [to Vasugupta] through the oral instruction of a Siddha 
…”; Spandakärikävivrti, p.165, IL 12-15: guror vasuguptäbhidhänasya säksät siddhamukha- 
samkräntasamastarahasyopanisadbhütaspandatattvämrtanihsyandasya .… ‘the Guru called Va- 
sugupta, to whom the outflow of the nectar that is the hidden essence of all the esoteric [$Saiva 
scriptures] was transmitted directly from the lips of a Siddha’. 

573Bhatta Bhäskara, Sivasütravärtika 1.3: frimanmahädevagirau vasuguptaguroh purä | si- 
ddhädesät prädur äsan fivasäträni tasya hi ‘1n the past the Aphorisms of Siva were discovered on 
Mt. Mahädeva by the Guru Vasugupta following the instruction of a Siddha.” 


404 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


574 though he too knew a tradition that Vasugupta was 


of scriptural revelation, 
the conduit to men of Kaula oral teaching, for he describes him as “one whose 
heart had been purified by the spiritual transmissions that he had received from 
numerous Saiva Yoginis and Siddhas”, a formulation that may well have been 
intended also to account for the eclectic character of the text.°7° 

Remaining faithful to the texts character as a creative synthesis of Kaula 
tradition neither commentator has attempted to tie his interpretation to a sin- 
gle scripture-based system. Ksemaräja, as I have stated above, shows a strong 
tendency to read the text in the terms of the Krama, but this is by no means his 
only exegetical resource in this commentary. Bhatta Bhäskara’s commentary, 


too, is relatively system-neutral, though he too on occasion uses language that 
echoes the Kälikula.°76 


SA Sivasätravimarsint, pp. 2, 1.7-3, L.4: kadäcic cäsau dvaitadarsanädhivaäsitapräye jivaloke 
rabasyasampradäyo mà vicchedity äfayato ‘nujighrksäparena paramasivena svapne ‘nugrhyon- 
misitapratibhah krto yathätra mahibhrti mabati filätale rahasyam asti tad adhigamyänugraha- 
yogyesu prakäsayeti. prabuddhas cäsäv anvisyan täm mahatim Siläm karasparsanamätra- 
parivartanatah samvädikrtasvapnäm pratyaksikrtyemäni fivopanisatsamgraharñpäni fivasäträni 
tatah samäsasäda ‘Once Paramaäiva, desiring to benefit mankind by preventing the esoteric 


tradition from dying out in a society that was almost completely permeated by the dualistic 
doctrine [of the Saiddhäntikas], favoured that [Guru Vasugupta on Mt. Mahädeva by appear- 
ing to him] in a dream and causing him to understand that there was an esoteric teaching 
[inscribed] on a huge rock on that mountain and that he was to learn it and reveal it to those 
who deserved to be so favoured. When he awoke he looked for that rock and turning it over 
by a mere touch of his hand saw that it confirmed his dream. He then acquired from it these 
aphorisms, which are the epitome of the esoteric $aiva scriptures’. 

7 Sivasñtravimarsins, p.2, 1l.3-5: päramesvaranänäyoginisiddhasatsampradäyapavitrita- 
brdayah. 

F76$ee e.g. (1) Sivasätravärtika 1.52-53b on rritayabhoktä viresah: evam maricinicayo guna- 
trayasamudbhavah | vaikalpike jagaty asmin vamanagräsatatparah | taträpi gräsakrd yas- 
mât tena viresvarah smrtah ‘In this way the mass of rays that arises from the three Qual- 
ities [that are manifest in the three states of waking, dream, and dreamless sleep] is in- 
tent on projecting and devouring [the contents of consciousness] in this universe of con- 
ceptual constructions. He is called the Lord of Heroes (Vire$vara) here because he in turn 
devours these [rays]’; cf. Jayadrathayämala, Satka 4, 4.9ab (Kälikäkramapatala): sphurad- 
vamanasamgräsarävikt srstkärikä; f. 216v (Siddhayogesvarividhipatala 34cd): asesacakracakresa- 
vamanagräsanisthuräm; Arnasimha, Mahänayaprakäsa 226: äsäm dvisatkadevinäm vamana- 
gräsatatparäm | devim trayodaÿim vande tädätmyapratipattaye); (2) Sivasütravärtika 2.12—15b 
(on garbhe cittavikäso visisto vidyäsvapnah ‘The mind expands within the source [and because of 
that] ignorance sleeps’): prakä$änandasäräntarvyävartanabaläd bhr$am | visayebhyo nivrttasya 
manasas cinmayt sthitih | paro vikäsas ciccandracandrikämrtanirbharah | sravacchäktämrtäpüra- 
plutänandijaganmayah | tatsadbhäväd avidyäyäh fprathayantyät dharädibhih | tattvajalair 


alamgräsayuktyà svapno vilopanam ‘The mind becomes consciousness when it turns back from 


Alexis Sanderson 405 


As for the Spandakärikä, all our authors agree that it presents the essentials 
of the Aphorisms, Ksemaräja claiming that Vasugupta himself was its author, °?7 
and Bhatta Bhäskara and Bhägavatotpala attributing it to Kallata, his pupil.5’8 


But in fact while there is much that is common to both texts, notably the model 


sense-objects by force of intense reversion into the essence that is [the fusion] of light and 
bliss. This is its full expansion. It is filled with the nectar that is the light of the moon of con- 
sciousness and it is fused with the world now blissful because it has been completely drenched 
by the outsurging flood of the nectar of [Bhairava’s] Power. Because of this there arises the 
sleep, the elimination through the process of Complete Devouring (alamgräsah), of the igno- 
rance that ?.…[it] with the entangling Tattvas from earth [to Siva]’. The reading prathayan- 
tyà dharädibhih | tattvajälair yields no appropriate sense that I can see. Perhaps we should 
emend to vyathayantyà dharädibhih ‘that torments [it] with the entangling Tattvas from earth 
[to Siva]’. The expression prakäfänanda- is frequently encountered in texts of the Kälïkula; 
see, e.g., Jayadrathayämala, Satka 3, f. 156r4: yatra ksayam idam yâti pränädyam sarvam eva 
hi | yatodeti punar bhüyo prakä$änandalaksanam | ciddhäma yat param sûksmam käranesv 
api käranam | tam fivam paramam devam svasaktiparimanditam: Satka 4, f. 34v4: vikäsäkuñ- 
canenaiva prakäsänandayogatah: f. 196x7: trifirsà viryamälini | prakäsänandamadhyasthäà prol- 
lasanmantravigrahä; and f. 196v1: prakäsänandamadhyasthä kädyà kañkälabhairavi. The term 
alamgräsah too is a feature of the Krama texts; see Arnasimha, Mahänayaprakäfa, Ÿ. 127r2-3 
(v.225cd): devikäkramasadbhävo ‘hy alamgräsaikaghasmarah; Mahänayaprakä$a (Triv.) 7.99ab: 
alamgräsapravrttena kriyävesena tattvatah; Vätälanäthasätravrtti on 2: käläkälakalpanottirnä- 
lamgräsavapusä mahänirihena; on 9: cäturätmyena udyogäbhäsacarvanälamgräsavapusà svasva- 
räpävasthitib; on 10: udyogävabhäsacarvanälamgräsaviräntiräpänäm mahäsamvidrasminäm; 
Jhänakriyädvayasataka Scd: namah samastabhävaughahathälamgräsabhänave; and the commen- 
tary on the Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakä$sa 4.6: bhagavatyälamgräsaparayä. 

577 Sivasätravimarsint, p. 3, I. 4-7: etäni ca samyag adhigamya bhattasrikallatädyesu sacchisyesu 
prakäsitavän spandakärikäbhis ca samgrhïtavän ‘And [Vasugupta] having mastered these [Apho- 
risms] revealed them to Bhattaéri Kallata and other worthy disciples and then summarized them 
in the Spandakärikà . 

5’8Bhägavatotpala, Spandapradipikä, p.83, I. 15-17: ayam atra kilämnäyah siddhamukhenä- 
gatam rahasyam yat | tad bhattakallatendur vasuguptaguror aväpya fisyänäm | avabodhärtham 
anustuppañcäsikayà samgraham krtavän ‘On this matter the following tradition is reported. 
The moon-like Bhatta Kallata received from the Guru Vasugupta the esoteric teaching that 
had come to him through the oral instruction of a Siddha and summarized it in fifty verses in 
the Anustubh metre’ (for the point of the moon-metaphor see footnote 581); and Bhäskara, 
Sivasñtravartika 1.45: sarahasyäny atah so ‘pi prädäd bhattäya süraye | $rikallatäya so py evam 
catubkhandäni täny atha | vyäkarot trikam etebhyah spandasätraih svakaïs tatah | tattvärtha- 
cintämanyäkhyatikayä khandam antimam ‘He transmitted [the aphorisms] in four sections, 
along with [an explanation of their] esoteric teaching, to the learned Bhattaéri Kallata, who 
explained the [first] three of these in his own Spandakärikä and the last section in a commen- 
tary entitled Tattvärthacintämant . Citations from the Tattvärthacintämani, now lost, survive 
in Zanträloka 10.208 (paraphrase), -viveka thereon (quotation); Tanträloka 16.51 (paraphrase), 
-viveka thereon (quotation); and Sivasätravimarsini, p. 138, IL. 5-8 (quotation). 


406 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


of liberation through transcendence and expansion, there is nothing in them 
that supports this supposed intimate relationship and much that goes against 
it, most notably the absence from the Aphorisms of the doctrine that Siva's 
essence is the vibrancy of consciousness (spandah, spandatattvam) that gives the 
Spandakärikä its title. Here too no single Kaula system can be identified as the 
texts basis. Nonetheless it is probable that the Kälikula was a major element in 
the milieu within which this text emerged. The term spandab is certainly much 
used in the scriptures of that tradition. °?? 

The short gloss on the Spandakärikä by Bhattaéri Kallata supports the view 
of Bhatta Bhäskara and Bhägavatotpala that the root-text was indeed composed 
by Kallata and not by Vasugupta as Ksemaräja maintained. For it lacks its own 
initial benedictory verse and nowhere gives any indication of separate author- 
ship. The second of three post-colophonic verses in the edition of the text does 
assert that the Spandakärikä is by Vasugupta: “[Here] Kallata has clarified the 
nectar of the Spandakärikä that the venerable Vasugupta extracted from the 


ocean of the Sivasütra taught to him on Mt. Mahädeva by Siva in a dream” #0 


See Jayadrathayamala, Satka 1, f. 190v3-5 (45.120-122): ekah $ivo mahämülam nirupa- 
dhir anantakah | vijñänajñänasampürnah sarväkäras tu mantharah | 121 nistarañgärnaväkärah 
paritrptah paräparah | sufäntamürtih sarvätmä nirväneso tinirmalah | 122 tasya $aktih svakam 
viryam ciddhämänandagocaram | vyaktam vyaktivibhedena spandanänandasundaram: Satka 2, 
£ Sr4: spandänandodarävartavisräntäyämalaya te | namas ciccakravifrämaprasaradvisvamaärtaye; 
Satka 3, f. 107v7-8 (15.9c—10): ya parolläsint $aktih paräparavibhägagä | jñänakriyänilayant ic- 
ch ciccakramadhyagä | spandodaragatà sûksmä susäksmämrta*syandini (con. : samdhini Cod.); 
Satka 3, f.95r4 (13.30): fatspandacakramadhyastho smaren mantram mahädbhutam | iyam 
sà devadevesi mantrasuddhih paräparä; Satka 4, £. 58r5-6 (4.17-18): jñänam jñeyam tathà 
jhätà jñaptigarbhän “nibhälayan (corr. : nibhälayam) | layam yâti pare dhämni nirahamkära- 
dharmini | cidänandaparispandagarbhasthaspandarüpayà | vyäptä paramayä bhäti “sadadhvä- 
varanäntagà (äntagä corr. : ämtigà Cod.); Ciñcinimatasärasamuccaya, {. 22v4 (7.206ab) (on the 
twelve Kälis, in the Uféaragharämnäya section): sphuraty antargatà ghürmir anäkhyam span- 
dam uttamam; Devidvyardhasataka, £. 11123 (v. 127): akathyam vä(k) kramätitam akulam ca 
kuloditam | spandanäntaramadhyastham ätmägamam subhävitam. 

80Spandakärikavrtti, p.40, I. 3-6: “*dugdham (em. : drbdham Ed.) mahädevagirau 
mahesasvapnopadistäc chivasñtrasindhoh | spandämrtam yad vasuguptapädaih $rikallatas tat 
prakaticakära. The edition's reading drbdham is unacceptable. For while the Spandakärikä 
can be ‘composed” (drbdha-) the ‘nectar that is the Spandakärik& (spandämrtam) cannot be 
‘composed from the ocean of the Swasätra’. The metaphor requires the nectar to be ‘ex- 
tracted” from that ocean, in allusion to the Puränic myth of the extraction of nectar from 
the ocean of milk. This meaning is provided by the graphically similar dugdham:; cf. Näräyana, 
Stavacintämani 1.10: mäyäjalodarät samyag uddhrtya vimalikriam | fivajñnänam svato dugdham 
dehy ehi harahamsa nab, on which Ksemaräja comments as follows: svato dugdham tvayaiva 
kaläsläghyenänitam. 


Alexis Sanderson 407 


But the verse is suspect, since it appears in only some manuscripts, and if it 
were original Bhägavatotpala, who knew this commentary, could hardly have 
maintained the view that the Spandakärikä is Kallatas. The motive for interpo- 
lation is clear, namely to make Kallata himself support the view of Ksemaräja. 

Kallatas brief and lucid gloss stays firmly within the parameters of the text 
itself, eschewing, therefore, all reference to the specific doctrines of the Säkta 
traditions, unlike that of Ksemaräja, which, as we have seen, grounds the text 
in the Krama, though it also recognizes its transcendent, syncretistic character 
by connecting some passages with the Trika. 

The commentary of Räjänaka Räma, the pupil of Utpaladeva, likewise ad- 
heres closely to the explicit content of the text, relying also on Kallatas gloss. 
We find no attempts to clarify its meaning by making connections with the 
Trika or Krama. If he strays beyond the parameters of his text it is only to the 
extent that he applies the philosophical concepts of his teacher.”?? 

Bhägavatotpalas commentary (Spandapradipikà) is of a very different char- 
acter. As a Päñcarätrika Vaisnava its author attempts to show through abundant 
citations from Pañcarätrika sources, both scriptural and exegetical—in the latter 
case he draws extensively on the philosophico-devotional treatises of the Kash- 
mirian Päñcarätrika Vaämanadatta (son of Devadatta) as well as a wide range of 
Saiva texts—that the doctrine of the Spandakärikä is equally at the heart of this 
non-$aiva tradition. 

As for the unpublished Spandapradipikä of Bhattärakasvämin,# that is 
written from the perspective of a Kashmirian $Saiva versed in the works of Ut- 
paladeva and Abhinavagupta but without strong leanings towards the Krama 
or the Trika, though in the Mañgala verse at the beginning of his commentary 


S81He refers to the commentary as Kallaças in the introductory verses of his Spandapradipikä. 
After reporting the tradition that the Spandakärikä is Kallatas summary of the teaching 
of the Sivasätra (see footnote 578 on p.405) he adds (p.83, IL 18-19): ya api tadartho 
vyäkhyäjyotsnäprakatikrto sti tenesat | mohanifämadhyagatä mandadr$as tad api närtham ïksante 
‘Although he made the meaning of those [fifty verses] slightly clearer with the moonlight of 
a commentary those in the midst of the night of delusion with weak sight are still unable to 
make it out’. 

582Sce, e.g., Spandakärikävivrti, p.25, where he applies Utpaladevas distinctive classification 
of the four levels of contracted agency of consciousness (parimitapramätrtä), namely those of 
identification with the body (dehapramätrtä), intellect (buddhipramätrtä), vital energy (präna- 
pramätrtä), and the void (finyapramätrtä). 

S83The manuscript, which to my knowledge, is the only one to have survived, breaks off in 
the commentary on the last verse of the work proper, before its two closing verses of veneration 
and benediction. 


408 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


on the second chapter he venerates the essence of the Trika that transcends the 
Saktis Parä, Paräparä, and Aparä.*% In the chapter colophons he is identified as 
a worshipper of Srividyä, that is to say, of the Säkta goddess Tripurasundari”” 
and this fact is reflected in the introduction to the commentary. For in its verses 
11-14 he prepares for his task by meditating on an unnamed Mandala, begin- 
ning with obeisance to Ganeéa, Dharma, Varuna, and Kubera at its gates and 
then dissolving it stage by stage into the point (binduh) at its centre. The stages 
are (1) the four gates, then (2) three circles, followed by sets of (3) sixteen, 
(4) eight, (5) fourteen, (6) ten, (7) ten again, (8) eight and (9) three.*% The 
Mandala, then, is that of Srividyä, which alone has this structure. There is an 
unusual feature, however, in the deities of the four outer gates. This arrange- 
ment is not found in any form of the Srividyà known to me, but does occur, and 
is probably peculiar to, the Kaula system taught in the Devirahasya (| Parära- 
hasya), where these four are worshipped as the door-guardians (dvärapäläh) of 
its Yantras for initiation (Patala 1) and in its worship of the initiation Guru 
(Patala 60). The Kaulism of this text, which was well known in Kashmir,? con- 
tains no trace of the terminology of Kashmirian non-dualism and appears to be 
East Indian in character, though it was probably composed or revised in Kash- 
mir since it has integrated the local Kashmirian goddesses into its pantheon, ‘8 
and consequently a number of Kashmirian Pari$istas which provide Pañcängas 
for their worship within the same ritual parameters have been published with 


584Bhattärakasväamin, Spandapradipika, f. Sv18—19: yad anuttaram apürvam paräparäparä- 
paräkalätitam | $uddhäsuddhasvabhävam *tad (em. : tam cod.) upäsmahe sadardhasäräkhyam. 

S85E.g., f. 5v16—17: iti frimacchrividyopäsakasribhattärakasvamikrtaspandapradipikäyäm pra- 
thamo ‘yam ulläsab. 

586Bhattäraka, Spandapradipika, f. 1r16-18 (ärambhaslokäh 11-12b): 11 ganesadharma- 
varuna*kuberän (corr. : kubïrän cod.) pranipatya ca | caturdväram trivrttänusodasärnästapalla- 
vam | 12 *caturdasadasadasavasuvahnisadäsrayan (vasu em. vasva Cod). 

587 There are, for example, six Kashmirian manuscripts of the Devirahasya, one of them on 
birch-bark, listed in the catalogue of the Sanskrit manuscripts in collection of the Research 
and Publication Department in Srinagar (RaiNA 1989, p. 40) and three in the collection of the 
Banaras Hindu University (TRIPATHI 1971, p.750). 

588Thus among its Mantras are those of Särikä, Säradä, Mahäräjfi, Jvälämukhi and Bhidä. 
Similarly, the affiliated Uddhärakosa classifies ten of the goddesses of the Devzrahasya’s Mantra- 
pantheon as Great Vidyäs (m4hävidyäh), following the model of East Indian Säktism. But 
whereas there the Ten Great Vidyäs (dasa mahävidyäh) are Tripurasundari, Laksmi, Tärä, Bhu- 
vanesvarï, Mätañgi, Daksinakäli, Bhairavi, Chinnamastä, Dhümävati and Bagalämukhiï, here 
they are Tripurasundari, Laksmi, Tärä, Bhuvaneévari, Mätañgi and the local goddesses Säradä, 
Särikä, Räjñi, Bhidä, and Jvälämukhi. 


Alexis Sanderson 409 


it. We learn nothing more about Bhattäraka from his commentary; but per- 
haps he is identical with the Kashmirian Bhattäraka ÂAnanda whose commen- 
tary on the Wijñänabhairava (Vijñänakaumudï) was completed, according to 
its concluding verses, in [Kali] 4774 (= A.b. 1672).*° For Bhattäraka Ânanda 
identifies himself, like our commentator, as a follower ofthe $rividyä, and refers 
to his preparation for composition in similar terms.”?! 

It is at least certain that the author was a Kashmirian. When explaining the 
term Szbdaräsisamutthasya faktivargasya ‘the set of Saktis that arises from the syl- 
labary’ in Spandakärikä 3.13b he gives as an alternative the interpretation that 
it refers to the eight goddesses Amä, Kämaä, Cärvañgi, Tañkadharini, Tara, Päar- 
vati, Yaksini and Särika. This places the matter beyond reasonable doubt, since 
this series of goddesses is peculiarly Kashmirian. Särikä is one of the lineage- 
goddesses (kuwladevï) of the Kashmirian brahmins and is venerated in the form 
of a rock at the Pradyumnapitha on the hill Här*parbuth (Särikäparvata) in 
Srinagar with the other seven goddesses from Amä to Yaksinï as her retinue.”?? 


THE SAKTA SAIVISM OF THE MAITHILA KAULS 


The East Indian Säktism seen in the Devirahasya, mentioned above in connec- 
tion with Bhattärakasvamin's commentary on the Spandakärikä, is also found 
in ritual manuals written by the seventeenth-century Kashmirian scholar Sähib 
Kaul for the worship of Tripurasundari (Srividyänityapñjäpaddhati), Bhuvanes- 
vari (Hrllekhäpaddhati), and Daksinakäli (Syämäpaddhati). The Kauls, though 
subsequently integrated as a distinguished division of Kashmirian brahmin so- 
ciety, were Maithila Mädhyandiniya Yajurvedins who had come to Kashmir 


58/The term Pañcäñga denotes in this context a set of five texts: a verse Patala outlining the 
cult, a prose Paddhati that sets out the procedure and Mantras of worship in full, a verse Kavaca 
invoking the goddess’s protection, a verse hymn of a thousand names ofthe goddess (szhasranä- 
makam), and a poetic hymn (séoéram, stavaräjah) to the same. 

V0 Viñanakaumudi, p.63, v.3: vedasaptarsivedäntyayugäbdamadhupaksatau | vijñänakau- 
mudim etäm bhattänando vyakäsayat. 

SI Viñanakaumudï, p.63, 1. 1: srividyänugrahäväptapreksälesas …. 

”?Bhattarakasväamin, Spandapradipikä, f.21r1G-18: tathà cänyathä: amä kämä cärvañgi 
tañkadharini tärà pärvati yaksini $ärikà ityädiräpasya ca $aktivargasya bhogyatäm gatah san …. 
Bhattärakasvämin's reason for mentioning these eight is evident from their names and Mantras: 
each name begins with a sound that is the first in one of the eight sound-classes (v4rgäh) that 
make up that syllabary; and the Mantra of each Sakti contains the same sound in the form of 
a seed-syllable. 


410 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


from northern Bihar during the period of Muslim rule, probably after the in- 
corporation of Kashmir into the Mughal empire in 1586; and it is very likely 
that it was they that brought in and sustained this new constellation of Kaula 
observance.*®* Sähib Kaul, though faithful to his East Indian heritage in his 
Paddhatis, venerated the Kashmirian goddess Särikä as his lineage deity”” 
and wrote a number of devotional works in which the Säkta Saiva tradition 
of his adopted homeland rooted in the non-dualistic doctrines of Utpaladeva 
and Abhinavagupta is fully integrated. We see this, for example, in his Sac- 
cidänandakandali, Sivasaktiviläsa, Sahajärcanasastikä, and Nijätmabodha. This 
tradition is also accommodated in his Devinämavilasa,® à poetic work in full- 
blown Mahäkävya style that is based on the non-Kashmirian Bhavänisahasra- 
näma and interprets in Cantos 6 to 15 the meaning of each of the thousand 
names of the Goddess given in that text. °°° 

Other works in this tradition are the Gurubhaktistotra and Gurustuti of his 
pupil Cidrüpa Kaul, the Sadänandaläsya of Sadänanda Kaul, another of his 
pupils, the Bhaïravisaktistotra (modelled on Abhinavaguptas Bhairavastotra), 
the Srinäthastotra and Tripurasundaristotra of Gane$a Bhattäraka, the Guru- 
stotra of Jyotisprakä$a Kaul, and, by Jyotisprakä$a Kauls pupil Govinda Kaul 
of the Där lineage (däravamsodbhavah), à commentary (-padapradipikä) on 
that hymn, a Gurustutiratnamälä, and à hymn to Svacchandabhairava, the 
Svacchandamahesvarästaka, the last another indication of the Kauls’ assimila- 
tion of the local $aiva tradition. 


5#On the Maithila origin of the Kauls of Kashmir and their religious tradition see SANDER- 
son 2004, pp. 361-366. 

%$ee the 17th and final verse of his Sérikästava, f. 53v1-2: stotram mantroddhäry adah 
Särikäyäh sähibkaulo vamsadevyäs cakära ‘Sähib Kaul has composed this hymn to his lineage 
goddess Särikä from which [the letters that make up] her Mantra may be extracted”. 

See, e.g., Devinämaviläsa 2.52-54, which allude to the Trika (parddidevisvara) and men- 
tion Netranätha/Amrte$abhairava (metrefa). Canto 3 elaborates the Pratyabhijnährdaya of 
Ksemaräja; see, e.g., 3.2: mahädvaye darfanaräjaräje prasiddhasiddhäpratimaprabhävah | citih 
svatanträkhilasiddhisiddhih pürno "pi fänyo jayasi svabhätah (echoing Pratyabhijñährdaya 1.1: 
citih svatanträ visvasiddhihetuh). 

5% Devinämaviläsa G.2: Sambhus cakre yäni nämäni devadevyäh spastam pürvam uddesa- 
pürvam | sähibkaulas täni bhaktyekavasyo vrttair artham laksayadbhir babandha. 


Alexis Sanderson 411 


CHRONOLOGY 


To determine the chronology of the Kashmirian $aiva literature in its most 
creative phase we have only three precise dates, found in concluding verses at 
the end of three of Abhinavaguptas works. These report that his Kramastotra 
was completed in [40]66 (= À.D. 991), his Bhairavastotra in [40]68 (= À.b. 993), 
and his Kvarapratyabhijñävivrtivimarsini in [40]90 (= a.p. 1015). 

These dates enable us determine approximately both the dates of his pre- 
decessors, where they are connected to him in a known preceptorial sequence, 
and those of his successors Ksemaräja and Yogaräja. If for want of any more pre- 
cise means of measurement we assume preceptorial generations of twenty-five 
years and active lives of fifty, and allow leeway on either side of the earliest and 
latest of the three dated works to approximate the active life of Abhinavagupta 
as c. 975-1025, then Somänanda will have been active c. 900-950, Utpaladeva 
c. 925-975, Laksmanagupta and Räjänaka Räma c. 950-1000, Ksemaräja cc. 
1000-1050, and Yogaräja c. 1025-1075. 

As for the Gurus of the Krama, Bhütiräja, as Abhinavaguptas teacher, will 
have been active c. 950-1000. Jñänanetra, then, will have been active c. 850- 
900, Keyüravati, Madanikä, and Kalyänikä c. 875-925, Erakanätha, Govin- 
daräja, Bhänuka, and Hrasvanaätha c. 900-950, and Cakrabhänu (Bhütiräja’s 
Guru) c. 925-975, Cakrabhänus disciples Iäni and Prabodhanätha c 950- 
1000, Nandaka and Jaiyaka c. 975-1025, Sajjana and Pañkaka, c. 1000-1025, 
Somesvara and Näga c. 1025-1075, and Arnasimha c. 1050-1100. This crude 
calculation receives independent support from Kalhanas report that Cakra- 


97 Kramastotra, v. 30: satsastinämake varse navamyäm asite ‘hani | mayäbhinavaguptena 
märgasirse stutah sivah ‘1 Abhinavagupta have composed this hymn to Siva on the 9th Tithi, 
a dark day, in Märgagïrsa, in year 66; Bhaïravastotra, v. 10: vasurasapause krsnadasamyäm 
abhinavaguptah stavam imam akarot ‘Abhinavagupta has composed this hymn on the 19th 
of the dark fortnight of Pausa of [the year] Vasus(8)-flavours(6) [68]”); and Âvarapraty- 
abhijñävivrtivimarsini, concluding v.15: ii navatime Smin vatsare ‘ntye yugämse tithisasi- 
jaladhisthe märgasirsävasäne | jagati vihitabodhäm ifvarapratyabhijñäm vyavrnuta paripärnäm 
preritah $ambhupädaih ‘Thus, on the whole Ævarapratyabhijnä that has enlightened mankind, 
[Abhinavagupta,] instigated by [his] venerable [teacher] $Sambhu[nätha], has completed [this] 
commentary, at the end of Märgaëirsa in this 90th year in the last of the [four] Yugas [Kali] 
in the [year] lunar days(15)-moon(l)-oceans (4) [4115]. When years are given in Kashmir 
with the century omitted, as here, they pertain to the Laukika era, also called Saptarsi, which is 
counted from 3076 8.c. We can deduce that the omitted century is the 40th (4066, 4068, and 
4090) because the last date is further specified as falling in year 4115 of the Kali era, which is 
counted from 3102 B.c. 


412 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


bhänu was punished while his Guru Hrasvanätha was the minister of war and 
peace under Ya$askara. It appears from that account that this event occurred at 
the very end of the king’s reign, which began in 939 and ended in 948. 

Other authors of the Krama can be less narrowly dated. The anonymous 
author of the Trivandrum Mahänayaprakäsa wrote after Abhinavagupta (f. c. 
975-1025) and before Jayaratha in the thirteenth century.$* $rivatsa, author of 
the Cidgaganacandrikä wrote after Arnasimha (f. c. 1050-1100), since he draws 
on the lattes Mahänayaprakäsa,*” and very probably before c. 1300. This pos- 
terior limit is set by the probable date of the South Indian Mahe$varänanda, 
since he cites the Cidgaganacandrikä in his Mahärthamañjariparimala.S® 

The certain limits of Mahe$varänandas activity are widely separated. He 
was active after c. 1175, because Sivänanda, the Guru of his Guru?! cites 
the Saiddhäntika Paddhati of Somasambhu, °°? which was completed towards 
the end of the eleventh century, 60 and he cannot have been active later than 
about 1500, since Laksmidhara (1497-1539) quotes verses of the Kämakalä- 
viläsa of Punyänandayogin,(# who was one preceptorial generation later than 
Mahesvaränanda.%® But the range can be narrowed to the decades around 1300 
if the Säkta Saiva Amrtänandayogin who has given us three works on the wor- 
ship of Tripurasundari, the Yoginihrdayadipikä, the Saubhägyasudhodaya, and 
the Cidviläsastava,® and was a disciple of Punyänanda7 and therefore two 


58 For the succession down to Arnasimha see p. 292; for the date of Cakrabhänu's punishment 
see p.281; and for Jayarathas knowledge of the Trivandrum Mahänayaprakäfa see pp. 308 and 
311. 

59See p.297. 

SO Mahärthamañjariparimala, pp. 27, 51, 68, 70, etc. 

601$ee, e.g., Mahärthamañjariparimala, pp. 111-112 (yathoktam asmatparamagurubhih $ri- 
kramaväsanäyäm: … [= Sivänanda, Subhagodayaväsana, v.21]); p.127, IL 11-14 (yathoktam 
asmatparamagurubhih srisubhagodaye: … [= Sivänanda, Subhagodaya, v. 69]). 

602He does so in his Mryäsodasikärnava-rjuvimarsini p.225, IL. 10-11. The passage cited 
= BRUNNER 1963-1998, pt. 2, p. 203, v.5. 

603See p.420. 

604Vrajavallabha Dvivepa, Nityäsodasikärnava, Skt. introd., p. xviüi. 

05Maheévaränandas teachers teacher, $ivänanda, was a pupil of Svätmäna- 
nda (Nisyäsodasikärnava-rjuvimarsint, p.2, IL 1-2); and between Svätmänanda and 
Punyänanda there were three preceptorial generations:  Svätmänanda—Triloca- 
ne$a— Devesa—Kefavesa—Punyänanda (Amrtänandayogin, Saubhägyasudhodaya  6.19d- 
210). 

606 The author calls himself Amrtänandayogin in his Saubhägyasudhodaya 6.21 and is named 
thus or as Amrtänandanäthayogin in the colophons of that work and his Yoginïhrdayadipika. 

0 Saubhägyasudhodaya 6.21cd, in the account of his spiritual lineage: asmat punyänando 


Alexis Sanderson 413 


generations later than Mahesvaränanda, is identical with the Amrtänandayogin 
who wrote the Al4mkärasamgraha, à treatise on poetics. Nothing in the latter 
proves conclusively that this is so. But there is more than the mere agreement of 
names to judge by. For the A/lamkärasamgraha shows that its author was indeed 
a Säkta Saiva devotee of Tripurasundarï and expresses this in terms so similar to 
those found in the Tantric works of Amrtänandayogin and others in his region, 
time, and tradition, that this together with the identity of the names makes 
single authorship very probable. Thus in its first verse the Alamkärasamgraha 
venerates the primal couple (ädyam mithunam), describing them as immersed 
in the blissful relish of their union, a single deity whose two ‘feet’, symbolizing 
their dual power, are intent on the creation of the universe.{® Similarly, the 
Cidviläsastava venerates in its opening verse the blissful fusion (s#marasya-) of 
Siva and $Sakti, embodying the self-manifest light of reality (prakäsah) and its 
innate power of creative ideation (v#mar$ah) as the ‘supreme sandal” (parä pä- 
dukä) of the Guru Paramasiva (parasivätmano guroh), that is to say, in keeping 
with South Indian Säkta Saiva symbolism, as the hidden, unitary source of that 
dyad.°1° The equation of the object of veneration with the Guru, that is to say, 
with the deity as the source of the authors Guru lineage, might be thought to 
be a striking point of difference between these two verses. But in fact the differ- 
ence is merely that the equation is explicit in the second and implicit in the first. 
For the ‘primal couple” (ädyam mithunam) of the Alamkärasamgraha is a term 
of art in this South Indian Säkta Saiva literature for Paramaëiva and his Sakti 
in their role as the first teacher and his consort under the names Caryänätha 
and Tripurasundari or Kämesvari, worshipped at the centre of the central tri- 
angle of the Sricakra upon the central point that represents Paramaëiva in his 
ultimate nature, the supreme bliss in which this polarity is fused in undifferen- 
tiated unity.91° As for the Alamkärasamgraha's notion that the two feet of this 


mamämrtänandayogino näthah; Yoginihrdayadipikä, p.19, 1. 7-8: etat kämakaläviläse y 
asmadgurubhih prapañcitam. 

8 Alamkärasamgraha 1.12: jagadvaicitryajananajagarükapadadvayam | aviyogarasäbhijñam 
ädyam mithunam ä$raye. 

609 Cidviläsastava 1: svaprakäsasivamaürtir ekikä tadvimarsatanur ekikä tayoh | sämarasyavapur 
isyate parà pädukà parasivätmano guroh. Cf. the hidden third and fourth feet of the Guru in 
Mahärthamañjariparimala, p. 4, 11. 16-22, and the equating of the ‘sandal (#rzpädukä) with the 
innermost state of consciousness as the highest object of reverence ibid, p. 96, IL. 12-22. 

610$ee Vidyänandanätha, Niyasodasikärnava-artharatnävali, p.3, Mañgala verse 2: 4ädyam 
mithunam ärabhya svagurvantam kramena tu | vande gurvaugham ‘T venerate in due order 
the Guru lineage that begins from the primal couple and ends with my own teacher. For the 


414 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


couple are the source of all creation, that too is derived from this same textual 
milieu. For in a discussion of the symbolism of the worship of the feet of the 
deity as the primal Guru Maheévaränanda quotes a verse without attribution 
which says that one foot is white and the other red, representing semen and 
menstrual blood, the two ingredients of conception in Indian theory, and that 
this whole universe is born from its two parents through these.$l! Similarly, 
Sivänanda quotes a verse which venerates the footstool on which the [two] feet 
of Siva-and-Sakti rest, identifying it with consciousness itself and describing it 
as haloed by the radiance of the infinite worlds that it spontaneously creates.f!2? 

In its second introductory verse the Alamkärasamgraha maintains this Säkta 
$aiva context by venerating the goddess Sarasvati (Säradä) as the presiding deity 
of [all] names and forms, that is to say, all words and the entities they denote 
(nämarüpädhidevatäm), describing her as the blissful relish of all that emerges 
from that union (sadulläsarasäkäräm) and as causing the unfolding of the lev- 
els of reality (#attva-), just as moonlight opens the petals of a night-blooming 
lotus.61 Similarly, in its opening verses the Saubhägyasudhodaya venerates the 
power in the form of creative verbalization or ideation (parämarsarüpini), abso- 
lute by virtue of its fusion with Siva (cadaikarasyät), describing it as that which 
though one assumes plurality and extension through the radiance (-wlläsa-) of 
its autonomy.(l# And in the opening verses of the Yoginihrdayadipikä we find 


identity of the this primal couple see ibid. p.218, 1. 13-219, IL. 11: &dau prakäsavimarsasära- 
nirvisesabindulaksanah paramänandänubhava eva paramo gurub. sa punar nirvisesabindvätmä 
svecchävasät prakäsavimarsasaktifivätmanätmänam vibhajyodyänapithe krte yuge kämesvarakä- 
mesvarisamÿñayà sthitas catyänätharüpi .….paramasivah sväbhedena sthitäyai svasaktyai kämes- 
varyai prathamam upadideÿa. The same information is conveyed in Sivänanda, Nityäsodasikä- 
rnava-rjuvimarsint, pp. 218, 1.9-219, [.2; and Amrtänandayogin, Saubhägyasudhodaya 6.1- 
5. Three other such couples are worshipped in the three corners of the central triangle. The 
distinctive term withunam for these couples is used by Amrtänandayogin himself in Saubha- 
gyasudhodaya 5.7b: tayor mithunam. As for Vidyänandanätha, he may have been a near con- 
temporary of Sivänanda, since his account of his lineage ends with Väsudeva, disciple of Rat- 
nadeva (Nityäsodasikärnava-artharatnävali, p.223, I. 20-21) and Sivänanda adds himself as 
Väsudeva's disciple (Wiéyäsodafikärnava-rjuvimarsini, p.224, Il. 1-3.). 

SE Mahärthamañjariparimala, p. 4, 1. 23-24: yad ähub: Suklo ghrih uklam ävisto raktam 
rakto ‘ñghrir äsritah | pitror añghridvayenedam amunä jäyate ‘khilan” iti. 
2$ivänanda, Nityäsodasikärnava-rjuvimarsini, pp. 10, 1. 5-11, 1. 2: abhiyuktovaco pi: ‘svec- 
chävibhävitänantajagadrasmivitänavat | naumi samvinmahäpitham $ivasaktipadäsrayam” iti. 

GB Alamkärasamgraha 1.2: *tadulläsarasäkäräm (tadulläsa em. Ed. : samulläsa Cod.) tattvakai- 
ravakaumudim | namämi $äradäm devim nämarñpädhidevatäm. 

SASaubhägyasudhodaya 1.4: seyam tadaikarasyät parä parämar$aräpini $aktih | svasvätantryol- 


läsaspandäd ekäpy anekadhä vitatä. 


(oN 


Alexis Sanderson 415 


the creative ideation that is the supreme power of the Guru of the universe being 
venerated as that which though one shines forth in the form of the multiplicity 
of names and the named (nänänämartharäpini). S The expresssion nämärtha- 
(‘names and the named”) in nänänämaärtharäpini is evidently synomous with 
the nämarüpa (‘names and forms’) of the Alamkärasamgraha’s formulation, as 
can be seen from the use of the expression nänänämarüpa- in à parallel context 
in the Yoginihrdayadipika.S\ What is more, when the Alamkärasamgraha’s verse 
describes Sarasvati as sadulläsarasäkäräm, literally ‘having the form of the bliss- 
ful relish of the radiance of that [union]” it echoes the Saubhägyahrdayastotra 
of Sivänanda, which describes ‘the transcendental speech-essence” (parä väk), 
Sarasvati under another name, as an embodiment of ultimate experience ‘hav- 
ing the form of the blissful relish of diversity’ as it descends through its lower 
levels to articulate utterance.f!7 

Now the Alamkärasamgraha can be dated with a high degree of prob- 
ability. For its author tells us that he wrote at the request of Ma- 
nva/Manma/Manna—all three forms are found in the manuscripts—, son of 
Bhaktiräja, during the latter’s rule, and we know of only one Bhaktiräja, a king 
of the Ettuva branch of the Telugu Choda family from whom we have a copper- 
plate inscription dated in A.b. 1355/6. Another, issued by his son, Annadeva, 
is dated in A.D. 1388. The A/amkärasamgraha, therefore, will have been com- 
posed c. 1350.68 So if, as is probable, the same author was the Säkta disciple 


615 Amrtänandayogin, Yoginihrdayadipikä, opening verse 3: vimarsarüpini aktir asya visvagu- 
roh parä | parisphurati saikäpi nänänämärtharäpini. 

GIE Yoginihrdayadipikä, p.90, IL. 1-2: param tejah Sivasaktisämarasyarüpaparämayam jyotir 
icchärüpam svecchägrhitanänänämarüpaprapañcamayam ‘The radiance that embodies the high- 
est [power] that is the fusion of Siva and $akti (param tejah), one with the multiplicity of 
the many names and forms that it has adopted by virtue of its autonomous will (icchärü- 
pam) …; ibid., IL. 6-7: svecchäkalpitanänänämarüpaprapañcamayam $ricakrarüpena parinatam 
parämayam tejah ‘The radiance that is the highest [power], which is one with the multiplicity 
of the many names and forms that it has created by virtue of its autonomous will, [that it to 
say,] which has evolved into the form of the $ricakra 

617$ivänanda, Saubhägyahrdayastotra, v. 3: smarämi tm paräm väcam pasyantyädikramäsra- 
yäm | *nänävidharasäkäramahänubhavaräpinim (äkära var. : äkäräm Ed.). I have rejected the 
reading preferred by the editor for that which he reports from two manuscripts. The reading 
-rasäkära- is also seen in a Kashmirian manuscript of the hymn (Tripurasundaristotra), which 
has nänävidharasäkäraparänubhavarüpinim here. 

618 For this epigraphical evidence see KRISHNAMACHARYA and SarMA 1949, pp. xl-xlii. They 
note the difficulty raised by the discrepancy between the names Manna/Manma/Manva (all 
these forms are found in the manuscripts) and Anna[deva], but accepting that they may refer 


416 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


of Punyänanda, Mahesvaränanda will have been active around 1300. The same 
approximate date results if we apply the crude calculation of twenty-five years 
for a generation to Sivänandas account of his preceptorial lineage and accept 
that the Bhojadeva whom he reports as a contemporary of his spiritual fore- 


619 was, as is very likely, the famous Bhojadeva of Dhärä who 


bear Dipakäcärya 
ruled c. 1018-1060. By this calculation Sivänanda will have been active around 
1225-1275,2 and Maheévaränanda, as the pupil of Sivänanda’s pupil Mahä- 
prakä$a, will have been active c. 1275-1325. If so, the Cidgaganacandrikä, 
since it draws on Arnasimhas Mahänayaprakä$a and is quoted by Maheévarä- 


nanda, must have been composed between about 1100 and 1300. 


to one and the same person. 

SV Nityasodasikärnava-rjuvimarsint, p.223, |. 3: asmadgotramahattarah prasiddha*bahvapa- 
däno (em. : bahväpädäno Ed.) bhojadevadrstacamatkäro mahädesikapravarah frimän dipakäca- 
ryo dandakakartä ‘The venerable Dipakäcärya, author of the /Tripurasundari]dandakalstotral, 
the foremost of my lineage, the best of great Gurus, whose many noble deeds are famous, 
whose miracles were witnessed by Bhojadeva. The emendation is supported by Amrtänanda- 
yogin's Saubhägyasudhodaya, 6.16cd: nänäpadänamahito dipakanäthah svasamtater dipah ‘Di- 
pakanätha, the lamp of his lineage, lauded for his many noble deeds’. 

620The lineage, as given by Sivänanda in Niryäsodasikärnava-rjuvimarsint (pp. 223-234), 
with approximate dates based on this synchronicity with Paramära Bhojadeva, is as follows: 
Dipakäcärya (1025-1075), his son Jisnudeva (1050-1100), Mätrgupta (1075-1125), Tejo- 
deva (1100-1150), Manojadeva (1125-1175), Kalyänadeva (1150-1200), Ratnadeva (1175-— 
1225), Väsudevamahämuni (1200-1250), and Sivänanda (1225-1275). The same lineage, up 
to Kalyänadeva, is given by Amrtänandayogin (Saubhägyasudhodaya 6.16c-22). Here it divides, 
Amrtänandayogin line reaching him not through Ratnadeva but through Paramänanda, an- 
other of Kalyänadevas disciples. 

621Madhusudan KauL SHaAsTRI claims in the introduction to his edition of the Vémakesvari- 
matavivarana that its author, Jayaratha, acknowledges Amrtänandayogin at its beginning. If 
that were true, the date of the latter would have to be taken further back. But it is not. Ja- 
yaratha, in that edition, acknowledging in the second of his opening verses the Âcäryas of 
the past from whom he has learned (pärve .…..guravo mama), identifies them as frdipikäcärya- 
pramukhäh, which KauL has evidently understood to mean ‘those of whom the first is the 
Âcärya of the Dipik& and that Dipikä as the Yoginihrdayadipikä of Amrtänandayogin. But to 
refer to a Guru as the Âcärya of a text is unparallelled to my knowledge. The published reading 
is clearly an error for dipakäcäryapramukhäh ‘those of whom the first was Dipakäcärya”, as can 
be seen by comparing this with the verse quoted in p. 115, IL. 20-25, which speaks of number- 
less commentators on the Vémakefvarimata, beginning with Dipakanätha (4 fridipakanäthato 
by aganitair adyäpi vrttih krtä). The first commentator is evidently the Dipakäcärya, author 
of the Tripurasundaridandaka, mentioned in Sivänanda’s commentary (-rjuvimarsini, p.223), 
as the last of the line of Siddhas of this tradition, followed by Jisnudeva, the author of the 
Samketapaddhati and the first of its ‘lineage of men’. The source of the error is the Kashmirian 
pronunciation of Sanskrit, which tends to render 4 as ë/i, as in khémälkhimä for Skt. ksamä. 


Alexis Sanderson 417 


Sitikantha, the author of the Old Kashmiri Mahänayaprakäsa wrote after 
the disciples of Cakrabhänu, who was active c. 950-1000. How soon after this 
date he wrote cannot be determined from the evidence presently available, but, 
as has been argued above, the archaic character of the Kashmiri of the text sug- 
gests a date well before the fourteenth century, since the Kashmiri of Läl Déd’s 
poems, composed in that period, shows a much later stage of the language, 
one barely distinguishable from the modern vernacular.°?? The same argument 
applies to the Old Kashmiri Chummäs and Kathäs. 

Concerning the date of the Chummaäsamketaprakä$a of Niskriyänandanätha 
we can say at present only that it is earlier than its citation by Sivasvämin 
Upädhyäya I in the eighteenth century.°?? Equally open are the dates of the 
Värülanäthasätra and its commentator Anantaéakti, the Sitikantha who com- 
piled the Kaulasütras and Kulasütras, and the author of the /#änakriyädvaya- 
fataka, probably Sillana. Concerning Ramyadeva we can say only that he was 
later than Ksemaräja (f. c. 1000-1050) and concerning Cakrapäninatha that 
he lived before him. As we have seen, the Srivatsa who wrote a commentary on 
the Bhuvanamälinikalpa of the Jayadrathayämala, cannot be earlier than Ut- 
paladeva (f. c. 925-975) and is likely to have lived several generations later.°? 
Concerning Vi$vävarta, the author of the Zantraräjatanträvatärastotra 1 can say 
only that he was active at some time after Kallata in the second half of the ninth 
century and before A.b. 1583, the date of the earliest manuscript of his work 
known to me.°?7 

Iévarasiväcärya, Sañkararäsi, and Visvävarta, who, according to Jayaratha, 
introduced the Säkta cult of Tripurasundari in Kashmir appear, as we have seen, 
to have been active at some time after c. 1050 and before c. 1125.28 

The dated works of Abhinavagupta also enable us to settle the dates of the 
Kashmirian Saiddhäntikas within relatively narrow limits. For in his Zanträloka 
(8.428-434b), composed at some time after the Xremastotra and before the 
Üvarapratyabhijñävivrtivimarsint Abhinavagupta (f. c. 975-1025) has quoted 
without attribution the summary-verses at the end of Bhatta Rämakantha [Ps 


62$ee pp. 302 to 305. 

623ee p. 350. 

G24$ee p. 327. 

625$ee footnote 74 on p.255. 

626$ee pp. 258 and 418. 

27 Jayadrathayämalaprastäramantrasamgraha B, f. G4r7: sam 704 märga sukla 6 ravau. 
628See p. 384. 


418 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


commentary on the 23rd chapter of the Vidyäpäda of the Matañgapäramesvara, 
while the latters father Bhatta Näräyanakantha has quoted verse 55 of the 
Üvarasiddhi of Utpaladeva (fc. 925-975), the teacher of Abhinavaguptas 
teacher Laksmanagupta, in his commentary on Mrgendra, Vidyäpäda 1.11. 
Both father and son, then, will have been active during the second half of the 
tenth century. Bhatta Rämakantha Ils disciple Bhatta Vidyäkantha II will have 
been approximately contemporary with Abhinavagupta. 

As for the date of Bhattaéri Kallata, the author of the Spzndakärikä and 
Spandavrtti, and hence that of the Sivasürra said to have been revealed to his 
Guru Vasugupta, the only hard evidence in the Kashmirian Saiva literature is 
that Utpaladeva cites Pradyumnabhatta,*? whom Bhatta Bhäskara reports to 
have been the immediate successor of Kallata in the lineage that led to him- 
self. 6% So there was at least one preceptorial generation between Utpaladeva 
(f. c. 925-975) and Kallata, which places the latter’s active life no later than &. 
875-925, or no later than c. 850-900 if Utpaladeva is correct in saying that 
Pradyumnabhatta was known to his teacher Somänanda (c. 900-950).%1 That 
Kallata was not active earlier than the middle of the ninth century follows if 
we accept that this is the Bhattaéri Kallata mentioned by Kalhana in the Räja- 
tarañgin1 as one of a number of Siddhas who descended to earth for the benefit 
of mankind during the reign of Avantivarman (r. 855/6-883).%%? He will, then, 
have been an approximate contemporary of Jñänanetranätha. 

Bhatta Bhäskara, the author of the Sivasütravärtika, gives the follow- 
ing lineage of the transmission of the Sivasütra: Vasugupta — Kallata — 
Pradyumnabhatta — Prajñärjuna — Mahädevabhatta — Srikanthabhatta — 
himself. If we take Kallatas active life as c. 850-900 then by the same crude 
calculation Bhatta Bhäskara will have been a contemporary of Abhinavagupta, 
flourishing c. 975-1025. 

Evidence of the date of Räjänaka Jayaratha, the author of the commentaries 
on the Zanträloka and Vämakefvarimata, is found in the autobiographical verses 


G2]n the Sivadrstivrtti, p.94, IL 5-7, Utpaladeva cites a verse from a hymn to the Goddess 
which Räjänaka Räma identifies (Spandavivrti, p.129, L 1-7) as from the Tattvagarbhastotra. 
Utpaladeva tells us in the same work, p. 16, IL 10-11, that the Zafvagarbha is the work of 
Pradyumnabhatta. 

30 Sivasñtravärtika 1.4-9b. 

3 Svadrstivriti, p.16, IL 10-11, on 1.16ab (kimciducchünatä saiva mahadbhih kaiscid ucy- 
ate): saiva kimciducchünatà kathyate bhattapradyumnena tattvagarbhe. 

32 Räjatarañgint 5.66: anugrahäya lokänäm bhattasrikallatädayah | avantivarmanah käle sid- 
dhà bhuvam avätaran. 


Alexis Sanderson 419 


at the end ofthe former. There he tells us that his father Srngäraratha was made 
a minister by King Räjaräja.%* No Kashmirian king appears with precisely this 
name in the historical literature of Kashmir. But it is evident that Jayaratha 
means Räjadeva, who according to that literature ruled Kashmir for 23 years 
from [Laukika] 4289, that is to say, from A.p. 1213 to 1236,9% the name Rä- 
jaräja being readily understood as synonymous.°? 

The author of the work on the Krama lineages to which I have given the 
name *Xramavamsävali was a contemporary of Jayaratha, since the latter refers 


to him as such. °36 


8 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 12, p.432, concluding v. 28: ray sa Srñgärarathäbhidhäno bälo vivr- 
ddhim gamito jananyä | sattväkhyayä khyätagunah kramena $riräjaräjah sacivam vyadhäd yam 
“This [son], Srñgäraratha by name, of famous virtue, whom Räjaräja in due course appointed 
as a minister, was brought up as a child by that mother Sattva’. At the end of his commen- 
tary (-vimarsini) on Ruyyaka’s Alamkärasarvasva (p.753, IL 10-15) he reports that his father 
Srñgäraratha was the principal minister (mantrinäm agranih) of Räjaräja. 

#Jonaräja, Réjatarañgini, vv. 75 and 87. 

G35 However, according to Rasrogr (1979: 210), following the suggestion of K.C. PANDEY 
(1963, p.262), this king is not Räjadeva but Jayasimha, who ruled Kashmir from 1128 to 
1155 (Kalhana, Räjataranñgini 8.3404 and Jonaräja, Räjataranñginï, v. 38). He rejects identifica- 
tion with Räjadeva with the argument (op. cit., p.211, footnote 5) that it is difficult to believe 
that this king would have patronized Jayaratha since “on the testimony of Jonaräja (Räj. Verse 
74-87) he was just a usurper and had neither talents nor energy for asserting his authority”. 
This argument would be without force even if it were the case that Jayaratha claimed Räjadevas 
patronage since there is no reason why a weak ruler should not have shown favour to the son of 
one of his ministers. But in fact there is no evidence of any such claim. For RasroGr's assertion 
(op. cit., p. 212) that Jayaratha reports in the Tanträlokaviveka (vol. 12, p.430, v. 30) that the 
king inspired him to write this commentary is false. The passage actually states that it was his 
father that inspired him. It is only of incidental interest, then, to observe that Räjadeva was not 
an usurper. In fact Rasrocr's characterization of Räjadeva is not Jonaräjas but conflates into 
a single statement two passages in the English introduction of Srikanth KauL to his excellent 
critical edition of that authors Räjatarañgini (KauL 1967, p. 56). In the first, from which Ras- 
TOGI has derived the claim that Räjadeva was an usurper, the editor is in fact referring not to 
him but to the Dämara Padma, the murderer of his father. The dating proposed by Rasrogr is 
unbelievable on other grounds. If RasroGr were right, then Jayaratha’s father would have been 
serving as a minister not more than forty-nine years and perhaps as few as twenty-seven after 
a brother of his paternal great-grandfather had done the same. For Jayaratha tells us (Zantra- 
lokaviveka, vol. 12, p.431, 11. 9-16) that Sivaratha, a brother of his great-great-grandfather, had 
served as a minister under King Uccala, who ruled Kashmir from 4.p. 1101 to 1111. 

36 Tanträlokaviveka, vol. 3, p.193, L. 8, introducing a citation from this work: atas cäsya gu- 
rukramam ajänänair adyatanaih \citation] ityädi yad uktam tat svotpreksitam evety upeksyam 
‘And so what à contemporary has said without knowing Abhinavaguptas preceptorial lineage, 
namely “[citation]” should be rejected as his own imagining’. I have assumed that the various 


420 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Manodadattas Kalädiksäpaddhati, his detailed guide to the conduct of Saiva 
637 But it 


is not clear how much of the text that has come down to us belongs to the 


initiation following the Svacchanda, was completed in A.b. 1335/6. 


original composition, since that text reports that it has been expanded by a 
certain Sivasvämin. Nor do we know how long after Manodadatta later he was 
active. His expanded text contains à hymn that was composed by Räjänaka 
Ratnakantha in the seventeenth century, but, as we have seen, the section in 
which that hymn is found may well be a later addition.®%# There is nothing 
that enables us to identify him with one of the two or more Sivasvämins of the 
Upädhyäya lineage mentioned here. 

For Räjänaka Taksakavarta, the compiler of the digest Miryädisamgrahapa- 
ddhati, we have a prior limit in the date of the latest of his dateable sources. This 
is the Saiddhäntika Paddhati of Somasambhu, the Xriyäkandakramävali. * The 
date of the composition of that work appears in its final verses. Though the 
manuscripts diverge at this point, all readings known to me place it in the 
last quarter of the eleventh century.%#° Since I have encountered no reference 


verses on the Krama% lineages cited by Jayaratha in his commentary on Tanträloka 4.173ab 
are all from a single work, since all are in the Âryä metre and have been cited as evidence of 
the unreliability of their information. These verses have been cited in vol. 3, p.193, IL. 13- 
16; p.194, IL. 3-4; p. 195, IL 5-8, IL. 12-15, and Il. 18-19; and p. 196, IL. 11-12. A verse on 
the scriptural affiliation of certain Krama lineages cited outside this context, in vol. 3, p.191, 
IL 3-4, is probably from the same. 

637 See footnote 514 on p. 387. 

638$ee p. 397. 

3 Nityädisamgrahapaddhati f. 28V3: nirmälyalaksanam sodhäà proktam $risomasambhunä; see 
BRUNNER 1963-1998, pt. 2, p.271, v. 61. 

640]n the colophonic verses in the edition of the text published in the KsTs from Kashmirian 
manuscripts it is said to have been completed in year 1130 of the Vikrama era (vikramärkanrpa- 
kälasamudbhavesu $ünyägnibhih samadhikesu ca tacchatesu | ekädasasv amalasästram idam 
samastam [v.1813]), that is to say, in A.D. 1073/4, if we assume that the years are counted as 
expired rather than current, as is usual with dates given in this era. But in the Devakottai edition, 
prepared from Grantha manuscripts, and reproduced in the edition of Brunner (1963-1998, 
pt. 4, p.419) the same verse gives the year as Vikrama 1153 (vikramärkanrpakälasamudbhavesu 
pañcäsatä trisahitesu $aracchatesu | ekäda$asv amalasästram idam samäptam), which is A.D. 
1096/7. An East Indian palm-leaf manuscript of the text prepared in the seventh year of the 
reign of the Päla king Madanapäla [ms À, f. 120v2-4: *oaramesvaraparama(em. : paresvarapara 
Cod.)bhattärakamahäräjädhiräjasrimanmadanapäladevasya pravardhamäne vijayaräjye saptame 
samvatsare […] bhagavatpädapanditasaiväcäryakumäraganens likhäpito ‘yam Saivägamah $oma- 
Sambhukrtah], that is to say, in A.D. 1149 in the chronology of D.C. Sircar (1976), doubt- 
less conceals the same reading beneath its errors: vikramärkanrpakälasamudbhavesu pañcä- 


Alexis Sanderson 421 


to Taksakavarta in any other work, I can propose as his posterior limit only 
the year 1875-76, in which the undated manuscript of his digest was pur- 
chased by Georg BÜHLER in Kashmir. However, the great abundance of the 
scriptural sources and Paddhatis on which Taksakavarta has drawn°! suggests 
that he was active not far from the beginning of this period from the twelfth 
to nineteenth centuries. Concerning the authors of the lost Kashmirian Pad- 
dhatis that are known from citations, we can say of Vi$vävartas that it pre- 
dates Taksakavarta,* and of Dharmaëiva’s and Känasiväcaryas that they pre- 
date Abhinavagupta (f. c. 975-1025). The dates of the Svacchanda-based 
Paddhatis cited in the Kw/lädiksäpaddhati can be dated only within very wide 
limits. But, as we have seen, the Gurupustaka and Diksäkalpalatä are probably 
works of the fourteenth century.$# 

Among the later Kashmirian authors mentioned here Sähib Kaul was born 
in 16295 and completed his Devinamaviläsa in 1666.$% Bhattäraka Ananda, 
author of a commentary on the Vijñänabhairava (Vijñänakaumudï) and, per- 


haps, on the Spandakärikä (Spandapradipikà), can be placed in the second half 


bata trisusatesu $aracchatesu | ekäda$a$ca mama Sästram idam samäptam (£. 121r3). An early 
undated Nepalese palm-leaf manuscript of the text (ms B) lacks this verse, ending after the 
preceding verse with the prose fr?matkarnaprakäsavyavaharanäya sasamasamvatsare kriyäkända- 
kramävalipustakam panditäcäryasrisomasivena vira(ci) tam samäptam iti (£. 74r4-5)."The reading 
sasama is meaningless. If this is an error for dasama, the meaning will be ‘Here ends the text of 
the Kriyäkändakramävali composed by Somaëiva for the use of the excellent Karnaprakäéa in 
the tenth year. The work was composed while Somasambhu was abbot of the Golakïsthäna in 
the domain of the Kalacuri kings of Tripurï in Central India, whom we know to have appointed 
Saiddhäntikas of this richly endowed monastic institution as their Räjagurus. The year is surely 
regnal and I propose that the name Karnaprakäéa is a periphrasis for Ya$ahkarna, the Kalacuri 
king who ruled from Tripuri from À.p. 1073 to 1123, radiance/whiteness (prakäsah) being the 
defining characteristic of fame/success (yasah) in Indian poetic convention (see, e.g. Haravijaya 
13.3: yasahprakäsam; 16.54: Safisubhrayasahprakäsa-; Cambodian inscription K. 286, v. 16bc 
(CæDès 1952, p.90): ksitindräh jatà jagattrayavikirnayasahprakäsäh). f this is correct we have 
a third date of composition, 1082. But dafama is not the only possibility. If sasama is a corrup- 
tion of prathama the year will be À.b. 1073 and so agree with the version of the Kashmirian 
manuscripts. The fact that two different dates are given in an otherwise identical verse indicates 
not corruption but conscious revision. Perhaps the text circulated in two editions, an earlier 
and a later. 

S41See footnote 517 on p. 387. 

2e p. 387. 

543See pp. 390 and 391. 

See p. 396. 

SMadhusudan KauL’s introduction to the KsTs edition of the Devinämaviläsa, p. 2. 

#6 Devinamaviläsa, p. 320, v. 18. 


422 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


of the seventeenth century, since the former reports that it was completed in 
[Kali] 4774 (= A.D. 1672).57 

Räjänaka Bhäskarakantha has been held to have been active during the 
eighteenth century. But the only evidence for this date is the reported claim 
of his descendants c. 1960 that he lived six generations before them.%* He 
himself tells us at the end of his Cirtänubodhasästra that he had been educated 
by Ratnakantha, evidently à member of the same patrilineage (the Räjänakas 
of the Kantha-Dhaumyäyana Gotra) who had been a pupil of his grandfather 
Vaidüryakantha.** He gives no further information on this scholar, but it is 
not improbable that he is the author of that name and patrilineage®5° who com- 
posed the Sambhukrpämanoharastava preserved in the Kalädiksäpaddhati, the 
Ratnasataka (a hymn to Sürya), and commentaries on the Ydhisthiravijaya- 
mahäkävya of Visudeva, on the Srutikusumänñjali of Jagaddhara, on the Hara- 
vijayamahäkävya of Ratnäkara, and, in the field of poetics, on the Kävyaprakä$a 
of Mammata and the Devistotra of Ya$askara, since Bhäskarakantha praises his 
teacher as “a master of all the branches of scholarship” (samastavidyänipunah) 
and the author of those works certainly merits that description. For in addition 
to these compositions we have a good number of manuscripts copied by him 
for his own use, often with his annotations, in the fields of poetics, lexicogra- 
phy, grammar, drama, Kävya, Vedänta, and Sämkhya. If it was he that taught 
Bhäskarakantha, then the latter was active towards the end of the seventeenth 
century. For Ratnakanthæs works and manuscripts bear dates that extend from 
1648/9 to 1685/6.% 

Sivasvämin Upädhyäya I composed his Viÿñänabhairavavivrti during the 


S47See p. 409. 

S8Reported by K.C. Panpey (1963, pp. 264-265), who proposes the second half of the 
eighteenth century on its basis. See also HANNEDER and SLAJE 2002, pp. 18-19. 

6415.298: pitämahasya sacchisyät präptavidyät tathaiva ca | samastavidyänipunäd ratnaka- 
nthäd dayänidheh. 

S0Both were Räjänakas of the [Kantha-]Dhaumyäyana Gotra. Bhäskarakantha, Bhäskart, 
vol. 1, p. 2, opening verse 6: y«h kanthadhaumyäyanatäprasiddhavisuddharäjänakavamsajätah | 
sa bhäskaräkhyo dvija esa tikäm karoti sästre ‘bhinavodite min ‘{]], this brahmin Bhäskara, born 
in the pure Räjänaka lineage famed for its being of the Kantha-Dhaumyäyana [Gotra]’. Räjä- 
naka Ratnakantha reports his Gotra as Dhaumyäyana in the fourth opening verse of his Séuri- 
kusumäñjalilaghupañcikà (dhaumyäyanakulodbhavah). 

1 For a list of these compositions and manuscripts in his hand and their dates see STEIN 
1979, vol. 1, pp. 46-47. The Stein collection of manuscripts from Kashmir in the Bodleian 
library (Oxford) contains several of the latter not mentioned in that listing. 


Alexis Sanderson 423 


governorship of Sukhajivana (1753-62),5°2? and Siva[räma]svämin Upädhyäya 
I his Sivaratrirahasya during the reign of Ranjit Singh (1819-1839). This 
Sivasvämin also wrote the Yajñopavitasikhämälänirnaya, 5" and, though this 


S2Viñanabhairavavivrti, p.144, IL 1-12: sukhajrvanäbhidhäne raksati kä$miramandalam 
nrpatau | agaman nihsesatvam vijñänoddyotasamgrahah sugamah This] simple Vijñänoddyota- 
samgraha has been completed while King Sukhajivana is ruling the kingdom of Kashmir’. The 
term Upädhyäya here is not a mere description but denotes his membership of the Upädhyäya 
(Padey/Padi) kinship group (jätih, Kashmiri zäh). He tells us this and his Gotra in the preced- 
ing verse (p. 143, 11. 7-18): nämnä fiveti gunikauSikagotrajätyopädhyäyasabdayutayäpy upalaksi- 
tena ‘with the name $iva, qualified by the jätih of the Gunikaugika Gotra called Upädhyäya 
(pace RASTOGI, who read this impossibly [1979, p.226] as giving his name as Sivaguni and 
his Gotra as Kauâika). The z4#h is indeed of the Gunikausika Gotra; see KouL 1924, p. 106, 
listing it as Padi of the ‘Svamina Gan Kaushika” Gotra and the Census of 1891 (BHaG Ram 
1893, p. 137), less accurately, as Padey of the ‘Säman Gan Bhüshak’ Gotra. 

53$ee the final colophon of the Jammu manuscript of this text (STerN 1894, No. 2668 
ka): krtir iyam panditasivarämasya käfmirikopädhyäyavamsaprasütasya yah $rimahäräjaranajit- 
simhasya kä$miraräjyärambhe jivitavän ‘This is the work of Pandita Sivaräma, born in the Kash- 
mirian Upädhyäya lineage, who was alive at the beginning of the reign of Mahäräja Ranjit 
Singh’. It is likely that he is the Sivasvämin Upädhyäya/Sivaräma/Sivopädhyäya, grandfather 
of the Ke$avaräma Upädhyäya in whose possession BüHLER found the codex archetypus of the 
Räjatarañgini (STEIN, Räjatarañgini ed., p. xiüi). According to the versified colophon at the end 
of the Calcutta edition of the Räjataranñginisamgraha Moorcroft, who arrived in Kashmir in 
1822 and remained until May 1823, during the reign of Ranjit Singh, obtained the manuscript 
on loan from the house of this scholar as a result of the intercession of the Trikesvara, the pa- 
triarch of the érikajätiyäh, the members of the Trika lineage (the Tikoo zäfh; see GRIERSON 
1932, s.v. tyuk"): frimurkaräphako mantri präptaka$mira*mandalo (corr. : mandale Ed.) räjye 
$riranajitsimhabhäpateh priyadarsanah | *rimattrikesvarapremna ($rimattrikesvara corr. STEIN : 
frimantrikesvara Ed.) präptà râjatarañgint | murkaräphakadhirena grhäc chrifivasväminah | 
frimacchrifivarämasya grhe räjävali $ubhä | kasmiramandale nityam vartate nänyasadmani | 
frimadvibudhendra*$ivopädhyäyäya (corr. : fivopädhyäya Ed.) namo namah | tenopädhyäyena 
pañcasahasravarsänäm mahäprabhävasahità räjävali svagrhe pälitä prayatnena $rivibhor dayayä 
bhadram | vartate ca grhe yasya $ubhà râjatarangini | sa jivanmukta eva *syäd (corr. : syän Ed.) 
amrtah svargam äpnuyät. samvat 1880. 1880, the date of composition given in this colophon, 
equals A.D. 1822/3. STEIN notes (ibid.) that Sivaräma and his descendants to the present day 
have been attached as hereditary gurus to the Trika family, which he describes as having held for 
several generations past an influential position in Kashmir. He also notes that Pandit Sivaräma 
was commonly called Sivopädhyäya. 

This follows from the fact that in both works the author uses the pen-name Nityasvatantra; 
see Sivarätrirahasya, f. 4x, colophon: krtir nityasvatantretyaparanämnah Sivasyeti Sivam:; and 
Yajñopavitasikhämaälänirnaya, #Æ. 1v-2r (v.2): cin nitya yadi sarvakälavisaya kätastharüpa tada | 
yäthätathyataya sthitäpi yadi sà svänandasärdrä param | svasvätantryavasäc cito vivaranam ya- 
träpi kuträpi cet | sarvavyäpitayästu niscitam idam nityasvatantrena tat. In f. 2v5-6 of the latter 
he calls himself Sivopädhyäya: yajñasätrasikhämälänirnayadvärato py aham | cito vimarfanam 


424 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


is only probable, the Safcakranirnaya, a work on meditation on the energy- 


65 not to be confused with the work of that name men- 


centres in the body, 
tioned above as including and explaining some verses on this subject from 
the Jayadrathayämala 5 He may also be the Sivasvämin Upädhyäya who 
wrote the Gäyatrimantravivarana and Srividyämantravivarana alias Anubhava- 
bodhavidyä.°” Those works show their author to have been a worshipper of 
Tripurasundari (érvidyopäsakah) who, while following the Trika-based Siväd- 
vaita, sought to reconcile the Säkta Saiva and Vaidika elements of his com- 
munitys religious practice by showing that the Sivädvaita is supported by the 
Upanisads and that both the Säkta Saubhägyavidyä and the Vedic Gäyatri share 
the same $Saiva meaning and reality. This reconciliation of the Vaidika and 
Saiva is also the purpose of the Yajñopavitasikhämälänirnayah, which heightens 
the probability that one author wrote all four works, since we know that the 


kurve sivopädhyäyasamÿnitah. The same name is given in the final colophon (f. 19r1-2: i#; $ri- 
macchivopädhyäyaviracito yajñopavitasikhämälänirnayah). 

6]In the colophon of his Sarcakranirnaya the author says that he wrote at the instigation 
of the son of Purusottama Osu (f. 386): ty osupurusottamaputrasya nodanäd akaro(d) dvijah 
upädhyäyasivasvämi Subham satcakranirnayam: and in the last verse of the Sivarätrirahasya the 
author records that he wrote for the pleasure of Purusottama: nityasvatantrakavinà nirnitä $i- 
vayämini | älodya sarvatanträni purusottamatustaye. Since the author is a Saiva it is unlikely that 
he would have chosen this usually Vaisnava name for the Deity unless it enabled him to convey 
an additional meaning obliquely: (for the pleasure of the Supreme Soul)/{for the pleasure of 
Purusottama). 

656$ee p.258. 

7 Gäyatrimantravivarana, colophon: paratattväptyai racità gâyatrimantra uttame vyäkhyà 
vidusä Sivena ramyà $amkaracodanavaskrteneyam. samäpteyam gäyatrimantravivrtih. krtih $ri- 
fivasväminah. upädhyäyakulotpannasivarämaprakäsità | $rividyätustaye bhäyäd gâyatrivivrtih 
parä | yady apryam mayä drbdhä svätmänandavivrddhaye | anyo ‘bi kascit tad api krtakrtyo nayä 
bhavet | Sästräntaraikarasikaih ksantavyam vibudhaih paraih | svavinodam viracayann anindyo 
yaj jano bhuvi; Srividyämantravivarana, f. 46v11-15: faÿmädres cärudüra fdrivipinamilitasve- 
tagañgävagähät pütasväntena käfmirikavibudhasivasvämyupädhyäyanämna | vyäkhyäto mantra- 
râjah prakatavimalasatsampradäyah paräyäh $ri\vidyäyà gabhiro hariharadivase Sisyabodhärtham 
esah}. The manuscript breaks off after #77 in the last sentence. The rest of the last Päda has been 
supplied from the transcript of these verses made by Rasrogr (1979, p. 227, footnote 1) from 
a manuscript belonging to Pandit Dinanäth Yach. That manuscripts colophon adds that the 
author was the son of one Prakä$opädhyäya (bid., footnote 2): it frividyävivaranam anubhava- 
bodhäkhyam krtih prakäsopädhyäyasvämiputrasivopädhyäyasväminah. That both works are by the 
same author is certain. For in the Srividyämantravivarana its author refers to the Gäyatrima- 
ntravivarana as his own (£. 11v7—9): etac ca yathà tathä matkrte gäyatrimantravivarane drstir 
vidheyety alam aprakrtena. 

SE Srividyamantravivarana, f. 26V9—10: iti srividyagäyatryor abhedarthab. 


Alexis Sanderson 425 


author of the Sarcakranirnaya wrote the last. 

The commentary of Räjänaka Laksmiräma (Lasa Käk Räzdän) on the 
Parätrifikä does not give the date of its composition, but his commentary on 
the Gitä tells us that it was completed in 1811.65? 


À BRIEF HISTORY 


I conclude by presenting an outline of my view of the historical trajectory of 
the various religious traditions covered in this study, their interaction, and their 
relative strength. 

The earliest dateable evidence of Mantramärgic Saivism in Kashmir is found 
in two hymns in high poetic style, one to Siva and the other to the god- 
dess Candi, that form two chapters of the Mahäkävya Haravijaya of Räjänaka 
Ratnäkara. Ratnäkara was a courtier of Cippata-Jayäpida, who ruled Kashmir 
from c. 826-838, and his work was written c. 830. The first hymn, the Siva- 
stotra, shows knowledge of the literature of the Siddhänta and though it does 
not name its sources it is possible to recognize within its high-flown poetic 
periphrases the wording of the Matañga, the Rauravasütrasamgraha, the Sva- 
yambhuvasütrasamgraha, and the early Saiddhäntika exegetes Sadyojyotis and 
Brhaspati.( The second hymn reveals knowledge of the technicalities of the 
Trika and, perhaps, of the Trika’s scripture Trifirobhairava 1 We may fairly 
conclude that the presence of these materials in a work of Kashmirian literary 
art indicates that these two traditions were well known by this time in the re- 
fined circle of the court, or at least that they were well enough established to be 
considered worthy of mention. 

There is nothing in these hymns that reveals awareness of the cults of 
Svacchandabhairava, Amrte$varabhairava, or the Kälikula. 62 In the case of the 


The closing verse: laksmiräma iti dvijo tra nivasan kasmirabhümandale meror mätur upätta- 
dehajanano räjänagopälakät | frisäke dvigunädriparimite mäse tathaiväsvine sukläyäm pratipady 
ajäñghrinirato gitäsu tikäm vyadhät. 

6600n the dates of Cippata-Jayäpida’s reign, Ratnäkara* relations with him, and his Sai- 
ddhäntika scriptural sources see SANDERSON 2001, pp. 5-6, footnote 3. I have not yet published 
my evidence of his knowledge of Sadyojyotis and Brhaspati (for which see SANDERSON forth- 
coming b); but that concerning the former may be found in outline, with due acknowledge- 
ment, in Warson 2006, pp. 111-14. There is no compelling reason to think that Sadyojyotis 
and Brhaspati were Kashmirians. 

661$ee SANDERSON 1986, p. 169, footnote 1, and 2001, pp. 18-19, footnote 21. 

S62My view that there is no reference to the Kälikula is contradicted by Rasrocr (1979, p. 93), 


426 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


two Bhairavas, this absence has no weight as evidence, since they may have been 
passed over in silence simply because they could not be accommodated com- 
fortably in either hymn, falling as they do within a domain that lies between the 
Saiva and the Säkta. But this will not explain the absence of the goddess of the 
Kälikula from the hymn to Candï. We may surmise, therefore, especially when 
we consider the comprehensive knowledge of the varieties of contemporary re- 
ligion exhibited in these hymns, that the Kälikula and its Krama refinement 
had not yet come to the fore of the Kashmirian Säkta domain in the knowl- 
edge of the court, whereas the Trika was already well established there. And 
this hypothesis receives support from what we have been able to deduce of the 
chronology of the Krama, namely that Jhänanetra, whom the Kashmirian lin- 
eage of that system claims as its source, flourished somewhat later, from around 
the middle of the ninth century. 

The second half of that century saw the composition of the Sivasürra and 
Spandakärikà and, especially in the later, the first attempt from the Säkta Saiva 
domain to present a non-dualistic metaphysics and gnostic soteriology in op- 
position to the dualistic and ritualistic exegesis of the Saiddhäntika Saiva scrip- 
tures. This movement was presented in its early phase as coming not from Siva 
as the teaching of certain scriptures but rather as the contemporary irruption 
into the world of the gnosis of enlightened Siddhas and Yoginis; and we have 
seen the same perspective in the propagation of the Krama, which unlike the 


who claims that Kälasamkarsantï, the goddess of the Kälikula and Krama, appears in the hymn 
to Candi, in 47.55, in the abbreviated form Samkarsanï: präptäbhisamdhiparatäm anuvriti- 
lagnagaunasthitih sthitasitätisayäd abhiksnam | vidyeti sarvabahuläkhiladrstisamina samkarsant 
nigadità kila fasane tvam. The abbreviation is not uncommon. However, the reading samkarsant 
of the edition (wrongly reported by RasroGr as samkarsini) is a corruption. The editor records 
the variant sämkarsant and the Bodleian library's manuscript of the text reads sämkarsane 
(£ 145r24). The last is evidently to be preferred because it provides the adjective needed by 
the context to qualify the noun $äsane ‘in the doctrine’, which would otherwise remain un- 
specified. Moreover, the adjective is entirely appropriate. The preceding seven verses (47.48— 
54) have praised the Goddess manifest as various Mahäyäna-Buddhist principles, and the verse 
that follows (47.56) praises her as the principle that for the Ekäyana Vaisnavas [of the Pañ- 
carätra] is the sole cause of their liberation. Now Bhatta Rämakantha tells us that there were 
two kinds of followers of the Pañcarätra: the Simkarsanapäñcarätras (Naresvarapariksäprakä$a, 
pp. 87-88) and the Samhitäpäñcarätras (bid., p.91). The sémkarsanam Säsanam of 47.55 is 
evidently the doctrine of the former and the Ekäyanas of 47.56 those who follow the latter 
(=*Ekäyanasamhitäpäñcarätras). The reading smkarsant is derived from sämkarsane as a result 
of the common confusion by Kashmirian copyists of e and 3, which are virtually indistinguish- 
able in Kashmiri pronunciation. 


Alexis Sanderson 427 


Trika maintained this perspective after the initial revelation, as can be seen from 
the tradition concerning the Xramastotra of Eraka, the surviving works of Hras- 
vanätha, and the tradition of the revelation of the Chummäs, the Old Kashmiri 
Kathäs, and the Vérälanäthasütra. It is not without good reason, then, that the 
historian Kalhana speaks of the reign of Avantivarman (c. 855/6-883) as one 
that was marked by the descent of Siddhas among men for the benefit of the 
world.$5 That this development had a major impact on Kashmirian society is 
evident in the fact that Kalhana records it. For he is generally silent about the 
recent history of religion in the valley beyond noting the religious affiliations 
of certain kings and the temples and other religious foundations that they es- 
tablished. Such figures as Bhatta Rämakantha, Abhinavagupta, and Ksemaräja, 
who loom so large in the learned literature of the Saivas of Kashmir and beyond, 
receive not even a passing mention. 

This pivotal period was followed in the tenth century by a remarkable ef- 
florescence of learned exegesis and philosophical argument in all areas of the 
religion. On the Säkta $aiva side we have the development within the Trika 
of the philosophical tradition of the Pratyabhijñä; and the last quarter of the 
century and the first of the eleventh saw with Abhinavagupta the production 
of Krama-influenced, Pratyabhijña-based exegesis of scripture in the Trika itself 
and with his successor Ksemaräja the extension of this exegesis to the Tantras 
of the cults of the two Bhairavas and beyond that domain to the interpretation 
of texts both esoteric and devotional that unlike those Tantras were open to a 
much wider audience than that of initiated specialists. The inclusivist aspira- 
tions of this tradition are also expressed in the formulation of the view that the 
Vidyäpitha-based system of the Trika does not merely transcend the Siddhänta 
and the Bhairava systems but also includes them within a higher synthesis that 
validates practice on all these levels. 

This was also the golden age of Kashmirian Saiddhäntika exegesis, which 
now developed à rigorously dualistic and ritualistic interpretation of the Sid- 
dhänta’s scriptures, with an exclusivist perspective that seems designed to bar 
the gates, as it were, against the intuitionist and charismatic influences that had 
come to the fore since the middle of the ninth century. Bhatta Rämakantha 
presents his exegesis in a fundamentalist spirit as a return to the original posi- 
tion set out in an earlier time by the founding fathers of his tradition with the 
purpose of rescuing it from the contamination it had suffered from attempts to 


663$ee footnote 632 on p. 418. 


428 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


assimilate its scriptures to alien perspectives, at one extreme to that of orthodox 
Brahmanism and at the other to that of the Säkta Saivas. 

Concern to counter contamination is also seen in the Säkta Saiva camp 
at this time. For Ksemaräja makes it clear that the principal purpose of his 
commentaries on the Suacchanda and Netra was to reverse inroads from the 
Saiddhäntika perspective into the interpretation of these Tantras and the en- 
actment of their prescriptions. Nor does it seem that his concern was primarily 
with theological theory. He consistently imposed the non-dualistic ontology 
of the Pratyabhijñä on these texts, as Abhinavagupta had done on the Trika’s 
Mälinivijayottara, but we sense greater urgency when he addresses what he saw 
as unwarranted diluting of the non-dualistic practice (advaitäcärah) of the Svac- 
chanda, practice, that is, which transcends brahmanical values of purity, pre- 
senting these departures from prescribed observance as the baleful effect of the 
dominance of the Siddhänta in the Saivism of his community. Indeed he sees 
the rise of non-dualism in Kashmir from its beginnings in the ninth century 
as a mission directed against this dominance, saying in the introduction to his 
commentary on the Sivasätra that Siva appeared to Vasugupta in a dream to 
direct him to the discovery of this text out of his concern that the esoteric tra- 
dition, evidently that of the Säkta Saivas, was on the verge of extinction in a 
society that was then almost completely under the sway of dualism.%%* He does 
not state explicitly that the dualism to which he refers is that of the Siddhänta, 
but that it was is the most natural interpretation of his words, especially in the 
light of the fact that he interprets the first Sütra as a refutation of the Saiddhaän- 
tika doctrine that God, other souls, and the material universe are irreducibly 
distinct. 

From Ksemaräjas statement of his purpose in writing his commentaries on 
the Tantras of the two Bhairavas we can infer that the forms of $Saivism that 
they authorize had been established in the valley for a considerable period of 
time, though how long they had been present and whether or not they predate 
the advent of the Siddhänta itself in the region cannot be determined from the 
available evidence. We can at least say that the MVerra was composed in Kashmir 
at some time between about 700 and 850, probably towards the end of this 
period, that the Svacchanda was used by the redactor of that text, and that its 


practice, therefore, was probably already current in Kashmir at that time. 


GA Sivasñtravimarsint, p.2, IL. 7-12. For this passage and my translation see footnote 574 on 
p. 404. 
66 For the date and provenance of the Netra see SANDERSON 2005b, pp. 273-294. I see no 


Alexis Sanderson 429 


The two facts that Ksemaräja extended Säkta Saiva exegesis into this do- 
main and that when he did so it had long been under the influence of the more 
conventional, Veda-congruent Siddhänta suggest that the cults of Svacchand- 
abhairava and Amrteévarabhairava were far from being fringe phenomena in 
the Kashmir of his time. Moreover, the detailed ritual manuals that have come 
down to us in Kashmir for the ceremonies of Saiva initiation, the fire-sacrifice, 
and the various post-mortuary rituals are all centred on these two deities. It is 
tempting to conclude, therefore, that it was this form of Saivism, that of the 
middle ground between the Siddhänta and the Säkta Saiva systems, that was the 
mainstream tradition in Kashmir throughout the period accessible to us, and 
that the Siddhänta, like the Säkta Saivism of the Trika and Krama, had little im- 
pact on the core practice of the majority but merely influenced it for some time 
on a theoretical level and provided a view of the proper relationship between 
$aiva practice and brahmanical norms that encouraged or justified a drift away 
from the more challenging aspects of non-Saiddhäntika observance that would 
probably have occurred even without its influence, simply as the consequence 
of the routinization that we would expect in any tradition that achieved wide- 
spread acceptance within brahmanical society. It is possible, then, that when 
Ksemaräja tells us that the Siddhänta was dominant in the Saiva community of 
his time he is referring to its influence rather than reporting that those following 
the Saiddhäntika system of worship were in the majority. 

However, the very manuals whose existence shows the dominance of the 
worship of the two Bhairavas in Kashmir in later times also contain evidence 
that must make us hesitate to conclude that this state of affairs goes back all 
the way to the golden age of Saiva exegesis. For while the Tantras and their 
learned commentators present the varieties of Saiva practice entirely within the 
boundaries of this or that system these manuals exhibit eclecticism within their 
Svacchanda- and Netra-based matrix, and since they record the actual practice 
of the local $aiva officiants we may read this incorporation of elements from 
other ritual systems as evidence that these were influential in the valley. Now, 
the Siddhänta figures very strongly in this respect. Thus, for example, in the 
Siva-vase (svakalasah) set up and worshipped in the preliminaries of Saiva cre- 
mation according to the Sivanirvänapaddhati the officiant worships (1) as the 
principal deities Bahurüpabhairava and his consort Mäyädevi—the former, in 
spite of the non-Saiddhäntika ring of his name, is an iconographic variant of 


reason to think that the Suzcchanda too was Kashmirian. 


430 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


the Kashmirian version ofthe Siddhänta’s distinctive Siva-form, the ten-armed, 
five-faced Sadäsiva—, (2) the ancillary door-deities, (3) Amrtesabhairava and 
Amrtalaksmi, (4) the eight Bhairavas that are the first outer circuit of the ret- 
inue of Svacchandabhairava, (5) the seven deity-circuits, to which I shall re- 
turn, (6) another Mantra-form of Amrte$abhairava (Mrtyuñjaya), (7) the six- 
syllable Siva-Mantra (om NAMAH $rväa) of lay Saiva worship, (8) the Mantras 
of Siva’s eight Mürtis, (9) Durgä and the Dinmaätrs, (10) the five Causes from 
Brahmä to Sadäéiva as the Lords of the five Segments (kalädhipatayah), (11) 
the six cosmic hierarchies (sd adhvänah), (12) the Vyomavyäpimantra, said 
here to have the effect of eliminating all sins, and (13) the five Brahmamantras, 
followed by the Pañcarätras Laksmivasudeva and a series of local goddesses 
(Särika, Säradä, Räjñi, Vitastä, Gangä, Jvälämukhi, and Bhuvaneévari).$67 Of 
these the Vyomavyäpimantra and the five Brahmamantras are Saiddhäntika. 
As for the seven deity-circuits, a standard feature in all the Kashmirian Pad- 
dhatis, these are (1) the eight Vidyeévaras (Ananta to Sikhandin), (2) the eight 
Gane$varas (from Nandin to Candeévara), (3) the eight (or ten) Lokapälas, the 
eight Mothers (Jayä, Subhagä, Vijayä, Durbhagä, Jayanti, Uhinï, Aparäjitä, and 
Karali), the eight celestial Grahas (from Sürya to Ketu), the eight Nägas (from 
Ananta to Kulika), and the eight (or ten) weapons of the Lokapälas. This is 
a standard Saiddhäntika arrangement expanded by the addition of the Moth- 
ers of the Vämatantras, the Grahas, and the Nägas. 68 Indeed, according to 
Räjänaka Taksakavarta the scriptural authority for this arrangement is an oth- 
erwise unknown 9000-verse redaction of the Saiddhäntika Mihsväsa known as 
the Nandivarävatära. © 

In later times the Siddhänta died out in Kashmir as an independent tra- 
dition. Some works of Saiddhäntika learning continued to be copied down to 
recent times but I have encountered no manuscript of any Kashmirian Pad- 
dhati that sets out the procedure and Mantras of Saiva ritual on Saiddhäntika 
lines for practical use, nor do we see any trace of Saiddhäntika literary activity 


666$ee SANDERSON 2005b, pp. 273-276. 

67 Sivanirvänapaddhati, pp. 218 [188c], L. 13-226 [190b)], L. 3. 

668 Thus in Saiddhäntika scriptural sources we see, for example, the Vidyeévaras, Ganeévaras, 
Lokapälas, and their Weapons prescribed for worship as the outer deity-circuits in the Kirana 
(20.7-12b) }, and the Vidyeévaras, Ganeévaras, and Lokapälas in the Mrgendra (Kriyäpäda 
3.20-26b). 

GS Nityädisamgrahapaddhati, f.35r3-4: nandisvarävatäre nih$väse navasahasrasamkhyake 
saptävaranärcä(yä) yah kramo .…. "These deities form the outer retinue (bahirävaranam) out- 
side the inner retinue (garbhävaranam) consisting of the principal Mantra’s auxiliaries. 


Alexis Sanderson 431 


in the valley after Bhatta Vidyäkantha (f. c. 975-1025). This has further en- 
couraged the tendency to minimalize the importance of the Siddhänta in the 
overall picture of the $Saivism of the valley, even to negate it altogether as in 
the widespread use of the term Kashmir Saivism in modern scholarship to refer 
the Säkta Saiva elements of Kashmirian Saivism that had the good fortune to 
survive in some form down to Kashmirs encounter with the modern world. 
However, the demise of the Kashmirian Siddhänta cannot be explained simply 
by appealing to the picture of a Saivism dominated by the cults of the Bhairavas, 
the Trika, and the Krama, since that dominance may be more an effect of the 
Siddhänta’s demise than its cause; and the weight of the Saiddhäntika elements 
within the Paddhatis that outlived the Siddhänta should be sufficient to in- 
hibit the facile conclusion that it had always been à marginal phenomenon in 
Kashmir. I consider it more probable that the primary cause of its disappear- 
ance here was the advent of Muslim rule in the fourteenth century and the 
consequent withdrawal of royal patronage from the public sphere that was the 
Saiddhäntikas” special territory, together with the widespread destruction of 
$aiva temples and Mathas that occurred during the darker periods of Islamic 
rule. How quickly the tradition declined and disappeared is not clear, since we 
have so little evidence of the state of religion in the valley between the four- 
teenth century and the incorporation of Kashmir into the Mughal empire. But 
in the seventeenth century Räjänaka Ratnakantha commenting on a reference 
to meditation on $iva, to his Mandala, and to initiation by the fourteenth- 
century Kashmirian poet Jagaddhara in a hymn to $iva takes these without 
hesitation to be the visualization of Svacchandabhairava, the Mandala of the 
same, and the initiation taught in the Svacchanda, even though nothing in the 
hymn indicates this specific tradition.7° 

As for the Säkta Saiva systems, the Trika gives the impression of having 
been less deeply established in Kashmir than the Kälikula. Abhinavagupta tells 
us that his was the first attempt to write a Paddhati on this system. There are no 
works of substance on the Trika by any other author and no later manuals for 
practical use in ritual survive to show that it had succeded in integrating itself 
into the ordinary religious life of the community. We might cite the existence 
of Jayaratha’s thirteenth-century commentary on the Zanträloka as evidence 
that the tradition did flourish long after Abhinavaguptas passing; but the in- 
ference would be inconclusive. The intellectual brilliance of the Zanträloka, its 


670Ratnakantha on Jagaddhara, Ssutikusumaäñjali 37.11. 


432 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


relevance as a key to the Saiva religion as a whole, and its undeniable influence 
on the thinking of the Kashmirian $aivas concerning broader soteriological and 
philosophical fundamentals might well have been sufficient reasons to attract 
this secondary exegesis even if the Trika in the narrow sense of a system of ritu- 
als had few followers in Jayaratha’s day. Even Jayaratha, I have suggested, may 
not have been among them. That it had some followers, albeit of a form of 
the Trika assimilated to the Kälikula, we know from the testimony of Jayaratha 
himself. For he reports that there were Gurus in Kashmir who followed a sys- 
tem of worship that combined the Trika of the Devyäyämala with the Kälikula 
of the Mädhavakula.S”\ So here we have evidence that the Trika had survived 
in Kashmir in some form down to the thirteenth century, five centuries after 
our first evidence of it in the Haravijaya of Ratnäkara. 

In comparison with the Trika the Krama appears to have been much more 
widely developed in Kashmir. While we have only the works of a single if fa- 
mous author for the Trika, here we have a plethora of writers from the mid- 
dle of the ninth century onwards, producing works in both Sanskrit and Old 
Kashmiri, and exercising throughout the most creative period of Kashmirian 
Saivism a profound influence not only on the Trika but also, through the works 
of Ksemaräja, on the understanding of the Svacchanda, the Netra, and a broad 
range of Saiva texts aimed at a wider audience. Influence in the reverse direc- 
tion from the Trika to the Krama is far less evident. Indeed of all the major 
works of the Krama discussed here only the anonymous Mahänayaprakä$a has 
absorbed the doctrines of Utpaladeva and Abhinavagupta to an appreciable ex- 
tent. Other works, such as the Mahänayaprakä$a of Arnasimha, the Old Kash- 
miri Mahänayaprakäa of Sitikantha, its commentary, and the literature on the 
higher Krama of the oral instructions, to which I have drawn attention in this 
study, show an autonomous tradition largely untouched by the thought and 
distinctive terminology of those better known authors.67? 

The distinctness of the Krama is evident not only in the independence of its 
discourse but also in the character of its position in relation to the ‘lower Saiva 
traditions. For there is nothing here of the ambition that drives the works of 
Abhinavagupta and Ksemaräja to embrace and subordinate the many-layered 
diversity of the systems of the Saiva Mantramärga within a higher unity. The 


671$ee above, footnote 81 on p. 258. 

S2The persistent term ‘Kashmir $aivism’ or ‘Kashmiri Saivism” is therefore doubly mislead- 
ing. Its current use is mistaken because it excludes the Siddhänta, but it also confuses by fos- 
tering the illusion that non-Saiddhäntika $aivism was a single doctrinally unified whole. 


Alexis Sanderson 433 


Krama tradition remained aloof from this inclusivist tendency, and this inde- 
pendent stance is reflected in its observances. For while Abhinavaguptas Trika 
rejected the tradition of radical Saiva asceticism with its cremation-ground prac- 
tices, making the rejection of such socially distinctive externals a fundamental 
principle of its universalism, the Krama, and indeed the Kälikula as a whole, 
continued to maintain its distance from mundane society. For, as we have seen, 
some of its Gurus were ascetics who had adopted the Käpälika observance, 
decking themselves with ornaments of human bone, carrying a human skull as 
a begging bowl, and living in the cremation ground. 

In the course of the eleventh century the Säkta Saiva cult of Tripurasun- 
dari was introduced into the valley and integrated into the exegetical tradi- 
tion of the Trika. How quickly and widely it was adopted is unclear, since we 
have so little evidence from the three centuries after Jayaratha. But thereafter, 
as we have seen, Bhattäraka, the author of the Spandapradipikä, Bhattäraka 
ÂAnanda, the author of the Vijñänakaumudi, if he is not identical with the pre- 
ceding, and the Sivasvämin Upädhyäya who wrote the Gäyatrimantravivarana 
and Srividyämantravivarana were all initiates engaged in this form of ritual. 
Moreover, Tripurasundari is prominent among the goddesses whose worship is 
included in the Svacchanda-based Paddhatis; her cult provides the framework 
for the conceptualization of the cults of the local goddesses seen in the Kash- 
mirian Mähätmya texts;°”3 and the literature of her cult, comprising Paddhatis 
and Stotras, much of it non-Kashmiran, is very well represented in the body of 
surviving Kashmirian manuscripts, though this must be in part if not largely 
the effect of the arrival in Kashmir of East Indian Säktism with the Maithila 
Kauls. It is at least probable that just as the cult of Svacchandabhairava came to 
monopolize the domain of non-Säkta Saiva ritual in Kashmir, so this tradition 
of the worship of Tripurasundarï (Srividyä), which has enjoyed great popular- 
ity throughout the subcontinent down to modern times, came to dominate the 
Säkta, and that the Trika and Krama survived as textual resources of exeget- 
ical and spiritual inspiration, in the manner of the Pratyabhijñaà, rather than 
as living traditions of ritual practice. The demise of the Trika in this sense is 
strongly indicated by the commentary on the Parätrifikä composed by Räja- 
naka Laksmiräma (Lasakäka) around the beginning of the nineteenth century. 
It is unlikely that if this ritual tradition had still been active he could have 
written a work that assimilates the text to the cult of Svacchandabhairava. Cer- 


673$ee, for example, the Särikäpariccheda, which assimilates the goddess Särikä of 
Härtparbuth to Tripurasundari, and the Räjñiprädurbhäva, which does the same for the Räjñi 
of Tulmul. 


434 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


tainly, when I studied the Kashmirian $aiva literature in Kashmir from 1972 
to 1977 as a pupil of the $aiva Guru Swami Lakshman Joo Raina (1907-1991) 
I encountered no sign that any practical knowledge of the ritual aspects of the 
Trika or the Krama had reached the present. Even the worship of Svacchanda- 
bhairava and Amrte$varabhairava had died out. I was informed that the tradi- 
tion of receiving $Saiva initiation following the Kalädiksäpaddhati, which was 
still alive when Georg BüHLER visited Kashmir a hundred years earlier, 7 had 
been neglected for about fifty years, and I heard the same concerning the Saiva 
post-mortuary rituals. 

What did survive was a purely gnostic Trika which lacked ritual practice 
(other than that of the common brahmanical tradition), which had subsumed 
into a homogenized whole without remainder the literatures of the other non- 
Saiddhäntika systems. This, however, was not a twentieth-century develop- 
ment, for, as Ï have argued elsewhere, we find it already in the model of the re- 
ligious life advocated by the Mrtitattvänusmarana, an unpublished Kashmirian 
treatise composed at some time after the fifteenth century and before the nine- 
teenth, which is likely to reflect general belief in the Kashmirian brahmin com- 
munity of its time.®”” Ir is to be hoped that further research into unpublished 
Kashmirian materials of the post-classical period will clarify further the history 
of this separation of gnosis from ritual, a development that can be seen as a sign 
of Saivism's assimilation to the dominant brahmanical model of the religious 
life with its duality of doing without knowing and knowing without doing. 


ABBREVIATIONS 
ASB Asiatic Society of Bengal, Calcutta 
BHU Banaras Hindu University 
BLO Bodleian Library, Oxford 
Cod. The reading of the manuscript 
con). My conjectural emendation 
COIT. My correction 
Ed. The reading of the edition 
em. My emendation 


SABünLEr 1877, pp. 23-24. 

The significance of this text for the early development of the purely gnostic Trika has been 
considered in SANDERSON forthcoming 4, which provides an edition of the relevant passage 
on the three forms of the religious life: the way of ritual (Smärta brahmanical), the way of 
meditation (kundaliniyogah), and, for those who have transcended rites, the way of knowledge 


(the Trika). 


Alexis Sanderson 435 


qu. Quotation 

SBB-PK Staatsbibliothek zu Berlin - Preussischer Kulturbesitz 
SOASL School of Oriental and African Studies, London 
SUBG Staats- und Universitätsbibliothek, Gôttingen 


MANUSCRIPT SOURCES 


Amsumadägama: 1F> transcript 3. 

Agnikäryapaddhati: À = Paris, Bibliothèque Nationale, Ms Sanscrit 505 C; paper; 
Säradä; B = su8G Mu. 1, 134; paper; Särada. 

Annapürapäñjäpaddhati. BoR: 252 of 1883-84, Pt. 3; paper; Säradä. See also CHANDRA 
1984. 

*Amrtesvaradhyänavivarana of Lasa Käka [Räjänaka Laksmiräma]. s8B-Pk Hs or 11664, 
f.[91]v1-17; paper; Särada script. 

Astikä of Prabodhanätha. Kä/ikäkulapañcasataka (q.v.), . 96v1-97v4. 

Atmärthapüjäpaddhati. 1#p transcript 55; paper; Devanägari transcript. 


Üvarapratyabhijñäkaumudi of Bhattäraka Sundara. Research and Publication Depart- 
ment, Jammu and Kashmir Government, Srinagar, Sanskrit 1089; paper; Säradä script. 
[Not yet accessed and read]. 

Üvarapratyabhijñävimarsinivyäkhyä, anonymous. Trivandrum Ms 270 (Kvarapraty- 
abhijñävyäkhyävyäkhyä); paper; Devanägari transcript. 

Uttaragharämnäya. = Ciñcinimatasärasamuccaya (q.v.), ff. 20r8-24v3 (7.155-245). This 
contains the Xälikäkramaslokadvädasikä and the Kälikäkramapañcäsikä (referred to to- 
gether as the K%/ikäkramapaddhati [7.242]). 


Uttarämnäyayajñakrama. NeMrP E447/13; paper thyäsaphü; Newari script; place of de- 
posit: “Acyuta (owner), Kathmandu”. 


Urmikaulärnava. NAK 5-5207; incomplete; paper; Newari script. 
Kalädiksäpaddhati of Manodadatta, extended by Sivasvämin. À = BORI 157 of 1886-92; 
paper; Säradä script. B = BoRI 1147 of 1886-92; paper; Säradä script. 


Kälikäkulapañcasataka. NAx 5-358, NemPr B30/26; palm-leaf, Newari script; no date 
of copying. This is a composite codex in a single hand, comprising the K%/kula- 
pañcasataka, the Khacakrapañcakastotra (q.v.), the Kälikästotra of Jhänanetra (q.v.), 
the Sripithadvädasikä of Cakrabhänu (q.v.), the Astikä of Prabodhanätha (q.v.), the 
anonymous Kramaviläsastotra (q.v.), and the Mahänayaprakä$a of Arnasimha (q.v.). 


Kälikäkrama. = Manthänabhairava, Siddhakhanda (q.v.), #. 179r5-186v3. 


436 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Kälikäkramapañcäsikä. = Ciñcinimatasärasamuccaya (q.v.), . 21v1-24r3 (7.180c-241). 


Kälikäkramaslokadvädasikä. = Ciñcinimatasärasamuccaya (q.v.), ff. 20r8-21v1 (7.155- 
180b). 


Kälikästotra of Jhänanetra. Kälikäkulapañcasataka, #.90v1-92v4. No title in the 
colophon (krtir iyam $srijñänanetrapädänäm iti). 

Kälikulakramasadbhäva. NAK 1-76, NémPr A203/23; paper; Newari script; incomplete 
(up to 7.2 ); probably penned in the seventeenth-century. 


Kälikulakramärcana of Vimalaprabodha. NAK 5-5188, Némpp A148/10; paper; Newari 
script; probably penned in the seventeenth-century. 


Kälikulapañcasataka. À = Kathmandu, Kaiser Library, 524 (‘Kälikäkushe’), Nemrr 
c49/3; palm-leaf; early East Indian script; penned in [Laksmanasena] Samvat 122 
[= a year between A.p. 1230 and 1242]. B =NaK 1-252 (‘Kälikulakramärcana’); pa- 
per; Newari script; penned in A.D. 1644/5. 


Kälottara. NAKk 5—-4632, NGMrP B118/7; paper; Devanägari. À modern Nepalese tran- 
script containing an unattributed account of the Saiva canon followed by various re- 
censions of the Kälottara. 


Kirana. NAK 5-893, NGMPrP A40/23 (= Kiranatantra, Kiranägama); palm-leaf; Licchavi 
script; incomplete; penned in A.D. 924. 

Kulapañcäsikä. NAk 1-1076. NGmPp A40/13. Palm-leaf; Nepalese Kutila script; penned 
c. A.D. 1100-1200. 

Kaulasütra of Guru Bhattaéri-Sitikantha. BoRI 445 of 1875-76; paper; Kashmirian De- 
vanagari. 

Kramaviläsastotra, anonymous. Kälikäkulapañcasataka (q.v.), #. 98v1-102v1. 


Kriyäkändakramävalï of Somasambhu. À = NAK 1-772, NGMPr B26/1; palm-leaf; early 
East Indian script; A.b. 1149. B = Cambridge, University Library, Add. 1406; palm- 
leaf, Newari script. 


Kriyäkälagunottara. NAKk 3-392, NéMrP 825/3; palm-leaf, Nepalese Nandinägari/Päla 
script; penned in A.D. 1184/5. 

Kriyäsamgrahapaddhati of Väladhärin. Kathmandu, Kaiser Library 63, NemPp c5/3; 
palm-leaf, Nepalese Bhujimol script; penned in A.p. 1090/1. 


Khacakrapañcakastotra. À = Kälikäkulapañcasataka (q.v.), #.72v1-89v4. The NcmPr 
microfilm lacks f. 73. For that I have used NAK 5-5183, NampPp A150/6 (Kälikäkula- 
pañcasataka) (B), #. 1vl-6vl; paper; Devanägari. 

Gäyatrimantravivarana. of Sivarämasvamin/Sivasvamin Upädhyäya. su8G Mu I 30, 
#. 16r[-23a]8-24v{31b]12; paper; Säradà script. 


Alexis Sanderson 437 


Gurupustikä. su © 4115; paper; Säradä script. [Not yet accessed and read]. 

Gurubhaktistotra of Cidrüpa Kaul. BLo Chandra Shum Shere e. 264 (‘Tantric Col- 
lectanea”), #. 290v{511b]1-292r[513a]4; paper; Säradà script; in the same hand and 
format as the Srividyanityapüjäpaddhati of À.b. [18]35/6. 

Gurustuti of Cidräpa Kaul. 8LO Chandra Shum Shere e. 264 (‘Tantric Collectanex”), 
f#.292r[513b]4-297v[518b]3; paper; Säradà script; in the same hand and format as 
the Srividyänityapäjapaddhati of A.b. [18]35/6. 

Gurustutiratnamälä of Govinda Kaul. sBB-PKk Hs or 11126; paper; Säradä script. 

Gurustotra of Jyotisprakä$a Kaul. s88-Pk Hs or 12509, ff. [125]r-[129]r; paper; Säradà 
script. 

Gurustotraprakäsikä of Govinda Kaul. sBB-Pk Hs or 11126; paper; Särada script. 

Guhyasamayasädhanamälä. 810 Sansk. c. 15 (R); palm-leaf; Nepalese Kutila script; prob- 
ably penned in the 12th or 13th century. 

Guhyasiddhi. NAKk 1-163 NémPP A150/39, #. 1v1-26r8; paper; Newari script. 

Ciñcinimatasärasamuccaya. NAK 1-767, NGMPP B157/19; paper; Newari script; penned 
in A.D. 1754. 

Cittasamtosatrimsika. soast 44390 (‘$aiva Hymns), ff. 41v1—49r7; paper; Säradä script; 
penned in A.D. [18]60/61. 

Chummäsamketaprakäsa of Niskriyänandanätha. sB8-PK Hs or 11387 (‘Trimsaccarcä- 
rahasya’); paper; Säradä script; incomplete. 


Jayadrathayämala, Satka 1. NAKk 5-4650, NémrP 8122/7; paper; Devanägari script. 
penned in Vikrama 1982 from an old palm-leaf manuscript (präcinatädapatrapustakät) 
for the library of Räjaguru Hemaräja Säkya (f. 214v5). 


Jayadrathayämala, Satka 2. NAKk 5-4650, NGMPrP A153/2; paper; Devanägari script; 


penned in Vikrama 1982 from an old palm-leaf manuscript (präcinatädapatrapustakät) 
for the library of Räjaguru Hemaräja Säkya (f. 132v4-5). 


Jayadrathayämala, Satka 3. NA 5-1975, NGmPP A152/9; paper; Newari script; penned 
in A.D. 1686/7. 

Jayadrathayämala, Satka 4. NAK 1.1468, NémrP B122/4; paper; Newari script; penned 
in A.D. 1626/7. 


Jayadrathayämalaprastäramantrasamgraha. À =ff.3v3-G4r5 of Nak 1-258, NGMPP 
A152/8 (‘Jayadrathayämalé); paper; Newari script; A.b. 1642/3. B = ff. 4rl-G4rl of 
NAK 1-1514, NGMpp reel number not recorded; paper; Newari script; penned in A.D. 


1584/4. 
Jñänakriyädvayasataka, probably of Sillana. A = soast 44390 (‘Saiva Hymns’), ff. 1v1— 


438 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


18r7; paper; Säradä script. The Citrasamtosatrimsikä of Näga, the last of the series of 
philosophical hymns in this composite codex and written in the same hand reports 
that it was penned in A.D. [18]60/61. This is the second manuscript in the codex. B 
= sBB-PK Hs or 12833, #. 1[75]r-11[86]v; paper; Säradà script. 


Jhänarainävali. 1FP transcript 231; paper; a Devanägari transcript of a Grantha palm- 
leaf manuscript, R. 14898. 


Tattvatrayanirnayavivrti of Bhatta Rämakantha. Lucknow, Akhila Bharatiya Sanskrit 
Parishad, 2390; paper; Säradaä script. 


Tantraräjatanträvatärastotra of Âcärya Vi$vävarta. À = ff. 1v1-3v1 of NAK 1-258, NGmPP 
A152/8 (‘Jayadrathayämala’”); paper; Newari script; penned in A.b. 1642/3. B =f. 1vl- 
3v7 of NAK 1-154, NGMPP reel number not recorded; paper; Newari script; penned in 
A.D. 1584. 


Timirodghätana. NAK 5-690, Némpp A35/3; palm-leaf; late Licchavi script; incomplete. 


Tridasadämara. À =AsB G 9999 (rridasadämare pratyañgirävidhänam); palm-leaf; 
Newari script; penned in A.D. 1189. B = Tridasadämarä(di) pratyañgirävisayakanäna- 
tantra (q.v.), f. 1vl-12r2. According to the colophons this consists of Patala 81 and 82 
of the Tridasadämaramahätantra, constituting the Pratyañgiräkalpa (B, f. 6v3—4: iti $ri- 
tridasadämaramahätantre catustrimsatisähasre $ripratyañgirotpattimantroddhäravidhi(r) 
ekäsititamah patalah; and B, f. 12r1-2): ii $ritridasadämaramahätantre catustrimsati- 
sähasre $ripratyañgirävidhi(r) dvyasititamah patala(h.) pratyañgiräkalpam samäptam. 

Tridasadämarä(di)pratyañgirävisayakanänätantra. NAk 3-30, NemrP B173/22; paper; 
Newari script; penned in A.D. 1618/9 


Tripurasundaristotra of Sivänanda (= Saubhägyahrdayastotra, q.v. in the general bibliog- 
raphy). 8LO Chandra Shum Shere e. 264 (‘Tantric Collectanea’), ff. [504]r4-[505]v7. 


Tripurasundaristotra of Gane$a Bhattäraka. BLO Chandra Shum Shere e. 264 (‘Tantric 
Collectaneæ), #. 326v[547b]1-328v[549b]5; paper; Säradà script; in the same hand 
and format as the Srividyänityapüjäpaddhati (a.b. [18]35/6). 

Devidvyardhasatikä. NAKk 1-242. N@mPr A161.12; paper; Newari script; probably 
penned in the 17th century; descendant of à manuscript in the library of Vi- 
malaprabodha, Räjaguru of the Nepalese king Arimalla (r. 1200-1216) (post- 
colophon, f. 19r5: paramahamsaparivräjaka-uttaränvayäcäryasrimadvimalaprabodha- 
pädänäm iti). 

Devyämata. NAK 1-279, NGmpp A41/15 (‘Nifväsäkhyamahätantra’); palm-leaf; Nepalese 
Licchavi script. 

Dvayasampattivärtika of Vamanadatta, son of Harsadatta. À = Mälinislokavärtika (q.v.), 
folio sides 552 [8r11] to 553 [8v]; paper; Kashmirian Devanägari script. B = BHU 
c4256, ff. 6r-7v; paper; Säradä. 


Alexis Sanderson 439 


Nandikseträvatära attributed to the Adipuräna. 81 Stein Or. c. 4; paper; Särada script. 

Nijätmabodha of Sähib Kaul. soas 44389; paper; Säradä script. 

Nityäkaula. NAx 2-226, NGmrp 826/21; palm-leaf, Newari script; right side damaged; 
incomplete (6.28). 

Nityädisamgrahapaddhati of Räjänaka Taksakavarta. BoR1 76 of 1875-76 
(Bhrigesasamhit&); paper; Särada script. 

Nisisamcära. NAK 1-1606; palm-leaf, Nepalese Kutila script; probably before 1100 A.p. 

*Niskalasvacchandadhyänavivarana of Lasa Käka [Räjänaka Laksmiräma]. s88-PKk Hs or 
11664, #. [91]r1-[91]v3; paper; Säradà script. 


Paramärcanatrimsika. soasr 44390 (‘$aiva Hymns’), ff. 34v3—41r5; paper; Särada 
script; penned in Samvat 36 (4a.p. [18]60/61 according to the colophon at the end 
of the Cittasamtosatrimsikä (q.v.), which follows in the same hand in this codex. 


Picumata. (Brahmayämala).Nax 3-370, Nempp A42/6; palm-leaf; Newari script; penned 
in A.D. 1052. 


Piñgalämata. NAKk 3-376, NGMPP A42/2; palm-leaf, Newari script; penned in A.D. 
1173/4. 


Präyascittasamuccaya of Hrdayasiva. Cambridge University Library Ms Add. 2833; 
palm-leaf, Newari script; penned in A.b. 1157/8. 


Bahurüpagarbhastotravisamapadasamketa of Ananta$aktipäda. BHU C488; paper; Säradä 
script. 


Bodhaviläsa. = Dvayasampattivärtika (q.v.) 

Bhagavadgitätattvaprakäsikä. of Lasa Käka [Räjänaka Laksmiräma]. su8G Mu 1 22; pa- 
per; Säradaà script. 

Bhävacüdämani of Bhatta Vidyäkantha. Jammu, Shri Raghunath Temple Mss Library, 


5291, now in the collection of the Ranbir Research Institute, Jammu; paper; Kash- 
mirian Devanägari. 


Bhuvanamälinikalpavisamapadavivrti of Srivatsa. spB-Pk Hs or 12231; paper; Säradä 
script. 


Bhaïiravisaktistotra of Gane$a Bhattäraka. BLO Chandra Shum Shere e. 264 (‘Tantric 
Collectanex), ff. 325r[546]r1-326r7[547a]; paper; Säradà script; in the same hand 
and format as the Srividyänityapüjäpaddhati (a.n. [18]35/6). 

Manthänabhairava, Kumärikhanda. NAk 5-4630, NemrP A171/11; paper; Newari 
script. 


Manthänabhairava, Siddhakhanda. Scans courtesy of Sam Fogg Rare Books & Manu- 
scripts, London; palm-leaf; Nandinägari/Päla script; probably penned in the 12th cen- 


440 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


tury. 
Mayasamgraha. NAK 1-1537, NGMPP A31/18; palm-leaf, Newari script; incomplete. 


Mahäkaravirayäga. NAKk 1-816, NGMPP B27/17; palm-leaf, Nandinägari/Päla script; 
penned in A.D. 1266. 


Mabhänayaprakä$a of Arnasimha Kuläcärya. Kälikäkulapañcasataka (q.v.), #. 103v1- 
130r5. 


Mahänayaprakä$a of Sitikantha in Old Kashmiri with Sanskrit commentary. NAK 1-252, 
NGMPP B135/41; paper; Devanägari. 


Mälinislokavärtika. Jammu, Shri Ranbir Sanskrit Research Institute, 623 (20 ka 2). This 
is a composite codex containing many small works in addition to the Mälinislokavaär- 
tika, each with its own folio numeration. See here Dvayasampattivärtika, Sivastaka, 
Satcakranirnaya À, Satcakranirnaya B, and Svabodhodayamañjari. 


Mrgendrapaddhatitikä of Vaktraéambhu. 1FP transcript 1021; paper; a Devanägari tran- 
script of a Grantha palm-leaf manuscript, RE 4006. 


Mohacüdottara. NAK 5-1977, NGmrP A182/2; paper; Devanägari. 


Yajñopavitasikhämaälänirnaya of Sivasvämin Upädhyäya [II]. sBB-PKk Hs or 11710; pa- 
per; Sarada script. 


Yonigahvara. ASB G 1000; palm-leaf;, Newari script. 


*Räjänakavamsaprasamsä. À = BLO Stein Or. e. 17; 19th century paper; text written 
on the rectos only; Devanägari script; marginal annotations in pencil by M.A. Stein; 
‘Notes on Ânandas Praasti handwritten by the same on ff. 13a-14b; on f.1 in 
his hand: “Extracts from Ânanda Râjânaka’s commentary on Naishadiyacharita and 
Sitikantha Râjânaka’s Kägikâvrttinyâsatikâ. Copied from a paper (6" x 3") of Pandit 
Sunkâka Râzdân, Habba Kadal, Srinagar" (signed M.A. Stein, Nishat Bagh, Septem- 
ber 19-20, 1894)”; copied by Räjänaka Laksmana in 1845. The second extract is in 
fact from Sitikanthas Balabodhininyasa (Kätantravrttinyäsatikä). B = 810 Stein Or. d. 
62; copy of the same exemplar prepared by Pandit Govind Kaul; paper; Säradä script. 


Räjñiprädurbhäva. 810 Stein Or. d. 81; paper; Säradä script. 


Varunapaddhativrtti of Bhatta Sivottama. 1FP transcript 143; paper; a Devanägari tran- 
script of a Grantha palm-leaf manuscript, Government Oriental Manuscripts Library, 
Madras, R 14871. 


*Visnustuti of Vämanadatta, son of Devadatta, comprising six complete Prakaranas 

(Samvitprakäsa,  Atmasaptati,  Vikalpaviplava,  Vidyäviveka,  Varnavicära, and 
Paramärthaprakä$a), and the beginning of a seventh. BHUu C4003; paper; Kashmirian 
Devanägari script. 


Särikäpariccheda. 810 Stein Or. e. 2 (viii); paper; Särada script. 


Alexis Sanderson 441 


Särikästava of Sähib Kaul. BLo Chandra Shum Shere, e. 264, #. 308r[529a]5- 
310v[531]v5; paper; Säradä script; in the same hand as the Srividyänityapajäpaddhati 
(a.p. [18]35/6). 

Sivagopradänavidhi. 810 Stein Or. f.12, fÆlvl-26vl11. On outer cover: 
gopradänavidhih  $Saivänäm.  Colophons:  i#  nandifivadharmasamhitäyäm 
gopradänavidhih (E.25r4-5); iti Sivagopradänam (f.26v9-10). penned in A.D. 
[18]86, probably 1886). 

Sivarätripäjäpaddhati. SBB-PK, Hs or 11279. Birch-bark; Säradä; disordered folios, 
each incomplete through damage; no folio numbers. Abbreviared title in margin of 
folio sides 6, 51, 59: sivarapu. 

Sivarätrirahasya. 810 Stein Or. e. 24, ff. 1rl—4r25; paper; Säradä script. 

Sivasaktiviläsa of Sähib Kaul. su8G Codex Vish 5 (parts numbered 5-20), part 5; paper; 
Säradä script. 

Sivästaka of Yogaräja. Mälinislokavärtika (a.v.), folio sides 241 [9r16] to 242 [9v12]; 
paper; Kashmirian Devanägari. 

Sisyasamskärapaddhati. Paris, Bibliothèque Nationale, Sanscrit 505 C; paper; Säradä 
script; acquired in 1898. 

Syämäpaddhati of Sähib Kaul. (1) Photocopy courtesy of Sam Fogg Rare Books & 
Manuscripts, London; paper; Devanägari script; probably from Jaipur. (2) sBB-rk Hs 
or 12439; paper; Devanägari script. 

Srinäthastotra of Gane$a Bhattäraka. BLO Chandra Shum Shere e. 264 (‘Tantric Col- 


lectanea’), ff. 288v[509b]1-290r[511a]7; paper; Säradà script; same hand and format 
as Srividyänityapüjäpaddhati (a.p. [18]35/6). 

Sripithadvädasikä of Cakrabhänu. NaK 5-358, nempr B30/26 (Kälikäkulapañcasataka), 
#. 93v1-95r4; palm-leaf, Newari script. 


Srividyänityapäjäpaddhati of Sähib Kaul. BLO Chandra Shum Shere e. 264 (‘Tantric 
Collectanea), f. 1v[226b]1-156v[378b]5; paper; Säradà script; A.D. [18]35/6. 

Srividyämantravivarana of Sivasvämin Upädhyäya [II]. s88-Pk Hs or 11663; paper; 
Säradä script. 

Satcakranirnaya (A), anonymous. MälinKlokavärtika (q.v.), folio sides 538 [2r], L. 1 to 
543 [4v], L. 18; paper; Kashmirian Devanägari. Follows the Mälinislokavärtika and is 
followed by the Zandulastavaräja. 

Satcakranirnaya (B) of Sivasvämin Upädhyäya [I]. Mälinislokavärtika (q.v.), folio sides 
378[1r]1 to 386[5r12]; paper; Kashmirian Devanägari. 


Samvitprakäsa of Vimanadatta. See *Visnustuti. 


442 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Saccidänandakandalï of Sähib Kaul. 8LO Stein Or. e. 26 (üir), F. 32r[18a]5—-44v4; paper; 
Särada. 

Sadänandaläsya of Sadänanda Kaul. s88-PKk Hs or 12509, Æ. [121]v-[125}r. 

Sahajärcanasastikä of Sähib Kaul. 8Lo Stein Or. e. 26 (ii), Æ. 22r[8a]1-32r[18a]5; paper; 
Särada; followed by Saccidänandakandali (q.v.). 


Somasambhupaddhativyäkhyä of Trilocanaéivacärya. 1FP transcript 170; paper; a De- 
vanägari transcript of a Grantha palm-leaf manuscript belonging to Kailäsabattar of 
Tirunelvely. 

Spandapradipikä of Bhattärakasvämin. BORI 513 of 1875-76 (Spandapradipa’); paper; 
Säradä script. 

Svacchandamahesvarästaka. ses-k Hs or 12509. [5v]-[15]r; paper; Säradä script. 

Svabodhasiddhi of Bhattaéri Bhüti. ses-Pk Hs or 11415, Æ. 57v-G0r; paper; Säradà 


script. 


Svabodhodayamañjart of Vämanadatta, son of Harsadatta. À = Mälinislokavärtika (q.v.), 
folio sides 549 [6v7] to 552, [8r11]; paper; Kashmirian Devanägari script. B = BHU 
C4255, f. 1v-5v; paper; Sarädä script . 


Svätmopalabdhisataka of Sillana. ss8-PKk Hs or 12833, ff. 87[1]r-98[12]r; paper; Säradà 
script. 


Haravijaya of Ratnäkara. BLO Stein Or. d. 52; paper; Särada script. 


Hrllekhäpaddhati of Sähib Kaul. 810 Chandra Shum Shere g. 27; paper; Särada script; 
penned in A.D. [18]55. 


Materials for the Study of the Levels of Sound in the Sanskrit 


Sources of the Saivasiddhänta. 


Ratnatrayapariksä 22, 70c-86b, 171c-173b and its Ullekhini. 
With Excerpts from an Unpublished Commentary* 


FRANCESCO SFERRA 


INTRODUCTION 


1. References to different levels of sound (7444) or of word (väc) appear in 
several early Saivasiddhänta scriptures, commentaries and independent works. 
The argument is usually treated when dealing with principles (sattva) or cate- 
gories (padärtha), in particular bindu, or mahämäyä, and while explaining the 
nature and formation of mantras. Scriptural sources differ to various degrees in 
their accounts. Apart from the context and from the coverage that each work 
devotes to this topic, the main difference between texts lies in the names and 
the numbers of the levels of sound and, in general, the way in which the sonic 
emanation is described. 

Here we limit ourselves to providing some examples. Among the earliest 
sources, the Kiranägama states in chapter 11 that the fifty phonemes evolve 
from the nine classes (lit. ‘sections’, khanda) through which the param brahma 
manifests. It is called ‘deposit of syllables” (zksarälaya) and is at first unmanifest 
(avyakta) in the form of word (v4gräpa). It is the supreme knowledge con- 


*I would like to thank Professor André Papoux and Dr. Dominic GoopaLz for inviting 
me to contribute to this volume in memory of Madame Hélène BRUNNER, a great scholar and 
a most gentle lady. My thanks also to Dr. Goopaiz, Dr. Fabio Boccio, Prof. Dr. Harunaga 
IsAACSON and Prof. Raniero GNoLt for reading this paper prior to publication and for their 
invaluable suggestions. Special thanks are also due to the authorities of the Adyar Library and 
the Oriental Research Institute of Mysore for giving me access to the manuscript sources used 
for this paper; and — last but not least — Susan Ann Ware for her help in revising the English 
text. 


444 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


sisting in #4da, the syllable om, the top of the face of bindu (stt. 2-5).! The 
Mrgendratantra describes the sonic emanation as starting with kwndalini and 
continuing with #4da, bindu, om and mätrkä (i.e. the phonemes from 4 to ksa) 
(Kriyäpäda 1.2)? The Särdhatrisatikälottaragama states that nada has three lev- 
els: gross (sthüla), subtle (säksma) and supreme (para) (1.5-8).5 In the descrip- 
tion that we find in the fanträvatärapatala of the Ajitägama (1.13cd-14), the 
‘totality of sounds” (éhdaräsi) derives from aksara (i.e. the syllable om), which 
comes from sound (sabda), in its turn evolving from Supreme $iva.{ According 
to the Sväyambhuvasütrasañgraha (Vidyäpäda 5.1-5), the phonemes evolve di- 
rectly from the brahman,” whereas the Paräkhyatantra (6.2—4) holds that they 


lekam nädatmakam jñänam om ity eva sthitam param | sà fikhà binduvaktrasya galañgasya 
mahätmanabh|| proktam $rutau param brahma codito ‘träksarälayah| sthito ‘vyaktah sa 
vâgräpah punar bhinnas tu khandasah || navakhandayutas cädyah punah sodasabhih svaraih | 
dasärdhäksaranisnätäh pañcakhanda vyavasthitäh || khandam dvayam caturvarnam $esam 
kätäkhyayä sthitam | evam jñeyam Satärdhätma varnasaktivibhedatah || (ed. p.46; cf. trans. 
p. 80). 

2$akter nädo ‘bhavad bindur aksaram matrkà tatah | mürtir ädyà mahesasya sarvaväcyänuyä- 
yini || (ed. p. 2, transl. BRUNNER 1985:5; pädas ab are frequently quoted by Aghorasiva, always 
with the reading bhave for bhavad [cf. also SSAV p. 5]; cf, exempli gratia, MreT Vidya° Dipika 
[see below, n. 23], Tatrvaprakäavriti p.45, Tattvasañgrahatikä p.131). C£. Papoux 1978:69. 

Snadäkhyam yat param bijam sarvabhütesv avasthitam | muktidam paramam kim ca divyasid- 
dhipradäyakam || tadviditvä mahäsena desikah pasahä bhavet| ägopäläñganàä bälä mlecchäh 
präkrtabhäsinah || antarjalagatäh sattvas te ‘pi nityam bruvanti tam | sthülam sûksmam param 
jhätvà karma kuryäd yathepsitam || sthälam fabda iti proktam süksmam cintämayam bhavet | 
cintayà rabitam yat tu tat param pariktrtitam || (ed. p.cxliii). References to näda also occur 
in other parts of the SärK (for instance, in 13.11 and 15.1; cf. also Rämakanthas Wr#i on 
chapters 12 and 20), but the most relevant passage regarding the topic under discussion is 
1.5-8. Stanzas from this part are frequently cited in commentaries and independent works, 
especially stanza 1.8. Cf, e.g., RTPUflekhint ad stt. 22, 53cd-54ab; NKWäkhyä ad st. 15; 
SvT Uddyota ad 11.8cd, vol. 6, p. 10; SD Vrrri, p. 102; Kvarapratyabhijñävivrtivimarsini, vol. 2, 
p.192; Bhävopahäravivarana, p. 30. For further references see TORELLA 2001:860. A parallel of 
st. 1.8 can be found in /#änasiddhänta 8.3 (see Acri, forthcoming, $7) and in a quotation with 
attribution to 4gama in the commentary on the Caryägiti by the Buddhist Munidatta (p. 148). 

#asit pürvam hi sargädau vyomaräñpät paräc chivät| Sabdas tato ‘ksaras tasmäc chabdaräsir 
anuttamah || navavargasamäyuktah pañcäsadbhedabheditah || (ed. vol. 1, p.2). 

Sathädäv abhavac chabdah käranäd aksaram tatah|\ käranam moksadam brahman brahma 
brahmavido viduh|| tasmät sarvaprado devah Sabdaräsir iti $rutah| navaparvasatärdhätma 
yonibijätmakah parah|| akärädivisargäntam bijam tat sodasäksaram | $esä yoni catustrimsad 
avyayä hy aksarätmikäh || sà faktir devadevasya tayà vyäptam idam jagat | jñänam $aivam param 
säksmam yat tat tärakam uttamam || vedädiiñänabhedena Sivajñänavibhedatah| cintämanir 
iväträsau sthitah sarvasya käranam || (ed. in GoopaLz 2001:342, and GoopaLz 2004:323- 
324). 


Francesco Sferra 445 


evolve from the bindu.$ The Pauskarägama, which at least in the /fänapäda 
that has come down to us and has been published seems to be influenced by 
the speculations of the first Kashmirian exegetes and “is probably a late South 
Indian text with an old title”, is one of the most syncretic scriptures; as such it 
records at least four positions: Z) sound, which has the nature of bindu, evolves 
in four stages, that is, säksmä, pañyanti, madhyamä and vaikhari (2.20-21ab);° 
2) the evolution of phonemes procedes from #4da, which in its turn derives 
from bindu (7.72cd);!° 3) phonemes come from a group of powers deriving 
from bindu, in its turn deriving from the fsra, which manifests itself accord- 
ing to the form of n4da, that comes from the param brahma (8.2cd-13ab);'! 
4) phonemes come directly from bindu (8.18 f.)."? 


Ssrstikäle sa sarvajñah purusärthaprayojanäm|  vyaktim nayati bijärnam bindoh sa 
paramesvarah || binduh ksubdhas tadicchätah Sabdaräsir abhüt tadä| khandadvayena sañjatah 
svarädyah khandabhedatah || svaraih sodasabhih Sesais traystrimsadbhir aksaraih| maätrkeyam 
matà loke varnoccärasya mätrkä || (ed. pp. 15-16: cf. transl. pp. 321-322). Cf. also GooDALL 
2001:341-342, n. 78. 

7GoopaLz 2001:329. See also GoopaLL 1998: xliii-xiv. Itis worth noting that several stan- 
zas quoted by Rämakantha and Aghoragiva from the PÀ do not appear in the published portion 
of the text (cf. e.g., SärKWr#i, pp. 3, 34, 40, 46, 47, 50, 53, 54, 59, 145; KA Vr#ri, pp. 33, 82, 
133; Tattvaprakäsavrtti, pp. 25, 55; Tattvasañgrahatikä, p.133; RTP Ullekhini, pp. 153, 193; 
Paramoksaniräsakärikavriti, p.281). At times, the wording of stanzas attributed to the PÀ is 
quite different from the printed editions. See stanza: patir vidyä tathävidyä pasuh päsas ca 
käranam | tannivrttäv iti proktäh padärthäh sat samäsatah || (SärKVrtti, p.7), which, as pointed 
out by N. Ramachandra BHATT, corresponds, with some discrepancies, to PA 1.8cd-9ab: patih 
kundalini mäyà pasuh päsas ca kärakah || iti proktäh padärthäh sat Saivatantre samäsatah | (p.7), 
but which can be found in a fragment of the Ur-Pauskara that has been quoted, with à little 
discussion, by Dominic GoopaLz on pp. lii-liii of his introduction to the Paräkhyatantra. Very 
rarely are we able to trace stanzas in the printed editions; for instance, 6.35 and 6.36, quoted 
in MPÀ Vrtti (pp. 614-615). 

8C£. also GoopaLz 2001:342-343. 

rasmäd baindava evestah $abdah säñkhyätmanäm api| fabdäs caturvidhäs te ‘pi vaikharyädi- 
vibhedatah || vaikhari madhyamäkhyä ca pasyanti sûksmasañjñitä | (p.12). The text continues 
with the description of the four levels (stt. 21cd-26). 

lyädasya bindoh prasrtih Sabdänäm nihsrtis tatah || (p.91). 

Uadau brahma param fuddham ädivarnatvam ägatam || (2cd) [...] tatksobhatah samutpa- 
nnam sästram nädasvaräpatah| pravrttam tadadhabh kiñcid vikubjäkäratah fivam || sa ca bindur 
iti khyätah $araccandrasamaprabhah || (G-7ab) [...] fivecchäksobhito bindus tadadhah $aktir am- 
bikä | (8ab) [...(list ofother 19 powers: stt. 8cd—12)] #ibhyah sarve samutpannäs trimsad varnäh 
savimsatih | (13ab) (pp. 93-94). Cf. also GoopaLz 2001:342-343, n. 78. 

This part of the text is actually taken from the Paräkhyatantra (6.5cd-9ab). Cf. also PÀ 
2.15-16ab, 20ab. 


446 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Commentarial tradition from Srikantha (9th—10th cent?) to 
Näräyanakantha (first half of 10th cent.), his son Rämakantha (c. 950- 
1000) and, later, Aghoragiva (12th cent.),}? attempts to systematise the 
doctrine on the emanation of sound in accordance with the Saivasiddhänta 
explanation of principles, and by fixing four levels of it. The standard series is 
bindulkundalini 2 > näda = > bindu = > Sabdaräsilarna; however, as far as 
we can say at the moment, this does not correspond perfectly to any of the lists 
given in the scriptures.!*? As Dominic GooDALL proposes: “[T]he sequence 
may have evolved because of the redactors having treated as a samhärakrama 
the sequence of the sccära of a mantra (in which n4da and bindu may appear 
as a pair), and therefore inverting it to arrive at a srstikrama” (2001:331, see 
also ibidem p.342). 

As we shall see, some authors —especially $rikantha and later masters of the 
l4éth century— adopt another series, the one starting with s%ksmä and ending 
with vaikharti, referred to above. This series was probably already widespread 
in advaita circles of the time, since all the Saivasiddhänta authors that make 
use of it, whether they adopt it or simply mention it, refer to its ‘wrong in- 
terpretation in an advaita perspective, equating the higher level with Con- 
sciousness. In point of fact this series is the most frequently used in Pratyabhi- 
jfä writings, starting with the Kvarapratyabhijnäkärikä (1.5.13) by Utpaladeva 
(c. 925-975), 6 where we usually find parä instead of s5ksma. The first Saivasid- 
dhänta exegetes, concerned with establishing the independence of the purusa 
and its power ($zkri) from every factor that would involve these in a transfor- 
mation process, primarily endeavour to define the ontological status of word 
as a reality separate from Consciousness. Even though they hold that word is 
a necessary principle for allowing Ananta to have a body and differentiated 
thought (and thus to act in the afwddhädhvan), it is subject to transformation 
(vikära, parinäma) and therefore —in keeping with a well-known tenet of the 
Sämkhya— cannot be a conscious principle.!7 


3For the dates of Rämakantha (Bhatta Rämakantha ID) I refer the reader to Goopazz 1998: 
xiii-xviii and Warson 2006:111-112. On the life and dates of Aghoraëiva, see GENGNAGEL 
1996:14-18; see also Davis 1992a and GoopaLz 2000. 

{For other synonyms of bindu, see NK 16cd—17; cf. also GoopazL 1998:290-296. 

$See also GoopaLL 2001:328. 

SFor the dates of Utpaladeva, see SANDERSON 1985. 

7CF, e.g., KA 2.26ab: parinämo ‘cetanasya cetanasya na yujyate | (p.54; cit. also in Spanda- 
nirnaya, p. 14; for further references see GoopaLL 1998:254, n. 288); PA 2.5: parinämo tcitah 
proktas cidrüpasya na yujyate| cito vivarta evestas tathätve käryafänyatä || (p.10). This concept 


Francesco Sferra 447 


As is to be expected, we find dissimilarities between scriptural sources and 
exegetical works, such as the commentaries by Rämakantha on Xiranägama 
3.23cd'% and Sardhatrisatikälottarägama 1.5-8. It has even been shown that 
some attempts have been made to reconcile divergences between texts and 
scriptures where these are completely irreconcilable. For instance, in his Ma- 
dakärikävyäkhyä (ad. st. 12) Aghoraëiva interprets, in the light of the r4da the- 
ory, a verse from the sixth chapter of the Paräkhyatantra, which, taken in its 
original context, supports a varnaväda position.” 

The differences we find in the Âgamas and in early Saivasiddhänta literature 
regarding the status of word/sound andits differentiation in levels, undoubtedly 
reflect those extant in other Indian traditions and, to some extent, reveal a desire 
and an effort to test and develop the fzivasiddhänta in the arena of the dialecti- 
cal debate with other traditions. With regard to speculation on v4c, Srikantha 
addresses his critique implicitly to Bhartrhari (c. 450-510) and/or his followers 
and explicitly to advaita thinkers,* while Rämakantha and Aghoraëiva, espe- 
cially in the Nädakärikä and its commentary, also confront their ideas with 
those of the mimamsakas and the naiyäyikas.? 

Among the masters of the mature Kashmirian Saivasiddhänta, Srikantha 


is frequently stated in $aivasiddhänta texts; cf. RTP 49, 51cd-52ab, 199; NK 19. See also 
DuxuwiLa 1985:10, and for further references SFERRA 1991:322, n. 49. 

18Cf. GoopaLL 1998:84-86, 289-296. 

I?Cf. Gooparz 2001:327-328. 

20Cf. RTP 202cd ff. 

2The r4da theory, as elaborated by Rämakantha, can be seen as the result of an attempt 
to assimilate the sphofz theory according to $Saivasiddhänta tenets. As has already been noted, 
there are no radical differences between 74da and sphota theories (cf. SFERRA 1991:325, 328, 
332-333; GoopaLL 2001:344, n. 84). Indeed Kanti Chandra PANDEY, in discussing the näda 
theory, describes the “näda as a substitute for sphora” (1954:xci) (cf. also ToRELLA 2004:184— 
186). It is as if the sphota had been divested of its advaita ontological presuppositions, placed in 
a completely different context and reformulated with a more traditional (i.e. ägamic) terminol- 
ogy. Surprisingly, the word sphota never appears in the Nädakärikä despite the unmistakable 
reference to stanza 6 of the Sphotasiddhi by Mandanamiéra (c. 660-720) (st. 7), and the first 
part of the text is in fact a summary of his main arguments against the rival varnavädins. As 
D. GoopaLL has pointed out (2001:329), the 7444 theory has no foundation in the scriptures, 
notwithstanding the opinion of Krishna SrvaRaMAN (1977:64, n. 33) and Pierre-Sylvain FiL- 
LIOZAT (1984:224). Referents in this short text and its commentary are mainly non-ägamic: 
two examples of this are the implicit references to the anvitäbhidhänaväda (st. 3ab) and to the 
definition of word according to Patañjalis Paspasä (st. 5), and the compound wpalabdhilaksa- 
napräpta used by Aghoragiva (p.240), revealing the influence of technical terms typical of the 
Buddhist pramäna tradition. 


448 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


is the first to treat the sonic emanation, dwelling on it in three parts of his 
Ratnatrayapariksä: 1) st. 22; 2) stt. 70cd-86ab; 3) stt. 171cd-173ab, which 
have been translated and edited anew, together with their Ul/ekhini by Agho- 
ra$iva, in the second part of this paper. À brief introduction ($$2-4) provides 
material for further study. 

Some months ago, Dominic GoopaLz kindly provided me with a photo- 
graphic copy (originally made by Kei KaTAOKA) of an important codex kept in 
the Oriental Library of Mysore and listed there as MS P 269. In this codex, 
which contains several works and glosses included in the famous Assaprakarana 
collection, I have found an unpublished and interesting commentary on the 
Ratnatrayapariksä. The manuscript is fairly correct but mutilated (it ends while 
quoting päda a of st. 322); thus the name of the author of the work is at present 
unknown. We can note that its beginning (commentary on stt. 1-2) coincides 
with the Uflekhinï, and that in the passages describing the levels of word we 
can find several parallels with the Siddhäntasärävalivyäkhyä by Anantasambhu 
(14th cent.?). These passages have been published here in the appendix.?? 

2. In Ratnatrayapariksä 22 and 172cd-173ab, Srikantha adheres to a 
scriptural terminology: bindu, which he calls paranäda in päda 22c and 
anähatabindu in päda 173a, is, in both passages, defined by him as the cause 
(kärana) of the three subsequent levels: Z) sound (räda), 2) drop (bindu) and 
3) ‘totality of sounds” ($zbdaräsi, st. 172b) or phoneme (4rna, st. 22d), which, 
in the commentary on stanza 22, Aghoragiva places in relation respectively to 
para, süksma and sthüla \bija] of Särdhatrisatikälottarägama 1.8 that he quotes 
as scriptural support. À similar sequence to the one given here by Srikantha can 
be found in the commentary by Näräyanakantha and in the sub-commentary 
by Aghoragiva ad Mrgendratantra, Vidyäpäda 13.161cd-162ab,* and in par- 


21 am working on the complete editio princeps and English translation of this commen- 
tary and, making use of some MSS kept in the Institut Français de Pondichéry (RE-30369, 
RE-40042, RE-47615, RE-47667) and in the Asiatic Society of Bengal (G 566), on a new 
edition and English translation of the Ratnatrayapariksollekhini and the Nädakärikävyäkhya. 1 
am grateful to Dominic GooDaLL for informing me about these materials and for helping me 
get access to them. 

#näde dhvanipatih $aktau sarvasaktimatäm varah || yonir vifvasya vagisäh patayah paratah 
ivab| (MrgT Vidyä° 161cd-162ab; ed. p. 334); nädabhuvane dhvanipatir nädesvarah sthitah | 
L...] fktäv iti Säktasam$raye sakalasaktimatäm varisthah paramesvarah sthitah | atraiva ca yonir 
visvasyetyädi| nädabindvädikramena sakalajagadutpattihetuh kundalinyäkhyä $aktih sthita | 
yathoktam $Srimatsvatantre — tatra kundalinï $aktir mäyäkarmänusarini| nädabindvädikam 
käryam tasyà iti jagatsthitih|| iti| [as GoopaLiz has already pointed out (1998:291), the 


Francesco Sferra 449 


ticular in the commentary by Näräyanakantha 44 Mrgendratantra, Kriyäpäda 
1.2 (see above n. 2), where the syllable o7» is conceived as an intermediate level 
between the lower bindu and the phonemes.? 

The most original part consists in stanzas 70cd-86ab, in which the depen- 
dence on some passages of the Brahmakända of the Väkyapadiya by Bhartrhari 
and its relative Vr#i is evident. Not only does $rikantha incorporate in his text 
the celebrated stanza 1.115 [123] (= stt. 84cd-85ab), with only two variant 
readings,? but, as noted by Kanti Chandra PaNDEY (1954: xx), even inserts, as 
stanzas 73cd—74, 75cd, 77-78ab, some verses of unknown source that appear 
in the Vr#i on stanza 1.134 [142] of the Väkyapadiya. More specifically, these 
are the four stanzas indicated with the letters c4, cha, ja and %a in the edition 
by K.A. Subramania [ver (pp. 219-220; in Rau‘s edition these are part of the 
miüla text). 

The passage is of considerable interest for various reasons that should be 
analysed. 

The first thing to note is that after listing some synonyms of béndu, includ- 
ing such significant terms as fabdatattva, väksakti and aghosä väc, Srikantha 
affrms that four states of bindu exist (catasro vrttayas tasya |...] | vaikhari ma- 


dhyamäbhikhyä pa$yanti süksmasañjñitä || st. 72). This was in some way to be 


second half of this stanza is similar to SvT 10.1264ab (cf. ed. vol. 5, p.548)] [...] 
(Näräyanakanthas Wréti, p. 4212 12); nädas câtra mahämäyäsakter bhuvanätmakah prathamah 
prasarah | upasamhrtakäryäyas tu mahämäyäyà niskalah ivah sarvadädhisthänatvena sthita ity 
äha— Saktäv itityädi | asyä eva ca fabdotpattihetur avasthävisesah Sästräntare kundalinyäkhyayokto 
<>tra Sivatattva eväntarbhüta ity äha— atraiva cetyädi| (atra ca vifvasabdena nänyatarätmaka 
iti) vägisäh pataya ity api nädabindvädikramena Sabdotpädakasya Sivasyaivopacärena käryabhedäd 
ucyate| ete ca nädabindvädibhuvanesvarasamänadharmatväc chästräntaresu bhuvanesvarasabde- 
nocyanta ity äha— asminn evetyädi| tatas cäcetanatvena mahämäyäyäh fivädhisthänam vinä $ab- 
dâädikäryotpädakatväbhäväc chabdabrahmavädinah pratiksiptäh| $abdänäm ca käryatvam sid- 
dham iti vaksyämah kriyäpädärambhe “$akter nädo bhaved bindur aksaram mätrkà tatah” iti | 
[...] (Aghoragiva’s Dipikä, pp. 42219-42332). Cf. Huzin 1980:328-331. 

Makrimatah prasäntasya bhagavatah paraväksvarüpa yà kundalini saktib, tasyäh sakäsän näda 
ity anähataparadhvanilaksanah prasarah prathamam yad abhüt tasmäd api kramenesatsthülatäm 
upagacchann antahsañjalpätmakah sampinditavägräpatväd bindur iva binduh\ tata cäksaram 
ksayädidosarahitam omkäräkhyam| athaitasmäd omkärät \ädyä] prathamä mürtir [mahesasya] 
bhagavatah sambandhini nikhilaväñmayajananitvän mäteva mätrkà |sarvaväcyänuyäyini] saka- 
läbhidheyänugäyatri (em. BRuNNER [1985:6, n. 9] of the reading sakaläbhidheyänugägäyatri 
of MS T 539; as BRUNNER points out [ibidem], the reading sakaläbhidheyän anugäyanti of 
MS T 266 is possible as well ] sakaläbhidheyä tadanu gäyatri ed.) samudabhavat, yatsakäsän 
mantratanträdikam ädisarge prasarati | (ed. p. 2; transl. pp. 5-6). 

PLe. nänäm for loke in päda 84c and iha for iva in päda 85a. 


450 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


expected, as he had already touched on this subject earlier in stanza 46ab, 
where he limits himself to stating that word ($bda) is quadripartite on the 
basis of vaikhari väc and so on. The terms s#%ksmä, pasyanti, madhyamä and 
vaikharï are used here as labels for the levels of word and later explained, 
but nowhere are these terms explicitly identified with those in stanzas 22 and 
172cd-173ab, which have a more ‘scriptural intonation. The equation of the 
two terminologies is merely hinted at by Rämakantha (though the passages in 
question merit further comment) and Umäpatisiväcärya (of unknown date), 
and rendered explicit only by Anantaéambhu?? and, in a different way, by Veda- 
jñäna (16th cent.) * and the still anonymous author of the commentary on the 


26ÜUmäpatisiväcarya follows Srikanthas subdivision and terminology. In the $RS he de- 
scribes the mahämäyä from stanza 24 on, which according to the editor is taken, along 
with stanza 25, from the Visfvasärottara. Vägi$vari, i.e. mahämäyä (on Vägi$vari, see BRUN- 
NER 1977:256-260), is the basic material cause of the principles in the fxddhädhvan (vägisvari 
ca Suddhädhvamüälopädänakäranam]| nopädänam vinà käryam kadäcid upalabhyate|| st. 23). 
Its effects are näda, bindu, etc. (yätha kundalini Saktir mäyäkarmänusärini| nädabindvädikam 
käryam tasyà iti jagatsthitih|| st. 25; cf. above n. 24). Stanza 26 claims that mahämäya 
has four states, i.e. the levels of väc from vaikhart to süksmä (tasyä$ catasro vägrüpä vrttayo 
vaikharyädayah | vaikhari madhyamä cänyä pasyanti sûksmasañjñitä ||). Unfortunately I do not 
at present have access either to Umäpatiiväcärya’s or to Jñänaprakäéa’s commentary on the PÀ, 
and therefore have not able to read their explanation of the second chapter in particular, and 
of all relevant passages (see above, notes 7-12). 

27[n his SSAV Anantasambhu includes a long excursus on the level of sound and cites, among 
others, many passages from the RTP. He aknowledges the existence of a quadripartition of the 
levels of word: 4. fakti = > 3. näda = > 2. bindu = > 1. lipi. His argumentation is insipred 
by the words säksmasthülaninädabindulipigaih of verse 12a of the Siddhäntasärävali by Trilo- 
canasiväcärya (13th-14th cent.?). He specifies that the levels from 3 to 1 all have a dual aspect: 
they are both subtle (s%ksma) and gross (sthäla), depending on whether they are part of the 
pure or impure path. The term #inäda is explained with dhvani (resonance); bindu is the place 
in which vowels and consonants (svaravarna) are born and die; lipi corresponds to aksara; fakti 
is the mahämäyä, the kundalinïisakti (p. 4). The sequence of levels is expressed in at least two 
forms, with the series $akti = > näda = > bindu = > mätrkä (näda, bindu and mätrkä are 
conceived as results of a perturbation [ksobhal] of the #akti), or, in keeping with stanza 172cd- 
173ab of the Ratnatrayapariksä, with anähatabindu = > näda = > bindu = > Sabdaräsi. Then 
he juxtaposes stanzas 22cd and 72 of the Ratnatrayapariksä, thus suggesting that the two series 
correspond [4. bindu (= paranäda) = > 3. näda = > 2. bindu = > 1. varna (22cd) = 4. süksmä 
= > 3. pasyanti = > 2. madhyamä = > 1. vaikharï (72)], and states that there are two forms of 
käryabindu: sthüla (atisthaulya = vaikhart; madhyasthaulya = madhyamä) and sûksma (pasyanti 
and säksmä) (pp. 5-6). The text continues with the description of each of the four levels (p. 6) 
and of the kaläs, nivrtti, etc. (p.7 and f. [see below Appendix, notes 5-1]). 

28]n his anthology we read: #4dah süksmä bhaved binduh pasyanti madhyamäksaram | \...] 
mätrkà vaikhari jñeyä |] || (chapter 4, stt. 9ab, 10a; ed. and transl. pp. 172-173). 


Francesco Sferra 451 


Ratnatrayapariksä party published below.?? 

The second thing to note concerns the principal changes made by $Srikantha 
to the stanzas he quotes ex silentio. His modifications to stanzas ca and cha are 
irrelevant to what we are examining here, therefore we shall concentrate on 
stanzas ja and #4. First of all, we notice that he splits in two stanza j4 and 
inserts two other pädas: 

avibhägä tu pasyanti sarvatah samhrtakramä | 

svarüpajyotir eväntah süksmä väg anapäyini || ja || 

(Additions in bold type:) 

avibhägena varnänäm sarvatah samhrtakrami | 

svayamprakäsä pasyanti mäyürändarasopamä || 76 || 

svarüpajyotir eväntah süksmä väg anapäyini | 
Hence, while in stanza ja the term s#ksmä should most likely be understood as 
an attribute of pasyanti, in Srikanthas text it is the name of a fourth level of the 
word, ‘the subtle one’, which is different from pasyanti that here acquires two 
new attributes. 

Srikantha does not explain in detail his need to postulate a fourth level of 
the word. Apropos of this, there is nothing in his work that can be compared 
with the complex elaboration undertaken by Utpaladeva and Abhinavagupta (c. 
975-1025) in their writings.*° Nevertheless, if we consider stanzas 82cd-84ab, 
which contain a succinct definition of the four levels of word, we already have 
an idea of where his need stems from. In these stanzas he states that pasyanti 
is understood as the cause of madhyamä, while säksmä corresponds to the state 
in which the association with conceptualisation is completely dissolved. Thus 
it is evident, though not expressely stated by Srikantha, that payant; —like the 
yolk of the peacock’s egg (mayürända) containing in a self-luminous (svayam- 
prakä$a) whole the essence of myriad future developments— nevertheless em- 
bodies an extremely subtle form of discursiveness. If this were not the case, 
how could madhyamä, whose discursiveness is evident, exist? If madhyamä cor- 
responds to the savikalpa state and pasyanti to the nirvikalpa state, which, as 
set down in stanzas 59cd-70ab, is the presupposition for the former, siksmä 
is the necessary cause also of the nirvikalpa state, and the level that connects 


#%]n this work we find the most original treatment of the topic: the upper bindu is called 
paranäda; from this evolves näda, which is equated with säksmd; from näda evolve both the 
lower bindu and vaikhari. The lower bindu includes the two states of pasyanti and madhyamä. 

30See Papoux 1990:166-222; ToreLLA 2001. 


452 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


all the previous ones.?! To quote Krishna SrvarAMaN: “The parä or the s%ksma 
väc is the ultimate source of the denoting capacity of speech. This is 24da. It is 
the prius of all discursiveness. If pasyanti is the cause of determinate knowledge 
(nirvikalpaka-jñäna), parä is the source of knowledge as such (bodha), without 
regard to determinancy or its absence. The difference between the two corre- 
sponds to the difference between the possible and the actual” (1973:226). In 
other words, pasyantï is not the unity of all meanings, which is s%ksmä, but the 
undifferentiated, luminous unity of particular words and their relative mean- 
ings.”? 

Srikantha does not incorporate stanza jha (seyam äkiryamänäpi nityam 
ägantukair malaih| antyä kaleva somasya nätyantam abhibhüyate||) and con- 
tinues by inserting in his text stanza #4, making only two small changes: 

tasyäm drstasvarüpäyäm adhikäro nivartate | 

puruse soda$akale täm ähur amrtäm kaläm || # || 

(Modifications in bold type:) 

yasyäm drstasvarüpäyäm adhikäro nivartate || 77 || 

puruse soda$akale täm ähur amrtähvayäm | 
Thus, Srikanthas position is clear: he maintains that the word has four levels 
and that the highest of these, s%ksm4, must be known to attain liberation from 
the adhikära.®® As we shall see in more detail later, Aghoraëiva is ambiguous in 
his commentary, but Ananta$ambhu faithfully interprets Srikantha's thought. 
In his Siddhäntasärävalivyäkhyàä he writes: y& vänt cirasthäyini sà saksmäkhyä | 
yad uktam — svarüpajyotir eväntah süksmä väg anapäyini| iti| iyam eva 
Suddhädhvaväsinäm paramo bandhah\ ya imäm vivekena pratyaksikurvanti te 
prayojyalaksanam srstyädikartrtvam vihäya sivatulyà bhavanti | tad uktam ratna- 
traye — yasyäm drstasvarüpäyäm adhikäro nivartate | iti| (p.614 18).%* 

Srikantha goes on to say that masters who, by misinterpreting some passages 
of the sruti, do not see (na pasyanti) the Self (man) as distinct from word 
are mistaken, even if they recognize three or four levels of word ($Srikantha 
does not treat the problem explicitly). In fact such masters, whom Aghoraëiva 


$1[n stanza 40 45 Umäpatisiväcarya once again talks about the levels of word and specifies 
that the last (antimä), the fourth, is the cause of the first three: vaikhari frotravisayàä savikalpä 
tu madhyamä| nirvikalpä trtiyä ca täsäm käranam antimä || (p.117); cf. also Saivägamapari- 
bhäsämañjart, 4.6 (ed. and transl. pp. 170-171). 

32C£ PanDey 1954: xcvii-xcviii; SFERRA 1991:330. 

33On the term adhikära, see TANTRIKABHIDHANAKOSA I, s.v., and Boccio 2005:108, n. 35. 

34 Ananta$ambhu concludes that s%ksma vac is the 16th ka/ä of the purusa, in the sense that 
it is one of its faculties together with karmendriya, etc., and not its immortal part (p. 6). 


Francesco Sferra 453 


defines as ftbdabrahmavädins, conceive the highest level as the immortal part 
of the purusa, while it belongs to the sphere of the mahämäyä and therefore to 
insentient matter, however subtle it may be.” 

It is quite possible that by using a language with which grammarians were al- 
ready conversant and which was perhaps beginning to find favour in the Tantric 
circles of the period (though there is no concrete evidence of this) Srikantha 
intended to combine the cosmology of the bindu and its products with epis- 
temological theories then in vogue, while specifying how these theories had to 
be interpreted. By conceiving the products of bindu according to the doctrine 
of the levels of väc, he put the latter in a dvaita rather than advaita ontological 
perspective. 

We would expect his text to be quoted by his immediate successors, but this 
is not the case. Although Rämakantha is familiar with the work by Srikantha 
(in his Matañgavrtti [p.610] he quotes stanzas 175cd-176ab), he never cites 
it in his writings when treating sonic emanation. His silence cannot be casual, 
and it may indicate a slight and deliberately concealed divergence between the 
two masters. 

We should ask ourselves whether the innovative quality of $rikantha's 
thought may have been partly responsible for this. If we compare it with scrip- 
tural sources, we are bound to note that: 1) in using the terms s%ksmä, pasyanti, 
etc. he does not paraphrase any ancient scripture; 2) rather than a quadripar- 
tition, the scriptures propose a tripartition of #74da or other inconsistent hy- 
potheses — one of the scriptures postulating tripartite sound is the celebrated 
Särdhatrisatikälottara, which, as we have seen, is quoted by Aghoragiva precisely 
in the Ratnatrayapariksollekhinï, and moreover insists on the need to know the 
highest level of sound, param bijam, ï.e. the third.36 

Then, if we consider Srikanthas interpretation of stanzas ja and #4, we can- 
not say for sure that he departed from the tradition of the Väkyapadiya and its 
commentary,”” but he undoubtedly distances himself at least from the stan- 
dard interpretation of these stanzas by grammarians and other fziva masters of 


35Similar statements can be found in the anonymous commentary on the $RS, where it 
refers to the error committed by the sxbdabrahmavädins (pp. 48-49). 

36C£. 1.7cd, 12.2 #, 19.12, 20.3cd-Gab. 

37There exists a specialist debate as to whether or not Bhartrhari was the author of the Vkya- 
padiyavrtti and whether or not he posited a fourth level of word. Both arguments are complex; 
on the latter I refer the reader to TORELLA 2001:859-860, 866-867, who supplies references 
to primary and secondary sources. 


454 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


his time. For example, the vaiyäkarana Harivrsabha (7th cent.), when glossing 
stanza ja in his Paddhati on the Brahmakända, conceives säksmä as an attribute 
of the pasyanti väc (and not as a level superior to it), understood as the sixteenth 
digit of the moon, the immortal part of the purusa, which must be known to 
attain liberation from the adhikära: tasyäm iti| pasyantyäm| drstasvarüpäyäm 
iti| yat tasyà rüpam aviparitam abhigatam yadä $abdapürvena yogena drstam | 
[...] sodasiti kalä na kadäcid ävartate (kadäcid ävartate conj. IYER ] kadivävar- 
tate MS) saisà pasyanti väk (pp. 21926-220:2). The faiva master Somänanda 
(c. 900-950), who in the second chapter of the Sivadrsti cites (2.11ab) and 
gives a critique (2.44cd-51) of verse ja ab, attributes to grammarians the idea 
that there are only three levels of word, the highest (parä) being pasyanti (2.1). 
Rämakantha, who, in his turn, quotes stanza ja in at least three of his com- 
mentaries (44 Särdhatrisatikälottara, Matañgaparamesvara and Kirana), appears 
to share Somänanda’s view on grammarians in this regard. Later, Räjanaka 
Rämakantha (2nd half of 10th cent.) in his Spandakärikävivrti and Ksemaräja 
(11th cent.) in his Sravacintämanivrtti, both quote the three stanzas ca, cha, ja 
in reverse order (74, cha, ca), and clearly interpret them as a description of the 
three levels of word: pasyantï, madhyamä and vaikhari ® Laksmiräma gives a 
similar interpretation in his Parätrifikavivrti.®” 

Thus, we can hypothesise that concerning sound emanation, $rikantha di- 
verged too openly from both scriptures and the comunis opinio regarding gram- 
marian tenets, and that those who came immediately after him, Rämakantha 
in primis, found it easier to follow their own path rather than his. 

One last thing worthy of note is that, notwithstanding $rikantha’s favour- 
ing the quadripartition of word, significantly there is no reference in his work to 
the existence of other traditions, particularly the one maintaining that word has 
three levels; he in no way questions the three-word level concept, and makes 
no attempt whatsoever to justify the coexistence of the two traditions posit- 
ing a tripartite and a quadripartite level of word. This problem was raised by 
Rämakantha.“° 

3. While examining Rämakanthaæs viewpoint, we must keep in mind the 
following: 1) he only adopts the terminology vaikhari, etc. when citing stan- 
zas ja and #4; 2) he conceives these stanzas as belonging to another un- 


S8Cf. Spandakärikävivrti, ed. pp. 149-151; in the Sravacintämanivrtti (ed. p.5) we read: 
pasyantyädinäm svarüpam tatrabhavatä bhartrharinà uktam | yathà — [stt. ja = > cal. 

FC. ed. pp. 3-7. 

#0C£ also below, Appendix, avatärikä ad st. 80cd. 


Francesco Sferra 455 


specified tradition advocating a tripartition of word. In the Xÿranavriti ad 
3.23cd, for instance, stanza ja is introduced to confirm that the param bi- 
jam of sound, defined in verses 1.6cd-7ab of the Särdhatrisatikälottarägama 
as a reality constantly expressed by all creatures, is called pasyanti by followers 
of other scriptures.f! It is worth noting that in the Särdhatrisatikälottaravrtri 
and in the Matañgavrtti Rämakantha, in his turn, omits stanza jha and 
quotes the two stanzas ja and #4 together. It is unclear if he is directly 
quoting from the Väkyapadiyavrtti or from another source, or if he is fol- 
lowing in the footsteps of his illustrious predecessor Srikantha. However, 
we can be sure that his citations of those two stanzas do not coincide with 
Srikantha’s readings in the Matañgavrtti, and only with the second variant in 
the Särdhatrisatikälottaravrtti It is probable, therefore, that like Harivrsabha 
and the other $ziva masters mentioned above he sees s%ksmä as an attribute 
of pasyanti väc. In fact, in his works we find s#ksmabindu or süksmanäda (cf. 
Nädakärikä 14), but never säksmä väc. 

Although Rämakantha does not adhere to Srikantha’s schema —perhaps 
to remain faithful to ägamic terminology— he does however acknowledge the 
existence of a fourth level of word. 

In the Särdhatrisatikälottaravrtti Rämakantha refers to the fourth level of 
word as the cause of the ‘supreme seed” (param bijam). He defines it as the 
‘locus of the word” (wäcah sthänam), consisting in the supreme ether and 
pure wisdom.* Kiranägama 3.23cd is somewhat cryptic (nadabindukhama- 
ntränusaktibijakaläntagah), and consequently Rämakantha’s commentary is not 


Wproktam ca  $rimatkalottare —  ägopälañganà bälä mlecchäh  präkrtabhäsinah | 
antarjalagatäh sattväs te pi nityam bruvanti tam|| (SärK 1.6cd-7ab) saiva pasyantyavas- 
thety âgamäntaränusärinab | yad ähuh — [st. ja] (pp. 84-85; cf. transl. p. 293). 

Le. amrtähvayäm for amrtäm kaläm. I is worth noting that a slightly modified version 
of stanzas ja, cha ab and %a ab according to Srikanthas reading occurs in a quotation at- 
tributed to 4gama in the opening of Vidyäcakravartin’s commentary on the Almkärasarvasva 
by Ruyyaka: sarvaiva khalv iyam väk parä pasyanti madhyamä vaikhariti caturbhih padaih pari- 
miyate| yac chrutih — catväri väkparimitä padänityädikä| tatra parä näma nirupadhikam rü- 
pam|\ pasyantyädini trini punar aupädhikäni sthülatväd vigrahasthäntyäni| yathä câgamah — 
svaräpaÿyotir eväntah parà väg anapäyini| yasyäm drstasvarñpäyäm adhikäro nivartate || [77 
= ja cd-ña ab] avibhägena varnänäm sarvatah sambrtakramä| (ja ab] pränä$rayä tu pasyanti 
mayürändarasopamä || (cf. 76] madhyamä buddhyupädänà krtavarnaparigrahä| cf. 74cd = cha 
ab] antahsañjalpa rüpä sà na frotram upasarpati || [cf. 75ab] tälvosthavyäprtivyañgyà parabodha- 
prakäsini| manusyamätrasulabhà bähyä väg vaikhari matä || iti ||. 1 thank Harunaga IsaacsoN 
for having kindly pointed out to me this reference. 

[...] sasyäpi yat käranam tat paramäkäsasuddhavidyätmakam väcah sthänam (pp. 15-16). 


456 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


wholly perspicuous. We cannot help noting however that some of the words 
he uses to gloss the term kha (väk$sakti, kundalini, mahämäyä, paramäkä$a, 
süksmabindu)** recur in other works by him: the first three are found in the 
Nädakärikä, respectively in stanzas 25a, 17b, 16c; paramäkä$a appears in the 
passage of the Sardhatrisatikälottaravrtti referred to above (cf. note 44). To de- 
scribe this fourth level, Rämakantha quotes à set of stanzas, including the well- 
known verse from the Asvamedhikaparvan starting with ghosini jätinirghosà, 
etc.# 

Rämakantha is the only one who provides, both in the 
Särdhatrisatikälottaravrtti (ad 1.8) and in the Xïranavrtti (ad 3.23cd), 
an explanation of why the two traditions regarding the three and four levels 
of word exist. In the Xÿranavrtti he states that no distinction is made in 
the Särdhatrisatikälottarägama between bindu and näda since they are both 
subtle;“ in the Sérdhatrisatikälottaravrtti he states that only one supreme level 
of word is mentioned, rather than a third and fourth, because the last two are 
both devoid of conceptualisation (cintä) and indiscernible to those who are 
not omniscient.®” This was most probably an attempt to reconcile divergent 
traditions. Some parts of his Nädakärikä have this same function. Here, he 
does not treat word levels explicitly, and we can only seek to find some implicit 
references in the text.“ Rämakantha speaks about the mahämäya (stt. 16-17) 
and the subtle (s%ksma), immanifest (avyakta) level of the räda and its gross 
(sthüla) aspect. The gross aspect is represented by the sounds that manifest 
the rä4da and which, having this function, are known as väcaka (‘conveyors 


#4 satra nädah kundalinyabhidhänäyäh parasyä väk$akter avyaktasabdätmakah prathamah kso- 
bhab| bindus ca tasyaivesatsthülatäntahsañjalpätmakatvam | kham câtra paramäkä$am maha- 
mäyaiva sarvapurusasamyuktà $aktih |...) (p. 849-113 cf. trans. pp. 290-293). 

Le. Mahäbhärata 14.21.16; cit. also in VP Vrtri ad 1.134 [142] = st. #4, and in many other 
sources (for some comments, see TORELLA 2001:860, n. 12). 

érimatkälottare tu bindunädayor dvayor api süksmatayä visesäbhävat trini rüpäny asyäh 
(p. 8522-23; cf. trans. p. 294, see also n. 398). 

#7...) #bhayam api väcah padam cintayà rabitatvät pararñpam tadvaikam ity uktam | tadbhe- 
dasyäsarvajñair anavagähyatväd iti trividham eva tadrüpam darfitam (p. 1613-15). 

#8In the NK (and also elsewhere) Rämakantha uses three meanings of the term 444: 1) in 
some contexts he speaks of 74da as the level of the param bijam (cf. SärK 1), which, devoid 
of conceptual constructs, is the cause of knowledge as such (cf. stt. 1, 22-26); 2) in others (cf. 
st. 11) he speaks of r4da as consisting in internal language, as a level at which differentiation 
already exists; it is the inner sound that in $rikantha's terminology is defined precisely as m4- 
dhyamä; 3) in yet others, he refers to n4da in the usual sense, as a generic synonym for sound 


(cf. stt. 14-15). 


Francesco Sferra 457 


of meaning’, st. 14) that, strictly speaking, refers only to the subtle r4da 
(st. 12). What is significant here is that the attribution of the name väcaka 
to gross sound (i.e. phonemes) appears also in the Paräkhyatantra (6.16d) 
and the corresponding passage in the Pauskarägama (8.40b, cf. also 2.22d).“ 
Therefore, it is quite possible that Rämakantha, and also Aghoragiva, by 
deliberately using this word and giving the above explanation, attempted to 
unify under the r4da theory a fragmented tradition, some of whose branches 
adhered to doctrines close to those of the Mimämsa. 

4. As we have already seen, Aghoragiva attempts to make the celebrated 
Särdhatrisatikälottarägama 1.8 fit into a four level schema and cites it 4d 
Ratnatrayapariksä 22, though it does not contain an explicit reference to that 
passage. At times, Aghoraëiva’s ideas seem inconsistent. On the one hand, he 
glosses Srikantha; on the other, he takes Rämakanthas terminology as a point 
of reference. In this regard, his asystematic use of the attributes of the various 
levels is revealing. 

The three authors do not substantially differ in their descriptions of the 
level of audible sounds. While glossing Ratnatrayapariksä 22 Aghora$iva uses 
three compounds that Rämakantha had already employed, 4kä$aväyuprabhava 
and $rotragrähya (cf. Särdhatrisatikälottaravriti 1.8 and Moksakärikävyäkhyà 
ad st. 112) and sthülasabda (cf. Kiranavrtti ad 3.23cd, Nädakärikä 8d; cf. 
Nädakärikä 24c, 26a). These terms were already known in linguistic and 
philosophical speculation and Rämakantha himself must have taken them 
from earlier sources. However, sthälasabda also has à scriptural ring, since it 
evokes Särdhatrisatikälottarägama 1.8a (sthülam (i.e. sthülam bijam] fabda iti 
proktam), and Aghoragiva actually employs it in his Nädakärikävyäkhyä 8, 11 
and Ratnatrayapariksollekhini (avatärikä ad 76). Srikantha uses arna (st. 22d), 
vaikhari väc (stt. 46d, 72c, 820), frotragrähya (73ab) and fabdaräsi (st. 172).5° 

It is in the definition of the other levels that the greatest discrepancies are 
to be found. As we have seen, Srikantha uses the two attributes svayamprakäsä 
and mäyärandarasopama to qualify pasyanti.\ The latter, in particular, is used 
by Rämakantha (ad Särdhatrisatikälottarägama 1.8, p.15), and subsequently 


#%$ee also below RTP 73b. 

50Sarvätmasambhu in his Siddhäntaprakasikä connects the level of audible sounds with the 
vidyätattva: vidyätattve akärädiksakäräntä (em. | akärädiksakärädiksakäräntä MS) ekapañcä- 
fadaksaräni kämikädyastävimsatisamhitäs ca vaikhariräpäni vartante| iKvaratattve pranavas ca 
sadäsivatattve sakalo binduh sakalo nädas ca | (fol. 133). 

51C£. also Sivagrayogin's position, summarised by DEVASENAPATHi (1966:1 39-140). 


458 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


by Aghoragiva in his Ratnapariksollekhinï (st. 22), to gloss the säksmam bijam 
level, corresponding to the (lower) bindu, which should represent the m4dhya- 
mä level. Significantly, Aghoragiva does not go out of his way to explain these 
words in the Ratnatrayapariksollekhini.®? In the avatärikä to stanza 77, he states 
—in a vague if not actually misleading manner— that the synonym of s%ksma 
is näda, defined earlier in the text (i.e. in the commentary on stanza 22) as 
the “seed of the understanding of meaning (abhidheyabuddhibija).* In fact, 
in the gloss on stanza 22 the compound zbhidheyabuddhihetu is used as an at- 
tribute of näda. However we have seen that the latter corresponds to the third 
level of word and not the fourth. The compound sbhidheyabuddhibija was actu- 
ally used first by Rämakantha in his commentary on Särdhatrisatikälottarägama 
1.5a (p.9). In any event, Aghoragiva also adopts the aforesaid compound in 
other parts of his Ullekhint (i.e. ad 53-54ab, 83cd-84ab) but always as a gloss 
of the fourth level of word, säksmä väc. In Aghorasiva’s treatment there is an- 
other incongruity — the last I am dealing with here: 44 stanza 22 he uses 
the compounds aksarabindu and parämarsajñänarñpa to gloss the lower bindu 
—the latter compound was employed in the same way by Rämakantha in his 
Särdhatrisatikälottaravrtti ad 1.8, p. 15—, but ad stanzas 74cd-76 he utilises 
them respectively to indicate pafyanti and madhyamä. 


TEXT 


Note to the edition—  Orthography, sandhi and punctuation have been silently 
normalised (e.g. *%khyo näda° instead of %khyah näda”° in st. 22cd; cidätyanta® 
for cidä atyanta® ad st. 84b). For the sigla, see Sigla & Manuscripts Consulted 
(below). The symbols and abbreviations in the apparatus are as follows: 

ac ante correctionem 

conj. conjecture 

deest omitted/absent in 


em. emendation 


*?Aghoragiva also adopts the comparison with the liquid of a peacock’s egg in his cri- 
tique of the sphota (NK, p.240). However, it should be noted that in other texts, such as 
Värülanäthasätravrtti by Anantaaktipäda (ad st. 7, ed. p.9) and the Mahärthamañjariparimala 
by Maheévaränanda it is compared with the parälsüksmä väc (süksmä tu fikhandyandarasanyä- 
Jäd uktaväktrayasabalibhävasvabhäva, p.129). 

53A similar compound is used by Mandanamiéra in his Sphotasiddhi: e.g., abhidheyadhihetu, 
p.749; abhidheyädhigamanimitta, p.759. C£. also Tattvabindu by Vacaspatimira: e.g., abhi- 
dheyapratyayahetutä, p.708; abhidheyadhihetu, p. 716.13; abhidheyapratyayopajanana, p.729. 


Francesco Sferra 459 


pe post correctionem 

r recto 

v verso 

(ep) equally possible 

] separates the accepted reading from the variants 

© separates the commentary on different lemmas within the same compound 
(...) enclose numbers and bibliographical references (not present in the MSS) 
[..] enclose the pagination (i.e., numbers of folios and of lines). 


italic stanzas of the Ratnatrayapariksä and pratikas 


[A, 218, À, 5, Ep 11, Ev 22, MY 110r8, M? 74v7] tatra bindusiddhi[A, 3]m 
äha— 

jäyate\ ‘dhvä yatah? fuddho vartate yatra livate | 

sa binduh paranädäkhyo nädabindvarnakäranam® || (22)° 
vaksyamänavad vicitrabhuvanädirüpatvena $uddhädhvanah kärya[A, 32]tvât 
tadupädänam binduh siddhyati| kiñca $abdopädänatayäpi tasya siddhir 
ity äha— nädabindvarnakäranam it | tatra nädo naämäbhidheyabu- 
ddhihetur bindoh [A, 33] prathamaprasararüpah süksmo nädaé cintayà 
rahitatvena érimatkälottarädyuktah| bindu$ ca tatkäryam” mayürändara- 
sabinduvad avyapade[A, 3,]$yah parämar$ajñnänarüpo ’ksarabindus tatraiva 
säksmatvenoktah| arna$ ca varna äkäsaväyuprabhavah  érotragrähyah 
sthülasabdah? | yad$ uktam tatra [A, 35] — 

sthülam $abda iti [E,, 12] proktam süksmam cintämayam bhavet | 

cintayä rahitam yat tu tat param parikirtitam || (SärK 1.8) iti” || 


X *X *X 


[A, 104, Ex 30, Ev 161, MY 110r10, M? 80r5] idänim bindoh paryäyanämäny 
äha— 
Sabdatativam aghos® vag brahma kundalini dhruvam || (70)° 
vidyäsaktih"® [A, 105] paro!! nädo mahämäyeti desikaih | [M* 110v11] 
bindur evam? samäkhyäto vyomänähata ® ity api || (71) 
idänim bindoh süksmä[A, 10ç]disabdavrttih!{ samhärakramena dar$ayati— 
catasro vrttayas tasya yäbhir vyäptäs tridhänavah | 
yäbhir vyäptä anavah! pro[A, 107]ktavad uttamamadhyamäprstajñänädima- 
nto bhavanti || 
käs tà ity aträhal°— 
vaikharï madhyamäbhikhyä pasyanti sûksmasañjnitä || (72) 
ata äsäm [A, 104] käranatvena binduh siddha ity arthah || [E, 162] 


460 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


vaikharisvaräpam äha— 

tatra sà vaikhart $rotragrähyà yärthasya väcikà |° [E, 31] 
sa ca — [A, 109] 

sthänesu vidhrte väyau krtavarnaparigrahä || (73) 

prayoktinäm iyam präyah pränavrttinibandha|M* 110v2]n4 |‘ 
tad ähuh— 

akä$aväyuprabhavah [A, 10:06] éarirât samuccaran vaktram upaiti nädah | 

sthänäntaresu pravibhajyamäno varnatvam ägacchati yah sa $abdah || iti || ? 
madhyamäm!? äha— 

kevalam bu[A, 1011]ddhyupädäna* kramäd\° varnänupätini || (74)° 

antahsañjalparäpä tu na $rotram upasarpati | 

pränavritim atikramya vartate madhyamähvaya” || (75)' [A, 1042] 
esä ca parämaréajñänasvarüpa”! sthülasabdasyapi käranam ity uktam || 

avibhägena varnänäm sarvatah samhrtakrama?? |" 

svayamprakäsà pasyanti mälA, 1013]yärändarasopama”* || (76)* 
iyam cäksarabindurüpety uktam || [E, 32] 

idänim abhidheyabuddhibijatvena präguktäm nädäparaparyäyäm süksmal 
À, 10;4]vasthäm äha— 

svarüpajyotir®" eväntah süksma vag {MY 110v-na]napäyint | 
anapäyinitvam cäsyäh susuptyädyavasthäsv api sambhavät, na tu nityatvena | 
[A, 1015] asyä api pratipurusam bhedenänekatväd acetanatväc ca käryatvam?” | 
tasyäs ca käranam parabindur evety uktam | 

tam eva vi[A, 10:6]$esayati— 

yasyäm drstasvaräpayäm® adhikäro nivartate || (77)” 
27 drstasvarüpäyäm purusasya bhogäl 
À, 10,7]dhikäro nivartate| yady evam vivekajñänäd eva moksasiddher diksä- 
narthyaprasañgah®® | tan na, malasya dravyatväc caksuhpatala[A, 10,4]sya?° 


yasyäm purusasvarüpäd vivekena 


caksurvaidyavyäpärenevesvaravyäpärena*° diksäkhyenaiva nivrttisiddheh || *! 
tata$ ca tadvisayavivekavijñänäbhävad®? eva $abdabrahmavädinah purusa- 

samavä[A, 112]yinim tam 
puruse sodasakale täm ähur amrtähvayam | * [E, 163] 

evam hi tesäm bhrama ity äha— 
kevalah** paramänando dhiro nityolA, 113]ditah prabhuh* || (78) 
nästam eti na codeti na $ränto na vikaravan | [En 33] 
sarvabhütäntaracarah Sabdabrahmätmako ravih || (79) 
bhitvä yam°T bodhakhadgena |A, 114] nirgacchanty avisañkitäh | 


manyanta ity äha— 


Francesco Sferra 461 


yam enam samyagjñaänakhyena khadgena bhitvä vivicya yathävaj jñätvä samsa- 
rän nirgacchanty ätmänah,* so ’yam*° [A, 115] éabdabrahmäkhyo ravir asmäd 
raver vilaksana iti tesäm bhramah || 

atra siddhäntam äha— 

täm eva vänim süksmäkhyäm ähur ätmavido (A, 116] janäh || (80) 
evasabdo bhinnakramah| ätmasvarüpavidas tu éaiväs täm süksmäkhyäm 
bindukäryabhütäm éabdavrttim eva manyante, na tu pulA, 117]rusa- 
samaväyinim, tasyä° vikäritvena jadatvät, tatsamaväye“! 
cetanatvädidosaprasañgät*? || [A, 114] 


purusasyäpi vikaritva- 


ittham bindukäryarüpäh*#? $abdavrttih pradaréyopasamharati— 

pratyätmaniyatà età vrttayo bandhanätmikäh | ° 
äsäm ca kärya[A, 1 1o]tvena jadatvän na citsamaväyo yujyate, api tu bandhana- 
tvam evety arthah || 

tathäpi— 

äbhyo viviktam ätmänam na hi pasyanti [A, 1110] pudgaläh || (81) [E, 34] 
pudgalä malayuktätmäna ity arthah®{| malävrtatvad ätmanäm tadvivekajña- 
näbhävena täsv evaätmabhräntir iti bhävah || 

kuta evaisam‘® ayam bhrama ity aträ[A, 1111]ha*°— 

paramätmaiva vâgätmä vag evarmeti ca fruteh*" |*8 


atmanä vakéaktyädisambandhasyärthavadabhütanam 
51 


n asam éruti[A, 11:2]- 


nam 52 ity 
arthah || 

vaikhari frotraje bodhe madhyamä savikalpake || (82) [A, 11:3] 

pasyanti madhyamotpädasamudyogesu laksyate | 
vaikhart érotragrähyaiva| madhyamä parämarsajñänarüpatvät®* savikalpake 
laksyate | [A, 11:14] tasyà api samutpädanahetuh pasyanti || 

anya tu— 

yadà vritir asesena vilinä cittasamsrayä || (83) [E, 164] 

tadä süksmä visuddheva cidäbhaty avive[A, 1115]katah°* | 
säksmä tv abhidheyabijatvena”® sarvabhütesv avasthitä®® pasyantyä api 
käranabhütä cidätyantasamélesat tadrüpeva7 bhä[A, 11iç]tity uktam || 
[E» 35] 

uktanyäyena ca— 

na 50 Sti pratyayo nünäm yah Sabdänugamäd rte || (84) 

anuviddham iha°° jñänam sarvam $abdena jayate |" 

kiñca— 

saisà [A, 1117] caturvidhà vritir nivrttyädikaläsrayar || (85) 


arthäparijñaänäd evam te manyante pudgalä malayuktätmäna 


462 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


pañcadhà bhidyate bhüyah kaläs tà binduvrttayah®° |? 
saisa $abdätmikä binduvrttir nivrttyadikalä$rayänäm ätmanam ta[A, 1118]rata- 
myenafl pañcadhä jñänädyupakärikety arthah| nivrttyädayah punah kuta°? 
utpannä ity aträha [A, 1lena (fol. 12 is missing)] — kaläs #à iti] bindor 
evävasthäbhütäh kaläkäravrttayah | tatah kalopädänatvenäpi bindusiddhir iti 
bhävah || 


X *X *X 


[A, 213, À, 17, E, 61, E, 178] moksopakärakatvam api dar$ayati— 
jñänam palA, 214]rämrtopäyahetuh parikarah® pasoh || (171) 
paramoksapräptyupäyasya diksäkhyasya taduttarakälänustheyasya ca nityädi- 


karma[A, 21;]nah käranam paricchedajänamft 


eva, ajñatavisaye [E,, 62] ’nu- 
sthänäsambhavät, nirbijadiksäyäm apy äcäryasya jñänapradhänatvalA, 216]t || 

tasya ca éivädivastuvisayakajñänasya®® éästradvärena bindur eva sampädaka 
ity äha— 

tac ca fabdänuvedhena $abdaräser abhüd asau | (A, 217] 

fabdarä$is ca bindüttho bindur nädäd asäv api || (172) 

bindor anähatäd esa käranam $uddhavartmanah | 
anähatabindur iti $u[A, 21s]ddhädhvayoner mahämäyäyäh sañjñä] tasyäas ca 
nädabindvädikramena $abdotpattir ity uktam || 


NOTES TO THE TEXT 


% Verse 22cd is also quoted without variant readings in SSAV on p.5. 

5 In the Siddhäntaprakäsikä by Sarvätmasambhu we read: bindavo bandho vidyävidyesva- 
rädisarträanäm käranam sakaläkhyasamsäribhogaparikaribhätä süksmädivaikharyantasabdahetus 
ca bhavati| (fol. 172 4). 

Ÿ St. 22 and its commentary up to this point have already been translated by SFERRA 
(1991:315) and by GoopaLz (1998:290). 

5 Cf. $RS 26: rasyds catasro vägrüpà vrttayo vaikharyädayah| vaikhari madhyamä cänyä 
pasyanti sûksmasañjñitä || (p.47). St. 72 is also quoted without variant readings in SSAV on p. 5; 
verse 72cd is very similar to PÀ 2.21ab: vaikhari madhyamakhyà ca pasyanti sûksmasamjnita | 
(p. 12). : 

€ C£ PÀ 2.22d: *pärvam arthasya väcikä| (p.12). 

S Verses 73cd-74ab correspond with a few changes to VP Vréti ad 1.134 [142] = st. ca: 
sthänesu vidhrte väyau krtavarnaparigrahä | vaikhari väk prayoktfnäm pränavritinibandhanà || 
(p.219), which is also quoted in SDrVrti p.43, Parätriikävivrti ad 2cd-3ab (p. 3; vivrte for 
vidhrte), Spandakärikävivrti ad 4.18 (p.151, abhihate for vidhrte), Stavacintämanivivrti ad 1 
(p. 5; vivrte for vidhrte); this stanza is also quoted without variant readings in SSÂV on p.5, 


Francesco Sferra 463 


where it is introduced with the words: #ktam ca ratnatraye. Päda 73c corresponds exaclty to PÀ 
2.22a. 

7 This stanza is also quoted by Rämakantha in his commentaries on MPÀ vidy4 7.40cd- 
42ab (p.245) and SärK 1.5ab (p. 9) and 17.5cd-6 (p.127); in the edition of the latter, N.R. 
Bhatt refers to Päniniyasiksä and Apisalisiksa without supplying any specific information. It is 
also cited in the Mahänayaprakä$a, p.113. 

® Verse 74cd corresponds to VP Vrtti ad 1.134 [142] = st. cha ab: kevalam buddhyupädänà 
kramarüpänupätini| (p.219); cit. in Spandakärikävivrti p.150, Stavacintämanivivrti p.5; cf. 
ASS (above, n. 42). 

* Verse 75ab is also quoted in the ASS (above, n. 42). Verse 75cd corresponds to VP Vr#i 
ad 1.134 [142] = st. cha cd: pränavrittim atikramya madhyamä väk pravartate || (p.219); cit. in 
Spandakärikävivrti p.150, Stavacintämanivivrti p.5. cf. PÀ 2.23ab: pränavrttim atikräntä väg 
esà madhyamähvaya | . Stt. 74cd-75 are also quoted in SSAV on p. 6 (variant reading: °upädäna® 
for ‘upädänà). 

#° Verse 76ab corresponds to VPVr##i ad 1.134 [142] = st. ja ab: avibhägä tu 
pasyanti sarvatah samhrtakramä| (p.219); cit. in Parätrifikävivrti ad 9cd-10ab (p.7), 
Spandakärikävivrti p.149, Sravacintämanivivrti p.5. Cit. by Rämakantha (with the variant 
avibhagät for avibhaga in SärK Vrtti ad 1.8 [p.16], MPÀ Vrtti ad 7.45—46ab [p.247], KÀ Vrrti 
ad 3.24cd [p. 85]); cf. also $Dr 2.11ab, 44cd-51, and ASS (above, n. 42). 

À St. 76 is also quoted without variant readings in SSAV on p. 6: cf. ASS (above, n. 42). 

# Verse 77ab corresponds to VP Wrrri ad 1.134 [142] = st. ja cd: svarüpañyotir eväntah 
sûksmaä vag anapäyint || (p.219). Cit. by Rämakantha in his commentaries on SärK and MPÀ 
without variant readings (references in the previous note). It is also quoted without variant 
readings in SSAV p.6, Parätrisikävivrti p.7, Spandakärikävivrti p.149, Stavacintämanivivrti 
p.5, ASS (above, n. 42). 

* Verse 77cd corresponds to VP Vrsti ad 1.134 [142] = st. %a ab: tasyäm drstasvarñpäyäm 
adhikäro nivartate| (p.219); cit. in Séavacintämanivivrti ad 1 (p. 5). Cit. by Rämakantha in his 
commentaries on SärK and MPÀ without variant readings (references above). It is also quoted 
without variant readings in SSAV on p. 6; cf. ASS (above, n. 42). 

£ Verse 78ab corresponds to VP Vr#ri ad 1.134 [142] = st. #a cd: puruse sodasakale täm ähur 
amrtäm kaläm || (p.220). Cit. by Rämakantha in his commentaries on SärK (amrtähvayäm) 
and MPÀ (amrtäm kaläm) (references above). It is also quoted without variant readings in SSAV 
on p.7 and Parätrimsikätattvavivarana, ed. p.248, and in Parätrifikävivrti ad 7cd-8ab (p. 6) 
with the variant reading paramäm for amrtäm. 

9 Cf. PÀ 2.26cd. 

T Verses 84cd-85ab correspond with slight differences to VP 1.115 [123]: #4 50 5ti pratyayo 
loke yah sabdänugamäd rte| anuviddham iva jñänam sarvam fabdena bhäsate || ; in Saivasid- 
dhänta texts, these verses are quoted in SärKWrtti ad 1.6cd-7ab and in NKWäkhyä ad 12 
(with ha for iva) and paraphrased by Umäpatisiväcärya in $RS 40 o-au (ähur evam jagat sarvam 
prabuddham $abdavrttibhih | na hi $abdäd rte pumsah pratyayo ‘ti kadäcana || fabdänuviddham 
eveha visvam jñänam pradr$yate| etä eva paro bandhah pasñnäm paramärthatah ||, pp. 117- 
118). Cf. also PÀ 2.15ab: kimca Sabdänusamviddhäh [sic: no application of sandhi] jayante 
pratyayà nrnäm | ; 2.19ab: na syäd adhyavasäyo ‘pi vinà fabdänuvedhanam | . 

P Verses 85cd-86ab are referred to in the anonymous Ullekhini ad $RS 26 and quoted 
by Vedajñäna in his Saivägamaparibhäsämañjari (4.10cd-11ab) with the reading ‘ray for 


464 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


“äsrayät (p.173). 

$ Stanzas 172-173ab are quoted in SSÂV p. 5 (variant readings: abdaräsir for fabdaräser 
[172b], eszh for esa [173a], °vartmanäm for °vartmanah [173b]). Verses 171cd-173ab have 
already been translated in Goopazz 2001:341. 


1 jàyate AE DE, MY] jéyato À. 2 yatah AE LE, M7] yatà À..3 päda dis quoted in E,E] deest 
in A. 4 iti EDEy] deest in A. 5 ‘käryam E,] °käryo À; °käryab En. 6 yad En] pad À;; tad Es. 
7 iti A;E] deest in Ex. 8 Sabdatattvam aghosä E DE, MY M? ] fabdatatvaghosä À. 9 According 
to E, the verse 70cd corresponds to 70ab. 10 %akrih ELE, MY MY] %akti À. 11 paro AMY 
My ; cf. above st. 22c (paranäda®) and NK 16c (nädah parah) ] parä ELEv. 12 evam AE] eva 
E MY M}. 13 hata A MY M] hatam ELEv. 14 %rttih EDE,] *vrttim À. 15 vyäptà anavah 
AE] vyäptänavah E,,. 16 aträha E LE, ] äha A1. 17 madhyamäm Aipc ELE,] madhyamä Àac. 
18 ‘wpädänà AELE, MY] ‘upädäna® M7. 19 kramäd A;ELE,] krama° MY MY. 20 mad- 
hyamähvayä À;ac ELE] madhyamamähvayä Aipc. 21 parämarsajñänasvaräpä E LE] parama- 
jhänarñpà À,.22 samhrtakramä A MY MY] sambrtikramät E LE. 23 mäyarä° EE, MM] 
mayärä° À, (ep). 24 svarñpa° ELEy MY MY] räpa° À.. 25 käryatvam conj. ] käryatvät A ELE,. 
26 °räpäyäm E,] ‘räpäyà À;; ‘räpayäm Ex. 27 vivekena ELE,] vikena À. 28 *änarthya® (or 
‘änarthaka) em. ] änarthakya® AELE,. 29 caksuh° E,,] caksuh En; caksusah AÀ;. 30 caksur° 
ELEy] deest in A, (ep). 31 In Aithe following words are added here: mahämäyäpurul A, 11]sa- 
vivekasya vicchimnamalänäm e (+ 9 illegible aksaras). 32 vijñänäbhäväd ELE,] ‘jñänäbhäväd 
Apc; ‘jnänäbhà A;ac. 33 räm EbEv] à À. 34 kevalah ELEy MY] kevala À;. 35 nityoditah 
prabhuh AËELE,] nityoditaprabhah MY (ep). 36 codeti ELE, MY] cedeti À;. 37 yam A;Ev 
M] yam E,. 38 ätmänah ELE,] âtmanah À;. 39 ‘yam ELE,] yam A. 40 rasyä em. ] tasy4° 
ELEv. 41 samaväye ELE,] “samaväyena À, (ep). 42 vikäritvä° E LE, ] vikäritväc À;. 43 °rüpäh 
ELEy] “bhatäs À, (ep). 44 pudgalä malayuktätmäna ity arthah E LE] deest in A;. 45 evaisäm 
AE» (eva esäm) |] evam esäm E,. 46 aträha EDE,] äha Ai. 47 $ruteh AE LE] frutih MY. 
48 Ehrecords in note the following verse: pumän eva hi vägukto väk purusa itiranät. 49 ätmanä 
em. ] mano A;ELE,. 50 väksaktyädi® ELE,] väksaktyanädi® À, (ep). 51 srutinäm ELEy] 
frutità® À;. 52 mala° Aipc EbEv] la° Ajac © °yuktätmäna EDE,] °yuktäh ätmäna À, (ep). 
53 parämarsa® ELE,] paramärsa® À,. 54 aviveka°® ELE,] dviveka° À. 55 abhidheya® ELE, |] 
abhidheyabuddhi® À; (ep). 56 avasthitä ELE,] avasthitäh À. 57 ‘rüpeva EDE,] °räpenava 

A, (sic for ‘räpeneva ?). 58 na so EE M}] 50 A,. 59 iha EDEy M] ft A. 60 päda b is 
quoted in ELEy] deest in A, (it is probably quoted below in the prafika, fol. 12 now miss- 


ing). 61 räratamyena E LE] täratamyatäbhä (blank space for + 4 aksaras) vana À;. 62 punah 
kuta EDEy] kutah punar À, (ep). 63 parikarah A;ELE,.] parikaram À. 64 pariccheda° E LE] 
paricchedo À. 65 °visayaka® ELEy] °visaya® A, (ep). 66 tac ca A;ELEvSSAV ] ratah À.. 


Francesco Sferra 465 


TRANSLATION 


At this point, he gives the demonstration of bindu: 

22. The [reality] from which the pure path is born, in which it exists [and] 
dissolves, is bindu, called paranäda, the cause of näda, bindu and arna. 

Since the pure path is an effect (kärya), to the extent that it consists in 
multiple worlds, etc. —as will be shown below—, [$rikantha] demonstrates 
that bindu is its material cause (#pädäna). Furthermore, there is the proof of 
the [bindu] also, because it exists as the material cause of word; thus he states: 
“Tit is] the cause of näda, bindu and arna”. Among these, the term #4da is [to 
be understood as] the cause of the understanding of meaning (zbhideyabud- 
dhihetu), the subtle sound (näda), whose nature is the first effusion of bindu, 
which in the venerable Kälottara and in other [texts] is defined as devoid of 
conceptualisation (cintä). Bindu, in its turn, is the effect of [näda]. It is the 
aksarabindu, which is indefinable (avyapadesya), like a drop of the liquid of the 
peacock's egg, consists in the knowledge of reflective awareness, [and] in this 
very [text, i.e. the K%/ottara] is defined as subtle. Lastly 4r74 is the phoneme, 
that is gross word, originating from the ether and the wind, audible. Since it 
has been said here [in the Särdhatrisatikälottara 1.8]: “Gross [sound] is called 
fabda, subtle [sound] consists in conceptualisation, but that which is devoid of 
conceptualisation is said to be supreme”. 


X *X *X 


Now, he gives the synonyms of bindu: 

70cd-71. Bindu is known by masters as follows: $abdatattva, aghosä vac, brah- 
man, kundalini, dhruva, vidyä$akti, sypreme näda, mahämäyä, vyoman 4nd also 
anähata. 

Now, he shows, according to an ascending order, the bindu states of word 
(abdavrtti), starting with the subtle one (s%ksmä): 

72ab. There are four states of [bindu/. Pervaded by these [states], individual 
souls (anu) are divided into three orders. 

Pervaded by these [states], individual souls become the possessors —as has 
been previously said— of knowledge that is superior, median, inferior, etc. 

[Someone may ask:] “What are these [states]?” He says: 

72cd. [They are:] vaikhari, the one known as madhyamä, paéyanti, #he one 
called süksma. 

Hence, the meaning is that bindu is proved to be the cause of these [states]. 

[Srikantha] explains the nature of vzikhari: 


466 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


73ab. Among these, vaikharï, which is audible, is the one that verbalises 
(väcikà) meaning; 

And it, 

73cd-74ab. once the wind is compressed in the places of articulation, assumes 
the form of phonemes. As à general rule, it depends on the speakers’ breathing 
(pränavrtti). 

It has been said: “Word (fabda) is the sound (näda) that comes into being 
through the ether and the wind; rising through the body, it reaches the mouth; 
being divided between the various places of articulation, it reaches the state of 
phoneme”. 

[Now] he explains madhyamä: 

74cd-75. Having only the mind as its cause, it gradually conforms to the 
phonemes. It consists in inner discourse (antahsañjalpa), but does not reach the 
ear. Being beyond breathing, it is called madhyama. 

And it has been said that this, which consists in the knowledge of reflective 
awareness, is the cause also of gross word (sthälasabda). 

76. Due to the non-distinction of the phonemes, in it succession is absorbed 
completely: pasyanti às self-luminous, similar to the liquid of the peacocks egg. 

And thus it is stated that it consists in the 4ksarabindu. 

Now, he describes the szksmä level, whose other synonym is 74da, which 
has been previously defined as ‘seed of the understanding of meaning’: 

77ab. The inner radiance is, within, none other than the undecaying subtle 
word. 

And its being undecaying stems from the fact that it is [constantly] present 
also in states of deep sleep and so forth, and not from its being eternal. This is 
also an effect, because it is multiple due to its being different in each human 
being, and because it is insentient. And its cause, it is said, is in fact the supreme 
bindu. 

[Srikantha] defines this [subtle word] as follows: 

77cd. As soon as its true nature is seen, the adhikära ceases. 

Às soon as its true nature is seen through the discrimination between lit 
and] the very nature of the purusa, the purusa's bhogädhikära ceases. [Objec- 
tion:] “If it were thus, since attaining liberation would simply be possible on 
the basis of discriminating knowledge, there would be the undesired conse- 
quence that initiation is useless”. [Reply:] No! It is not so, since eliminating 
maculation (mala), which is material, occurs only by virtue of that action of 
the Lord known as ‘initiation’, in the same way that a cateract is removed by 


Francesco Sferra 467 


virtue of the action of an eye specialist. 

Thus he says that the $hdabrahmavädins maintain that the [subtle word] is 
inherent in the purusa, precisely due to [their] lack of discriminating knowledge 
of its sphere: 

78ab. 1n the purusa, which has sixteen parts, it was known by the name of 
ambrosia. 

In fact, he explains their error as follows: 

78cd-80ab. The Lord, uncompounded, supreme beatitude, stable, always above 
the horizon, does not set and does not rise, is not tired, is not subject to transforma- 
tion. The sun, whose essence is $abdabrahman, exists in all beines. Having divided 
it with the sword of knowledge, those devoid of doubt leave [transmigration behind]. 

Hence, that sun known as $zbdabrahman has different characteristics from 
this sun [i.e. the Lord]. It is in this that their error lies [that is, not seeing 
that the true sun that is the Lord is different from the sun that is säksmä or 
fabdabrahman]. Having divided it with the sword of correct understanding, 
that is having discriminated [between it and the other sun or, in other words] 
having correctly (yathävat) known it, souls (4tman) leave samsära behind. 

At this point [$rikantha] presents the true doctrine: 

80cd. Men who knew the nature of the Self (ätmavid) said that it is none other 
than (eva) the word (väni) known as süksmä. 

The term “eva” is bhinnakrama {that is, syntactically speaking, it should 
appear in a different place in the text]. S4iv4 [masters] who know the true nature 
of the Self maintain that what is called s%ksm4 is none other than a state of word 
which is an effect of bindu, and not that it is indissolubly linked to purusa, since 
being subject to transformation, it is insentient, and if it were connected with 
it, this would give rise to the undesired consequence of also the purusa being 
subject to transformation, devoid of consciousness, and so forth. 

Having thus explained the states of word, which are by their very nature an 
effect of bindu, he sums up as follows: 

81ab. Fxed in each Self these states have the nature of bondage; 

And since, being effects, these are insentient, [their] inherent connec- 
tion with consciousness is not logically acceptable; on the contrary, they are 
bondage. This is the meaning. 

However, 

81cd. she pudgalas, in fact, do not see the Self as distinct from these [states], 

By pudgala we mean the Selves bound to maculation. The meaning is that 
it is mistakenly supposed that Self exists in these [levels of word] because, being 


468 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


covered by maculation, the Selves do not have a discriminative knowledge of 
these [levels]. 

If one were to ask whence their error derives, he would say: 

82ab. since the Sruti states: “The Self Word is none other than the Supreme Self. 
the Self is none other than Word”. 

The meaning is that the pudgalas, those whose Self is bound to macula- 
tion, think thus due to their ignorance of the meaning of those Srutis that are 
non-prescriptive explanatory statements (arthaväda) [and not prescriptive rules 
(vidhi)] regarding the relation between the power of word, etc. and the Self. 

82cd-83ab. Vaikhari is perceived in what originates in the ear, madhyamaä 
in knowledge endowed with conceptual constructs, paéyanti in the stimuli for the 
production of madhyamä. 

Vaikhartï is audible; madhyamä, since it has the nature of the knowledge 
of reflective awareness, is perceived in [knowledge] endowed with conceptual 
constructs. Pasyanti, in its turn, is the cause of the production of the latter. 

While the other: 

83cd-84ab. When there exists the state [of word] in which the association with 
conceptualisation is completely dissolved, then the pure, subrle (süksmä) /word] 
shines as if it were not different from consciousness. 

But säksmä, which, as the seed of [the understanding of] meaning, dwells 
in all beingss, is also the cause of pasyanti. It has been said that, due to [its] strong 
embrace of conciousness (cidä), it shines as if it possessed its form (s4dr4pà). 

And, on the basis of the celebrated principle: 

84cd-85ab. For limited souls there is no thought that is not accompanied by 
word. Here [in this world] all knowledge arises penetrated by word. 

Furthermore: 

85cd-86ab. This fourfold state [of word] is further divided into five parts 
through the dependence of the kaläs starting with nivrtti. These kaläs are functions 
of bindu. 

The meaning is that this bindu function consisting of word (#zbda) facili- 
tates knowledge, etc. in five ways, on the basis of the different degrees of souls 
that depend on the kaläs such as nivriti. From whence arose the ivrtti, etc? He 
replies by saying: “These kz/äs”, etc. The functions that take the form of ka/äs 
are actually the levels of bindu. Hence the meaning is that bindu is demon- 
strated also as the material cause of the kaläs. 


X *X *X 


Francesco Sferra 469 


He also shows that [knowledge] is a liberating factor: 

171cd. Knowledge is what assists the pasu, 1.e. the cause of the means for [ob- 
taining] the supreme ambrosia. 

The knowledge of discrimination is the sole cause of the means for obtaining 
the supreme liberation. This means consists in initiation and ritual practice, 
starting with perpetual rites, which must be performed after this [knowledge 
is reached], since action is not possible in relation to an unknown object [and] 
since the knowledge of the master is a fundamental element also in a seedless 
initiation. 

He says that bindu, and nothing else, is the generator, through the äsrra, 
of this knowledge concerning $iva and other subjects: 

172cd-173ab. And this [knowledge] that exists through penetration by word 
arose from the totality of sounds. This totality of sounds, in its turn, arose from 
bindu, bindu from näda, and the latter from the anähatabindu, which is the [ma- 
terial] cause of the pure path. 

Anähatabindu is the name of the mahämäyä, the matrix of the pure path. 
And it has been said that from this word arises according to the sequence: 74da, 
bindu, etc. 


APPENDIX 


Excerpts from an unpublished commentary on the RTP (ad stt. 22, 70cd-86ab) 
[M? 74v>] atha pürvam uddistärthanirupanäyaäha— 
tatra bindur ädau nirüpyalline 8]te|| (21d) 
jäyate <°>dhvä yatah suddho vartate yatra liyate | 
sa binduh paranädäkhyo nädabindvarnakäranam || (22) 
nanu $ivasya saty api prädhänye tam vihäya kim iti bindor evädau nirüpyate | 
käryena käranasiddher iti brämah| ayam arthah — käryam svopädänakära- 
[line 9]nam! äksipati | upädänakäranam ca svaprerakam iti| prerakäc chivat 
prâg eva binduh sädhyata iti | ata eva käryanirde$apürvam bindusiddhih | jäya- 
te <> dhvä yatah suddha iti yac chuddhädhvana upädänakäranam s4 binduh 
paranädäparaparyäyah | nädabin[line 10]dvarnänäm käranatvena boddhavyas 
ca, nädo <’>syävyaktasabdätmakah prathamah ksobhah, yad vaksyati— 
svarüpajyotir eväntah süksmä väâg anapäyini| (st. 77ab) iti | 
bindus ca tasyaiva sthüle dve avasthe madhyamäpaéyantyäkhye, yad vaksyati— 
kevalam buddhyupädänä? kramavarnänupälline 11]tini || (st. 74cd) 
antahsañjalparüpä tu na $rotram upasarpati | 


470 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


prânavrttim atikramya vartate madhyamähvayä || (st. 75) 
avibhägena varnänäm sarvatah samhrtakrami | 
svayamprakä$ä pasyanti mäyürändarasopamä || (st. 76) iti | 
arnas tu nädasyaivätisthülävasthä vaikharyä[ M? 75r:]khya, yad vaksyati— 
tatra sa vaikhart érotragrähyà yä<rthasya vacikä | 
sthänesu vi>dhrte? vayau krtavarnaparigrahä || (st. 73) iti || 


X *X *X 


[M? 80r;] evam sädhitasya bindoh éästräntarasiddhasañjñäsamvadam darésaya- 
ti — 

fabdatattvam aghosà väg brahma kundalini dhruvam || (70) 

vidyäsaktih paro nädo mahämäyeti desikaih | 

bindur eva samäkhyäto vyolline 6]mänähata ity api || (71) 
atha svavrttibhedasambhedais citim ullikhan bindur ity uktam® käs tà vrttayah 
kati sankhyäh kimabhidhänäs cety aträha— 

catasro vrttayas tasya yäbhir vyäptäs tridhänavab | 

vaikhari madhyamäbhikhyà pasyanti sûksmasañjnità || (72) 
[line 7] sridhänavo vidyävidyesänusadäsiva y4bhir vyäptä baddhäs tä$ catasra iti 
atha tà eva vrttir laksayati | tatra vaikharim äha— 

tatra sà vaikhart $rotragrähyà yärthasya väcikà | 

sthänesu vidhrte väyau krtavarnaparigrahä || (73) 

prayoktrnäm iyam [line 8] präyah pränavrttinibandhanà | 
sthänesüxahprabhrtisu väyau vidhrte niruddhe sati krtavarnaparigrahä pascät 
pränavrttinibandhanä sat bahih $rotragrähyà prayoktrnäm parasmai pratipäda- 
känäm präyo <°>ti$ayendrthasya ghatäder väcikä yà väk sà [line 9] vaikhari | 
präna unmukho väyubh, tasya vrttir ürdhvamprasarah, sa eva nibandhanam ni- 
mittam bahihprasare yasyäh sà tathäbhütä | sà ca vaikhari tatpürväyä madhya- 
mäyäà eva sthaulyam,” tato madhyamäm äha— 

kevalam buddhyupädänà kramavarnänupätini || (74) 

antahsañjalline 10] /parñpä tu na $rotram upasarpati | 

pränavrttim atikramya vartate madhyamähvayä || (75) 
tad upädiyate grhyata iti buddhyupädänä, kevalam buddhyaivaävagamyä, ata 
eväntahsañjalparüpä | kramavarnänupätini kramavarnätmikä | seyam ürdhva- 
pränavrlline 11]#im atikramya vartamänatvän #a hi frotram upayäti madhya- 
mähvayä vaniti sà ca paéyantyäh käryam,”? atha paéyantim äha— 

avibhägena varnänäm sarvatah samhrtakramä | 

svayamprakä$à pasyanti mäyñrändarasopamä || (76) 


Francesco Sferra 471 


varnänäm avibhägena hetu[ M? 80v;]nà sarvätmanä samhrtakramä paurvapa- 
ryavidhurä | ata eva mäyürändarasavadvyapadesyà pasyanti väg bhavati sva- 
yamprakäseti | antahsañjalpamänety arthah | antarmukhatvam eva hy âtmano 
<’>pi svayamprakä$atvam, yadväa sakalavi$esanäparisphuranenälline 2]nirni- 
yamänärthavisayä väni svayamprakä$asabdaväcyä| tadänim $abda eva hi sva- 
yam prakäsate | arthapräkatyatä väc chabdaprakata iti bhävah | sà ca süksma- 
vänyä vikrtih © | tatah süksmäm äha— 

svarüpajyotir eväntah sûksmä väg anapäyini | 
sva[line 3]rüpam sakalavisesanavidhuro <’>rthas tasya jyotis tasya prakäéah, 
arthamaätraprakäikä vani s#ksmä väg iti sà cänapäyini vagantaräpeksayà 
cirasthäyini, käranabhütä vägantaränäm ity arthah| atheyam evänünaäm 
paramo bandhaf ity äha— [line 4] 

yasyäm drstasvarüpäyäm adhikäro nivartate || (77) 
yasyäm vâci vivekena drstarüpäyäm adhikärah srstyadikäryakartrtväyäso nivar- 
tate S | seyam süksmaä vak paramo bandhah svapravrttinivrttyadhinapravrttika- 
tväd adhikärapravrttinivrttyoh, ata evasyah [line 5] süksmasariränupravesena 
parabandhatvam drdhayati— 

puruse sodasakale täm ähur amrtähvayäm | iti | 
kalayanti pravartayanti drkkriye purusänäm iti kaläh karanäni karmendriya- 
buddhindriyamano<’>bhimänadhividyaävakéaktidvayalaksanäni [line 6] soda- 
$a kathyante| kaläyä malanivrttau kälasya srjyamänapadärthakalane rägasya 
purusarañjane niyater bhoganiyame ca vyäpriyamänatayä säksät pravrttyana- 
ñgatvenäsangrahah | uktam ca tathä— 

karanasthena bhedena svacittyäpi ca[line 7]turdaéa | 

vak$aktibhedau dvau ceti pumskaläh soda$a smrtäh || iti | 
äsu kaläsu sodaëi kalä purusam à moksän na muñcati yonito yonyantaram pra- 
payati ca”? | 

evam vägvrttir abhidhäya tatkäranabhütam bindum abhistauti— 

kevalah paramälline 8]nando dhïro nityoditaprabhah || (78) 

nästam eti na codeti na fränto na vikäravän | 

sarvabhütäntaracarah Sabdabrahmätmako ravih || (79) 

bhitvä yam bodhakhadgena nirgacchanty avisañkitäh | iti | 
kevalo mäyädivat karmakhacito na bhavati| paramänandah paralline 9]mäna- 
ndahetutvät| dhirah samarthah svakäryärambhe| nityoditaprabhah prabhà 
sämarthyam, sà ca na kadäcitkä| nästam eti na codeti vinäsotpattirahitah | 
na fränto nodäsinah sarvadä samänäsamänaparinämayor anyataraparinämavan 


472 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


[line 10]| #4 vikäravän upädänakäranatvena sarvadä cävikrtaikadesavän, va- 
ksyati ca— 

yathodadhir upary eva vikaroty anileranät || 

tathaikadesato binduh| (stt. 177cd-178a) iti | 
sarvabhütäntaracarah sarvabhütäntarvarti bodhyaparämaréalaksanät käryat | 
siddha$abdätmikäbhir vrttibhir brmhalline 11]ti vijrmbhata iti Sabdabrahma, 
tadätmakas tatsañjñitah | ravis ca täbhir eva $abdavrttibhih prakä$akatväd ravir 
iva padärthänäm, kim asäv änandarüpatvät kim sarvathopädeya eva nety äha— 
bhitvä yam iti| bodha eva khadgah, tena yam bhitvä nirgacchanti, sa bin[ MY 
81r1] [(...) broken + 25 aksaras]nikrtvä dhyeyah kilety äkalayya visayatayä tad 
avalokanam nirgamanam tu änandarüpatäparityägena cidghanatäpräptir eva | 
avisañkitä iti bindunivrttya[line 2] [(...) broken + 25 4ksaras] ity arthah | 

atha vägvrttinäm traividhyam äcaksaänäh kecid bindum eva süksmäm vanim 
sañgiranta ity äha— 

täm eva vänim süksmäkhyäm ähur ätmavido janäh || (80) iti | 
tam eva bindum süksmäm yälline 3] [(...) broken + 25 aksaras] <éri> matka- 
lottare— 

sthülam süksmam param jñätvä karma kuryäd yathepsitam | (SärK 1.7cd) 
iti | 
atha yäbhir vyäptäs tridhänava ity uktam (cf. st. 72b) tad eva spastayati— 

pratyätmaniyatà età vrttayo bandhanätmilline 4] <käh | 
[(...) broken + 12 aksaras] 

äbhyo viviktam ätmänam na hi pasya>nti pudgaläh || (81) iti| 
vivekapratikülatä hi bandhanatvam iti bhävah | evam érutäv apity äha— 

paramätmaiva vägätmà väg evätmeti ca $rutih | 
tathänubhavato vägvrttim äcaste— 

vailline 5] <khari $rotraje bodhe madhyamä savikalpake || (82) 

pañyanti madhyamotpädasa> mudyogesu laksyate | 

yadà vrttir a$esena vilinà cittasamsrayä || (83) 

tadäà süksmä viuddheva cidäbhäty avivekatah | 
érotrajo bodhah $abdavisayam jñänam taträsau vaikhart lalline6] <ksyate | > 
[(...) broken + 23 aksaras]rthänugunavikalpaparämaréasahite bodhe madhya- 
mä laksyate| vimaréavisayäntahspharanasabdä madhyameti | tasyä utpäda 
utpattis tasyodyogah pravrttis tatra pasyanti [line 7] [(...) broken + 25 4ksaras] 
<a$e>sena sarvätmanà vilinä cittavrttih, vikalpänurüpäs cittavrttayo <’>nu- 
papannäs #adä vikalä vidhuracittamäträ$rayatvena visuddhä sakalavisesena vid- 
hurä prathamäksa[line 8] [(...) broken + 25 sksaras]bhyati | etad uktam bha- 


Francesco Sferra 473 


vati— prathamaäksasannipätänantaram padärthagatavikalpämaréapürvabhävi- 
no bodhasya tadarthaväcinah $abdasya ca viveko durlabha ity arthah | 
athopasamharati— 
na so [line 9] < $#; pratyayo nünäm yah fabdänugamäd rte || (84) 
anuviddham iha jñänam sarvam $abde> na jäyate | 
evam vägvrttidvärena bindum sädhayitva nivrttyadilaksanakäryadvärenäpy 
abhidhatte— 
saisà caturvidhà vrttir nivrttyädikaläsrayat || (85) 
pañcadhà bhidyate bhüyah kaläs tà binduvrttayah | 
[line 10] [(...) broken + 25 aksaras] pañcadhä bhidyate | tattatkalävartipuru- 
sabodhakatayä kalä$ ca tà bindor vrttaya iti | käs tà vrttayah | tatra— (the text 
continues with stt. 86cd—-872). 


NOTES TO THE TEXT 


% CE st. S9ab: svavrttibhedasambhedair ullikhan labhate citim. 

# Cf. SSAV (p.5): varnotpattisthänesu väyau niruddhe sati ya krtavarnaparigrahä pascäd 
atisayena väyor ürdhvaprasara eva bahihprasaranibandhanä param pratyuccäryamänaghatädeh 
$rotragrähyà väcikà väk sà vaikhari tatpürväyäh \sic: no application of sandhi] madhyamäyà ati- 
sthaulyävasthästhitä. 

Ÿ Cf. SSAV (p.6): käryabindor madhyasthaulyävasthä madhyamä yà buddhyàä kevalam 
gamyamänà| ato ‘ntargatoccaranarñpä| ata eva $rotrapatham anupayanti kramavarnätmikà 
Ssadürdhvapränaprasaram atikramya vartamänà sà madhyamähvayàä pa$yantyäh käryam. 

5 Cf. SSAV (p. 6): käryabindoh prathamävasthà pasyanti| sà ca mayärändarasagatapäda- 
paksädivacchabdagatavarnänäm avibhägena sarvatah paurväparyavidhurä| ata eva sakalavise- 
sanaparisphuranäbhäväd anisciyamänärthavisayä vänt svayam prakäsate| sà pasyanti sûksmäya 
vikrtih. 

€ C£. SSAV (p. 6): nädasañjnà süksmä sakalavisesanavidhuram arthasya svarñpam eväntah 
prakä$ikä yà väni cirasthäyini sà säksmäkhyä. 

6 Cf. SSAV (p.6): iyam eva Suddhädhvaväsinäm paramo bandhah| ya imäm vivekena 
pratyaksikurvanti te prayojyalaksanam srstyädikartrtvam vihäya Sivatulyä bhavanti. 

7 Cf. SSAV (p.6): kiñca saiva praläyakalänäm api süksmasariränupravesena sodasaka- 
läsu gananiyä sati tän eva moksaparyantam na muñcati| yonibhyo na yonyantaram präpayati | 
soda$a kaläs tu karmendriyapañcakam jñänendriyapañcakam mano'hañkärabuddhividyä catur- 
dasa| väksaktibhyäm saha sodasa kaläh pumsäm karanäni| uktam ca— karanasthena bhedena 
svacityäpi caturdasa | väksaktibhedau dvau ceti pumskaläh sodasa smrtäh|| iti| ata eväsu kaläsu 
faktyaparaparyäyà süksmäkhyà sodas kalä paramo bandhah. 


1 °käranam em. ] °käraranam M7. 2 ‘upädänà em. | ‘upädäna MY . 3 °dhrte em. ] °dhriä M°. 


ns : Y 
4 °visaya® em. ] *visayo® M7. 


474 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


SIGLA & MANUSCRIPTS CONSULTED 


Siddhäntaprakäsikä of Sarvätmasambhu 
Adyar Library, MS TR 285. 


À 
Ratnatrayapariksä with Ullekhinr: The Adyar Library, MS 71471 
(palm-leaf MS; grantha script; incomplete; Arabic numbers added later 
on the right margin). 

À 
Ratnatrayapariksä: The Adyar Library, MS TR 285 (paper MS; devanä- 
gari script; incomplete). 

Ep 
Ratnatrayapariksä with Ullekhinï: ed. in Astaprakaranam, 2 vols. ed. 
by Krsnasästri, Sivägamasiddhäntaparipälanasañgraha Publications, 
Devakôttai 1923, 1925, vol. 2, pp. 1-108. 

Ev 
Ratnatrayapariksä with Ullekhinï: ed. in Astaprakaranam, ed. by Vra- 
javallabha Dvivedi, Varanasi 1988, pp. 147-202. 

M 
Ratnatrayapariksä: Mysore, Oriental Library, MS P 269, fol. 110rv 
(palm-leaf MS; randinägari script; incomplete; numbers on the left 
margin of the recto). 

M; 


Ratnatrayapariksä with an anonymous commentary: Mysore, Oriental 
Library, MS P 269, fols. 71-102v (palm-leaf MS; nandinägari script; 
incomplete; numbers on the left margin of the recto). 


Studies on Utpaladevas Iévarapratyabhijñaä-vivrti. Part III: Can a 
cognition become the object of another cognition?” 


RAFFAELE TORELLA 


The present paper is the third of a series of papers (TORELLA, forthcoming a, b) 
in which I am presenting the critical edition and English translation of the frag- 
mentary codex unicus of the Kvarapratyabhijñnä-vivrti, the long commentary that 
Utpaladeva composed on his own Ævarapratyabhijnaä-kärikä PK) and svavrtti, 
a work of outstanding importance for the philosophy of Ka$mirian Saivädvaita, 
and for Indian philosophy as a whole. I need not repeat here what I have al- 
ready said elsewhere on the nature of the Vivrii and its relation to the other 
commentaries.! Suffice it to recall that Utpaladeva is said to have composed 
the IPK and the concise Vrtti at the same time, and later on to have devoted 
an analytic commentary to the complex Kä%rikä-Vrtti, i.e. our Vivrti (or Tika), 
in which he discussed possible alternative views and rejected them, also mak- 
ing occasionally quite long digressions on particular subjects. Of this lengthy 
work—corresponding to the extent of 8000 Sokas (hence the traditional de- 
nomination of Astasähasri)—only à comparatively small fragment has come 
down to us, covering the section IPK 1.3.6 through 1.5.3. A detailed exposition 
of my discovery of the original manuscript after a cursory consultation, some 
15 years ago, with a transcript of the same made by Prof. K. Ch. PANDEY, can 
be found in the first study that I have devoted to this text (TORELLA forthcom- 
ing a), which also contains a description of the manuscript (National Archives, 
Delhi, Skt. Mss. No. 30). 

The present paper deals with the Vivrti on IPK I.4.3-5. In the previous 
chapter Utpaladeva, referring to an enigmatic statement in the Bhagavadgitä,” 
had identified three powers ($zkri) in the Lord: Cognition, Memory and Ex- 
clusion. After making some preliminary remarks concerning them as a whole, 


*With deep sadness I pay tribute to the memory of Hélène BRuNNER. My admiration for 
her scholarly work is as great as my admiration for her unflinching courage and serenity in the 
last years of her life. 

lTorELLA 2002: XL-XLV. 

2 Bhagavadgitä XV.15b mattah smrtir jñänam apohanam ca “From Me derive memory, 
knowledge and exclusion”. 


476 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


he starts a detailed inquiry into each of them. His aim is to show that cogni- 
tion, memory and exclusion, which constitute the very basis of the knowledge 
process in the human mind, are indirectly also a proof of the coinciding of the 
individual subject with universal Consciousness. None of these phenomena can 
be really explained and their complex functioning accounted for satisfactorily in 
merely ‘mechanic’ terms, as first of all the Buddhists do. The individual subject 
can cognize, remember and exclude only if it is conceived of as inscribed within 
an eternal and, at the same time, dynamic universal I-ness, i.e. Siva. If Ut- 
paladeva investigation starts with memory, by infringing the above stated or- 
der, it is “because in a very clear manner memory can serve as a logical reason for 
the establishment of the identity of the self with the Lord”? The starting point 
is the classical definition of memory given in Yogasätra 1.11: “Memory is the 
non-extinction of the object formerly perceived” (anubhütavisayäsampramosah 
smrtih). The sustained analysis of Utpaladeva singles out a few crucial points 
contained in such an apparently simple process: How is it possible to attribute 
temporal differentiation to a cognizer that is permanent in his essential nature? 
What is the relationship between the cognitive act of the original perception 
and the cognitive act of the subsequent memory? How can the latter bring the 
former to light again without objectifying it? On this point, in fact, the Saiva 
and his principal opponent, the Buddhist epistemologist, are in full agreement: 
a cognition is self-luminous and cannot be the object of another cognition. 
The standard Buddhist explanation (examined in TORELLA, forthcoming b, 
from which I derive some of the observations that follow) is far from being 
satisfactory: saying that the perception produces a samskära, which in turn will 
produce the phenomenon of memory, only accounts for the fact that memory 
has a certain objective content but leaves out the ‘subjective’ component repre- 
sented by the fact that the object has been ‘coloured” by the previous perception, 
or, to be more precise, by its having been ‘already’ perceived in a certain past 
moment. Memory, in fact, is indeed the memory of the past object but also of 
the past perception of it. Instead, as Abhinavagupta says, what the samskära is 
able to convey (or resurrect) is neither the original perception nor the object 
insofar as it was cognized by such past perception.* This presupposes a living 


3So we read at the very beginning of the Vivrti on L4.1: smrtyädinäm idänim 
jhänaprakaranenänena svarñpam niräpayisyann asesakälänugatasvatanträvabodhalaksanätmata- 
ttvasvabhävesvarasaktiräpatäm pratipipädayisuh smrter eva tävat suspastam Kvarätmasiddhihetu- 
tayà prathamam sambhavam äha. 

#The point has been explicitly touched upon, in a different context, by Utpaladeva in IPK 
L3.2cd [...] pärvänubhavasamskärajatvam tu tattulyatvam na tadgatih “The fact that [mem- 


Raffaele Torella 477 


organism at work, a dynamic and unitary consciousness able to freely move 
between different moments of time. It is the I that ensures the possibility of 
unifying the various cognitions occurring at different times, thus resolving the 
apparent inconsistency between a (present) vimar$sa and a (past) anubhava. The 
one and same svasamvedana of both cognitions creates that necessary bridge be- 
tween them which the Buddhist epistemologist fails to account for.” A further 
clarification is provided by Abhinavagupta in the IPVV (IL, p. 32, IL 10-13): 
the prakäfa concerning the part-object (arthämse) belongs to the past; but the 
prakä$a as grasped by the vimarfa, concerning the part-self (sväémämse), is not 
limited by time. Thus the vimarsa in the memory can connect itself with the vi- 
mar$a in the perception and, through it, with the former light of the object—in 
this way meeting both requirements: taking place in the present and not being 
divorced from prakä$a (TORELLA 2002:106-107, fn. 12). 

The portion of the Vivrii that I have edited here (its translation will be 
published subsequently) is meant to answer the most obvious objection from a 
common sense point of view: why not simply say that the present memory ‘cog- 
nizes’ the former perception and, through it, the former object? Utpaladeva’s 
reply is centred on the vindication of one of the main foundation stones of 
Pratyabhiñaä philosophy: the basic identity of the I, consciousness and any cog- 
nitive activitiy. [If the I, the self, became the object of something outside it, 
it would simply cease being the I. Any cognition has as its essential nature 
self-awareness (svasamvit), which can be taken in three different, and comple- 
mentary, senses: svasyaiva samvit, Svaiva samvit, svasya samvid eva ca (see be- 
low, p.482). Abhinavagupta, availing himself of a device very popular among 
the commentators, maintains that the particle «4 evokes the existence of a fur- 
ther sense to be added to the three explicitly stated by Utpaladeva: sv4 samvid 
eva. None of them would stand, if the objectifiability of cognition were ac- 


ory] arises from latent impressions implies its similarity to the former perception, but not its 
cognition of that”. The semskära of the former perception is awakened by a present percep- 
tion—similar to the other—which gives rise to the memory. The samskära, therefore, ensures 
this ‘similarity” in the memory, but the memory itself has no direct access to (cannot ‘know’) the 
former perception and therefore nor can it, strictly speaking, establish the similarity between 
the latter and the present perception which has been reawakened by the samskära (TORELLA 
2002:99-100, fn. 4). Vrti thereon: “Since memory arises from the latent impression left by 
the former perception, it only bears a similarity to that perception but does not have direct 
cognition of the latter; and, moreover, as there is no cognition of the former perception not 
even the similarity to it can be maintained. 

Cf. IPVV IL, p.17, IL 22-23 anubhavasmrtyor ekam svasamvedanarüpam ekavisayatopa- 
lambhät. 


478 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


cepted. For each of them, apart from the first one,* Abhinavagupta specifies 
the respective counterparts, aptly clarifying the terse lines of the Vivrti: svaiva 
samvit— paräpy asya [jñänasya] samvit, svasya samvid eva—asamvid api ca, svä 
samvid eva—jadam api asya rûüpam.” 

But the opponent has one more argument, apparently a very strong one. 
The yogin, thanks to his extraordinary power of perception, is able to pene- 
trate other minds and know their contents: this is an unequivocal proof that 
cognitions can become the object of others’ cognitions. Utpaladeva*s answer is 
expressed in the last kärikä taken under consideration here, and subtly elab- 
orated in the dense Vivrti thereon. Even if we hypothetically admitted that a 
cognition can be objectified, nothing would change, since the establishing of a 
valid relationship of visaya-visayin between the two cognitions should be me- 
diated by the attainment of a state of unification between the two cognitions 
and the respective subjects, and, if a successful knowledge process has séräpya 
as its core, säräpya, for its part, is incompatible with unity. It is undeniable, 
concludes Utpaladeva, that the yogin can have access to other minds, but this 
is possible precisely because he has reached the identification with the supreme 
Self and consequently has gone beyond the distinction of limited subjects: at 
that point, the cognitions of others end up being ‘his own cognitions. Thus, 
dtmaväda has been finally established, but for Utpaladeva this is not enough. 
Cognitions now are provided with a permanent self as their ultimate ground, 
but the ‘lazy’ self (e.g. of the Nyäya or the Vaisesika) is unable to freely move 
among cognitions, unite them, separate them, or, for example, in the case at 
issue (the phenomenon of memory), recover an object and its perception from 
the past and make them shine again in the present without cancelling their 
original nature but also without reproducing them mechanically. For this, the 
‘sovereignty” (aisvarya) of self of the Saivas is needed. 


6The counterpart of svasyaiva samvit is not shown both because it is not relevant to what 
the author intends to prove, and because an awareness also of the other does not constitute a 
characteristic of insentience (IPVV IL, p. 45, Il. 5-7). 

7C£ IPVV I, p.44, L.25- p.45, 1.5 (1.3 präg iti is to be corrected to ‘pratiyogi). 


Raffaele Torella 479 


TExTS 


[f. 31, L 15] <Vivrti> *smrtikäle ca pürvakälävacchedenärthäbhäsasya sama- 
rthitasya lvärtamänikasmrtiprakäsäd bhedo nopapadyata ity anubhavasmrtyàä- 
bhäsayoh éariribhüta eko ’rthah tayor apy ‘'ekatvam äksipatiti ?copadaréayan 


smartäram caika[16v]m upapädayati || [...] 


drastäram 
[16v, L. 4] na ca yuktam smrter bhede smaryamänasya bhäsanam | 
tenaikyam bhinnakälänäm samvidäm veditaisa sah || 3 || <1.4.3> 
5.1 (17r, L 14] Vrttibh || pürvanubhütas cärtho ’nubhavena saha tatkä- 
likasmrtiprakä$e ’vabhäsamaänah smrtyabhinna eva prakäéäd bhinnasya pra- 
kä$amänataänupapatteh | lfevam anubhavasmrtyä[17v]disamvidäm aikyam sa 
eva cätmä vedakah | tathä hi || 
Vivitih || pürvänubhütasyaivärthasya kevalasya na smrtau yogijñäna 
ivätitärthavisaye prakä$ah | tathä hi smrtitvam na syät | anubhavamukhenaiva 


cärthasya svayam sthiratve ’pi smrtäv atitatvam l’ucyata ity anubhavapra- 
kä$a evätropayogi | tad äha “pürvänubhüta$ cärtho ’nubhavena saha” iti | 
smrti$ ca jñänarüpaivety äha “smrtiprakäéa” iti, smrtiprakä$asya tätkalikatva- 


$The words underlined in the text are those literally cited in the IPVV. Punctuation is mine 
(that found in the MS is often misleading). In the edition, <...> means ‘addition with respect 
to the transmitted text; [...], means ‘elimination of portions of the transmitted text’ (also the 
indications ‘folio’ and ‘line are between square brackets). The sandhi has been ‘normalized’. The 
establishing of the text has resulted from the delicate balance of sometimes divergent factors: 
the text as transmitted by the codex unicus, internal coherence, literal citations in the IPVV, 
paraphrases in the IPVV, parallel texts. A few literal citations from the Vivrti can be found in 
the footnotes of the KSTS Ed. of the IPV, which have been derived from the marginal notes 
of an important MS of IPV, that given the siglum Gh in the edition of the IPV (the MS is 
now at the National Archives, Delhi, where I have consulted it). When the transmitted text 
has been modified, this has been pointed out by using three different expressions: emendation, 
conjectural emendation and tentative restoration. The first is felt as virtually certain, the second 
as highly probable, the third as a mere attempt. 

Ysmrti°, my conjectural emendation for bhäta® MS; cf. IPVV IL p.33, L. 13 sd avatärayati 
samksepena Smrtikäle ca iti. 
Vvärtamänika’, my conjectural emendation for vänumänika® MS. 
lekatvam, my conjectural emendation for ekataram MS. 
Zcit. p. 33, L. 14 as darsayan. 
3smartäram, my conjectural emendation for kartäram MS. 
#the avatäranika of IPV follows. 
Sthe IPV follows. 
6p. 36, L. 8 has eva ca (tadvritim ‘evam ca ityädikäm vivrnoti), which instead is omitted in 
the citation in the Vivrti (see below), ad äha ‘evam anubhava” iti; ca also added in the MSS 
TT used for my edition of the Wrrri. 
7a possible emendation of cyata to ucyatäm could be considered. 


480 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


vi$esanena vartamänatoktyà käladvayänusandhänät smartrsiddhir upaksipta, 
na ca smrtijñänasya vartamänävacchinnasya visayinah pürväanubhavasahito 


Vvisayyabhrasamäna- 


’nubhüto ’rtho ‘ütarüpasvakälävacchinno bhinnätmaiva 
tälaksanasya visayatvasya prakä$äd bhede saty anupapatteh | tad ahä “ava- 
bhäsamäna” iti | prakäsasvarüpäsvikäre paroksärthavat prakä$amänatvam na 


yuktam arthasya *f...f, etac coktam purastäd vaksyate ca | [18r] *'tad 


evam vartamänasmrtiprakä$atäm vinà paurvakälikärthänubhavasya arthasya 
ca tajjñaänadvayätmatäm vinàä smitivisayibhäva eva nopapadyata ity ukta 
smrtyanubhavayor anusandhänamayaikarüpätmasiddhih | tad äha “evam anu- 
bhava” iti | âdigrahanenotpreksädisamvid uktänubhavisyate punar artho mayeti 
bhavisyatkälänubhavenäpy utpreksäbuddher anusandhänät | kevalam atränu- 
bhavasmaranotpreksädinäm tattadvisayavaicitryäd viciträtmatayä dharmarüpa- 
täm va parikalpya taddharmavän eko ’nya ivätmä vyavahriyate, ?/vastuta evä- 
ntarmukhasyänyonyam abhinnätmanas tadätmatvam | tad äha “sa evätma” 
iti | svänubhavasmaranayor bhinnakälatve tadabhedino ’rthasyäpi pürväpara- 
bhävena kälabheda eva atha ca smrtäv arthasya #atitatäbhäsenaikyam uktam, 
tat katham etasya bhedäbhedalaksanaviruddharüpayogah syät | atrocyate — 
pürvänubhavajñänasya tâvat smrtijñaänad bhedena prathaiva nästity anantaram 
eva vaksyate | jñänänäm ca svatah kälayogäbhävah, kevalam jñeya[18v]gato 


’sau tatropacaryata ity etad api vaksyate | evam cänubhavasmitijñänayor 
anubhävyasmaryamänärthäbhedän na tävat tadapeksayä pürväparavyavahäro 


vastuta$ cäbheda evätmäparanämaä vaksyate, tasyaiva tv ätmanas sarvaéak- 


ter ISvarasya kälaaktya citravabhäsakäritaya tattadädityädikriyaäsaksatkära- 
laksanäbhäsasadasadbhyäm cabhäsabhedaprakä$anät kramävabhäsane vaksya- 
mänakälacintäkramenänubhavasmitijñänayoh éariradyavasthäbhäsakramopa- 
cäro västaväbhedo ’py“anayor | tadapeksam apy arthasya paurväparyam 
katham viruddham syät, na ca — smrtäv avabhäsamäno ’pi smaryamänärthah 
sphutäkäro nävabhäsata ity — äbhäsabhedäd api bhidyate vimarsäbhedäd ity 
etad api vaksyata eva | yady api?” pürvänubhavah prthak smrtau na prathate 


18 possible emendation of vartamäna® to vartamänatä® could be considered. 

Voisayyabhrasamänatä", my tentative restoration for visayad bhrasamänata® MS. 

201 reproduce the passage, apparently corrupt, for which I have not been able to find a 
plausible restoration: fvetarüpädauvesesvetamänayetiprasädasya. 

2lcit. p. 36, L. 8 as sad eva ca. 

Pyastuta eväntarmukhasyänyonyam abhinnätmanas tadätmatvam, my conjectural emenda- 
tion for vastu eväntarmukhà anyonyam abhinnätmanas tadätmatattvam MS. 

cit. as atitä” p.36, 1. 22 (also possible). 

# anayoh | tad°, my conjectural emendation for anayor atad° MS. 

Fit. p. 39 as yady api ca. 


Raffaele Torella 481 


tathäpi pürvänubhütatvenärthäsya prathanäd arthamayo ’sau prakä$ata eva | 
evam bhedavyavahäre ’pi tattvatas tadai/kyam evedänim darayati | tatha hiti || 

Viviti || naca prakä$amänatänyathänupapattyä prakä$änupravese ’pi 
ghatavad grahyäméävasthä[19r]nam pürvaänubhavasya grähakäméopärohena 
prathanäd ity äha || ?’[...] 

naiva hy anubhavo bhäti smrtau pürvo ’rthavat prthak | 

präg anvabhüvam aham ity ätmärohena bhäsanät || 4 || <I.4.4> 

2#8[...] [19v, L9] Vrttih || smrtau smaryamäno ’nubhütärtho yathä 
prthagbhüto bhäti na tathänubhavah svätmana evähantäpratyeyasyänubhava- 
mayatvena prathanät | ya$ cänekakälo ’hamvedyo ’rthah sa evatma || 

Vivrtih || smaranajñäne ghatädyarthäkära eva ekah pürvakälädyavacchinno 
grähyabhävasthah prthaktvenedantänirdeéyo ’vabhäti, na tu pürvanubhaväkäro 
#”parah | “smrtäv” iti | na cäsau yogino ‘titärthamätrajñäna iva pürvänubhavo 
naiva prakäéate ’hañkäräspadibhüta*"grähakäméänupravistasyäham anvabhü- 
vam ‘liti mayänubhüto ’rtha iti va pürvänubhavasya smartrbodhaikyena 
prakä$anät | mayänubhüta *?rtha ity atrapi artha eva prthagbhüto bhäti, 
anubhavas tu tadänim arthopasarjanabhä[20r]vena srjyamäno ’pi taduttirna 
ivedantäparämar$asamsparsäksamo ’hammaätravi$räntisatattvah, tasya tu yah 
sa iti sphuta iti ca parämaréah tad anubhävyadharmopacärena vyava- 


häramätram desakälädyavacchedaprthagbhäväd iti vaksyate | so ’ham evam 
äsam ity ätmanah pramätur api grahyatvena buddhyädidharmopacärena 
vyavahärät | vastutas tu nâtmä näpy anubhavajñänam anubhävyätiriktam 
grähyapakse rüpavad äbhätiti | yo ’yam ahampratitau prathamäno vedya- 
bhümikävatirno ’nekakälagatavedyonmukhatvamäträt pratyagätmatädasäyam 


tathänekakäla®topacäropacaryamänah sa evaätmä drastä smartä ceti | tad äha 
“yas cänekakäla” iti | vedyatä atra prathamänatätätparyenoktä na tv anyäyat- 
taprakäratvena *vedanakarmatayä || 

Vivrti || nanu prakä$änupravesam vinä prakä$amänatä mä bhüt, na tu 
tâvataiva prakä$yaprakä$akayor aikyäpattir grähyabhäga eva grähakäd vicchi- 


%in MS *kyam eve° corrects a previous *kyeneve’. 
27 the avatäranika of IPV follows. 
28the IPV follows. 
®aparah, my conjectural emendation for apara° MS. 
30° grähakämsa’, my emendation for *grähakäm ca’ MS. 
51 ri, my conjectural addition. 
32 ytha, my conjectural addition. 
3° pacäropacaryamänah, my emendation for ‘pocäracaryamänah MS (also possible: 
upacärenäcaryamänah ot upacäräcaryamänah). 

#in MS vedana’ apparently corrects a previous vedaka’. 


482 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


nne ghatädeh prakäéyasya prakä$äbhinnasyäpi prathanät, tathä yoginäm para- 
pramätrbodhah paratvenaivedantayä prakä$ate ’nyathäa bhräntih syät, tat 
katham jñänasya jñänäntaraägrähyatve ’nubhavavisayäyäh smrter anubhavena 
sahaikyam syäd iti || %[...] 

[20v, L. 12] yoginäm api bhäsante na dr$o dar$anäntare | 

svasamvidekamänäs tä bhänti meyapade ’pi va || 5 || <1.4.5> 

ST...) <21v L2> Vrttih || sarvajñänäm api pramätrantaragatä 
upalambhäh svasamvinmätravedyasvabhäväh svätmärüdhä eva bhäseran | atas 
ca 8 tesim yoginäm ’paramätmatäpattir eva “tattvam, prameyakaksyäyäm 
eva và ghatädivat prâtisvikena $uddhabodhätmanä rüpenävabhäseran, yadi 
tathä sambhavet || 

#Vivrtih || tad atra | yoginäm api parabodhah svasamvinmaya evävabhä- 
sate ’nyathä präguktanityä bodhatähänih syät svasamvedanaprathämätrarüpa- 
tvât tasya | grahyabhümigatatvenävabhäsanäbhyupagame ’pi và tasya smr- 


tyanubhavavrttäntavailaksanyam eva parabodhavisayayogivijñänotpatteh, na 
tv etan“?nidaréane ’nubhavasmrtyor grähyagrähakabhäva ity äha “yoginäam” 
iti | yogitvam iha upayujyamänatvät paroksajñänamätramayam nirdistam | 


tad äha “sarvajñnänäm” iti | yogipratyaksasya anyaprasiddhatvamätre sarva- 


jñagrahanam “krtam | “pramätrantaragatäh” pramätrantarasiddhäh prama- 
trantarätmänas tattadghatädibhinnabhävavisayä ity arthah | jñänänäm jñäna- 


ntaravedyatve svabhävahänih syäd iti “svabhäva”padam upättam näpy ubha- 
yavedyateti pratipädanäya “mâtra”grahanam | svasamvinmätralaksanatväc co- 


palambhasya svasamvinmätravedyatvam svabhävah [22r]** | svasyaiva sam- 
vit Ssvaiva samvit svasya samvid eva ca iti | jñänam svasamvillaksanam, 
6 


param api hi tat prakä$ayet svätmänam eva prakä$ayan na tu “svätmapra- 


Sjnänäntarägrähyatve, my conjectural emendation for jñänäntaragrähyatve MS. 

36the avatäranika of IPV follows. 

37the IPV follows. 

38MS inverts the order: yoginäm tesam: all the mss. of the Vriti read resäm yoginäm. 

I accept now the reading paramatmatä" MS, while in my edition ofthe Vrri I had preferred 
parätmatä’ (the mss. of the Vr#i oscillate between the two readings). 

0sattvam is written above the line to correct a previous #4 tu. 

yivrttih has been added in the left margin. 

2° midarsane, my emendation for ‘nidarsano MS. The reading ‘nidarsane is also found in the 
fn. 121 of IPV L, p.137, which reproduces literally (with the only addition of one explanatory 
gloss) the above passage of the Wivrti (grähyabhümi … grähyagrähakabhäva). 

ST delete na (4 krtam MS), which apparently does not fit the context. 

the passage “révanmätram laksanam hi esäm”, cit. p.44, 1. 10, might be a quotation from 


the Vivrti (not found in MS). 
45 


46 


svaiva, my conjectural emendation for svasya MS. 
svätma®, my emendation for svätma MS. 


Raffaele Torella 483 


kä$anäd aparam paraprakä$anam jñänasyeti svasyaiva samvit tathäbhütam ca 


sat | parenäpi yadä taj jñänam prakäsyate tadä näsya svaiva samvit, na ca 
svasya tat samvid eva syäd, api tu paräpeksaprakä$anatvät paräpy asya samvit, 
asamvid api ca taj jadasyaivamlaksanatvat | tadä tv etävat syät — “yam 


yoginam pratyupasthitam parapramätrjñänam svayam eva prakä$eta “tam 


praty asya evam jñanalaksanätikramo na syät | na tv etad upapadyate parena 


saha sambandhäyogät | jñänam ca visayalambhanam särüpye"naiva bhavati 
nilade$ ca jñänavilaksanarüpatvät tadanukärena jñänasya bhedäbhedaniba- 
ndhanam särüupyam upapadyate, jñänayos tu dvayor visayavisayinor ekabodha- 
mätralaksanatväd abheda eveti na särüpyam älambanärtho ’nayor, api tu 
aikyam eva | darpanayoh sarvarüpavailaksanyäd anyonyasärüpyam syät | jña- 
nayos tu bodharüpatätirikto de$akälayogävesaviseso ’pi hi na sambhavi | 
kimca yad yathäbhütam tadrüpenaiva jñänam tadäkäram bhavat tadvisayam 
bhavet, anilavyavacchinnena hi nilena niläkäram jñä[22v]nam 'tadvisayam, 
tata$ ca grähyavyavacchinnagrähakaikasvabhävena jñänena jñänäntaram tu- 
lyäkäram eva syäd | yadi hy ekabhäga eva niveéayet, etat pramusitasva- 
rüpam na kuryät | *?evam dvayor *aikyäpattyaiva visayavisayibhävah | tad 
äha “svätmärüdhä eva” iti | *svätmä jñänasya grähakäméah, parapramätrsam- 
bandhi tu éarirädi sarvajñajñäne bhedena grähyäméa evävabhäsate | tadabhi- 
prâyenaiva tu parasattänuprave$avisayam sarvajñajñänam iti vyavahärah | 
västavena tu bodhaikätmanä Ÿpramätrà pramätrantaraikyäpattir eva para- 
mätma”vedakatvam sarvajñasya | tad äha “yoginäm paramätmatäpattir eva” 
iti | na ca pramätrantarair aikye ’pi sarvajñasya parasukhaduhkhayogah 
sukhäder västave pramätari bodhaikalaksanähantämätraprathätmany asanni- 
vesät | mäyiya eva buddhyätmani pramätary ahantedantäpratitivisaye tasyäva- 


#7 yam, my tentative restoration for param MS (which, alternatively, could simply be deleted). 

cit. p. 45, L. 14 as tam yoginam prati (yoginam being most probably a gloss). 

Woit. p. 45, IL 15-16 as nanu etad api. 

50 “paiva, my emendation for ‘raivam MS. 

SIMS reads, incorrectly, 14 tadvisayam. 

S?evam, my emendation for eva MS (also possible, but less satisfactory: n4 kuryäd eva — 
aikyäpattyaiva …). 

in MS zikyäpattyaiva corrects a previous aikyäpattir eva (also possible*). 

Ssyätma, my conjectural emendation for svätma® MS. 

ST restore pramäträ, not found in MS (most probably dropped by haplography; see the 
following pramätrantara’). 

56° vedakatvam, my conjectural emendation for ‘vedanam MS (quoted p.47, 1.10 as 
‘vedakam); cf. L'11 ‘rattvam’ paramätmavedakatvam ity arthah (contra: cf. Il. 13-14 sarva- 
jhagrahanam [...] parätmavedakaparyäyatäm eti). 


484 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


sthitir iti vaksyate | ata eva grähakabhümikottirnänäm västavapramätrdasäsa- 
mäpannänäm tattatsvahetüpasthäpitasukhaduhkhasäksatkäre ’pi na sukhitvädi, 
tesim notpadyata eva va sukhädihetuvaikalyät | sahajänandävirbhävas tada 
syät | pürvajanmäntarapratyaksikäre ’pi yoginäm janmä[23r]ntaränubhüta- 
nâm arthänäm pürvänubhütatvena saksatkäre pürvänubhavaikyäpattir eva, 
tadä ca vartamänena mayä pürvajanmany anubhütam iti pürvänubhavanu- 
sandhänäj janmäntaränubhütena smrtir eväsau | pramätrantaradrstam artham 


pramätrantaradar$anena saha yadottarakälam saksätkaroti yogï, tadä tatpürva- 
vartipramätrantaradarsanaikyäpattyä säksätkarotiti smrtir eva sà | pramätranta- 
raikyäpattäv api ca svapratyagätmasamskäränivrttes tatpramätrantara”” 
papuryastakädi parapramätrtvenaivävabhäsate, sarvathä samskärapariksaye tv 


i$varäyamäno yogi sarvam ätma$ariram eva paéyati, na tasya jñänapravibhägah | 
58 


svarü- 


na vedyavedakabhävah, grahakabhävaikyäpattya 
svaparavibhägasamskärabhramée ’pi vastutah svasamvedanarüpatayaiva *”’bha- 
vantiti sthitam | abhyupagamyäpy ucyate — sarvajñasya pramätrantarä(nu- 
bhavä yadi grähyabhäga evaf!vabhäserams tad abhedenaivähañkärabahirbha- 
vena tatpramätrantarasambandhisarirabuddhyäkärottirnena bodhamaätrena- 


tad evam sarvathä jñänänäm 


tmanä idantayä paratvenävabhäseran | tad äha “prameyakaksyäyäm” iti 
S“brätisvikena $uddhabodhätmanz” iti ca | esa ca pakso noktanayena sam- 
bhavatity abhyupagamavädamätram evedam | tad äha “yadi tathä sam- 
bhaved” iti | iha tv aham anvabhüvam mayänubhütam iti grähakäméädhi- 
ropenaivedamS#bhävottirnatayaiva[23v] prathanäd anubhavasmaranajñänayor 
aikyam eva naïitattulyateti siddha evätmavädah | ätmanas ca aikyamätrenäpy 
Sananubhavasmaranädisaktimattvad aiévaryam na syäd, etac 
coktam vaksyate ca || 


audäsinyän 


57 
58 


*svarñpa” (or, also possible, ‘svaräpam), my emendation for ‘svaräpah MS. 
na, my conjectural addition (74, not found in MS, is strictly required by meaning). 
S’bhavantiti, my conjectural emendation for bhavatiti MS (the only possible subject being 
jñänäni understood from the previous jñänänäm). 
0° yubhavä yadi, my emendation for *nubhaväya MS. 
Slavabhäserams tad abhedena, my conjectural emendationfor anubhäseran | stadbhedena MS. 
Zprätisvikena, my emendation for svikena MS. 
Sanvabhüvam, my emendation for anvabhäyam MS. 
SE bhävo®, my conjectural emendation for *bhäso® MS. 
Sananubhava’, my conjectural emendation for ränubhava® MS. The citation p. 53, L. 17 of 
yävat, not found in MS, leaves some doubt on the last sentence as transmitted in MS. 


The Search in Saiva Scriptures for Meaning in Tantric 


Ritual* 


Juorr TÜRzZSôk 


INTRODUCTION 


The question whether ritual is meaningful or not and if yes, what meaning it 
can have, keeps haunting various fields of Indian studies. Although it would be 
important to summarise what conclusions have been reached so far, it would 
require another paper — or even a book — to give an overview of the situation. 
The aim and scope of the present paper being different, I need to skip the gen- 
eral discussion of the problem, in order to concentrate on some aspects of what 
certain Sanskrit texts actually say about Tantric ritual. Nevertheless, it can be 
remarked in general that whatever meaning the texts seem to find in the ritu- 
als they prescribe, it always necessitates the performer’s prior knowledge of this 
meaning. This knowledge then can be of various kinds, such as the recognition 
of ones identity with Siva or the knowledge of the hidden meaning of ritual 
elements etc. 


*This article is dedicated to the memory of Hélène BRUNNER, whose pioneering works on 
Saiva ritual have opened up a new field in Indian studies and have served as the most important 
sources on the subject. A first version of this paper was read at a workshop on Tantric ritual on 
the 20th of March, 2004, organised by Prof. Harunaga IsaAcsoN at the South Asia Institue of 
the University of Pennsylvania, Philadelphia. I am grateful to him and everybody present for 
important comments and criticism, especially for remarks made by Prof. George CARDONA and 
Shaman HATLev. À second, revised French version of the first half of the paper was presented 
on the 3rd of May 2004 at the Ecole Pratique des Hautes Etudes. I am grateful to Prof. Lyne 
BansaT-BouDon for the invitation and her very useful comments. Moreover, I would like to 
thank Dominic GoopaLz for his invaluable criticism and suggestions to improve this paper at 
its final stage. 

lThis paper owes much to Alexis SANDERSON* ground-breaking article on meaning in 
Tantric ritual (SANDERSON 1995). An important part of that article is devoted to an analy- 
sis of the ways in which Kashmirian exegetes, most importantly Abhinavagupta and Ksemaräja 
(of the 10th and 11th centuries AD), interpreted some aspects of Tantric ritual in an effort 
to infuse meaning into or to project some new meaning onto its elements. In addition to the 


486 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Leaving aside the exegetical interpretations, I shall attempt to give a number 
of examples taken from $aiva scriptural sources and to show that certain con- 
cerns about ritual already appear in these rather unsophisticated texts.? These 
passages could demonstrate that the exegetes were not the first to raise such 
questions. While in the majority of cases one can show only that the arguments 
are similar, in a few passages there are more than one reason to suspect that the 
exegetes made use of some ideas taken directly from these sources. Be as they 
may borrowings or parallel arguments, these extracts reveal that in spite of great 
differences in aims, method, and level of sophistication, the scriptures and their 
interpreters were often concerned with the same problems, albeit from differ- 
ent perspectives. The passages examined will then also show that there is an 
internal theoretical development within the scriptural tradition of questioning 
the meaning of ritual action, of searching for meaning in ritual. 

The examples given for various developments are meant as illustrations and 
are definitely not exhaustive. AÏl the sources examined here were available to 
the Kashmirian exegetes of the tenth and eleventh centuries. 

Among these sources, the Zantrasadbhäva is one that has a special place and 
importance. This text is one of the three surviving scriptures of the early phase 
of the Trika tradition, which forms the basis of Abhinavagupta’s exegesis.Ÿ Just 
as another early scripture of the Trika, the Siddhayogesvarimata.* it concentrates 
on the attainment of supernatural powers and the cult of yoginis and other fe- 


philosophy of the Pratyabhijñä school, their ultimate exegetical source was the esoteric systems 
ofthe Kaula Trika and the Krama, regarded as the highest in a hierarchy of tantric systems. The 
ideas of the Kaula and Krama systems were freely made use of when interpreting the scriptures 
of other tantric currents. 

2Such investigations would not have been possible without important recent contribu- 
tions to the study of $aivism. First, Dominic GooDALL critical edition and translation of 
the Paräkhyatantra made this important text available. In many passages, it is only thanks to 
his efforts that the text of the codex unicus has become intelligible. His introduction is also a 
major contribution to the study of the Siddhänta. Second, Somdev Vasupeva has identified 
and transcribed several early Kaula sources from Nepalese palm leaf manuscripts. I am grateful 
to him for having made his electronic texts available to me, of which the Kwlasära in particular 
has proved very important for this paper. He has identified à citation of the Kwlasära (fol. 38v) 
in Ksemaräjas Sivasätravimarsini p.136 and references to the title in Kubjikämata 20.67 and 
Kulacñdämani 1.9. Finally, it is also of great help to scholars of Saivism that Mark Dyczkowski 
made the electronic texts of a number of scriptures accessible on the website of the Muktabodha 
Indological Research Institute. However, in this article I make references to my own working 
edition of parts of the Tantrasadbhäva. 

3See SANDERSON 1988:672. 

#For an edition and translation of most of the text, see TORzsôK *1999. 


Judit Torzsôk 487 


male spirits associated with it; but it also discusses some aspects of ritual and 
gives some rather unique interpretations of some of its elements. Many of the 
quoted passages were then borrowed in a Kaula scripture, the Kwbjikämata, 
which is heavily indebted to the Trika tradition.” The fact that the Kubjika- 
mata borrows these very passages could be of double importance. First, it may 
show how elements of the early Trika became absorbed into the Kaula tradi- 
tion; second, it could possibly suggest that these questions about ritual, which 
were raised in a relatively early phase of the scriptural tradition, may have been 
a prompt for developments towards the overtly anti-ritualist Kaula systems. 

However, this mixed nature of the Zantrasadbhäva does not imply that it 
dates from before the appearance of the Kaula system or its earliest texts. At the 
present state of research, it would be difficult to establish a relative chronology, 
especially because many of the early Kaula texts have not survived.f There are 
two possibilities one could assume: either the Zantrasadbhäva represents a real 
transition between the yogin cults and the Kaula systems, or it was compiled at 
a date when some early Kaula scriptures were already in existence, thus uniting 
the two traditions in a relatively late compilation. The latter hypothesis seems 
more likely, especially in view of a similar case, that of the Mälinivijayottara. 
The Mälinivijayottara is the third of the three surviving scriptures of the early 
Trika, and just as the Zantrasadbhäva, it shows influences from different Saiva 
currents, thus suggesting a compilatory origin and a relatively later date among 
the early scriptures.? 

The questions about ritual that the texts examined here discuss are of diverse 
nature. First, I shall examine what general meaning some of the Tantras see in 
Saiva ritual. Then I shall give a few examples of the ways in which they interpret 
particular ritual elements or details. Finally, I shall raise the problem of how 
particular elements can be or can become meaningful for the ultimate purpose 
of ritual, and re-examine the question of the meaningfulness. 


See SANDERSON 1988:686f. and 2002:1. 
6On this problem, see Vasupeva 2004:XLI. 
7On the syncretic nature of the Mälinivijayottara, see VasupEva 2004:XXXIX ff. 


488 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


RITUAL AND ITS OVERALL MEANING: $SIVAHOOD IN INITIATION AND 
BEYOND 


$aiva initiation confers the right to practise certain rituals (both obligatory and 
optional) on the initiate and, at the same time, it is the purificatory rite that per- 
forms the major part of his preparation for final release. In its commonest form, 
which does not produce salvation immediately, initiation purifies the individ- 
ual soul while leaving certain residual impurities, which are then eliminated in 
the course of time. 

Among the earliest scriptural sources, all of which prescribe initiation to 
be performed with basically the same ritual structure, the scriptures of the Sid- 
dhänta appear to treat the purpose and meaning of initiation much more often 
than more esoteric schools teaching the cult of Bhairava and yoginis; and there 
may be a reason for that.Ÿ Tantras teaching the cult of Bhairava and yoginis con- 
centrate much more on the attainment of supernatural powers and on worldly 
enjoyments that result from the attainment of such powers, and therefore are 
less concerned with the meaning of rites that lead to these (for them) obvious 
results. But the scriptures of the Saiva Siddhänta aim primarily at salvation,? 
which normally happens only at the time of death. Therefore, they have prob- 
ably more reason to argue and demonstrate why and how that (in this life) 
invisible result shall come about after considerable time of dedication. As the 
Tantrasadbhäva puts it: AI teachings say that initiation equals liberation; but 


liberation is invisible, although it is proven by a visible cause. !° 


In fact, envisaging a question about the very existence of Liberation as such 
was not inconceivable to the Saiva tradition: 


PRATODA SPOKE: 
Some hold that this liberation is empty of the existence of all things, since it is 


8On some other questions concerning initiation and liberation in the Siddhänta, see 
GoopaLL 2006. 

?This does not mean they do not teach the attainment of supernatural powers; but their 
focus is different. See SANDERSON 1988. 

10 Tantrasadbhäva (9.236, referring to the various visible signs one is supposed to display 
when initiated): isanänäm tu sarvesäm diksä mokso vadanti hi | sa ca moksas tv adrstas tu sa- 
dhyate drstahetunä. This argument is Less sophisticated than what SANDERSON 1995:24 refers to 
before elucidating the theological problem and the answers exegetes have tried to give. ‘Tt is only 
here [i.e. in the obligatory worship of those who seek liberation alone] that it was felt necessary 
to formulate explanations of the far from obvious process by which ritual as the manipulation 
of finite forms and quantities could achieve the infinite and absolute state of liberation.” 


Judit Torzsôk 489 


when the existence of those has reality that the soul is involved in what charac- 
terises samsära. 

PRAKASA SPOKE: 

If liberation were not real, a means [to accomplish it] could not reach it, since 
its nature should be to accomplish a [really existing] goal. [And] who would use 
a means [to such a goal]?!! 


It is also notable that among the demonstrably early scriptures of the Siddhänta 
the texts concerned with the problem of how ritual works and what its meaning 
is are relatively late. !? This may be due to the fact that such questions were raised 
only after the Saiva Siddhänta established itself to some extent and it was felt 
that a somewhat more solid theoretical defence of the system was needed. Such 
defence may have also been prompted by the fact that other ($aiva) schools tried 
to challenge the original ritual system. It is also noteworthy that scriptures other 
than those of the Siddhänta discussing this problem also seem to belong to a 
relatively later layer of the tradition (such as the Zantrasadbhäva). 

As to the purpose ofinitiation, it is often brought out in a semantic analysis 
(nirvacana), which is frequently cited by the exegetes.!"* In all versions of this 
analysis, initiation, dksd is derived from two verbs: to give, d4-, and to destroy, 
ksi-. The Paräkhyatantra, which has à relatively long discussion of the subject, 
puts it in the following words (15.10): 


It bestows (44-) Sivahood and destroys (ksi-) the bonds of the soul — therefore 
it is called intiation (4/ksä), established as such because of the bestowing and 
destroying functions. !{ 


ll Pratoda uväca: sarvärthabhävasünya sà kesäm cin muktir ipsitä | yatas tadbhävasadbhäve 
pumän samsäradharmagah || Prakä$a uväca: abhävarüpayä muktyà sädhanam na tadäfritam | 
sädhyasädhanarüpatvat prayoktä sädhanasya kah || Paräkhya 15.46-47. Translation quoted 
from GoopaLz 2004:399. As remarked by GoopaLz 2004:399 in view of the subsequent dis- 
cussion, it is not very likely that a particular rival conception is referred to when the real exis- 
tence of liberation is questioned. However, the argument could be perhaps that of a Sänyavädin. 

For the relatively late date of the Mararñgapäramesvara and the Paräkhya, which are used 
here, see GoopaLL 1998:lxxiii-lxxiv. As GoopaL 2004:lviii concludes, the Paräkhya is per- 
haps the latest of the early listed scriptures of the Siddhänta. Among the early Saiddhäntika 
scriptures, it is only the Myrgendra, the Matañgapäramesvara and the Paräkhya that have more 
developed theological discussions (see GoopaLz 2004:xlviii). 

This semantic analysis is mentioned in SANDERSON 1992:287 and GoopaLz 2004:386 
note 865. For yet more examples and their translations, see Somasambhupaddhati vol. 3, pp. 3- 
4. See also Bhairavamañgalä 257b-d, with a slightly different wording: fvatvam ca pradiyate | 
a$ivà (2) malaksayam krtvà dikslä] iti vidhïyate (iti corr. Somdev Vasupeva: itya MS). 


gvatvasya pradänam yat ksapanam päsasamtateh | tena diksà samäkhyätà taddänät ksapanät 


490 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


As pointed out above, normally neither of these two aspects of initiation is 
fully carried out in the rite of initiation itself. For if the initiate was to obtain 
perfect Sivahood, and if all his bonds that tie him in this world were to be cut, 
he would cease to live and would become $iva or Siva-like immediately. Instead, 
what initiation bestows is supposed to mature through time, as explained in the 
same text about the fruit of initiation: 


Its fruit arises through maturation, just as [fruit arises] from sowing seeds in the 
ground. That fruit is Siva-hood, which releases [from the bonds], [and] which 
is of the nature of bliss.!° 


The above cited semantic analysis of the word ‘initiation’ occurs in slightly 
different forms in other texts. According to these variants, things to be given 
and to be destroyed are not exactly the same. The citations below replace the 
attainment of Sivahood with that of knowledge, and the bonds that are severed 
with the impressions of the bound soul or karmic residues obliterated. 


True knowledge is bestowed (4;-yate) and the impressions of the bound soul 
are destroyed (ks7-yante). Therefore, because it is associated with bestowing and 
destroying, it is called here initiation (d5k54). 


‘True knowledge is bestowed and the impression of actions is destroyed. There- 
fore, because it is capable of bestowing and destroying, it is called initiation; it 
is the purification of those who are ready.!7 


The variations concerning what is eliminated, whether it is the impressions 
of the bound soul (paf) or actions (karma) that are destroyed seems less impor- 
tant here. Although being a bound soul implies not only karmic bonds, what 


sthitä || For a different formulation with the same purport, see Matañgañgapäramesvara 
Kriyäpäda 2.2-3b (also referred to in GoopaLz 2004:389, note 865): dänam näma parä kästhà 
mantrapradhvastakarmanäm | pasor yä vyaktim äyäti praksinakalusasya ca || anayoh Sasane sid- 
dhà diksä ksapanadänayoh. 

5 paripäkät phalam tasyà bijaksepäd yathä bhuvi | änandalaksanam tat syäc chivatvam mu- 
ktidam phalam, Paräkhya 15.45. Translation by GoopaLz 2004:399. 

\6diyate jñänasadbhävah kstyante pasuväsanäh | dänaksapanasamyuktà diksä teneha kirtitä, 
scripture cited by Jayaratha ad Tanträloka 1.43 and by Ksemaräja ad Svacchandatantra 5.87, 
replacing the second päda with the singular of the same words.) See also diyate paramam jñänam 
ksiyate karmaväsanä, scripture cited by Yogaräja ad Paramärthasära 3. 

l/Cited by Bhatta Näräyanakantha in his Mrgendravrtti ad Mreendragama Kriyapäda 8.1 
diyate jñänasadbhävah ksiyate karmaväsanà | dänaksapanayogyà hi diksä Suddhih krtätmanäm. 
The first compound is translated more literally as ‘true nature, which is Knowledge (la nature 
vraie, qui est Connaissance) by BRuNNER 1985:198. 


Judit Torzsôk 491 


is destroyed during the most part of initiation is karmic impurity. This could 
explain why karmaväsanä appears here as a synonym of pasuväsanä, even if, 
strictly speaking, the latter would imply more than karma. 

The transfer of knowledge instead of Sivahood in some versions is possibly 
more significant. What can be intended here by (true) knowledge is the realisa- 
tion of one*s identity or similarity with Siva, which ultimately leads to Sivahood 
after some maturation, as the passage above explained. But knowledge may also 
stand for one of Siva' qualities the initiate shall finally obtain at the time of his 
liberation: omniscience. 

This variant leads us to the question of the role of knowledge in $aiva ritual 
in general. For it is knowledge of $aiva doctrine, transmitted in the course of 
initiation, that can possibly ensure that the performer of the ritual perceives 
and understands the meaning of what he does. 

It is often reiterated that one of the major differences between the dual- 
ist Siddhänta and nondualist schools of $aivism is that the latter gives more 
importance to knowledge, in the sense that it sees Liberation primarily as the 
knowledge or realisation of one’ identity with Siva. By contrast, dualist Saivas 
maintain that initiation must always involve and depends on external (i.e. not 
internal, mentally performed) ritual, which removes (most) impurities in the 
same way as one removes a cataract from the eye. Now this opposition is cer- 
tainly present in exegetical texts,” but it does not imply that knowledge in gen- 
eral is more important for the nondualists. For, as SANDERSON (1995:40-41) 
points out, dualist exegetes claim that the practitioner can remove impurities 
that remain after initiation only if his daily ritual is also a cognitive action. It 
is nevertheless true that according to this theory, knowledge works as a kind of 
action and not as knowledge. 

If we turn to the scriptures, some that are qualified as dualist or belonging 
to the Siddhänta lay rather heavy emphasis on the role of knowledge, and it 
seems they do so much more often than the supposedly nondualist texts of 
yogini cults. They explain the link between Sivahood and knowledge as follows: 


The real nature of $iva is revealed to the individual so that his knowledge may 
manifest itself. Enlightened by this knowledge, he will appear as $Siva and he 


181 must also be remarked that the Paräkhya perhaps deliberately tranformed the line into a 
more recognisably $aiva definition by replacing knowledge with Sivahood and karma with ‘the 
bound soul (paÿu). The Matañgapäramesvara also presents à more shaivite version. 

For the categories of dualist and nondualist in various Tantric senses and in the scriptures 
as opposed to exegetical sources, see SANDERSON 1992:282fF. 


492 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


will be Siva when his body ceases to exist.2° 


When one is initiated by a guru, due to an intense descent of Siva's Power, one 
becomes omniscient like Siva, being devoid of limited knowledge; then one is 
filed with the manifestation of Sivahood and one shall not return to the world 
of transmigration.?! 


He [the person who has attained Sivahood] has that true knowledge which is 
left, all bonds [having] fallen away it. It is pure, has everything as its object and 
is devoid of all limitations.?? 


When ignorance and ones limited power to act are consumed by the fire 
of knowledge, then all dispositions of the mind such as passion [or desire 
(abhiläsa), egotism (ahamkära)], together with things beyond this range [i.e. 
anything else produced by ignorance*], will be destroyed immediately. From 
that moment, one [remaining] karmas are destroyed and one will obtain un- 
limited Sivahood, visibly and completely.?{ 


Knowledge as a powerful instrument and an important aim appears in con- 
texts other than initiation and the direct attainment of $Sivahood. It is also 
claimed as necessary for the performance of any ritual. Ritual and knowledge 
about what it means are thus inseparably linked, as it is explained in the pas- 
sage below, using the more general concepts of ‘action’ (which implies more 
specifically ritual action) and ‘knowledge’. 


Knowledge by itself is not seen to produce results, since, when [objects of de- 
sire such as] women or food are cognised, enjoyment of them is not possible 
without action. So too action depends on knowledge, for action is necessarily 


2nänaäbhivyaktaye vyaktam fivatattvam anum prati | vyakto Sau Sivavad bhäti fiva eva tanu- 
ksaye, Matañgapäramesvaratantra, vidyäpäda 26.72. 

2 Hvrasaktinipätena gurunà diksito yadà | sarvajñah sa fivo yadvat kiñcijiñatvavivarjitah || 
fivatvavyaktisampürnah samsäri na punas tadä, Kiranatantra 1.21-22ab. For a different trans- 
lation according to Rämakantha interpretation, see GoopaLz 1998:215#. 

Psajjñänam tasya tacchistam sarvapäsaparicyutam | fuddham tat sarvavisayam sarvopädhiba- 
biskrtam (Paräkhya 15.65) describing true knowledge in the state of Sivahood, along with true 
dispassion, power and dharma. Translation by GoopaLz 2004. 

3 According to Rämakanthas commentary ad loc. 

M yadà vidyägninà plustä sävidyà kalayä saha | madädayas tadäà sarve hy äsayä$ cordhvago- 
caräh | dhvamsam äyänti vai ksipram; tatksanät ksinakarmanah | pumso mitam $ivatvam syät 
prakatam sarvatomukham (Matañgapäramesvaratantra, vidyäpäda 26.75cd-77ab). 

2The context of the following passage is the discussion of the four means (sädhana) one can 
employ to attain liberation, viz. knowledge (jñäna), (ritual) action (kriyä), yoga and observances 
(caryä). The arguments, however, go beyond these specific considerations. 


Judit Torzsôk 493 


preceded by knowledge. Therefore both knowledge and action come together 
as the means to attain the fruit. And caryä [[observances]] and yoga are taught 
to be subsidiary to knowledge and action.?° 


According to passages cited above, the transfer of Saiva knowledge can 
have several roles after initiation: it reveals and confirms the initiate’s Sivahood, 
which he will fully obtain after death; it destroys by itself several negative dis- 
positions of the bound soul (so knowledge has the power to act on the bonds of 
the bound soul); and $aiva knowledge is also indispensable in order to perform 
Saiva ritual after initiation, which in turn also contributes to the full destruction 
of the bonds. 

But this efficiency of knowledge — as well as ritual action — can only work for 
those who have the right to perform post-initiatory practices. Women, children, 
the elderly, the hedonists and other such weak creatures are unable to obey post- 
initiatory rules of pratice, and therefore are excluded from (ritual) action and 
knowledge: 


And for children and others [incapable of following the post-initiatory obser- 
vances of the cult], He has taught the cleansing of post-initiatory observances 
and such, by which the activities referred to as knowledge and action are there- 
fore excluded for them.?” 


The same scripture also raises the question of meaningfulness in another 
context. It concludes that life-cycle rites and the like are meaningful only inas- 
much as they ensure a social framework for Saivas, which is important to show 
to the outside, non-$Saiva world.28 


Celibacy [and other observances] are for the sake ofthe [continued] functioning 
of social institutions and practices. Otherwise Saivas would be reviled as being 
without correct practices and without social groupings. There are no particular 


26 kevalatvena na jñänam dr$yate phalasädhakam || yatah stribhaksavijñäne tatsukham na kri- 
yojhitam | jñänäpeksä kriyäpy evam jñänapürva yatah kriyà || ato jñänakriye dve ‘pi phalopäya- 
samägate | caryäyogäv api proktau citkriyänugatäv api (Paräkhya 15.14cd-16). Translation by 
GoopaLL 2004:391-392. 

27 baälädinäm api proktam samayädivisodhanam | vyäpäro drkkriyäkhyo ‘to vyävritas tesu yena 
sah (Paräkhya 15.31). Translation by GoopaLz 2004:395. 

28T understand that brahmacarya here stands metaphorically for practices belonging to life- 
cycle rites and other rituals, defined and prescribed by Smrtis and practised by $aivas and 
non-$Saivas alike; but that it does not cover Saiva initiation and daily ritual. For a different 
interpretation, see GOODALL 2004:394. 


494 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


benefits of those [practices and so forth to be derived] from the variety of prac- 
tices that can be chosen; but still this variety of practices must be protected, just 
as [the caste hierarchy of] brahmins and the other castes [must be respected] .?? 


À similar view is expressed at one place in another, earlier scripture,* which 
states that any post-initiatory expiation is performed only to keep up appear- 
ances. Although the text refers to expiatory or reparatory rites (präyascitta) in 
particular, which are meant to make up for omissions and faults committed 
while performing other ritual actions, it may understand that expiation includes 
most post-initiatory rites by extension; and that those initiated do not need any 
ritual, for they are already liberated. Indeed, apart from certain elements in daily 
ritual, all other rites were or could be generally considered expiatory.°! 


Those who belong to the four varnas, of unmixed origin, and have been purified 
by $aiva initiation are released from all sins, just as those who are absorbed in 
Saiva knowledge.?? [For them,] any [post-initiatory] expiation is taught only to 
protect common social practice.” 


Although the passages cited justify the necessity of knowledge including 
ritual knowledge, and, in one way or other, maintain that at least certain post- 
initiatory rituals and practices are needed, they do not clarify why or in what 
particular way post-initiatory ritual contributes to the destruction of the re- 
maining bonds or impurities in the course of time. 

The answer given by the exegetes* is that the daily enactment of one’ trans- 
formation into Siva, which is a necessary part of all Saiva worship, gradually 


#äsramäcäravrttyartham brahmacaryam iha sthitam | nindyäh syur anyathä saivä niräcärà 


niräsramäh || na tatphalaviseso ti vrttibhedair vikalpitaih | tathäpi paripälyo sau vrttibhedo 
dvijädivat || (Paräkhya 15.28-29). Translation by GoopaLL 2004:394. 

30 (Pauskara-)Päramesvaratantra cited in GoopaLL 1998:361. 

310n this idea, deriving from Vedic ritual theory, see SANDERSON 1995:31 

32The last clause may be understood in two ways. It could mean that those absorbed in Saiva 
knowledge are liberated even if they are not of unmixed origin etc. (This has been followed 
in the translation.) Or it could have à restrictive sense, i.e. that not only one has to belong 
to the four varnas, of unmixed origin etc, but also absorbed in $aiva knowledge in order to 
be liberated. The grammatical structure suggests the former interpretation, but the restrictive 
meaning could equally have been intended, for the last clause may be added there in this form 
for metrical reasons. 

3 varninah Suddhajätiyä[h] sivadiksävisodhitäh | vimuktäh sarvapäpebhyah fivajñänaparäs ca 
Je || lokasamvrttiraksärtham präyascittam prakirtitam (cited by GoopaLz 1998:361, who un- 
derstands the passage to mean that all post-initiatory observances are unnecessary). 

34$ee SANDERSON 1995:38f. and 1992:287. 


Judit Torzsôk 495 


contributes to the ultimate tranformation obtained only at death. Although 
exegetes would differ in the interpretation of how exactly this contribution to 
Sivahood takes place, they would agree on the necessity of daily rites due to this 
principle. And this enactment of Sivahood is indeed prescribed in all scriptures. 
Their principle is often cited in the form of “fivo bhütvä fivam yajer”: becoming 
Siva, one should worship Siva.° 

While the exegetical understanding seems sensible, I have not found any 
actual occurrence of such interpretation of the daily ritual in the scriptures. 
Either it was something too obvious for their authors to state, or it was simply 
not one of their major concerns.f 

What is nevertheless quite remarkable is that some early scriptures of the 
Siddhänta do question the point and meaning of certain rites. Even if these 
questions are rare and cannot be called typical, they show us that such doubts 
were not voiced only by anti-ritualist Kaula texts. These argumentative passages 
form an important part of the history of ritual interpretations. 

Another noteworthy element in these arguments is that, at least in some 
cases, it is accepted that some — or even most — rites are performed only for 
the sake of preserving common social practice, in order to maintain a façade of 
conformity. Part of the difference between the ritualists and the anti-ritualists 
then is simply that the former want to preserve this façade, while the latter do 
not find it necessary. *” 


3 Another possibility has been proposed by Richard H. Davis (1992b). He suggests that 
what is enacted in the course of daily worship is the divine cosmological activities of emission 
and reabsorption, and that it is — at least partly — by this enactment of the divine functions that 
one’ tranformation is effected. Examples for reabsorption include the reabsorption of all the 
levels of the universe (sattvas of the subtle body) before worship, and the return ofthe secondary 
circles of deities into the central one, $iva, at the end of a päj4. Emission is performed when the 
worshipper creates his divine body with mantras, or when he visualises the secondary circles of 
deities (ävaranas) around $iva. Such practice of creating and reabsorbing the universe and the 
senses seems to be described in Paramärthasära 78 as a special kind of mantra recitation (japa); 
but here there may be an allusion to a more esoteric Kaula practice. In Yogaräjas commentary ad 
loc. (p.150), “srstisthitisamhärakramensa should be emended to “srstisamhärakramena, à reading 
found also in the ms. Wilson (531e) at the Bodleian library. 

36] is of course also possible that I have failed to identify this interpretation or a relevant 
passage in the available corpus, or that a now lost text dealt with it. 

37This difference of attitude is also reflected in two similar pädas: lokasamorttiraksärtham (‘in 
order to protect common social practice’) in the above citation of the (Pauskara)Päramesvara as 
opposed to lokapravrttihetvarthe (because of social practice”) in à passage of the Tantrasadbhäva 
quoted below. 


496 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


THE SIGNIFICANCE OF PARTICULAR ELEMENTS OF A RITUAL 


Another way in which ritual is or can be considered meaningful is if its con- 
stitutive elements are meaningful, in other words, if each of its elements taken 
separately contribute to the ultimate purpose, whether directly or indirectly. 
Here, I shall examine four ways in which scriptures attribute meaning to cer- 
tain elements of ritual. The first is the identification of various elements with 
Siva, the second is the analysis of the meaning of elements in the immediate 
ritual context, the third is giving meaning to some elements irrespective of the 
ritual context in the form of semantic analyses, and the fourth is attributing 
meaning through internalisation of some ritual elements. 


THE MEANING OF ELEMENTS IN RELATION TO SIVA: IDENTIFICATION OF A SUP- 
PORT WITH SIVA 


In the course of all Saiva ritual, various factors of the rite are transformed into 
Siva, by infusing mantras into them. This fact has been emphasised by nondu- 
alist exegetes in order to affirm that it promotes awareness of ones identity with 
the god, and thus leads to liberation. In fact, the same procedure is seen in 
all the Tantras and manuals, not only in those of the nondualist school. More- 
over, this identification is practised not only in view of final liberation, but also 
to obtain success in this world. Scriptures abound in lists of factors which are 
thus transformed. The following is just a sample to illustrate the idea in various 
ritual contexts, from daily ritual to initiation and rites of magic. 


One should worship the Lord of gods in an image (/rige), on a platform, in 
the fire-pit [as the sacred fire] or in the [practitioner’s] body — thus is it always 
taught.*? 


After the päjä performed in this way on the platform and in the [purificatory] 
chalice, one should worship the Highest Lord in the fire-pit and in ones own 


38O0n the nonduality of the factors of action, see SANDERSON 1995:48—49 

® Sväyambhuvasätrasamgraha 17.28 (in the context of daily ritual): päjayed atha devesam 
liñge va sthandile pi va | agnikunde ‘thavä dehe nityam evam prakirtitam. Here as elsewhere, 
liñga probably does not denote the well-known phallic representation of $iva, but may mean 
any kind of image in which $iva is installed. The platform usually implies the mandala drawn 
on it, but other objects can also be placed there. Siva is made to be born in the fire from 
the Goddess of speech (Vägi$vari), and he is identified with the ritual fire in the course of 
fire offerings. He is propitiated, and takes part in the purificatory procedure during initiation. 
‘Body signifies the practitioners own body, transformed into Siva by the appropriate mantras. 


Judit Torzsôk 497 


body.“ 


Ifone worships Him properly on ones hand, on the platform, in an idol (/irge), 
on the #andala, in the rice-offering, in the water [of the purificatory chalice], 
one shall obtain the fruit of initiation.f! 


One should visualise Rävana with the Sword [Khadgarävana, à manifestation 
of Siva] together with his Female Mantra-companions in ones body, in an idol, 
in the middle of the sacrificial fire and on a platform.#? 


While these identifications explain the 74son d'être of the major factors of 
Saiva worship, they do not attribute meaning to smaller elements and minor 
details of the ritual, nor do they explain why certain minor actions are per- 
formed. 


THE MEANING OF ELEMENTS IN RELATION TO EACH OTHER, IN THE IMMEDIATE 
RITUAL CONTEXT 


A certain number of elements which are not identified or identifiable with Siva 
can gain significance because they fit into a longer ritual sequence whose final 
aim is the preparation of one of the factors identified with Siva. In these cases, 
the link of the particular element with the rest is quite obvious and does not 


#0 Tantrasadbhäva 9.119 (in the context of initiation): eva sampüjayitva tu sthandile kalase 
tathà | kunde cätmasarire ca püjayet paramesvaram. 

# Svacchandatantra 3.31cd-32ab (in the context of initiation): suahaste sthandile liñge 
mandale caruke tathà | jale cägnau ca sampüjya samyag diksäphalam labhet. Siva worshipped 
on ones hand means the so-called Svahasta or ‘Siva’s hand’. The guru ritually places the ap- 
propriate mantras on his right hand, which is thus tranformed into Siva. He then puts his 
hand ceremonially on the initiand’s head, thus transferring $iva’s power onto him. See e.g. So- 
masambhupaddhati 3 p.97. As BRUNNER explains in note 245 on p.98fF, this gesture may have 
been the most important moment ofinitiation at an earlier date. Tantras teaching goddess wor- 
ship call this hand the $zktihasta ‘the hand of $Siva's power’ and prescribe the transformation of 
the left hand, instead of the right one. See e.g. Brahmayämala 38.3-5 (187r3). The purificatory 
elements, fire and water, are also worshipped as $iva, just as the rice-offering made to Him. 

#2 Kriyäkälagunottara fol. 57v (for the attainment of supernatural powers): ätmadehe tathà 
liñge agnimadhye ca sthandile | dhyäyet khadgesvaram devam(dhyäyet em : dhyäyeta) vidyä- 
mantraïs tu ävrtam. In the context of the attainment of supernatural powers, it may be signifi- 
cant that the male deity is not invoked on his own in the usual /oci of worship, but accompanied 
by a host of goddesses or demonesses. In various Tantras of different branches (e.g. the Suaccha- 
ndatantra, the Kriyäkälagunottara, the Matañgapäramesvara, and the Siddhayogesvarimata), the 
same phenomen can be observed quite often. When the deities are invoked to bestow super- 
natural powers, they are often accompanied by a larger circle of deities, which usually includes 
additional female deities. For some more details and references, see Tôrzsôk 2003:203f. 


498 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


need any clarification. I shall give two examples of such contextually required 
or justified rites. The first is the case of hand-gestures, mudräs. By simple anal- 
ogy, they are associated with certain ritual acts which are reinforced or even 
performed by them. À text confirms that they are to be shown to complete the 
ritual action (päranäya kriyävidheh Mrgendra Kriyäpäda 3.264). Thus, the pres- 
ence of four different mudräs are justified by the actions they perform, as in the 
following passage: the invocation of the deity is accompanied by the hand ges- 
ture of Invocation, then the god is installed with gesture of Establishing, greeted 
with the gesture of Homage and retained with the mudrä of Blocking.“ 


One should invoke the mantra-body [of Siva] following the sequence of cre- 
ation, starting from the end of the mantra [i.e. from the point situated twelve 
inches above the head according to Näräyanakantha], creating the ancillary- 
mantras of He Who Has the Radiance of the Rising Sun. This is to be done 
with the gesture of Invocation. Then one should establish Him in a support 
made of His powers® with the gesture of Establishing, and after receiving Him 
with the gesture of Homage, one should make him stay there with the Blocking 


gesture. 


Bt is noteworthy that the commentator, Näräyanakantha, does not seem happy with this 
straightforward explanation of how the gestures function. Therefore, he gives a general seman- 
tic analysis of the word, which is based on another passage of the same text: the gestures 
(mudrä) seal (mudrayanti) the numerous obstacles [i.e. demons] that could have found some 
occasion [to interfere with the rite]; the gestures do not let them free, that is why they are called 
mudräs. (…labdhävakä$am vighnaugham mudrayanti na tu svätantryam kurvantiti mudräh). Cf. 
Mrgendra Kriyäpäda 5.2ab, whence this derivation comes. I come back to this irvacana below. 

#This is normally done by identifying five sections of the body with five large segments of 
the universe, five parts of Siva's fivefold mantra and five $Saiva ancillary mantras, starting from 
the uppermost of each (the downward movement representing creation, the way in which the 
created object is further and further away from its source, the creator). The equivalences can 
slightly differ in various Tantras. For two examples, see Somasambhupaddhati vol. 3, PL IL, IV 
and V. 

The word sgktavigraha refers to the term vidyämürti or ‘female mantra body according to 
Näräyanakantha ad loc. (nirlingä dandäkärä vidyämürtih): Sivas body made up of his mantras, 
having no particular visual representation apart from being arranged vertically. See BRUNNER 
1985:48. 

#6 Mrgendra Kriyäpäda 3.12cd-14ab: mürtäv ävähanam kuryän manträntät srstivartmanà || 
navärkatejaso ‘ngäni vidhäyävähamudrayä | sthäpanyä sthäpanam kuryäc chäktavigrahasam- 
$raye || pranatyä samnidhikrtya nirudhyäd rodhamudraya. For an illustration of how to perform 
the hand gestures, see e.g. Somasambhupaddhati vol. 1, PI. I, keeping in mind that Tantras can 
slightly differ on this subject. 


Judit Torzsôk 499 


Another, different kind of example of how ritual elements depend on each 
other and form a sequence could be the various rites performed around the fire- 
pit, which is identified with Siva. Siva is in fact born there from the goddess of 
speech, Vägiévari, whose presence implies a whole series of rites. À small house 
is symbolically created for her with sacred ku$a grass; she is protected behind 
a curtain visualised around her, and before she conceives she is ritually given 
a bracelet to be tied on her right wrist so that she should have a male child. 
Thus, a major factor in Saiva ritual, the fire identified with Siva, justifies and 
necessitates a chain of minor rites. It is, however, never questioned why just 
exactly these actions are needed to establish Siva in the fire.“ 

The concatenation of minor rites is something one can observe in various 
contexts. But just as the association of mwdräs with the corresponding ritual ac- 
tions are too obvious to point out, so too the ways is which minor ritual items 
are linked to each other are left unexplained. Rather than stating such trivial 
matters, the scriptures devote their attention to more complex associations of 
ritual and meaning. Why is Siva worshipped in such and such forms? What 
is the purpose of carrying attributes such as the sword? What is the point of 
performing ritual in prescribed places, at crossroads, on the top of a mountain 
etc? What is the actual role of consorts in ritual? The scriptures do attempt to 
provide answers to such questions. However, it must be remarked that in most 
cases, the replies they give are not the more or less obvious ones we would ex- 
pect them to say. In several examples below, instead of offering straightforward 
explanations, some texts develop what could be called an exegetical discourse 
on each subject. And in so doing, they sometimes anticipate their own, later, 
exegesis by writers such as Abhinavagupta and Ksemaräja. Indeed, it seems that 
some of these texts are the first to write the exegesis of their own tradition. 


THE MEANING OF ELEMENTS ON THEIR OWN I: SEMANTIC ANALYSES 


In analysing less evident and more hidden links between ritual and meaning, 
the scriptures often turn to a traditional exegetical device: semantic analysis 
(nirvacana). The nirvacana of deity names is a device through which the ex- 
egetes, most notably Abhinavagupta and Ksemaräja, often encoded additional, 
more esoteric meaning into their cult. But in this too, there are some scriptural 
antecedents, even if their analyses are far from being as learned and complex 
as the exegetical ones. Moreover, the aim of the scriptures is obviously not the 


47 For the sequence, see e.g. Svacchandatantra 2.183. 


500 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


same as that of the exegetes in that they do not try to infuse the system of the 
Krama into them; these nirvacanas are attempts to fit all details into the ritual 
and doctrinal complex and thus to enrich their meaning. 

One such semantic analysis appears in an unpublished anti-ritualist Kaula 
text, the Kulasära.“8 Interestingly, it concerns the name of Bhairava, a favourite 
object of analysis in the Kashmirian exegetical literature. This well-known name 
describing a frightening form of $iva denotes ‘the Terrifying One’ and derives 
in fact from the adjective bhzru, which comes from the verb bhj- ‘to be afraid.#? 
Abhinavagupta and Ksemaräja propose several complex exegetical analyses of 
the word. According to one one of them, the name is derived from an aggregate 
of three verbs: bbr-, ru- and vam-. The first verb ‘to hold, to nourish’ expresses 
that Bhairava holds and nourishes the world while he himself is held and nour- 
ished by the universe in which he is manifest. The second verb, r- ‘to roar’, 
shows that Bhairava manifests the world as sound within himself. The third 
verb vam- in the sense ‘to vomit or ‘to emit refers to the fact that he emits or 
creates the universe, even if it is ultimately identical with him. The three verbs 
thus reflect the three divine functions, maintenance (s#hiti with bhr-), retraction 
or resorption of the world into the god (samhära with ru-) and creation (srs#i 
with vam-).5® The analysis of the Kulasära is much simpler, deriving the name 
from only one verbal root. But it agrees with Ksemaräja and Abhinavagupta 
in making it come from the verb br, to hold, in the sense that he holds or 
nourishes the universe and | or that he manifests himself as the universe. 


bharitam tena cäsesam akalpanakalädikam 
By Him everything is maintained | nourished | filled up, from the internal 
power of creation onwards.°! 


#8For a summary of Kaula doctrines, see SANDERSON 1988. 

#bhi+Kru according to Panini 3.2.174. bhiyah kru-klukan-au Kru and KlukaN are krt 
(nominal) suffixes one can add only to the verb 647. 

50Summary of SANDERSON 1995:62-63, who analyses Ksemaräjas interpretation in his com- 
mentary on Svacchandatantra 1.4ab with the help of the Tanträloka, and points out, among 
other things, that the explanation of the rw- element requires more exegetical effort. See also 
Tanträloka 1.96-100. For a detailed discussion of this topic, see the excellent analysis given in 
KAHRS 1998:55-97. 

5IThe meaning of the word akalpanakalä is not clear to me. Lit. ‘kalä of non-fashioning’, 
it could denote a section of the $aiva universe called fäntikalä, the second one from above 
corresponding to the very beginning of creation; or it could stand for the highest level of pure 
non-creation. It could also mean ‘limited power to act (one of the senses of ka/ä itself), which 
is the first evolute of mdyä or the plurality of creation, paving the way for other levels (rattva) 


Judit Torzsôk 501 


There is another line in the same text, which most probably also contains a 
semantic analysis, echoing nérvacanas well-known from Kashmirian exegesis.? 
Since the text is very fragmentary here, one cannot be sure what it is really 
about. The context is about Siva’s power, fakti, in any case, which suggests that 
the derivation concerns the goddess Käli, but as she does not appear elsewhere 


in the text, this remains only a possibility. 


kalälh/m] kalayate sà tu kälasamgrahakäraka [ä(?)]... (fol. 4r) 
She creates the Kalä(s) [i.e. the five levels of the universe(?); or: limited power 
to act(?})] and she withdraws time (44/4). [therefore she is called Käli] 


These nirvacanas are not restricted to the texts of the more esoteric Kaula 
branch, although they are definitely less ubiquitous elsewhere. One example is 
to be found in the Xriyäkälagunottara, à text mainly concerned with exorcism 
and snake-charms. In one of its longer sections, the text prescribes the wor- 
ship of a god called Khadgarävana (‘Sword-Rävana) and his female attendants. 
Khadgarävana is a Rävana-like form of Siva, mostly invoked to chase away evil 
spirits who possess people. The Xriyäkälagunottara tells us that once Siva created 
five mantras in order to kill the demon Kälanemi. As it was a furious form of 
Siva that created the mantras to fight the demon, his roar or cry (rva) became 
the mantra-deity Khadgarävana. (The story is told by $iva in the first person 
singular to the goddess.) 


manträs tv ete saha vidyaifr] nihsrtä mama dehatah | 

krodhe (krodhe em : krodha) krodhesvaro jäto räve vai khadgarävanalh] || 

And these mantras, together with their female mantras, were created from my 
body. Krodheévara (‘Lord of Wrath’) was born from my wrath (krodha) and 
Khadgarävana from my roar (räva). 


The derivation of Rävana from ru- ‘to roar is of course a common one, 
but the context created around it also explains why he is not a devotee (as he 
is in the Rämäyana), but an embodiment of Siva. It is also possible, although 


of the universal creation. Or this ‘natural’ #4 could also stand for divine energy, fakti. In any 
case, in most possible interpretations, it appears to denote the first step towards creation. 

5? For examples and their analysis, see SANDERSON 1995:64. 

3Note that vidya is treated as an -a stem noun and the locative is used for the ablative. 


502 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


by no means provable, that through this derivation some association is created 
between Khadgarävana and $iva in the form of Rudra.” 

Another semantic analvis, more closely related to ritual action, is to be 
found in a scripture of the Siddhänta. It explains that hand gestures, mudraäs, 
instead of simply repeating and confirming the ritual action in gestual language 
(as one would think from the examples given above), are employed to seal or 
paralyse (mudrayanti) demons called ‘impeders’ or ‘obstacles’, who could spoil 
the rite or make it unsuccessful. The derivation also makes use of the fact that 
mudräà is a feminine noun: ‘Since they paralyse (mudranät) the horde of obsta- 


cles, these Female Powers belonging to Siva are called gestures (mudrà) 


Furthermore, objects or substances used in ritual are also given additional 
significance through #irvacana. Thus, again the Kwlasära, derives the name of 
one of the impure offerings, rice beer (sw74), from the word ‘god’ (swra), while 
another word for alcohol (v4runi) is identified with the nectar of immortality: 


ksiräbdhimadhyamathanä[d] vyaktitvasamupägatà 

avasthä väruni jneyà suraih pità surà smrtäh (fol. 78r-78v) 

Alcohol is called véruni [in the sense of ‘coming from or belonging to the god 
of the ocean, Varuna] because it was produced as such from the churning of the 
milk ocean. Rice beer is called swr4 because it was drunk by the gods (swraih). 


In this context, it is also notable that the Xw/asära justifies impure offer- 
ings such as alcohol and meat by pointing out that some vedic rites also require 
them: the Sauträmani involves drinking surä (rice beer), and the Aévamedha 
for instance necessitates the killing of a horse: sauträmanyam suräpänam … a$- 
vamedhe tu cä$vam vai evamädipasor vadham (fol. 70r). These lines are echoed in 
some similar arguments in Abhinavagupta’s Zanträloka. In the following pas- 


S#Ru-dra meaning ‘running about (dra-) and roaring (r#-) is a common interpretation 
recorded in dictionaries. For the name Rudra being separated into Ru-dra, see Ksemaräja on 
Netratantra 16.64a glossing sarvatorudrah with samastarugdrävanäd rudrah. Rudra is explained 
by him here as ‘annihilating (drävana) pain (ruj-)’. For yet another interpretations, see his com- 
mentary on Svacchandatantra 1.42 (vol. 1, p.36.). 

Svighnaughamudranän mudräh kathyante harasaktayah, Mrgendra Kriyäpäda 5.2ab. For 
some more sophisticated derivation in the exegetical literature, see e.g. Ksemaräja ad Ae- 
tratantra 7.33, explaining the word as ‘bestowal (74-14) of happiness (mud-a), ‘releasing (mu- 
c) [from bonds] and destroying (drävana) [duality]’ and as ‘sealing (mwdrana) the power 
(dra-vina) of supreme consciousness’: mudo harsasya ränät päsamocanabhedadrävanätmatvat 
parasamviddravinamudranäc ca. 

56The meaning of the word avasthä here is not clear to me. It may be understood to form a 
compound with the preceding word. 


Judit Torzsôk 503 


sages, in addition to adducing the above examples of the Xwlasära, Abhinav- 
agupta also justifies the prescription of a female partner (d#ri) in tantric rites 
by referring to the vedic injunction according to which a wife (parni) is needed 
to perform the rites. 


Surä is pure for the sacrificer in the Sautramani sacrifice, while it is impure [lit. 
‘contrary] for others.” [...] There is no sacrifice without a wife, the gods are all 
treated as equals, the Brahmasatra requires the offering of alcohol, and one also 
offers the marrow, intestines and the heart [of animals]. This has been taught 
even in the scriptures of bound souls [i.e. in non-$aiva scriptures] by the Lord.°8 


Cult objects do not escape from this scriptural exegesis either. The esoteric 
Kaulajñänanirnaya” (3.10cd.) for instance gives the following, rather wide- 
spread, f° derivation of the word /iga, standing here probably for ‘symbol’ or 


‘idol. 


tena liñgam tu vikhyätam yatra linam caräcaram 
Thus it is called /niga, because [lit. ‘in which] the world of moving and non- 
moving creatures dissolve (Zn-am) in it. 61 


Many other occurrences of semantic analysis in the scriptures could be enu- 
merated to demonstrate the various ways and fields in which it was applied as 
an exegetical tool; and many of these occurrences would be similar to the above 
cited examples in that the explanations they give would be general, i.e. inde- 
pendant of the particular ritual context in which the object of analysis is used. 
However, it also happens that the #irvacana is applied not only to explain, but 


5 
5 


’sauträmanyäm surà hotuh Suddhänyasya viparyayah, Tanträloka 4.246ab. 
Spa patnyä ca vinà yägah sarvadaivatatulyatä || surähutir brahmasatre vapäntrahrdayähutih | 
päsavesv api fästresu tad adarsi mahesinä, Tanträloka 15.172cd-173. 

This text, of which an eleventh century manuscript survives, probably dates from the 9th 
or 10th century C.E. For the dating of the manuscript, see e.g. Baccxr 1934. A discussion of 
the dating will be found in Shaman HAaTLevs thesis, which is in preparation at the University 
of Pennsylvania, Philadelphia. 

60One of the earliest occurrences of this derivation may be in the commentary of Kaundinya 
on Päsupatasütra 1.6: liyanal liñganäc ca liñgam. For closer parallels, see Msväsa Guhyasütra 
1.100 £atham liyej jagat sarvam liñge caiva caräcaram and Mälinivijayottara 18.3 yajed ädhyä- 
tmikam liñgam yatra Enam caräcaram | bahirliñgasya liñgatvam anenädhisthitam yatah. X am 
grateful to Dominic GoopaLz for pointing out these parallels in an email message of the 26th 
of August, 2006. 

SIThe idea seems to be this: im | layam gacchatiti liñgam, where li- would stand for /ayam 
or linatvam, dissolution, and ga- for gacchati, to go. 


504 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


to create a new form of ritual. In most of such cases, the old form of ritual 
is reinterpreted and transformed from external rite into an internal, mental or 
yogic one. While semantic analysis is not the only way of internalising ritual, 
it is a very common one in the Kaula scriptures. 


THE MEANING OF ELEMENTS ON THEIR OWN 2: INTERNALISATION 


The internalisation of several elements of external ritual was an important de- 
velopment in the history of $aiva tantrism, and it has been amply analysed 
in the literature on the Kaula branch. Here I simply intend to show that this 
transformation of external into internal or mentally performed ritual was at 
least partly the result of the attempt to infuse more meaning into ritual, and 
that this quest for meaning is clearly discernible in some scriptural passages. 
An important element of internalisation in the Kaula cults was of course their 
esoteric interpretation of the word Kula, which, instead of denoting yogén1 lin- 
eages, came to mean the body, consisting of various internal powers (internal 
yoginis or $aktis).? But their interpretative élan went further than that. In what 
follows, I shall give examples of some more unusual internalisations through in- 
terpretation. The examples are mainly taken from the Zantrasadbhäva, which is 
not a purely Kaula scripture of the Trika; but the passages on internalisation I 
cite have all been borrowed in a Kaula text, the Kubjikämata. 

The first set of examples concerns the attributes a practitioner (sädhaka) is 
supposed to carry during his vidyävrata. The vidyävrata, lit. ‘observance of the 
female mantra”, was an obligatory preliminary observance to propitiate mantras 
before making use of them, i.e. before invoking them to help in the attain- 
ment of supernatural powers. Various such observances are prescribed in dif- 
ferent texts. The practitioner must usually wear certain clothes, carry certain 
objects, and wander around reciting a particular mantra. Sometimes excen- 
tric behaviour is also prescribed, reminiscent of päsupata practices. When the 
Tantrasadbhäva comes to the discussion of this topic, it lists a number of at- 
tributes prescribed for the practitioner to carry during his wanderings. For each 
object, the text gives an esoteric interpretation, by which the attribute, usually 
a weapon commonly carried by a deity, is enriched with esoteric meaning and 
is thus said to lead to final liberation. In each case, the interpretation takes the 


S2On a summary of the changes in the Kaula cult, see SANDERSON 1988:679f. 
These borrowings have been pointed out in SANDERSON 2002. 
SASee e.g. chapter 10 of the Sidhayogesvarimata. 


Judit Torzsôk 505 


form of a semantic analysis, and the text introduces this passage as a paribhäsà 
or explanation of technical terms. Here are three weapons of the long list: 


vämà jyesthä tathà raudri icchäjñänakriyätmikälh] | 

trisälam tripatham khyätam trisaktim anupürvasah || 

The godesses Vamä, Jyesthä and Raudri are of the nature of Will, Knowledge 
and Action. Thus the trident is known to be made of these three goddesses, of 
three spheres | roads, in due order. ° 

kharñpà vyomagä $äntà nirmalà atate priye | 

khetakam tena nämam tu dvädasänte vyavasthitam || 

There is [a Female Power] which has the form of space (kh4), moves in space, 


is calm and pure while erring (agate), o my beloved; therefore, she is called the 
shield (khetaka), which is established at twelve inches above the head.6 


SP 


kartari jhänasaktis tu yena päsäñ chinatty asau | 

sà kalä paramä sûüksmä mantränäm bodhanï parà || 

kartari kartrräpena jñätavyà sädhakena tu | 

The scissors | knife is the Power of Knowledge by which one cuts the bonds [of 
the soul]. It is an extremely subtle element, which is the supreme awakener of 
mantras. Thus it is to be known as the performer [of initiation | ritual] by the 
practitioner. (7 


These semantic analyses do not simply explain or justify why these objects 
should be carried by the practitioner; they transform them into his internal 
powers he must master in order to proceed in his observance. The object be- 
comes a metaphor for a Female Power ($akri) in his body, and thus the whole 
rite is internalised. The external observance is transformed into a yogic practice. 

The last interpretation concerning the kartari (scissors or knife) is interest- 
ing also in that it gives us a parallel to Ksemaräjas exegesis on an attribute of 
Svacchandabhairava, the sword. For in his commentary on Svacchandatantra 
2.90, Ksemaräja identifies the sword of the deity with the Power of Knowledge 


S Tantrasadbhäva 9.107cd-108ab = Kubjikämata 25.134. The word rripatha can denote a 
group of three worlds or spheres (such as 4#matattva, vidyätattva and fivatattva in the Saiva 
context) or a place where three roads meet, which could also be understood to refer to the three 
goddesses metaphorically. The equivalence of the trident and the goddesses is also established 
through the homonymy of the word #zkti ‘female power and ‘spike | prong. (N.B. Every noun 
is transformed into the neuter in the second line.) 

Sie. khe atate — iti khetakam. Tantrasadbhäva 9.108ab—109cd = Kubjikämata 25.135. (Nä- 
man is thematised.) 

Le. kartrräpena pasäñ chinattiti kartari. Tantrasadbhäva 9 \11-112ab = Kubjikämata 
25.137cd-138. 


506 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


(jñäna$akti) and calls it the instrument with which the bonds of the soul are 
cut — a role quite similar to that of the kartari in the Tantrasadbhäva.S® 

In the same chapter of the Tantrasadbhäva, another set of equivalences con- 
cerns the places where the pracitioner is to go during his mantra observance. 
In fact, the list of places given also corresponds to the lists given in many Saiva 
Tantras, which recommend them for the performance of any ritual, for daily 
worship as well as for intiation. The enumeration includes mainly abandoned 
places, such as abandoned mansions, the top of a mountain, forests etc. and 
places which are traditionally thought of as invested with magic properties 
such as the confluence of rivers or crossroads. The cremation gound is also 
mentioned of course. The primary reason for preferring these places must have 
been twofold: since they were abandoned, invested with magic power, they were 
particularly auspicious for tantric rites to obtain supernatural powers; and since 
they were far or hidden places, the rites could remain secret and well protected 
from the uninitiated. Although these reasons seem obvious and understandable 
enough, the appropriateness of these places would be difficult to justify sote- 
riologically. However, through their reinterpretation, the Zantrasadbhäva gives 
them particular significance for the individual practitioner and his practice. 
The following examples are metaphorical understandings of two such places: 
‘the top of the mountain’ and ‘crossroads”: 


The mountain is the mouth of the preceptor, and one should rely on | 
cling to the tip of his mouth. Thus is the mountain top [in Tantras] known 
metaphorically, o Goddess worshipped by the gods.? 


Oh Goddess, the crossroads is that of the goddesses Vamä, Jyesthä, Raudrikä 
together with Ambikä — the individual soul roams there | in them.”° 


In this way, the places prescribed for ritual lose their primary association 
with external rites and magic. They are transformed into sources of knowledge 
and internal sources of power. 


SBThis is not meant to suggest that Ksemaräja borrows from this scripture, for in both cases, 
the word lends itself to the derivation mentioned quite easily. 

S Tantrasadbhäva 9.45cd-46ab, Kubjikämata 25.74: parvatam guruvaktram tu tasyägram 
avalambayet | parvatägram smrtam tantre paryäyena surärcite (tantre TSB : tena KMT). 

70 Tantrasadbhäva 9.46cd-47ab: catuspatham bhaved devi vämä jyesthà tu raudrikä | am- 
bikäyà samäyuktä -m- atanam pudgalasya tu; citation almost identical with Kubjikämata 25.75. 


Judit Torzsôk 507 


Names of consorts (d#rïs) in ritual, the Mother, Sister and Daughter (three 
nouns which are also used as simple synonyms of yogini) are similarly reinter- 
preted; and their function and importance are again explained through seman- 
tic derivations. 


mäteva samsthitä $aktir jagato yonirüpini || 
atotpannam samastam hi väñmayam sacaräcaram | 
tena mâteti vikhyätä mayä te paramesvari || 
udbhavasthà duhitr tu duhanä jagatasya tu | 
duhitÿ tu dvitiyà tu bhagini tu tathocyate |) 
bhagarüpä parä sûksmä uipannä sätmanà saha | 
yathägnis tejasä nityam anänätve vyavasthitah || 
tadvad eva bi cätmasthà bhagini bhagarüpint | 
svayamjätà mahäsüksmä nänyatkenaiva nirmitä || 


The female Power is established as the Mother, she is the matrix of the world. 
Everything moving and non-moving, made of speech, is born from her. There- 
fore I call her Mother, great goddess. The Daughter (dwhitr) is established in the 
origin [of the world], she provides the world with desired objects (dwhana).” 
Thus the Daughter is the second [type of female power], now I explain the Sis- 
ter (bhagini). She is extremely subtle in the form of the female organ (bhaga), 
born together with the individual soul. Just as fire is always inseparable from its 
heat, so too the Sister, in the form the female organ, is within the individual 
soul. She is born of herself, is highly subtle, and is not constructed by anyone 
or anything else.”? 


In a more elaborate way, the sacred places (pZhas) are also internalised, start- 
ing with the confluence of the Gañgä and the Yamunaä, Prayäga, in the navel, 
thus tranforming the external geography of pelegrination into an internal one. 
Both the Zantrasadbhäva and the Kubjikämata affirm that the internal places 
are more important, and that external ones are prescribed only to comply with 
worldly conventions.” The Kubjikämata then adds yet another set of equiva- 
lences, whereby it identifies various parts of a house with the sacred centres. 


The word meant is probably dohana, which has both a primary and a metaphorical mean- 
ing. What is intended is probably the metaphorical one, but with reference to the verbal root 
dub, ‘to milk’, which the text connects with dwhitr-. 

7?The extract, in strongly Tantric Sanskrit, comes from the beginning of the passage in ques- 
tion (Tantrasadbhäva 9.132cd-136), which has been somewhat shortened in the version of the 
Kubjikämata (25.158-160). 

PF lokapravritihetvarthe bahih pithäh prakäsitäh | prakirtitäh (Tantrasadbhäva 9.79cd, Kub- 
jikämata 25.98ab). 


508 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Thus, Prayäga is placed in the middle of the house for instance, Attahäsa in the 
fire-place (cul), Devikotta in the grinding stone (gharatta) etc. 

These equivalences are established, at least partly, in search of meaning in 
ritual. And in this respect, the Tantras continue the same method that one 
can see in the Brähmanas and the Upanisads. For these vedic texts also seek 
meaning in ritual by creating macrocosmic and microcosmic links, equivalences 
— upanisads — between elements of vedic ritual, the universe and the human 
body.’ 

Now the reinterpretations of these isolated elements in ritual do not neces- 
sarily change the basic ritual structure of initiation and daily rites, at least not 
in the Zantrasadbhäva. On the whole, the text does not reject external ritual 
altogether, but attempts to enrich the meaning of some observances by writ- 
ing some sort of primary exegesis on them. These metaphoric interpretations, 
homologisations and even the internalisations remain separate from and in- 
dependent of the traditional, external ritual complex of initiation and daily 
ritual, which are maintained and prescribed in this text. As opposed to this, 
Kaula scriptures go further in this interpretative procedure. For there, once 
the elements of a rite are given new meaning, the whole rite changes, often 
in that it becomes internal, and initiation and daily ritual are also affected by 
these transformations. The pan-$aiva offering of eight flowers (astapuspikä), 
for instance, is transformed into an offering of eight mental flowers in the 
Kaulajñänanirnaya (3.24): non-violence (ahimsä), the curbing of the senses 
(indriyanigraha), compassion (dayä), sincerety or devotion (bhäva), patience 
(ksamä), the conquering of anger (krodhavinirjita), meditation (dhyäna), and 
knowledge (jñäna).” 


74This idea was already expressed in a remark by KaHrs 1998:60, pointing out that the 
interiorisation of $Saiva ritual is ‘strikingly similar to the way in which sacrifice was interiorised 
in late Vedic times.’ 

75This offering is performed with real Aowers and recommended for the poor, the weak, 
women, children etc. in Brhatkälottara fol. 137r. In its various versions prescribed there, 
the flowers are to represent parts of $ivas mantra-body and his throne. For more details, 
see Tôrzsôk *1999:133 citing Prof. Alexis SANDERSONS% edition of the passage. Note that 
Kiranatantra 59.29 also prescribes what it calls mental (mänasa) flowers. (I thank Dominic 
GoopaLL for pointing out this passage in an email of 26th August, 2006.) However, this text 
seems to identify the flowers (whether they are indeed mental or just mentally transformed into 
something else) with various elements of a common worship (p#jà), i.e. water, honey mixed 
with milk and ghee, incense and lamps, sandalwood paste, roots, flowers and fruits, cooked 
food and clothes (understanding väsanä in the sense of väsana). 


Judit Torzsôk 509 


THE MEANING OF THE RITUAL ELEMENTS IN VIEW OF THE ULTIMATE 
PURPOSE OF RITUAL 


As the above examples show, it was not an uncommon procedure to seek mean- 
ing in various elements of external ritual taken separately, especially concerning 
rites other than initiation and daily ritual. However, the purpose and meaning 
of rites are rarely questioned in view of the ultimate purpose of ritual, except 
in the more esoteric Kaula texts. The Kaula inquiries include questions that do 
not seem to preoccupy other scriptures and which also concern initiation and 
daily ritual. Why would one need to be purified before performing a rite? Why 
is a mandala à necessary support on which to invoke the deities during initi- 
ation? These Kaula investigations result in the rejection of almost all external 
ritual, with the argument that this or that rite ultimately does not make sense. 
Below I should only like to point out a few arguments taken from Kaula scrip- 
tural sources. Thus, the Xwlasära reasons as follows on the futility of purificatory 


baths: 


Unwise people think that purity is obtained with water or earth. The body is 
born from blood and sperm and contains faeces, urine and phlegm. It is des- 
tined to live with disorders of the blood, the bile etc. Now how could purity 
be obtained by pouring water on it, oh Faultless One? When one rubs a stone, 
it can be shown to be made of earth. But just as it is destroyed [by rubbing] 
without becoming different, so too, embodied souls [remain the same]. If you 
rub a piece of charcoal or if you pour water on it, it will not abandon its own 
nature. The same is true for all embodied souls./6 


Interestingly, another Tantra, the Bhairavamañgalä, uses the same image 
with almost identical wording. It continues the argument by saying that one 
should resort to non-duality, i.e. one should stop seeing objects in terms of pure 
or impure, auspicious or inauspicious. It concludes that nothing is inauspicious, 
and that only what is auspicious for Bhairava (bhairava-mañgalà) exists. This 
in turn may refer to the title of the text itself. 


If you rub a piece of charcoal or pour water on it from hundreds of jars it will 
not abandon its own nature. The same is true for all embodied souls. Therefore, 


76fol. 74v värinà mrttikäbhif ca faucam icchanty apanditäh | raktaretodbhavam pindam 
vinmaütrakaphasamyutam || raktapittädi-cänyais ca dosair yukto vyavasthitah | sa tatpraksälanäc 
chuddhih katham sambhävyate ‘naghe || Siläyäm ghrsyamänayäm mrdbhavatvapradarsanam | 
ksayam yäti na cänyatvam tadvad dehavatäm punah || ghrsyamäno yathäñgärah ksälyamäno 
jalena tam | na jahäti svabhävam tu tadvat sarvasaririnäm. As Somdev VasuDEvA has pointed 
out (in his electronic text), the first line has à parallel in Zanträloka 4.223. 


510 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


since nothing exists that would be pure by nature … what is the purity of mind 
for people is non-duality 7 Nothing should be inauspicious, only what is 
auspicious to Bhairava exists./# 


Of course, one could argue against this by saying that it is not the water 
or some other substance that purifies, but the water that has been transformed 
into Siva by mantras. This is indeed affirmed by the Bhairavamañgalä, which 
consequently rejects not only all calendrical restrictions and observances, but 
also purificatory rites and baths, claiming that only mantras have the power to 
change the nature of someone or something. 


There are no rites to be performed on certain lunar dates or vows to be ob- 
served under certain constellations, no calendrical fasts,/” purification, obser- 
vances and baths, and there are no inauspicious moments. It is the mantra that 
is the supreme time, observance and secondary rites; baths and purificatory rites 
are … established in mantras.%° Mantras derive from the Omnisicent and are ca- 
pable of ending this transmigration. They are unfailing, pure and still, devoid 
of inaspicious times and the like. They are made of time and they give rise to 
the »ädis. They perform initiation, and Sadäéiva is also formed with mantras. 
… Just as something touched by the philosopher’s stone turns from copper to 
gold, someone purified by initiation reaches Sivahood.f! 


TThe text is difficult to construe here either due to corruption or to irregular grammar or 
both. 

78 Bhairavamañgalà 249-252ab: ghrsyamäno yathälñlgärah kslallyamäno ghatasataih | na 
jahäti svabhävatvam tadvat sarvasaririnäm || tasmält] svabhävasuddhasya abhäve bhävam äfri- 
tah | bhävasuddhir manusyänäm advaitam bhävam äfritam || amañgalam na kimoit syäd asti 
bhairavamañgalä (abhäve has been corrected from abhäved and na from naiva by Somdev Va- 
SUDEVA). 

7%These two pädas rejecting only calendrical observances seem to have been quite popular, al- 
though they figure mostly in the context of obtaining supernatural powers. See e.g. Tantrasadb- 
häva 1.56 and Tanträloka 29.65, the latter perhaps based on the former. A similar line, in yet 
another context, also occurs in the Kvarasambitä (19.787) and the Visvaksenasamhitä (38.3 and 
39.321). I am grateful to Dominic GoopaLz for pointing out the popularity of this verse. 

80The Sanskrit has an illegible syllable here. 

81 Bhairavamanñgalä 252cd-256ab, 258: na tithir na ca naksatraniyamo nopaväsakam || na 
faucam na vratasnänam kälavelà na vidyate | mantram eva (mantram eva em.: manum eva MS) 
param kälam vratam ca niyamädikam || snänasaucädikam karma mantra(-)tra pratisthitam | 
sarvajñäd ägatàä manträh bhavacchedakarälh] smrtäh || amoghà nirmalä[h] säntä[h] kälavelädi- 
varjitäh | kälätmakam bhaven mantram manträn nädisamutkalam || mantrais tu kriyate diks[à] 
mantrarñpt sadäsivah … yathà rasendrasam{s]prstals] tämrabhäväm pramuñcati | tadvald] diksa- 
visuddhas tu fivatvam pratipadyate. 


Judit Torzsôk 511 


Now if it is Siva in the form of mantras who purifies everything, he could 
just as well purify one directly, and do that once and for all. This is the point of 
view of the Kaulajñänanirnaya, which affirms that he who has learnt the science 
of conquering old age from the Kaula texts will be able to purify anything by 
touching or by looking, thanks to the powerful rays of the Bindu.*? Other 
common elements of daily ritual are also rejected, such as the material idol 
(liñga probably referring to any idol here) in the Kaulajñänanirnaya® and any 
kind of iconic image (pratimä) in the Timirodghätana:$* ‘For them [for true 
yogis] there is no clay, stone, silver or gold idol (Zzga). [...] What is the use of 
images for he who possesses the divine way [i.e. liberation]?? 

In the same way, elements of the initatory ritual are also found purposeless: 
the tracing of the mandala, which is necessary in other systems for the Samaya 
rite to introduce the neophyte into the $Saiva community, the construction of 
the fire-pit (kunda) together with all ritual around the fire, which are the prin- 
cipal means of initiation in the tantric systems. Instead, the 7imirodghätana, 
for instance, states that the real fire-pit is in the body, and that liberation 
occurs not through initiation with fire ritual, but through the transmission of 
knowledge. In a similar spirit, the Kulasära maintains that one can be initi- 
ated simply by the touch of a Kaula yogi.” Needless to say that other, optional 
rites, such as observances (czryä) are also often declared useless or to be done 
simply according to one’s wish*#; and sacred sites (p/thas) are not to be revered 
externally, but only inside the body.*? 


827,30cd-31ab: yam yam spréati hastena yam yam payati caksusä | $uddham bhavati tat 
sarvam parabindukiranähatam The printed text has yä» yäm for what should be yad yat in 
Sanskrit. ‘Whatever he touches with his hand or looks at with his eyes will become pure, struck 
by the rays of the supreme Bindu.”’ Bindu stands here for the subtle essence of the power of all 
mantras. 

833,14: na kästham mrnmayam liñgam na $ailaratnasambhavam... ‘In this system,] there is 
no wooden clay or stone idol (/riga), nor one made of precious stones…? 

8412. 4ab: na tesäm mrnmayam liñgam na [failam] rüpyakäñcanam; 12.14ab: kim tasya pra- 
timärñpaih yasya divyà gatih sthitä. 

Sdehastham tu mahäkundam. ‘The great fire-pit is in the body.’ 

865 2ab: yadä samkrämita[m] jñänam tadà muktih suniscitam. ‘Surely, it is when knowledge 
is transmitted that liberation occurs.” 

8 sparsanäd diksito bhavet (fol. 40r). ‘He will be initiated by touching.’ 

88See Kaulajñänanirnaya chapter 12, Kulasära fol. 83r. 

® Kulasära fol. 80v: vämadaksinam agre tu trdhà pitham tu sundari | paryated [dJehasamstham 
tu yogi bähye vivarjayet. 


512 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


While some of the internalisations cannot be considered reductions of ritual 
in that they involve elaborate visualisations, most of them not only internalise 
ritual, but also reject parts or the whole of it. Moreover, many of the internal 
practices are not developed in greater details, only the internal-external equiva- 
lences are established in an outline. Therefore, it seems that the majority of these 
internalised rites do not form a full structure for meditation, unlike Buddhist 
Sädhanas. 

As it has been pointed out in SANDERSON (1995:87-90), this compres- 
sion or reduction of external ritual was coupled with the intensification of 
what remained. Most importantly, it implied the intensification of initiation, 
which had to involve visible possession by the deity. Below, the example of the 
Tantrasadbhäva is cited because it reflects some of the contradictions and prob- 
lems involved in such intensification and emphasis on spontaneous possession. 

The passage starts with the enumeration of various kinds of $zktipäta, the 
descent of Sivas Power, which is a manifestation of his grace. In all tantric 
systems, this descent — whether it is visible or not — is a sign that the person is 
ready to receive initiation. In the Zantrasadbhäva, à mantric manifestation of 
this Power is written on the ground, which the initiand is to look at. 


He who, concentrating on the Curled $akti while looking at her, falls [on the 
ground] after a hundred [repetitions of the mantra] is known to have had an 
intense descent of Siva’s Power. He who falls after one thousand or ten thousand 
[repetitions] is known to have had an average descent of the Power, o goddess. 
And he who falls after twenty, thirty or fifty thousand repetitions is known to 
have had a basic descent of His Power, my beloved one. This is how I describe 
the various descents | falls in the order of decreasing quality. One should ini- 


tiate those who have fallen on the ground, those who do not fall should be 
discarded.?° 


The passage clearly requires a visible sign to prove the intensity of Siva's 
grace: the falling on the ground. Moreover, the requirement of this sign is im- 
plicitly justified by suggesting a parallel between the intensity of the descent 
(päta) of Siva’s Power and the falling (päta) on the ground. After this, the guru 


90 Tantrasadbhaäva 9.327-330: bhavitätma yadä pasyec chaktim vai kutiläkrtim | satena patate 
yas tu tivrapätah prakirtitah || evam sahasram ekena atha caiväyutena ca | yasya päto bhaved devi 
madhyamah parikirtitah || duyayutais tryayutair väpi tathä pañcadasaih priye | patate vartanair 
yas tu so ‘dhamas ca tv iti smrtah || pâtänäm ca vibhägo ‘tra vivrnve damsakänvaye | patitam 
diksayed devi pätahinam tu varjayet. 


Judit Torzsôk 513 


can go on with the process of initiation. But the subsequent lines, which de- 
scribe the effects of initiation, more precisely, the effects of the cutting of the 
initiand’s bond, do so in very similar terms. The initiate is to fall on the ground 
again, albeit not exactly in the same way. 


This is the sign of those who have been transformed [by initiation]: they move 
about, tremble or shake. And when the bonds of the soul are cut, the initiate 
falls on the ground. He who falls on his face is the best, he who falls on his back 
is average and he who falls on his side is taught to be the least good by Sambhu, 
the god of gods.°! 


The effects of the spontaneous descent of Power and the cutting of the bonds 
being quite similar, initiation does not appear to make a remarkable difference. 
And the concluding part of the passage seems to suggest that apart from the 
touch of the guru, indeed, nothing else is really needed for initiation. 


Ifinitiation is liberation, as it is according to all Saiva scriptures, then initiation 
is to be understood when the bonds of the bound soul have been stunned. 
When the body, released from all merit and demerit, falls on the ground, then 
it is salvific initiation; he who performs it is the guru. He who has the bonds 
stunned merely by his touch is called the guru: he makes people cross the ocean 
of transmigration.?? 


In spite of the wording, it may be too far-fetched to interpret this extract to 
assert that no ritual is needed for initiation apart from the guru's touch. When 
the guru is defined as he who liberates merely by his touch, it can also be meant 
as a general praise of the guru rather than a theoretical statement about the role 
of initiatory rites. It is, however, remarkable that the passage appears to start 
out as a defense of ritual initiation, but ends with a Kaula-type anti-ritualistic 
statement — even ifit is just metaphorical here — reducing initiation to the guru’s 
touch. 


 Tantrasadbhaäva 9.332-334ab: bhävitänäm tu cihnedam calate kampate dhunet | päsacchede 
tu samjäte patate käsyapitale || sammukham patate yas tu cchinnapäso na sam$ayah | utiamo sau 
samuddista uttäno madhyamo matah || tiryakpäto dhamah prokto devadevena fambhunä. 

V2 Tantrasadbhäva 9.340-42: yadi diksä bhaven muktih sarvesu câgamesu ca | tasmäd diksà tu 
bodhavyä päsastobho yadà bhavet || dharmädharmänibaddhas tu pindo yatra patet priye | tadaà 
nirvänadà diksä yah karoti sa desikah || yenaivälabdhamätrasya stubhyate päsapañjaram | sa 
gurus tu samäkhyätah samsärärnavatärakah || (änibhaddhas conj.: ’anibaddhas codd.). 


514 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


CONCLUSION 


From the ways in which the scriptures examined here treat the problem of how 
to interpret and find meaning in ritual, three distinct approaches emerge. These 
approaches sometimes seem to be characteristic of certain branches of Saivism, 
but this is not necessarily the case. 

1. The first could be called the argumentative approach. The basic ritual 
structure is accepted and never questioned as it is; instead, this approach tries 
to argue for why rites are necessary and what they accomplish. Although texts 
of the Siddhänta have been cited in most cases, it is not the case that all texts 
of the Siddhänta would argue in this way, nor is the Siddhänta the only branch 
that would do so. 

2. The second approach, for which most examples have been quoted, is an 
interpretative one. This interpretative approach may or may not accept all ex- 
ternal ritual; but whichever is the case, it attributes special meaning to external 
ritual elements by reinterpreting them, often through semantic analyses. AIl 
branches of the scriptural tradition seem to adopt this approach, albeit not to 
the same extent. The interpretative approach sometimes tranforms external rites 
into internal ones, which thus partly undermines the original ritual system. 

3. The third one may be named the rejectionist approach. As is known, this 
is characteristic of the Kaula branch, which rejects most external rites as mean- 
ingless; but it can also be adopted by others, especially concerning a particular 
type of ritual. 

As I remarked above, the sources examined here do not give us a complete 
picture of the situation and therefore any conclusion drawn here is subject to 
revision.” Nevertheless, I think many of the scriptural examples clearly show 
that there is an internal and theoretical development within the scriptural tra- 
dition of questioning the meaning of ritual action. And this self-questioning 
and search for meaning may be a more significant factor in the reduction of ex- 
ternal ritual than usually assumed. Of course, there must have been other, most 
importantly social, factors behind; and it is generally true that the reduction of 


3As SANDERSON (1995) argues, one $aiva tantric tradition appears to have been able to 
solve the problem of how ritual can be meaningful in all its elements in an organic way. It is 
the Krama, which attempted to render every element of ritual meaningful for the attainment 
of Sivahood, and which was a source for many an interpretation given by Abhinavagupta and 
Ksemaräja. However, the scriptures of the Krama, too, simplified external worship to a large 
extent: they considered internal worship superior, and suppressed all icons. 


Judit Torzsôk 515 


external ritual is always more convenient for a number of reasons.” But it seems 
more likely that the questioning of the meaning of ritual contributed to the re- 
duction of external rites rather than that it was the simple manifestation of an 
intention or tendency to reduce them. As mentioned above, a distant parallel 
of such developments might be the case of the Upanishads, which reinterpret, 
internalise, and, at the same time, undermine the Vedic ritual system. 

There is another reason why it is not unreasonable to think that much ofthe 
internalisation is a result of the tradition’ internal, theoretical development. It 
is the fact that in many cases the internalised ritual does not appear to be re- 
lated to actual practice. This is especially true for many homologisations of the 
Tantrasadbhäva (concerning e.g. the internalisation of places of worship and 
of the weapons), which give the impression that there is more exegetical work 
than actual practice behind them. Now such arguments are very questionable; 
for who are we to judge today what was actual practice at the time of the com- 
position of the Tantras?” But in spite of the difficulty of proving this, one 
should bear in mind that the homologisations of the Zantrasadbhäva are rather 
unique, and the Zantrasadbhäva itself does not refer to them in other contexts, 
whether ritual or not. This strongly suggests that in the majority of the cases we 
are dealing with what I called primary exegesis, exegesis within the scriptural 
tradition itself, evolving from questions raised by their authors. 


MANUSCRIPTS CONSULTED 


KULASARA 
NAK MS 4-137, NGMPP A 40/11. (I have made use of 
Somdev VAsUDEVA’s annotated electronic transcription.) 
KRIYAKALAGUNOTTARA 
NAK MS 3-392, NGMPP B 25/32. 
TANTRASADBHAVA 
NAK MSS 1-363, 5-445, 5-1985, which are, respectively, 
NGMPP A 44/1, À 44/2 and A 188/22. 
TIMIRODGHATANA 


For an analysis of such tendencies in Kashmir, see e.g. SANDERSON 1995. 

%Other evidence, such as the mention of certain rites in non-tantric sources, could help. 
However, inscriptions rarely give many details of these rites, especially concerning Kaula prac- 
tice, and Literary sources describe what appears even more fanciful than the scriptural prescrip- 
tions. 


516 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


NAK MS 5-690, NGMPP A 35/3. (I have made use of Somdev 
VAsUDEVA* annotated electronic transcription.) 
NISVASATATTVASAMHITA 
NAK MS 1-227, NGMPP A 41/14. (I have used the electronic 
transcription, supplemented with readings from its Kathmandu 
apograph MS No. 5-2406, NGMPP A 159/18, prepared by 
Dominic GOODALL.) 
PARAMARTHASARA 
Bodleian Library MS Wilson 531e. 
[PAUSKARA-]PARAMESVARATANTRA 
Cambrige University Library MS Add. 1049. 
BRHATKALOTTARA 
NAK MSS 1-89 and 5-778, which are, respectively, NGMPP 
B 24/59 and A 42/8. (I have made use of Alexis SANDERSON's 
partial electronic transcription.) 
BRAHMAYAMALA 
NAK MS 3-370, NGMPP A 42/6. I have made use of Shaman 
HATLEY’s annotated electronic transcription.) 
BHAIRAVAMAN GALA 
NAK MS 5-687, NGMPP B 27/21. (I have made use of 
Somdev VasupEva's electronic transcription.) 
SIDDHAYOGESVARIMATA 
NAK MS 5-2403, NGMPP A 203/6, and Asiatic Society of 
Bengal, Calcutta MS 5948 (5465 G). (I have used my own 


working edition.) 


Synæsthetic Iconography: 1. the Nadiphantakrama 
SOMADEVA VASUDEVA 


The mantric identity of Goddess Mälini is an allegedly disordered version of 
the Sanskrit alphabet called the rädiphäntakrama. That there does exist a dis- 
cernible system in this supposed chaos can be demonstrated by analysing the 
earliest scriptural sources transmitting textual variations. The surprising, but 
compelling reason for the order is set out in $ 3, and the synæsthetic iconogra- 
phy it implies is briefly discussed.! 


ALPHABET DEITIES 


The Goddess Mälinï is one of two alphabet deities’ prominent* in the Tantric 
system called the Trika. The mantric identity of this Goddess“ is the r4diphä- 
ntakrama (lit. ‘the order [of the alphabet] beginning with #4 and ending with 
pha’), à particular rearrangement of the Sanskrit syllabary in which vowels and 
consonants are intermingled in a hitherto unexplained and at first sight random 
order. In all early sources surviving each individual phoneme of the sequence 
is said to be a body-part of the Goddess Mälinï, and some accounts also supply 
the names and details of fifty presiding female phoneme-deities. To explain the 


IThis article is the first of a triptych of studies on Synæsthetic Iconography. I presented an 
earlier draft of its central argument at Alexis SANDERSON’S Tantric Seminar in All Souls College, 
Oxford, in 1997. 

2The other alphabet deity of the Trika is Sabdarägi (cf. MVUT 8.27-32ab; Tanträloka 
15.116cd-120), represented by the common order of the Sanskrit syllabary. 

3The high status of the Goddess Mälinï in the pantheon of the Trika is evident by her partial 
(in early texts) or total (in later texts) transcendence of visual representation (for details of the 
intimate relationship of Mälinï, Parä and Sarasvatï, see SANDERSON (1990:45-50 and passim)). 

To use the terminology of the MVUT: the Goddess manifested in the nädiphäntakrama is 
called Bhinnayonimälini, ‘the Crowned Goddess in whom the vowels are intermingled [among 
the consonants]”. The Goddess manifested in the common order of the Sanskrit alphabet (the 
Sabdaräsi-sequence) is called Abhinnayonimälini, ‘the Crowned Goddess in whom the vowels 
are not intermingled [among the consonants]’. 

SExcepting the Kashmirian Agnikäryapaddhati, a ritual manual which presents the n&di- 
phäntakrama as a completed Mantra with initial seed-syllable and final ass. 


518 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


underlying rationale of the nädiphäntakrama the two presumed original func- 
tions of the sequence are here investigated: the ritual projection of the alphabet 
into the practitioners body (xy4sa-) and the encryption and “extraction” (de- 
coding) of mantras (mantroddhära-). 

It must be emphasised at the outset that the r4diphäntakrama as discussed 
in the surviving works of the Trika DOES indeed present a specific order of the 
syllabary and not a chaotic non-order. Once this has been pointed out, it seems 
obvious, but earlier scholars (e.g. SINGH in his translations®) have presumably 
not reflected on the matter and, in spite of textual evidence to the contrary, 
have assumed it to be a “non-order” (4krama-). Such an assumption is in fact 
also doctrinally impossible. 

Both in the early Trika’s realist ontology and in the later Trika’s non-dualist 
phenomenology order is transcended only by the ultimate reality of Siva.’ 
Therefore this article demonstrates that the “disarray” or “irregularity” of this 
sequence of phonemes is only apparent. The original redactor(s) of the r4dipha- 
ntakrama, compelled by considerations either ignored by, or unknown to their 
successors, have in fact followed à discernible methodology to produce their 
variants of the nädiphäntakrama. To uncover this, the largely unpublished, ear- 
liest scriptural sources transmitting the series must be taken into account. 

The extensive metaphysical discussion of the rädiphäntakrama in the post- 
scriptural exegetical tradition of the Trika is unanimous in its acceptance of the 
nädiphäntakrama as revealed in the Mälinivijayottaratantra MVUT)—and 
paraphrased by Abhinavagupta in his 7anträloka’ —as authoritative. 

They do not discuss or explain divergences in the order of this sequence 
found in other Tantras.! Nevertheless, the scriptural transmission of this se- 
quence does show substantial divergences in the order of the phoneme-series. 


6e.g. SINGH (1979:254): “In Mälini, they are arranged in an irregular way, i.e. the vowels 
and consonants are mixed and no serial order is observed.” 

7Abhinavagupta describes Siva's autonomy thus: Parätrimsikävivarana (S) p. 435: tan na 
kas cit krama iti brümah, akramam yad etat param päramesvaram vicitram garbhikrtänantavai- 
citryam svätantryam trikärtharñpam tad evaitat, ‘Therefore we say: ‘no order at all.” That which 
has no order, this ultimate, diverse autonomy of the supreme Lord, containing within itself 
infinite variety, is what the Trika teaches [as the ultimate reality] 

SMVUT 3.3741ab. 

° Tanträloka 15.121-125ab. 

10]t is interesting to note that Jayaratha in his commentary on Zanträloka 15.121-125ab 
quotes the passage of the Trifrobhairava but remains silent about the divergent order of the 
nädiphäntakrama given therein. 


Somadeva Vasudeva 519 


Luckily, this is a rare instance where it is possible to study the corresponding 
passages of the greater part of the known early Trikatantras: the Siddhayogesva- 
rimata, the Mälinivijayottara, Trisirobhairava, and the Tantrasadbhäva.\\ 

The scriptures of the cult of the Goddess Kubjikä have incorporated much 
of the Trika material that predated them: some of it reworked, some of it verba- 
tim.!? This material may therefore also legitimately be adduced as a secondary 
level of evidence for the Trika sources on which they are based. 


ANATOMY OF THE SYSTEMATISATIONS 


With the exception of an evidently corrupt passage in the [published version 
of the] Agnipuräna, all of the texts consulted list all 50 phonemes of the San- 
skrit alphabet, but they present them in a varying number of what I will call 


enunciations. ? 


ANTICIPATED INCONSISTENCIES 


A preliminary survey of the available materials has yielded thirteen different 
passages teaching the nädiphäntakrama.\* In the eleven different sequences! 
summarised below the nädiphäntakrama is taught in four different modes. The 
phonemes are listed: 


1. In more or less “plain language” with an associated body-part (1, 
IL, IL); 

2. In plain language with an associated body-part and a correspond- 
ing presiding female deity (1v, 1x, x); 

3. Encoded in the Mälinigahvara (see below) with an associated 
body-part (v, vi); 

4. Encoded in the Mälinigahvara with an associated body-part and 
a corresponding presiding female deity (vir). 


1Of the presumed early Tantras of the Trika only the Devyäyamalés discussion of the 4- 
diphäntakrama (presuming it contained such a chapter) is not available. It is also not known 
whether the later Trikasära transmitted its own version of the nädiphäntakrama. 

2Cf SanDERsoN (1986:163-164). 

?The difference is that anusvära- and visarga- are not given independently in some texts. 
#Only five of these have been published before now. 

SI omit the Päramesvarimata and a second version of the sequence taught in the Srimatot- 
taratantra. 


520 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


In all of these the sequence seems quite naturally to break up into a series 
of shorter strings of phonemes (separated by commas and semi-colons in the 
listing below). À substantial proportion of these can be presumed to be in- 
tentional, designating phases of projection or anatomical description. Others 
may be no more than artifacts of varying versification skills. Most of these are 
shared with some variation by all texts, but the order of placement in the main 
sequence may differ. One immediate text-critical hypothesis must be that these 
subunits approximate the textual units in a posited Ur-text. The history implied 
by these surviving texts becomes thus rather complex; the extent of differen- 
tiation requires probably many more degrees of separation from the posited 
original source than the known texts allow. So, even though the greater part of 
known early Trikatantras has been examined these appear to reveal that they 
are merely incomplete remnants of a far more complex textual situation. 

Furthermore, all of the texts!° homologise the phonemes with the Goddess 
body-parts, thus it is clear that this must be the one essential feature which 
cannot be separated from the #4diphäntakrama in the minds of the redactors. 


EXPECTED DIVERGENCE IN THE PHASES OF PORTRAYAL 


i. Siddhayogesvarimata 3.7cd-18, 48 enunciations, six descriptive phases: 


ü. Mälinivijayottaratantra 3.37cd-41, <Tanträloka 15.121-125cd, 48 
enunciations, five descriptive phases: 1. na r 5 [ Ü'tha, ca dha ï na u 
ä, ba ka kha ga gha na à a; 2. va bha ya; 3. da dha, tha jha ña ja ra ta; 4. 
pa cha la à sah, ha sa ksa; 5. ma $am ta, e ai o au da pha 


ii. Agnikaryapaddhati, GüttingenP© ms F°39°7, Paris Ms F°771%-16; gives 
Mantra and aniconic visualisation verse encoding the Mantra sauh: om 
na r ÿ ll tha ca dha ï na u à ba ka kha ga gha a à à va bha ya da dha tha 
jha ha ja ra ta pa cha la à sa ah ha sa ksa ma $a am ta e ai o au da pha hrim 
mälinyai namab svähà 


IExcepting of course the Agnikäryapaddhati which merely presents Mälini as a completed 
Mantra. 

V[1.] The first twenty phonemes, 74—4, form the head of the Goddess; [2.] three phonemes 
va— ya are her neck and shoulders; [3.] the eight phonemes, d4—#a are her arms, hands, fingers, 
trident and skull-bowl; [4.] the nine phonemes p4—ksa, given in eight enunciations, are her 
upper torso; [5.] the ten phonemes m4—pha, given in nine enunciations represent her buttocks, 
genitals, legs and feet. 


Somadeva Vasudeva 521 


NA 


Vi. 


vii. 


viii. 


Tantrasadbhäva 3.105-128ab encoded in the mälinigahvara (redacted in 
the Xubjikämata, see V), 48 enunciations, five descriptive phases: !$ 1. na 
r F | L'tha ca dha ï na u à ba ka kha ga gha ña à a; 2. va bha ya; 3. da dha 
tha jha ña ta ra ja; 4. pa sa cha la à ha sah ksa; 5. ma fam ta e ai o au da 


pha 


. Kubjikämata À 4.81ab-106 encoded in the mélinigahvara- (incorpo- 


rated from the Zantrasadbhäva, see 1v), 49 enunciations, five descriptive 
phases: Z. na r 5 [ Ltha ca dha à na u ü ba ka kha ga gha a i a; 2. va bba 
ya; 3. dha da tha jha ña ah ta ra ja; 4. pa sah ha cha la à sa ksa; 5. ma $am 
ta e ai o au da pha 


Trisirobhaïravatantra cit. TaÂIVivx 15.121-125ab: c, <Kubjikämata B 
17.94-109, 50 enunciations with Saktis, six descriptive phases:!? 7. na r 
5 | L'tha dha à ca ba ka kha ga gha ña i a na u ü; 2. va; 3. da dha tha jha 
ña ta ra ja; 4. bha ya; 5. pa sa ksa cha la à sa ha ah; 6. ma $a am ta e ai o 


au da pha 


Satsähasrasamhitä B 7.5-38, encoded in the (mälinigahvara-), 50 enun- 
ciations with Saktis, five descriptive phases: . #4 tha r F l l ca dha ï na u 
à ba ka kha ga gha ña i a; 2. va bha ya; 3. dha da tha jha ña ah ta ra ja; 4. 
pa sah ba cha la à sa ksa; 5. ma $a am ta e ai o au da pha 


Satsähasrasamhitä À 415.30-35, 52-56, 78-84, 106-112, 123cd-126, 
50 enunciations ordered into the five mahapitha-: Uddiyänapitha: #4 r F 
ll tha dha 3 ; Jälandharapitha: ca ba ka kha ga gha ña i a na; Pürnagiri- 


SFollowing the Malinivijayottara very closely: [1.] the first twenty phonemes, 74—4 form 


the head of the Goddess; [2.] then three phonemes, v2— y, represent her neck and shoulders; 


[3.] then eight phonemes, d4—ja represent her arms, hands, fingers, skull-bowl and trident; 


[4.] then nine phonemes pa—ksa, given in eight enunciations, represent her upper torso:; [5.] 


then ten phonemes, m4—pha, given in nine enunciations represent her buttocks genitals legs 
and feet. 


°[1 


.] The first twenty phonemes, #4—% represent the head of the Goddess; [2.] a single pho- 


neme, va, represents her neck; [3.] eight phonemes, d44— ja represent her arms, hands, fingers, 


skull-bowl and trident; [4.] two phonemes, bha and ya represent her shoulders (the position of 


these two phonemes may be explained by their inclusion into the phase of the upper torso); [5.] 


eight phonemes p4—4h, represent her upper torso; [6.] ten phonemes, #14—pha represent her 
buttocks, genitals, legs and feet. The text as edited in the KSTS edition of the Tanträloka is not 
very reliable, but emendation is possible on the basis of the parallel passage in the Kubjikämata. 


522 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


pitha: # à va dha da ta tha jha ña ra ja bha ; Kämarüpapitha: ya pa sa ksa 
la cha à sa ba ah ma $a am; Mätañgapitha: a e ai au o da pha 


ix. Srimatottara À 7: 1. na tha r ÿ | Î ca ï na u à ba ka kha ga gha a a va i; 
2. bha ya; 3. da dha tha jha ña ra ja ta; 4. pa à ah ha sa cha la sa ksa; 5. 
ma $a am ta e ai o au da pha 


x. Kularatnoddyota 5.84-99, 50 enunciations with Saktis, six descriptive 
phases: 1. na tha r F l Ü dha ca à ba à à ka kha ga gha ña na u ü; 2. va; 3. 
da dbha tha jha ña ra ja ta; 4. bha ya; 5. cha la à sa ha ab pa sa ksa; 6. ma 
£a am ta e ai o au da pha 


xi. Agnipuräna (AP:) 145.6-18ab, 39 enunciations with Saktis: 4 a[tha] 
ar] ta[ÿ] ca dha 3 nana] talu] ja[a] ca[ba] ka kha ga gha ulña] 1 a va bha 
ma da dha paltha] olau?] am ah ta ta ja pa falsa] sa cha nalla] alä] thalsa] 


ksa ma 


i. In the recension of the Siddhayogesvarimata surviving in Nepalese Mss 
(3.7c-18d) the enumeration of the phonemes is partially encrypted, (eg. Si- 
ddhayogefvarimata 3.9c: jhasaptamah smrtau karnau, ‘the two ears are the sev- 
enth [phoneme from] jha [-»4]”), and the order given is the most eclectic of any 
work consulted. The order of this sequence points to an origin in the practice 
of nyäsa-. The practitioner empowers his body in phases in a more or less de- 
scending order. The first phase describes the head omitting the chaplet and the 
third eye. The first sixteen phonemes thus represent the actual physical features 
of the practitioner (as opposed to the Goddess). The importance of the first six- 
teen phonemes of the sequence may be explained by their correspondance to 
the sixteen vowels of the regular Sanskrit alphabet in its $bdaräsi- form. In the 
nyäsa- procedure of the faxbdaräfi-sequence (cf. Mälinivijayottara 8.27-29ab) 
the sixteen vowels (usually representing Sivatattva) are all projected into the 


head.?° 


2The 50 phonemes are given in 48 separate enunciations correlated with the respective 
body-parts of the Goddess. Vocalic nasalisation and aspiration (anusvära- and visarga-) are not 


present independently but are joined to #7 and 54 respectively. The attribution of left and right 
is given only for the ear-ornaments, the right being mentioned first. Since nothing else is stated 
one may infer that the right side is always mentioned first (sädhyäpeksa-, right from the deity's 
point of view). 


Somadeva Vasudeva 523 


The order given in the Siddhayogesvarimata differs so greatly from all other 
sequences that we must conclude it to be only remotely related to the re- 
codification of the #y4sa-order into the so-called nädiphäntakrama. The very 
name #ädiphänta is inappropriate since the sequence neither begins with #4 
nor ends with pha. It is not possible to explain this order as the result of faulty 
textual transmission. Rather, because the sequences are embedded in quarter- 
verses which cannot be easily transposed, it must be the result of conscious 
effort. It would not be possible to assimilate this sequence to the later 74dipha- 
ntakrama without considerably altering, or rather rewriting, the text. 


ii. The presentation of the nädiphäntakrama in Mälinivijayottara 3.37-41ab 
is very brief. The order is given in plain language with no attempt at encod- 
ing.! The sequence of the MVUT is clearly the most systematic among the 
works consulted: the Goddess is described from her topknot down to her feet 
in a consistent descending order. This is one of the two most common ways 
to describe a personage of eminence, the other possibility being the ascending 
manner, approaching as a humbly bowing devotee who first sees the feet. Thus 
the Kashmirian commentator Vallabhadeva introduces the first description of 
Pärvatt in the Kumärasambhava as follows:?? 


The body of Goddesses is described beginning with the toes of the feet; [for a 
description] of humans one begins with the hair, this is the poetic convention. 


The inversion of this principle may be explained by the manifestation of the 
Goddess in the order of creation (srstikrama-) rather than the order of resorption 
(samhärakrama-). Now this principle of a systematically descending order is 


21Only the phonemes ha, o and au are not directly enunciated but are stated to be ‘the 
following phoneme (3.40a, 3.41b). The sequence consists of 48 enunciations, since neither 
the anusvära- (am) nor the visarga- (ah) are given independently. The anusvära- is joined to #4 
forming the bfjamantra- fam representing the generative organ of the Goddess and the visar- 
ga- is connected with the phoneme 54 to form the bäjamantra- sah representing her life/soul 
(j{va). The relative position of right and left is stated only once, for the shoulders. The right 
is enumerated first, again implying a procedure to be followed throughout. It is noteworthy 
that this appears to be the standard practice for all of the Trikatantras with the exception of the 
Tantrasadbhäva which has reversed this order. 

22Vallabhadeva ad Kumärasambhava 1.32: devinäm rüpam pädañgusthät prabhrti varnyate, 
mänusinäm tu kesebhya ärabhyeti kavisamäcära iti. This is echoed by Mallinätha introducing Ku- 
märasambhava 1.33 but attributed to the custom of the pious (dhärmika-) and not the common 
practice of poets: devatänäm rüpam pädängusthaprabhrti varnyate mänusänäm kesäd ärabhyeti 


dhärmikäb. 


524 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


of help to clarify the precise nature of the Goddess “head-garland” (fromä- 
lä-). This expression could refer to two things: a garland of severed heads, or 
a headband. Since it is mentioned immediately after the top-knot, it cannot 
possibly be a necklace located at the level of the neck. That it was originally 
intended as a kind of chaplet is also implied by the 7Zrifirobhairava: ‘a garland 
[worn] on the head’ (malikä sirasi) 23 
The extreme condensing and essentialising tendency of the Mälinivijayottara 
has reduced the exposition of the nädiphäntakrama to a mere four and a half 
verses:?1 
The phoneme #4 is her topknot; 7 7 / {2 form the skull-crown; #ha is her head; 
the eyes are ca and dha°f; her nose is 7; n-u and n-% are the two ears with or- 
naments; ba, the gutturals [ka kha ga gha na], i and 477 are the mouth, teeth, 
tongue and voice; ® va bha ya are the neck, the right and left shoulders; d4 dha 
are the arms; the hands are [both] #h4; jha and %a are the fingers [on her right 
and left hands]; ja ra and fa are her [trident-]staff?” and skull[-bowl]; pa is her 


23 As Jayaratha explains, it is of course made of skulls, see TaAIVivx: iromälà kapälärambhi- 
kä, ‘Garland of heads means one made of skulls. 

À Mälinivijayottara 3.374 1b. 

#There is a metrical problem at MVUT 3.37a. The r4-vipulä (-<-) is preceded by a non- 
permitted ja-gana (-—*). Such violations of the metre are rare in the MVUT but it should be 
taken into consideration that the present instance occurs in a list. 

2The phoneme ca forms the third eye of the Goddess and ha represents her two ordinary 
eyes. The corresponding passage in SYM 3.7d explicitly places only dha into the two eyes (cf. 
also Satsähasrasamhità patalah 7: trtiyam nayanam devyä ña-cha-madhyagatam tathä || cämu- 
ndayà samopetam jñätavyam varavarnini | na-da-madhyagatau jñeyau dvidhäbhütau tu locanau 
|| privadarsant devesi sûryasomätmikä smrtà | caksuryugme varärohe, daksavämakramena tu ||). 

27The long -4 expresses the plural -4h in sandhi.. 

28[n the discussion of the SYM% passage it was noted that the first sixteen instances of its 
sequence, corresponding to the sixteen vowels of the Säbdaräéi sequence, were all present in 
the head of the Goddess. At first glance it appears that this doctrinally significant feature is 
not preserved; the first phase of the Mälinivijayottara does describe the head of the Goddess 
but it consists of twenty phonemes. There is however one peculiarity in this phase: the pho- 
nemes representing the teeth are not individually enumerated but are collectively called the 
“gutturals” (kavarga-). If this is counted as a single instance the head of the Goddess would 
again be circumscribed by sixteen instances. It is not inconceivable that it was the redactors 
intention to preserve this feature. In the Mälinivijayottara’s projection of the ftbdaräfi- sequence 
into the practitioner’s body the sixteen vowels are after all also placed into the head (Mälinivi- 
jayottara 8.27-29ab). 

2 ra forms the staff of the trident in her right hand, ja its three spikes. Cf SYM 3.12; Triÿi- 
robhairava 9c. 


Somadeva Vasudeva 525 


heart; cha and /4 are her breasts; her milk is 4; s4h is her soul; [ha], the immedi- 
ately following phoneme is her vital energy; sa and ksa are her belly and navel; 
ma, Sam and fa are her buttocks, her genitals and her pair of thighs; €, 45 her 
knees; the following phonemes [o and av] are her shanks; d4 and pha are her 
feet. 


iv. In the Tantrasadbhäva the nädiphänta sequence is given in an encoded 
30 


form using the device of the Mälinigahvara. 
The Mälinigahvara is à triangu- 
lar grid into which are placed all 
of the phonemes beginning with 
the top corner spiralling inwards 
to the centre. Once this grid has 


been drawn the sequence is “ex- 
tracted” (wddharet) by following 
instructions such as ‘take the sylla- 
ble between ya and 54 [-ha]’ etc.°! 

Although the Zantrasadbhäva 
3.105-128ab employs the term 
nädiphänta, it then paradoxically x 


proceeds to begin the sequence not 
with #4 but with #h4. An error in 7». 
the process of redaction or in the Figure 1: The mälinigahvara. 

scribal transmission may therefore be diagnosed. The correct order is easily re- 
stored with help from the earliest Mss of the Kubjikämata’s parallel passage”? 


The remaining divergences between the sequences of the Zantrasadbhäva and 


30 For a discussion of this and other gahvaras, see SCHOTERMAN 1982. 

31 For instructions on drawing the Mälinigahvara see: Tantrasadbhäva 3.100104, Kubjikä- 
mata 4.76-80, Satsähasrasamhitä 7.76-80, Srimatottara F° 34%. In the uddhära- procedure of 
the Tantrasadbhäva the directions pürva-, pascima-, ürdhva- and daksina- refer solely to the di- 
rections “left, right, above” and “below”; they are not associated with the five mahäpithas placed 
into the diagram by some texts of the Kubjikä-cult. Madhya- (“in the middle of”) and randhra- 
(fat the edge of”) are self-explanatory. A separate triangle with the syllable ksa is occasionally 
appended below the 0; ksa has this special status because, strictly, it cannot be extracted from 
the diagram but arises from the samyoga- of ka and sa. 

#2The problem relates to the confusion over the true nature of the romälä- represented 
by the four neuter vowels 7 7 / { (Tantrasadbhäva 3.106cd) already encountered. The original 
position of the “head”, ie. the phoneme #h4, was immediately after these. This is the position 
preserved in the derivative Kubjikämata passage and also in the Mälinivijayottara which agrees 
with the Tantrasadbhäva for the first twenty-nine phonemes if #h4 is restored to this place. 


526 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


the Mälinivijayottara are not dramatic,* and with the exception of one quarter- 
verse the Zantrasadbhäva passage could be rearranged to give precisely the 
same rädiphänta-sequence as the Mälinivijayottara without doing anything 


more than rearranging the sequential order of complete half-verses.*° 


v. This passage of the Zantrasadbhäva has been adopted into Kubjikämata 
4.81ab-106, the first occurrence of the rädiphänta- sequence in that Tantra.Ÿ 


Somewhere in a lineal precursor of the surviving two palmleaf mss of the Tantrasadbhäva the 
fromälä- must have been wrongly perceived as “necklace of heads”. This has led to the moving 
of the pädayuga- describing the head (3.106cd) to the beginning of the sequence, since in the 
practice of nyäsa- it would have been incongruous to jump from the topknot down to the 
neck and then back up to finish the head. The transposition of the hemistich relating to the 
head was also less invasive than the excision and reinsertion of the four vowels relating to the 
“head-garland” (romälä-) and thus preferable. 

3Restoring the misplaced initial ha the sequence continues in the exact order of the Mäli- 
nivijayottara up to #a at position 29, then agrees with the Trifirobhairava ta-ra-ja, then follows 
its own arrangement made up of sequences found in the Trirobhairava. From ksa, position 
40, onwards it follows the Mälinivijayottara again. Again, anusvära- and visarga- do not feature 
independently. The left-right-orientation, frequently stated explicitly, is the reverse of the other 
Trikatantras (no indication is given whether this implies that the description is sädhakäpeksa-, 
from the viewpoint of the practitioner). 

The one problem occurs at 3.120c (74-sa-madhyagam udaram the syllable sa is the stom- 
ach) where it is metrically impossible to move päda c to the desired location after 122b. That 
quarter verse also shows a metrical problem. The n4-vipulä- (---) is not preceded by either 
the permitted double ga-gana- (--) or ra-gana (-*-) but by à ja-gana (-—°). The hypothet- 
ical, reordered verse-numbering yielding the nädiphäntakrama of the Mälinivijayottara is as 
follows (Metrically impossible insertions are bracketed by superscript asterisks): Tantrasadbhä- 
va 3.105ab, 106, 105cd, 107—116, 119, 118, 117, 120ab“c“d, 121, 122cd, 123ab, 122ab, 
123cd—128. The derivative Kubjikämata passage allows itself to be reordered into the nädi- 
phäntakrama of the Mälinivijayottara without any problems at all: Kubjikämata 4.81cd—94ab, 
96cd, 97ab, 95cd, 96ab, J4cd, 95ab, 97cd, 99cd, 100, 98ab—99ab, 101—106. The metrical 
problem with the corresponding passage to Tantrasadbhäva 3.120c does not arise since the Ky- 
bjikämata reads grhya (the lectio difficilior), in place of priye and expands the quarter verse into 
an independent pathyä pädayuga-. 

#It is however difficult to explain why this should have happened in each and every case. 
Beyond the restoration of the original positions of the phonemes #4 and #ha no other changes 
have here been [re?-Jimposed on Tantrasadbhäva. 

36The Kubjikämata’s redactors’ thought-processes can occasionally be reconstructed. At 74- 
ntrasadbhäva 3.115ab > Kubjikämata 4.9 1cd-92ab à redactor of the Kubjikämata had presum- 
ably misread #-#ha as either %-tha or u-dha, neither of which makes sense in the Mälinigahvara. 
He was therefore compelled to rewrite the instructions for the extraction of the phonemes rep- 
resenting the Goddess’ arms. This implies that the redactor(s) had access to only a (single?) 
rather corrupt Ms of the Tantrasadbhäva for this passage, secondly that he/they seem(s) to have 


Somadeva Vasudeva 527 


vi. The Trifrobhaïrava’s discussion of the r4diphänta-sequence survives only 
in citation in Jayarathas Zanträlokaviveka 15.121-125b and it has also been 
redacted into in the Kubjikämata 17.94—109.%7 In this most elaborate exposi- 
tion of any surviving Trikatantra all fifty phonemes of the syllabary are listed 
separately with their Sakti and location on the body of the Goddess. The pho- 
nemes are given explicitly without encoding. 

Although the Zrifirobhairavas nädiphäntakrama roughly follows the order 
of the Mälinivijayottara, it cannot be reduced to that order by simple transpo- 
sitions of halfverses as can that of the Zantrasadbhäva. Nevertheless, it must be 
admitted that the sequence of the 7rifirobhaïrava is in large parts very similar to 
that of the MVUT. The differences are in fact exactly the kind to be expected 
in a conflated transmission originating with a common source, ie. transposition 
and inversion of discrete groups. 


x. Among the scriptures of the Kubjikä-cult which have drawn upon these 
Trikatantras, the Kwlaratnoddyota 5.84—-101ab shows à somewhat remote but 
still discernible afinity to the 7rifrobhairava. The usefulness and the limitations 
of Kubjikämata 4.81ab—-106 and 17.94—109 have been noted above.” 


been well versed in the encoding system of the Mälinigahvara, and thirdly that he has been able 
to restore the correct order of the nädiphänta sequence from another, unknown source. 

37The secondary nature of the Kubjikämata passage is confirmed by the nature of its di- 
vergence: original vipulä- forms have been removed during redaction. Thus at 7r#irobhairava 
12ab/Kubjikämata 105ab the redactor of the Kubjikämata has rephrased the verse to remove 
the ra-vipulä-. At 98a the editors of the Kwbjikämata have accepted the secondary emendation 
Mukhivirä for the doubtlessly original Chirvirä in Ms A, thus converting the ra-vipulä- to à 
pathyä- form. There are also some errors of omission which have occurred during the redaction 
of the Kubjikämata: for instance at 103b the Kwbjikämata has not even preserved the phonemes 
bha and ya corresponding to the shoulders, in place of bhayau it reads api. 

S8Positions 7-9 (Maälinivijayottara: ca-dha-i) are dha-i-ca, the ears and ear-ornaments 4- 
(nlu-[n]ü are moved down to positions 18-20, the Mälinivijayottara’s sequence is maintained in 
the interval. The shoulders bha-ya are moved from positions 23-24 to 31-32; in the intervening 
list ja-ra-ta is inverted to #a-ra-ja. These three phonemes describe the trident and the skull-bowl 
of the Goddess. It is unlikely that this should indicate an iconographical difference, for instance 
that the trident might be inverted, pointing downwards in the manner of Durgä Mahisäsura- 
mardini or that the orientations might be reversed, the skull-bowl being in the right hand and 
the trident in the left. The order then diverges but the final sequence from m4—pha agrees 
with the Mälinivijayottara again. The attribution of left and right is given only for the feet, 
and, following the practice of Mälinivijayottara, the right member is listed first. From this it 
may again be concluded that the other pairs obey the same pattern, the prior member is the 
right, the latter the left. This again reflects a normative practice for the Trikatantras. 

3The Satsähasrasamhitä 7.5-38 has been edited by SCHOTERMAN (1982:210-218). Regard- 
ing the naming of some of the Saktis of the nädiphäntakrama ScHOTERMAN (1982:213-214) 


528 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


ix. The Srzmatottara® is the only text to give a full visualisation of a variety 
of the Goddess Mälinï and also of the fifty Saktis presiding over the individual 


phonemes. 


xi. Agnipuräna 145.6-18ab appears to be in turn derived from the scriptures 
of the cult of Kubjikä. The text is unfortunately transmitted very imperfectly.“! 
The twenty-nine phonemes which are enumerated are thus unreliable, but nev- 
ertheless the Saktis and their locations agree (with some omissions) with the list 
of the Kubjikämata.®? 


Te O1 Mizp1iy FLUCTUATING IDENTITIES OF THE PHONEME GODDESSES 


Just as the Sabdaräéi sequence has a series of Rudras presiding over the individ- 
ual phonemes, so the Nädiphänta sequence has a pantheon of female deities, 
variously called Sakti, Kalä, Düti or Yogini, presiding over the individual syl- 
lables.** Their original purpose was the ritual purification, empowerment and 
divinisation of the physical body during the imposition of the phonemes in 
the practice of ny4sa-* The names of some of these deities echo the respective 
body-parts their phonemes are associated with: Priyadaréanä in the eyes, Väg- 
iévari for speech etc. The variations encountered are tabulated (variant spellings 
encountered in a single text are noted individually, & denotes all texts): 


remarks that he has chosen -y4 endings instead of the more natural -7 in cases where he believed 
the -y4 to be the ending of a feminine proper noun in compound with samanvita- rather than 
denotative of the instrumental suffix. The weight of evidence now points against this, and it 
seems advisable to restore the “correct forms” as far as possible: Kapälinyä > Kapälini, Dipanyä 
> Dipani, Pävanya > Pavani. 

0 $rimatottara (=-Goraksasamhitä) 7.2- 64; 7.118-342. 

AThe edition reproduces numerous $Säradä— Devanägari transcription errors (initial w:#4; 
retroflex for dental etc.) and ignores obviously incorrect repetitions (#14 occurs twice). Some 
obvious corrections to the names of the Saktis are Vägeévari for Nägeévari, Lämä for Nämä etc. 

#This affiliation is further corroborated by the independent enunciation of the phoneme 
-ah with the Sakti Sañjivanï on the backs of the hands. This is common in the texts of the 
Kubjikä-cult and can be traced back to the Triirobhairava. 

BCE Malinivijayottara 3.17-25. 

#4Six of the sources consulted give details of these Goddesses: Trifirobhairava cit. TaÂlVivr 
ad Tanträloka 15.121-125cd; Kubjikämata 17.94—109; Srimatottara 7.769; Satsähasrasamhitä 
7.5-38; Kularatnoddyota 5.80c—-101b; Agnipuräna 145.6-18ab. 

#5]n the twenty-seventh chapter of the Päramesvarimata the object of \/nyas- is always one 
of these Goddesses, never à phoneme on its own. 


Somadeva Vasudeva 


na 


Ca 


dha 


ka 


kha 


ga 


ña 


Nädini a 

Nivriti à 

Pratisthà à 

Vidyä à 

Santi à 

Grasanti TriSiBhai; Grasanï à 
Cämundä a 

Priyadar$anà TriSiBhai, KuRa- 
Udd; Priyadarsani KubMaTa; 
Priyadarsinr SiMaUtt; Prita- 
darfant SaSàäSam; Priyädrsti 
AgPu 

Guhyasakti à 
(Sañkara)-näräyant SatSaSam; 
Naäräyant à 

Mohani à 

Prajñä à 

Vajrini à 

Kañkatä TriSiBhai, SriMaUtt, 
KuRaUdd; Karäli SiMaUt, 
AgPu; Karälinyä, KubMaTa, 
SatSaSam 

Kälikä TriSiBhai, KuRaUdd; 
Karñkatä KubMaTa; Kapälinyä 
SatSäSam; Kapali/Kañkäli/Ka- 
ñkatä SiMaUtt; Kapälini Ag- 
Pu; 

Siva TriSiBhai, SatSäSam, Ku- 
RaUdd, AgPu; Xälikä KubMa- 
Ta; 

Ghoraghosä TriSiBhai, Kub- 
MaTa, SatSäSam; Ghorä Ku- 
RaUdd, AgPu 

Sivirä TriSiBhai; Mukhivira 
KubMaTa; Chirvvarä SriMa- 
Utt; Khirvarä SatSaSam; Sir- 
varä KuRaUdd 

Mäyä a; MäyälSarasvati Sri- 


Va 


bha 


ya 
da 
dha 


tha 


jha 


fa 


Ja 
ra 


ta 


529 


MaUtt 

Vägisvari TriSiBhai; Vägesvart 
KubMaTa, SatSäSam, KuRa- 
Udd; Vägiÿ SriMaUtt; Näge- 
fvari AgPu; [Sarasvatr TaSad- 
Ta] 

Sikhivähint a 

Bhisani TriSiBhai, AgPu; Bisa- 
nà KubMaTa, KuRaUdd; Bhi- 
mä SaSaSam 

Vayuvega à 

Lama a; Nämä AgPu 

Vinäyiki TriSiBhai; Vinäyakr 
KubMaTa, SatSäSam; Vaind- 
yakï KuRaUdd; Vinäyakà Ag- 
Pu 

Pürnimä TriSiBhai, SatSaSam, 
AgPu; Paurnimä KubMaTa, 
KuRaUdd 

Jhañkart 05 Jhamkäri/Damkäri 
SriMaUtt 

Kundanä TriSiBhai; Kurdanï 
KubMaTa, SatSiSam; Kur- 
ddhanï SiMaUtt; ÜUrdhvaku- 
rdani KuRaUdd 


Jayanti à; Jayantyà SatSaSam 
Dipani TriSiBhai, KubMa- 
Ta, KuRaUdd, AgPu; Dipanya 
SatSaSam; Dipini SriMaUtt 
Kapälini à; Kapälinyä SatSa- 
Sam 

Pävant a; Pävanyä SarSaSam 
Chagalï TriSiBhai, KubMaTa; 
Chagalandä KuRaUdd; Chaga- 
ländi SiMaUtt; Sarirä AgPu 
Pâtana à 

Amotari  TriSiBhaïi, Amor 
KubMaTa, SriMaUtt, SatSa- 


530 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Sam; Amodi KuRaUdd; Nairr- fa Kusumäyudhä a 
ti SriMaUtt am Sukrä TriSiBhai, KubMaTa, 
sa Paramätmä a; Paramäkhyä Ag- KuRaUdd; Krñrä SatSaSam 
Pu ta Tära TriSiBhai, KubMaTa, Sat- 
ah Icchäsakti TriSiBhaï; /ccha SäSam; Zrakä KuRaUdd, Ag- 
KubMaTa Pu 
ba Ambikä à e Jñänasakti à 
sa Lambikäà TriSiBhai, KubMaTa, ai Kriyäsakti à 
KuRaUdd; Lambinr SriMa- o Gâyatri à 
Utt; Lambodaryä SatSäSam; 


Lambodari AgPu "  : . ne 
ksa_ Samhärikä a; Samhärya SatSä- RE un 

Sam; Samharikä/Samghäri Sri- pha  Phetkärikä TriSiBhaï; Phetkäri- 

NUS” ‘ käà KubMaTa; Phetkärya SatSà- 
Motte Sam; Phetkäri KuRaUdd 


It is striking that there is no substantive variance regarding the attribution of 
Saktis to phonemes. The deviations in the names are relatively minor and can 
easily be explained away as scribal errors, variant orthographies, synonyms etc. 


THE RATIONALE OF THE Nädiphäntakrama 


Even more striking than the fidelity with which the phoneme-$akti assignation 
was retained, is the flawless preservation, despite the frequent divergence of se- 
quence, of the association of a corresponding phoneme and body-part. This 
shows beyond doubt that this is the one key feature essentially defining the 
nädiphäntakrama in the pre-exegetical tradition. Astonishingly, there occur no 
variations at all in any of the texts consulted. As we have seen, the sequence of 
the phonemes may vary considerably, the associated female deities may or may 
not be present (but when they are their correlation with phoneme and body- 
part is also scrupulously maintained), but the undeviating identification of cer- 


6Elaborate visualisations (märtidhyäna-) for these are found only in the Srzmatottara patala 
7 Fr 39%-Fr 442, part of which is reproduced in Goraksasamhità patala 7, pp. 30-46. À similarly 
secondary elaboration seems to have taken place for the presiding deities of the Sabdaräéi order. 
Räghavabhatta, in his Padärthädarsa commentary on the Säradätilaka of Laksmanadesikendra 
(a commentary that is rich in visualisations of Speech-Goddesses), 44 6.4, à visualisation of 
Sarasvatï, gives details of the presiding deities of the phonemes in the Sabdaräsi sequence. His 
source is identified simply as ‘another Tantra”: pratyaksaram dhyänam tanträntaroktam yathà.… 


Somadeva Vasudeva 531 


tain phonemes with certain body-parts of the Goddess persists as the single 
constant factor in an entire scriptural transmission probably spanning several 
centuries. 


UNEXPECTED UNIFORMITY 


Once this specific correlation of a given phoneme and and a given body-part 
is accepted, the rädiphäntakrama can be explained as the order of mantra- 
imposition (#yäsa-). The most systematic of these orders of #y4sa- is that of the 
MVUT. It begins with the topknot and then descends down the body to the 
feet. The only missing link in the explanation of the rädiphäntakrama is the 
specific assignation of phoneme to body-part. What is so special about these 
particular associations and what has made them so impervious to change? 


How CAN THE PHONEME GODDESSES ALWAYS BE IN THE SAME PLACE? 


To uncover the reason for this it is helpful at this point to shift our attention 
from the audible phonemes to the visual graphemes used to represent them 
instead. The surviving exegesis of the Trika shows little interest in the written 
characters forming the nädiphäntakrama.*’ Abhinavagupta does indicate that 
Somänanda had taught such considerations as soteriologically effective (4p4- 
ya-) in his commentary on the Parätrimsika.“8 But Abhinavagupta does not see 
fit to follow his lead. He is aware of the historical and geographical specificity 
of calligraphic styles and dismisses such elaborations with this justification: al- 
though of use to some rare person, such speculations, dependent on the artificial 
conventions of writing, are of no use to disciples removed in space and time. 
Despite his dismissal, it is clear that certain Saiva Tantras, notably the Sarvavira, 


did show an interest in written characters and not just in phonemes.” 


#7]t contains very little speculation on the esoteric significance of written characters in gen- 
eral (see Tanträloka 3). 

#8 Parätrimsikävivarana 5—9ab (KSTS, p. 35'4): dhülibhedädinà ca kalpitasämayikalipyape- 
ksanam api bhaved api kasya cid upäyäya, na tu tat sakaladesakälagatasisyavisayam iti näsmäbhir 
vitatya vipañcitam | etadanubhavayuktyanupravistänäm ca tad akäryakaram, svakalpanäbhis ca 
sukaram | anyesäm caitadupadesänabhijñänäm tadupadesanam api akimcitkaram, ity alam anena 
prakrtavighnavidhäyinà |. 

#9$ee Ksemaräja in Sivasñtravimarsini at 1.4:a: … frisarvavirädyägamaprasiddhalipikramasa- 
mnivesotthäpikä..….[mätrkäl. 


532 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


PHONEMES, GRAPHEMES AND BODY PARTS 


The relationship between the graphemes and their correlated body-parts 
claimed here is the most simple: physical resemblance.* Specifically, the re- 
semblance claimed begins to be evident in the Gupta version of the Brähmi 
alphabet and lasts several centuries. The characters given in the following table 
represent a Gupta hand of the 3—4th century ce.°! 


x na topknot (tip of topknot  #@R ae ka kha ga gha [ia] tecth, 


the left added below the charac- 


ter it modifies). 


(Gkhägra-) TriSiBhaï). (right upper fang—lower left 
MC r /5 l Ù] malikä rai Trisi- fang SatSaSam, AgPu, ra -räja- 
Bhai - firomälä-. As noted earlier dantar). 
this is not a garland worn around “ itongue 
the neck but rather a chaplet of # a speech 
skulls worn on the head. 
Sur & va throat 
= . # bha right shoulder 
Her où ya left shoulder 
a dha two eyes 
. : 3 daright arm 
F3 7 nose (breath (pränana-) KuRa- 
Udd). & dha left arm 
© tha palms of the hands 
Or na ears ; | 
[u] right earring (its character 1° ha fines: GÉrehe Band 
resembles a small hook to the ® fa fingers of left hand 
left added below the character it EX jatrident in right hand 
modifies). J ra staff of trident 
[ü] left earring (its character re- © ta skull in left hand 
sembles a small double-hook to 
a paheart 
& 


cha right breast 


Z ba mouth 


50Of course, the post-scriptural exegetes have built up elaborate systems of identifications 
and homologies of their own involving this sequence, but the parallels they sought and put 
forward were between a sequence of morphemes and various elements, reality levels and other 
ontological, phenomenological or metaphysical categories (see for instance Abhinavagupta's 
exposition of Mälini, Mätrkä and Sabdaräéi as existing at the Madhyamä, Paéyanti and Parä 
levels of speech respectively, and the complex associations with #aftvas and experiential states 
which he advances primarily in his exegesis of the Anuttara, or Ekavira system of the Trika 
found in his two commentaries on the Parätrimsikä). But here we are concerned with the 
original attribution of meaning to the phonemes. 

51Taken from SANDER (1968:tables 8-20). 


Somadeva Vasudeva 533 


af /a left breast dess’ genitalia. The resemblance 
% 4 milkin breasts is rather to a male practitioner’s 
&r sa soul (soul in heart S;YoMa, pe | | | 
supreme soul 7}iS$iBhai, KubMa- lam] lovarian fluid 7riS5Bhaiï, 
Ta). KubMalTa,  SatSäSam,  KuRa- 
[ah] [Pränatma 7iSiBhai, vyà- Uaa]. 
pya KubMa Ta]. & ta thighs. The phoneme #7 may 


originally have been meant to 
cover both thighs together since 


ÿ 


ba vital energy (vital energy per- 


vading whole body SYM). it evolved out of a basic inverted 
# sastomach y-shape. 
Æ sa navel SN eight knee 
& ma buttocks 2 aileft knee 
A $a the genitals An apparent 3 oright shank 


problem is presented by the 
phoneme $, since the triangu- 
lar grapheme of the phoneme e 2 da right foot 
would clearly be à more appro- EL pha left foot 
priate representation of the God- 


au left shank 


Self-evidently, it would be rash to suppose this could be used as a reliable in- 
dication for the date of the earliest Trika texts. The n4diphäntakrama need not 
have originated in the Trika but may have been borrowed from an earlier source 
and, the range of possible dates within which the resemblance of graphemes and 
body-parts can be discerned is rather large. 

This hypothesis is not as strange as it first appears. An interest in the actual 
shape of the graphemes of the Sanskrit alphabet is also evident in other early 
Tantric sources. The /ayäkhyasamhitä, an early scripture of the Pañcarätra, con- 
tains a description of the varnas so graphically detailed that BHATTACHARYA*? 
(admitting the inaccuracy of the method) adduces this as evidence for a date 
as early as 450 ce. The graphemes described in /ayäkhyasamhitä 6.32cd-58 are 
similar to those used by the compilers of the nädiphäntakrama but the visual 
associations implied by the two systems are radically opposed. For instance the 
author of the /ayäkhyasamhitä passage saw the written character ka as a lotus 
(kamala-), having in mind perhaps à slightly earlier form of the character re- 
sembling a small plus sign. The author of the #ädiphäntakrama on the other 


52This reasoning does not seem to be that of E. KRISHNAMACHARYA, the editor of the text, 
but of B. BHATTACHARYA, the general editor who supplied the introduction. 


534 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


hand saw a hideous fang, having in mind the dagger-shaped evolute of the 
character. 

To summarise: In the Trika’s nädiphäntakrama the written shape of each 
grapheme taken singly was identified as resembling a certain bodily limb or or- 
gan; taken together the whole syllabary represented the anthropomorphic body 
of the alphabet deity. When listed in the conventional head-to-toes order of the 
nyäsa-rite a particular rearrangement of the alphabet is arrived at, and this is the 
sequence beginning with #4 and ending with pha. This means that one can draw 
an anthropomorphic sketch of the Goddess using Gupta era characters. 

What does this tell us about the earliest conception of the Goddess Mälini? 


À SYNÆSTHETIC ICON 


The Goddess Mälini, embodied in the nädiphäntakrama, was conceived of as a 
synæsthetic icon. This implies that Mälini comes into existence through a fusion 
of phonematic sound and graphemic shape within (or even as) the divinised 
body of the Tantric practitioner.°* 


The Sanskrit technical term used” to express such “fusion” is lolibhäva.SS 


53See SANDER (1968) tables 8-20, Schrifttypus 11, Gruppe A: Gupta-Alphabete des 3.4. 
Jh. n. Chr; Gruppe B: Gupta-Alphabete des 4-5. Jh. n. Chr. On the whole the description 
of the graphemes given in the /ayäkhyasamhitä seems to belong to even earlier paleographic 
strata than BHATTACHARYA had assumed. For instance the phoneme 77 is said to resemble a fire 
(anala-), an apt description of the wavy vertical line representing the phoneme 77 until about 
100 ce, but rarely beyond that date. In $aiva Tantras also, the phoneme 74 is usually the fire 
syllable. Alexis SANDERSON has provided me with the /ayadrathayämala’s enumeration of the 
various synonyms for the repha- (4, Varnanämapatala, 41cd-42ab): vahnim ca tittibham caiva 
deväsyam bhimavigraham / repham krodham samäkhyätam tathäà tejojjvalam ca tat. What must 
be realised, of course, is that a dating of any section of the Jayäkhyasamhitä cannot date the 
whole text, even if it were an original composition in the earliest stratum of that text. 

S#The most widespread form of synæsthesia (a condition where the stimulation of one sense 
organ produces a sensory impression in a different sense) is the perception of sound as colour, 
but all sorts of (sometimes debilitating) combinations are known to exist. 

See for example, Mälinrs self-dissolution through /o/ibhava after she feels slighted by 
Bhairava at Kubjikämata 1.71-80, cf. Vasupeva 2004:xlvii-xlvii. 

56$ee Tantrasadbhäva 1.20cd-21ab: punar eva tu te sarva ekabhävagatä prabho / lolibhütä 
yathà santi tathà tvam kathayasva mäm, and 1.473ab: lolibhñtam idam sarvam $aktisthäne 
layam gatah; Parätrisikävivarana p.50 I1.17-18: vifvatra väcye vifvätmani väcakam api yadi 
visvätmaiva tad evam paramparäcchädanalolibhävätmä nirvahed adhyäsah, na tv anyathäà / na 
bi tricaturañgulanyünatämätre ‘pi patah patäntaräcchädakah syàt. Kaulajñänanirnaya 3.20d; 
Kubjikämata 1.79; Jayaratha ad Tanträloka 1.1: tasya yämalam = lolibhävas.… Tanträlokaviveka 


Somadeva Vasudeva 535 


More precisely this seems to have originally denoted a state of indistinctness 
or instability that various entities must assume when they are on the verge of 
merging together, to the extent that they can no longer be distinguished.*7 In 
the Kashmirian exegetical tradition /o/bhäva is usually interpreted as a syn- 
onym for other technical terms denoting such fusion: /4ya, samghatta, yämala, 
and sämarasya, but evidently these terms all have complex histories of their own. 

For the initiate of the Trika, the Sanskrit alphabet, instantiated in the very 
precise order of the nädiphäntakrama, self-assembles into a visual representa- 
tion of the Goddess Mälini, her mantric identity or sound body. In a place 
and at a time proximate to the original conception of the phoneme-grapheme 
associations, the similarity between grapheme and body-part would have been 
immediately perceived, giving the impression that they are natural (sväbhävika), 
almost inviting the ritualistic assimilation (fanmayibhäva) with the body-parts 
of the practitioner in the mydsa-rite. As such, the successful visionary realisa- 
tion (darsana) of the Goddess Mälini would induce a mild form of synæsthesia 
in the initiate, dissolving the boundaries of sensory perceptions so that one 
could “see the alphabet as a Goddess,”—strikingly apt for the creative power 
underlying and manifesting the universe. The transformative power of such a 
many-levelled icon, bridging the sense-organs, must have been great. 

A careful reading reveals that these facts about Mälini are taught quite ex- 
plicitly in the earliest surviving scripture of the Trika, the Siddhayogesvarimata. 
First, it states that she must be sketched, but then reveals that she is “made up 


ad Tanträloka 3.122: lolibhävam … bhoktrbhogyasañghattasvabhävam; ibid 3.232: ya ävesah 
parasparasañghattätmà lolibhävah, ibid 3.237: yah parasparam lolibhävätmä sandarbhab, 
Üvarapratyabhijñävivrtivimarsini 2 p. 233, p. 278; 3 p. 27, p.50, Kularatnoddyota 12. 16, 
Timirodghätana fol. 48 recto, Devipañcasatikä 2.55: lolibhüta paräsakti ravisomakalodayam 
prakäsänandayor antar (antar MS G, antä Dyczkowski etext) ekäkäratayà sthitä; Matasära 
fol. Gr: tatah sa maithunam bheje drävaye <’>mrtam uttamam / akampitena manasà 
lolibhävavivarjitah. Svacchandatantroddyota 4.296d explains it as identical with the state of 54- 
marasya: samo raso yasmin sa samaraso lolibhävab, ibid 4.299d: {lolibhütam]...avikalpam vimr$ya 
tadvifräntyaiva samarasikuryät. Päramesvarasamhitä 6.4: bähyotthà väsanà vipra! bahujanmär- 
jità drdhä / lolikrto ‘nayä hy ätmä fuddho ‘fuddhasvarüpayä |. Ahirbudhnyasamhitä 16.62ab: 
väcyaväcakabhävena lolibhütä kriyämayi. Natanänandanas Kämakaläcidvallivyäkhyäna ad Kà- 
makaläviläsa 1.5: tayoh samarasah ekalolibhütah … pindibhavaty ekalolibhavati. Dhvanyälokalo- 
cana: sañkirnatà bi mifratvam lolibhävah, tatra katham ekasya prädhänyam ksirajalavat? In Bud- 
dhist Tantric texts the term features usually as ekalolibhäva. 

57See for example Helaräja's Prakirnaprakaäsä commentary 4d Väkyapadiya 3.3.2 
(sambandhasamuddesa): lolibhütäni fabdärthajñänäni ghata ity evam avagamyante. 


536 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


of all phonemes” (sarväksaramayi) # The natural interpretation of this state- 
ment is that formulated as the central argument of this paper: the phonemes 
are arranged so as to represent the actual body of Mälini. This is confirmed 
by statements such as: “The phoneme 7 pointing downwards is said to be her 
nose, *” a meaningless observation if applied to a sound or her nose alone. From 
such statements we may at least deduce that some of the characters must be ro- 
tated to fit into the icon. Figure 2 tries to recreate the synæsthetic icon of Mälini 
by minimizing such rotations. 

In the later Trika and its ex- 
egesis, the Goddess Mälini be- 
comes completely aniconic. À 
separate diachroneity, diamet- 
rically opposed to this essen- 
tialisation seen in the Trika, 
took place in the cult of the 
Goddess Kubjikä, where we 
find elaborate, standard icono- 
graphies of Mälini (see below 
for a critical edition of the de- 
tailed visualisation taught in 
the Srimatottara). This sec- 
ondary elaboration might be 
explained by the demotion of 
Mälini from the high rank she 
occupies in the Trika.° 

It is also easy to understand 
why this principle underlying 
the nädiphäntakrama should 
recreate the synæsthetic icon of Mälini made up eventually have been forgot- 
of Gupta characters. ten. Paleographic drift and the 

deliberate innovation of new 
calligraphic styles meant that the correspondence was no longer obvious, and 
inscriptional evidence of paleographical development shows that within a few 


Figure 2: À tentative, provisional attempt to 


centuries this correspondence becomes difficult to perceive. 


S8SYM 3.4—7ab: same medhye sulipte ca sugupte bhümimandale… rudrasaktim samälikhet sa- 
rväksaramayim devim sarvavarnopasobhitäm, “On an even ground fit for worship, well smeared 
[with cowdung] and concealed he should sketch the power of Rudra, the Goddess made up of 
all consonants adorned with all vowels.” 

SSYM 3.8a: à nasädhomukhi proktà 

On the pervasive influence of the Trika on the cult of Kubjikä, extending even to 
the mantra-system, see SANDERSON (2002, 1986:163-164) referred to in GOUDRIAAN and 
SCHOTERMAN (1988:14—24, 488-496). 


Somadeva Vasudeva 537 


DOCUMENTATION 


Mälinidhyänam: Srimatottara 6.1 41-47 


A visualisation of a ten-armed Mälini with five faces with three eyes each. She is 
red like the rising sun, intoxicated with liquor. She wears a dazzling diadem and 
celestial earrings. She bears: [1.] a bow, [2.] a lance, [3.] a conch, [4.] the gesture 
relieving fear, and [5.] a mirror in her left pentad of hands. In her right hands she 
holds: [6.] a thunderbolt, [7.] an arrow, [8.] a serpent, [9.] the gesture granting 
boons, [10.] a rosary. She is seated in vajräsana on the corpse (Sadäsiva). She 
wears a chaplet of skulls. Her heart-Mantra is s-h-au-üm, à derivative of the 
Parämantra sauh, cf. Srimatottara 6.132cd-133. 

udayädityasankäsiäm madiränandananditäm | 

pañcänanäm mahädevim tripañcanayanojjvaläm || 141|| 
divyakundalasobhädhyäm kiritimukutojjvaläm | 

bhujair dvipañcakair yuktäm nänälañnkäramanditäm ||142|| 

cäpam éaktis tathä kambu abhayam darpanam priye | 

vämamärgakaresv asyà divyästram ca viräjate || 143|| 

vajram bänam tathä sarpam varadam cäksasütrakam | 

daksinena tathä devi divyästram divyarüpinam ||144|| 
trivalibhañgamadhyasthäm pinonnatapayodharäm | 

härakeyürasobhädhyäm maniratnavibhüsitäm ||145|| 

vajräsanagatäm devim pretaparyankasamsthitäm | 

hadamälä $ire divyà varnahärävalambini ||146|| 

evam dhyätvä varärohe mälinim divyatejasäm | 

sarvavyäptimayim devim bhuktimuktiphalapradäm ||147|| 


Codices used for this section of patala 6: N = NGMPP reel no. À £, Fr 3347; from 6.142c 
onwards G = Goraksasamhitä patala 6, p. 29. 


141a ‘sankä$äm ] corr.; °sankäsam N° 141b °nanditäm ] corr.; nanditam N 141cänanäm | 
corr.; änanä N° l4lc ‘devim ] corr.; ‘devi N° 142a °ädhyäm |] corr.; ‘ädhya N 142b 
jvaläm ] corr.; jvalam N° 142c bhujair ] corr.; bhujai N° 142c yuktäm ] N; ...petäm #es- 
timonium of G begins  143c vämamärgakaresv ] em.; vämamärgakare tasya N; #xkikretasya 
G  143d ‘ästram ] G; ‘ämbram N  144b cäksa° ] G; cästra’ N° 144c daksinena tathà | 
N; #tkkxtha G  145a °bhañga° ] conÿ.; °tarañga® G hypermetrical, ‘talamga® N hypermetrical 
145b pinonnatapayodharäm ] conj.; vrttonnatapayodharäm G, pinavrttamayodharä N  146a 
‘gatäm devim |] em.; °gatäm devi G, gatä deviN 146chada° ] conj. SANDERSON; svara°G, va- 
daN 146cdivyà] G:; divyämN 146d ‘ävalambini ] em.; ävarambini N 147b mälinim ] 
G; mälini N° 147c ‘vyäptimayim ] em.; °vyäptimayi N, vyäptamayim G?°, vyäptamantim 
G% 147c devim ] G:; devi N 


145a °madhyasthäm | possibly à metrical adaptation of a final madhyamäm. 


538 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Tantrasadbhäva 3 > Kubjikämatatantra 4 


1044  uddharen Mälinim $ubhäm 
105a  nädiphäntasvarüpena 

105b  yathä bhavati tac chrnu | 

106a _ pa-dha-madhyam $ikhä caiva 
106b  adhahéirovyavasthitä | 

106c _e-pürvarnacatuskam tu 

1064  éiromala nigadyate 

105c  ai-fa-madhyam éiro devyäh 
1054  kärayec chubhalaksanam 

107a  trtiyam nayanam käryam 

107b  74-cha-madhyagatam priye | 
107c  na-da-madhyagatam jñeyam 
107d dvidhäbhütam varänane 

108a  nayane te smrte devyäh 

108b  kramäd daksinavämage | 

108c #a-pürvam näsika jñeyà 
Codices for patala 3 are denoted by the fol- 
lowing sigla: N:= NGMPP Reel no. À 44/1 
(NAK MS 1/363); N= NGMPP Reel no. A 
44/2; D= NGMPP Reel no. A. 188/22. Con- 
flation of the dental and palatal sibilants sa 
and $a (frequent in N) is reproduced only 
where relevant to other variance. The posi- 


tion of #ha (105cd) has been altered since it 
was deemed incorrect. 


104d mälinim ] corr.; mälini codd.  106a 
pa-dha-° ] N;:N; pa-da-° D  106b adhah] 
D; afdhalh N;,, * N° 106c e-pürvarna’ ] 
ND; e-[pülrvärna® N° 106d °mälä] em; 
°mälya D, ‘mäla N;IN  105cai-$a ] em; 
ai-da-° codd. 107b ña-cha-° ] N,N; da-ha-° 
D  ebpriye] D; priyet N;IN 107d varä- 
nane ] codd.; varänalidhaline N, 108a 
smrte | em.; smrtä codd.  108b ‘vämage | 


codd.; °vämake N; 


105 illegible in microfilm of N. 106b 
#rovyavasthitä :: incorrect syncopation with 
three iambi (--°-° -) 107c--109c illegible 
in microfilm of N. 


81b  uddharen Mälinim $ubhäm | 
8lc  nädiphäntakramenaiva 

81d  yathà bhavati tac chrnu 

82a  pa-dha-madhye &ikhä jñeya 
82b  adhah&irovyavasthita | 

82c e-pürvärnacatuskam tu 

82d  $iromäla nigadyate 

83a  ai-fa-madhye éiro devyäh 

83b  kärayec chubhalaksanam | 

83c  trtiyam nayanam devyà 

83d  a-cha-madhyagatam priye 
84a  na-da-madhyagatam jñeyam 
84b  dvidhäbhütam varänane | 

84c  nayanau ca smrte devyäh 

84d  kramäd daksinavämage 

85a  ta-pürvam näsikà jñeyà 

Varie lectiones noted in Edes are given only 
where relevant to proposed emendations. 
The sigla of Edes have been retained. Unfor- 
tunately the editors state: ‘only those readings 
are included which make sense in the Mälini 
Gahvara.” 

82b ‘éiro° em: ‘éira° Edgs, ‘&irah° D, ‘éira° 
E 82c°ärnacatuskam tu | em.; °äksaracatu- 
skam Edcs unmetrical, *äksar?catuskam tu 
DEGHYK, ‘äksarecatuskam F 834 priye | 
ABC; punah Edes 
te | em.; nayanau ca smrtau Edcs (nayane 
EGHIJK, smrte GHJK) 84d °vämage ] 
GHK; ‘vamagau Edes, vämago ] 85a 
‘pürvam ] C; pürve Edes 


84c nayane te smr- 


Somadeva Vasudeva 


108d  samélista tu h4-madhyaga 
109a dha-ta-madhyagatam grhya 
109b dvirabhyäsapaderitam | 

109c  #ha-da-pürve yute ‘dhastäd 
1094  bhüsanau karnayo(h) smrtau 
110a  vämadaksinamärgena 

110b  yathodbhütau sthitäv iha | 
110c sa-ca-madhyagatam vaktram 
110d devyäyà viranäyike 

llla  visarga-khasya madhyastham 
111b ka-ga-madhyayutam punah | 
lllc  kÆha-pa$cimam samuddistam 
111d  yasya cottaram eva ca 

112a  gha-ca syàt tatrasamstham tu 
112b uddhared aksaräñ chubhän | 
112c ete pañca smrta varna 

1124 devyà da$anakalpanä 

113a  #4-pürvam rasanä prokta 

113b  jha-ürdhvena Sarasvati | 

113c sa-ta-madhyasthitah kantho 
113d ma-cha-madhyagatoddharet 
108d °madhyagä ] codd.; °madhyagäh N; 
109a dha-ta-° ] em.; ta-ta- codd. + gr- 
hya N;; güghra ND  109b °paderitam ] 
codd.; °pade ’nvitam N; 109c pürve | 
codd.; purvam N, + yute] em.; yutau Ni, 
ryutau ND + ’dhastäd ] N;; dhastä ND 
110a °daksina® ] codd.; °dasina® N° 110c 
vaktram ] NN; cakram D 111a visar- 
gakhasya ] NN; visargakhas ca D 11lc 
kha-° ] em.; gha= codd. 111d yasya] 
D; paiya N; 112a tatra° ] conj; tara 
codd.  112b aksaräñ ] corr.; aksaräm D, 
aksarä N; + chubhän ] corr.; Subhäm codd. 
112d da$anakalpanä ] em.; dar$anakalpane 
D, da$anakalpaye N;  113b jha-ürdhvena | 
em.; jha-pürvena N;, ja-pürvena D 113c 
“sthitah ] N;; sthitam D  113d ma-cha-- 
madhya° ] N;; ma-*ttha*-madhya® ND 


111a--118d illegible in microfilm of N. 


539 


85b  samélistä netramadhyagä | 

85c  dha-ta-madhyagatam grhya 
85d  dvirabhyäsapaderitam 

86a  tha-da-pürvau yutau ‘dhastäd 
86b  bhüsanau karnayoh smrtau | 
86c  väamadaksinamärgena 

86d  karnabhüsasthitäv iha 

87a  sa-ca-madhyagatam vaktram 
87b  devyäyä viranäyike | 

87c  visargänta-kha-madhyastham 
87d  ka-ga-madhyagatam punah 
88a  kha-pascimam samuddistam 
88b  yasya cottaram eva ca | 

88c  gha-ca-madhyagatam caiva 
88d uddhared aksaram $ubham 
89a ete pañca smrta varnä 

89b  devyä da$anakalpanä | 

89c  Aa- rasanà devyà 

894  jha-ürdhvena Sarasvati 

90a sa-ta-madhyasthitah kanthah 
90b  "4-cha-madhyagatoddharet 
85b samélistä ] DE; samsrstä Edes, saméistäs 
G, samsrstam J  85b netra° ] FG/; caiva 
Edes 88b yasya cottaram ] conÿ.; pa$cimot- 
taram Edes  89c pürvam | E; pürve Edes, 
pürva° FG 


540 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


114a  ra-ma-madhyagatas tadvad 
114b  aksarau dvau $ubhätmakau | 
114c  éikharau tu smrtau bhadre 
1144 vämadaksinagau $ubhau 
115a  #-tha-daksinagau dvau tu 


115b  bähugau vämadaksinau | 
115c ra-u-madhyagatam caiva 
115d dvidhäbhütam prakalpayet 
116a  karatalau smrtau devi 

116b  savyäsavyam vijänatah | 
116c  ja-ma-pürvau tathängulyau 
1164 vämadaksinagäh $ubhäh 


117a  #a-tha-madhyagatam grhya 
117b  vämahaste prakalpayet | 
117c  ürdhvavaktram kapälam tu 
117d amrtakhyena püritam 

118a  daksine tu kare jñeyam 


118b y4-dha-madhyam tu dandakan | 


118c  éülasya kathitam bhadre 
118d uddhärena samuddhrtam 
119a  a-cha-madhyagatam $ülam 
119b uttänâ ürdhvavaktragam | 


114a ra-ma— ] em.; ra-sa-° codd. 115a 
u-tha-° ] em.; ra-dha* N;,, ta-tha* D 
116a °talau ] ew.; °talastho codd. 116b 
savyäsavyam ] D; savyäsayva N: 116c 
ja-ma- ] em.; bha-ma-° codd. 117a grhya | 
N;; güghra ND 117c ürddhvavaktram ] 
D; ürddhvaktram N;  118c bhadre ] D; 
rudre N, 119a a-cha-° ] NN; a-ccha-° D 


119b wttänd:: à nasalisation -4 in place of 
the correct sandhi -am has been preferred in 
order to avoid an incorrect syncopation with 
three iambi (----° -). 


90c 
90d 
9la 
91b 
91c 
91d 
92a 
92b 
92c 
92d 
93a 
93b 
93c 
93d 
94a 
94b 
94c 
94d 
95a 
95b 
95c 
95d 
96a 
96b 
96c 
96d 


ra-ma-madhyagatam tad vad 
aksarau tu $ubhätmakau 
$ikharau tau smrtau bhadre 
vämadaksinagau $ubhau | 
ñ-dha-madhyagatam grhya 
da-na-madhye dvitiyakam 
vämadaksinagau dvau tu 
bähü devyäh surärcite | 
ra-u-madhyagatam caiva 
dvidhäbhütam prakalpayet 
karatalau smrtau devyäh 
savyäsayvau vijänatah | 
ja-ma-pürvau tu añgulyau 
vämadaksinagau $ubhau 
am-ka-madhye karaprsthe 
dvidhäbhütam prakalpayet | 
ña-tha-madhyagatam grhya 
vämahaste prakalpayet 
ürdhvaktrakapälam tu 
amrtäkhyena püritam | 
daksine tu kare jñeyam 
ya-dha-madhyam tu dandakam 
$ülasya kathitam bhadre 
uddhärena samuddhrtam | 
a-cha-madhyagatam $ülam 
uttänam ürddhvavaktragam 


92c ra-u° ] G/; ta-da Edes, u-ra° K 94d 
prakalpayet ] DEGHJK; prapädayet Edes 
95d madhyam ] DFG; madhye Edcs 


Somadeva Vasudeva 


119c  jñätavyam tu vipascidbhir 
1194  yathälaksanalaksitam 

120a gha-na-madhyagatam hrc ca 
120b devyäyäh sarvakämikam | 
120c “na-sa-madhyagam udaram * 
120d ca-ja-madhyagatam priye 
l12la ra-va-sandhigatam tadvad 


121b  aksarau dvau stanätmakau | 
121c  jha-pürvam tu payo jñeyam 
121d amrtam samudährtam 

122a  ya-sa-madhyagatam pränam 
122b  devyäyä viranäyike | 

122c ma-sa-madhyagatam devi 

122d ätmäbijämrtätmakam 

123a  visargasahitam rudre 

123b uddhrtam mantram uttamam | 


123c  kasäkhyam mantraräjänam 
123d näbhim devyäh prakalpayet 
124a  bha-ña-madhyasmrtam devi 
124b  nitambam sakalätmakam | 
124c  va-sa-madhyagatam guhyam 
124d au-pa$cimasamanvitam 


120a ‘gatam] D; ‘gata NN ° hrc 
ca | codd.; hrx N 120d ‘gatam |] em.; 
‘gatah codd. 121a °-sandhi° ] N,N; 
°-sandi° D 121c jha- ] N;; ‘jha* N, 
“fa* D 122a ya-sa-° ] ND; ya-éa- N; 
123c mantraräjänam ] D; tatvaräjänam N;, 
mantraräjänah N° 123d näbhim] NN; 
näbhi D + devyäh ] corr.; devyà codd. 
124a bha-ña-° ] em.; bha-ya-° codd.  124b 
sakalä° ] codd.; [sa]kalä® N° 124c va-sa-° 
N,;va-$a ND 124dau-° ] em.; da-° coddl. 


120c À na-vipulä form preceded by a 
non-permitted ja-gana (-—*). 


541 


97a  jhatavyam tu vipa$cidbhir 
97b  yathälaksanalaksitam | 

97c  gha-na-madhyagatam hrc ca 
97d  devyäyah sarvakämadam 


99c  ca-ja-madhyagatam grhya 
994  ra-va-sandhigatam tathäà 
100a  vämadaksinagau dvau tu 
100b  aksarau tau stanätmakau | 
100c _jha-pürve tu payo jñeyam 
1004 amrtam samudährtam 

99a  ya-sa-madhyagatam pränam 
99b  devyäyä viranäyike | 

98a  ma-sa-madhyagatam grhya 
98b  ätmäbijam $ivätmakam | 

98c  visargasahitam bhadre 

98d  uddhrtam mantram uttamam 
101a “#a-sa-madhyagatam grhya* 
101b “udaram uddhrtam ’naghe‘| 
101c ka-säkhyam mantraräjänam 
101d näbhim devyäh prakalpayet 
102a  bha-ña-madhyagatam devi 
102b  nitambam sakalätmakam | 
102c va-sa-madhyagatam guhyam 
102d au-pa$cimasamanvitam 


97c madhyagatam hrc ca ] em.; °madhye tu 
hrdayam Edcs a na-vipulä, madhyagatam hr- 
dayam C, madhyam tu hrdayam FG  99c 
ca-ja° ] EFG: ja-ca Edes  100d samudähr- 
tam | ABD; ca udährtam Edés, camudähr- 
tam C 101c mantra° | FG/ tattva° Edcs, 
tamtva C 


542 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


125a  ürvakäram bhaved bijam 
125b  #4a-tha-madhyagatä ’naghe | 
125c na-ta-daksinagau bijau 
125d 
126a  savyäsavyagatau jñeyau 
126b  kramenaiva $ubheksane | 


jänukau dvau su$obhanau 


126c  ai-o-pa$cimagau dvau tu 
1264 janghe dve väamadaksine 
127a  tha-dha-madhyagatam devi 
127b  #a-sa-madhyam tathaiva ca | 
127c  dvau bijäv uddhrtau bhadre 
127d  pädau jñeyau vipaécite 

128a  vämadaksinagau proktau 
128b  laksanena vilaksitau | 

128c evam samyagvidhänena 


128d uddhrtä Mälini priye 


125a ürväkäram ] em.; ürvakärau codd. + 
bijam ] D; bïjä N;, bija N  125b na-tha-° 
NN; na-ga-° D + ‘gatä | em.; gato codd. 
125c na-ta-° ] em.; ta-tha- codd.  126a 
savyäsavyagatau | D; savyämavyagatau N;, 
savyäsavyaganau N 126b $ubheksane ] 
D; $ubhaksane N;, éubheksanau N° 126c 
ai-o-° ] conÿ.; ai-tha- N;; ai-sa- ND 127a 
tha-dha- NN; sa-dha- D 127b na-sa-° ] 
N;; da-tha-° N, r-sa-° D 127c bijàv ] D; 
bijav N;,bijamv N + bhadre ] codd.; omit- 
ted N; 127d pädau ] codd.; omitted N; 


103a 
103b 
103c 
103d 
104a 
104b 
104c 
104d 
105a 
105b 
105c 
105d 
106a 
106b 
106c 
106d 


ürvakäram bhaved bijam 
na-tha-madhyagatam ’naghe | 
na-ta-daksinagau bijau 
jänuni dve prakalpayet 
savyasavyagatau jñeyau 
kramenaiva $ubheksane | 
tha-dada-daksinagau dvau tu 
jañghe dve vamadaksine 
tha-dha-madhyagatam devi 
pa-ba-madhyam tathaiva ca | 
dvau bijau coddhrtau bhadre 
pädau jñeyau vipascita 
vämadaksinagau proktau 
laksanena samanvitau | 

evam samyagvidhänena 


uddhrtä Mälini priye 


104c 


ADEG'HJK 


tha-da-daksina° ] Edes, ??-pascima® 
104d jañghe dve vämadaksi- 


ne | K; jañghau dve vämadaksinau Edes, 
.…‘daksine FGHJK 


Somadeva Vasudeva 


543 


Trisirobhairavatantra > Kubjikämatatantra 17 


la Nädini tu $ikhägrasthä 
1b  rakäräksarasamjñita 

lc r FL INivrttyädyà 

1d  malikä éirasi sthita 

2a  tha &iro Grasani devi 
2b  dha netre Priyadarsanä 
2c à Guhya$aktir nädasthä 


2d  näsäyäm netramadhyatah 
3a  vyäpayitva sthita devi 

3b ca trtiyam ca locanam 

3c  Cämundä paramesäni 

3d  lalätasthä viräjate 

4a  bakäro vadanam tasya 

4b  Vajrini éaktir avyaya 

4c  kavarge da$anäs tiksnäh 


4d  Kañkatä Kälikä Siva 

Sa  Ghoraghosä Sirviräkhyà 
5b  kavarge samprakirtitaäh 
Sc  Mäyädevi; jihva tu 

5d a vag vägi$vari matà 

Ga Näräyani #4 karnau tu 


T=TaAIVi 15.121-125ab 


2a éiro grasani ] conj.; éirogram sati T 2c 
nädasthä ] em.; näsasthä T 2d näsäyäm |] 
em.; vyäptäste T  4c ‘varge ] em.; ‘vargo 
T Sa &irviräkhyà ] em; Sivirakhyà T (un- 
metrical) 


2c À correct a-vipulä form. The redactor 
of the Kubjikämata has emended to *éakti, 
reverting to the more familiar pathyä form. 
Sa éirvirakhya:: The emendation is derived 
from the variant Chirviräkhyä in MS A of the 
Kubjikämata. The metre thus shows a correct 


ra-vipulä. 


94a  Nädini tu &ikhägrastha 
94b  nakäräksarasambhavi | 
94. rF11tu Nivrttyädyä 
944  malikä éirasi sthita 

95a  tha $iro Grasani smrtà 
95b  dha netre Priyadaréani | 
95c  Z Guhyasakti nädasthä 
95d  näsäyäm netramadhyatah 
96a  vyäpayitva sthita devi 
96b ca trtiyam tu locanam | 
96c  Cämundä paramesäni 
964  lalätasthä viräjate 

97a  bakäram vadanam tasyà 
97b  Vajrini $aktir avyayä | 
97c  kavarge da$anäs tiksnäh 
97d  Kañkatä Kälika Siva 

98a  Ghoraghosä Sirviräkhya 
98b  kavarge samprakirtitäh | 
98c  Mäyädevi ; jihvä tu 

98d a vag Vagi$vari matà 
99a  Näräyani #4 karnau tu 


Varie lectiones noted in Ed are given 
only where relevant to proposed emenda- 
tions. The sigla and numbering of Eds 
have been retained. F and E proved clos- 
est to the 7riirobhairava. The verse order 
of F is superior to that of Eds: 94ab, 
OSa+vaktramedalasamsthitä, 96ab, 96c+95b, 
95cd, 99ab, 99c+bakäre vajrint mukhe, )7cd, 
98, 99d+kubjike Sikhivähint, 103ab, 100ab, 
100c+vakäräkhyau ubhau tu tau, 101, 102, 
103cd, 104cd, resumes. 


97a tasya] C; devyà Edx, tena G 
98a $irvirakhyä ] em; mukhivirà Eds, 
mukhävirà G, mukhiviräkhyàä D, ca 
viräkhya EF, chirvirakhyä A, chirvaräkhyä B, 
khivaräkhyä E  98b samprakiïrtitäh ] F; 
da$anäh é$ubhäh Edés, da$anä $ubhä AD, 
‘dam $ubhävahä E 98d vägi$vari ] A; 
vâgeévari Edes 


544 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Gb tayor # % ca bhüsanam 

6e Mohani ca tathä Prajña 

Gd va kantham Sikhivähani 

7a  Läma Vinäyikidevi 

7b  dadhau bähudvayam vibhoh 


7e Pürnimä hastadegastha 
7d  thakärakhyä vibhor mata 
8a  Jhañkäri Kundanä caiva 
8b  jhañäv angulayah kramät 
8e  Käpälini vamakare 

8d  fakärah päramesvari 

9a  Dipani $üladandaé ca 


9 rephah samyag udährtah 

9c ja Jayanti bhavec chülam 

9d  devadevyà maheévari 

10a  Bhisani Vayuvegä ca 

10b  skandhayor ubhayor bhayau 
10c  Pävani tu pa hrllagnä 

104  udaram saf ca Lambikä 

lla  Samhärika kszkäro 'yam 

11b  näbhau devyäs tu bhairavi 

llc  Chagali Pütanä caiva 

Gd  kantham ] em; kantha° T 8d 
päramesvari | em.; pärameévari T 11b de- 


vyäs | em.; devas T  11lc caiva] em.; ceti 


T 


8c vaämakare:: a correct bhavipula. 


99b  tayor #-# ca bhüsanam | 

99c  Mohani ca tathä Prajña 

994 va kantham Sikhivähini 

100a  Läma Vinäyakïdevi 

100b  da-dhau bähudvayam matam 
100c  Pürnimä hastadesasthä 

100d  #hakäraäkhyä vibhor mata 

101a  Jhankari Kundani caiva 

101b jha-ñäv añgulayah kramät | 
101c  Kapalini vämakare 

101d sakärah paramesvari 

102a  Dipani $üladandam ca 

102b  rephah samyag udährtah | 
102c  Jayanti ja bhavec chülam 

102d evam devi viräjate 

103a  Bhisani Vayuvegä ca 

103b _ skandhayor ubhayor bha-yau | 
103c  Pävani tu pa hrllagnä 

103d  udaram sa$ ca Lambikä 

104a  Samharika ksakäro ’yam 

104b  näbhir devyäs ca bhairavi | 
104c  Chagali Pütanä caiva 

99b u-ü ca bhüsanam ] em.; bhüsanam 
ï-parau Edes, u-ü...[?] B/C, u-ü-bhüsitau 
E, bhüsanam äparau G, bhüsanam ipatau 
F, bhüsanam iksagau H 99d kantham | 
E; kanthe Edcs, kantha ABDGHK, kanta 
C 100c pürnimaä] FG}J; paurnimaä Eds, 
paurnamä D  100d ‘äkhyä—matä ] e.; 
‘äkhyam—matam Edcs, °aäkhyä—matam 
E, ‘äkhyä—matah AB, ‘äkhye—matam 
E 101a kundani ] em.; kurdant Edcs, 
krurdani K, kandani E 101b jha-ñäv] 
em.; na-jhäv Edes, jha-ña$ A, jha-ñä$ B, 
jha-ña E, jha-nau J, jha-nyau K 103a 
bhisani ] DE/; bhisanä Eds, bhisanam 
E 103b bha-yau ] em.; api Edes  103d 
udaram sa$ ca lambikä ] F (misreading sacca 
?); sodaram lambikä sthitä Eds  104b F 
reads näbhau devyà vyavasthitä 


Somadeva Vasudeva 


l1d  stanau chalau prakirtitau 
12a  Âmotari tadgatam tu 

12b  ksiram 4 parikirtitam 

12c  paramätma szkäro ‘yam 
12d ha pränah éaktir Ambikä 
13a  Icchä$aktir visargäkhyà 

13b  vyäpya pränätmani sthitä 
13c ma nitambam Mahäkäli 
13d fa guhyam Kusumäyudhä 
l4a  Sukrädevi bhavec chukram 
14b  anusväras tu bhairavi 

14c Tara #2kära ürustha 

14d e ai JhänaKriye ubhe 

15a  januni samsthite devi 

15b  bhairavyäs tu mahätmanah 
15c  Gayatri caiva Sävitri 

15d  o au jañghe prakirtite 

16a  Dahaniï daksapädasthä 

16b  väme Phetkärikä d4phau 


ämotari | em.; à motart T 14b bhairavi] 
em.; bhairavi T 


lId Incorrect syncopation in three iambi 
(—— —). ämotari tadgatam tu:: À correct 
ra-vipulä which has again been emended to a 
pathyä form by the redactor of the Kwbjika- 
mata. 


545 


104d  cha-lau prakirtitau 

105a  Âmoti tadgatam ksiram 
105b Zkäram parikirtitam | 

105c  Paramätma szkäro ’yam 
105d ha pränah éaktir Ambikä 
106a  Icchä$aktir visargakhyà 
106b  vyäpya prânätmani sthit | 
106c #4 nitambam Mahäkäli 
1064 $4 guhyam Kusumäyudhä 
107a  Sukrädevi bhavec cukram 
107b  anusväras tu bhairavi | 
107c Tara s2käram ürusthä 

107d e-ai JhänaKriye ubhe 
108a  jänuni samsthite devi 

108b  bhairavyä$ ca mahätmanabh | 
108c  Gayatri caiva Sävitri 

108d  au-0 jañghe prakirtite 
109b  Dahanï daksapädasthä 
109b  vaäme Phetkärikä da-phau | 


104d prakirtitau ] EHJK; paristhitau Eds, 
paristhite G, vyavasthitau C 105b äkäram ] 
E; ävarnah Edé, ävarna ABH, avarna D, 
ävarnam J,/acuna ...kaéra F  105d pränah] 
FJK; prâne Eds, prâna CDE, pränäh H 

106b pränätmani sthitä ] E; °bhävena sam- 
sthitä Eds, vyäptibhütä vyavasthitä F  107a 
bhavec chukram ] F; tv anusväram Eds, tv 
anusvara AB, sanusvaram H[JK, ty anusvaram 
E  107b anusväras tu ] em.; Sukram de- 
vyäs tu Edcs, satusyanasu F  107d jñäna° ] 
ABEF; jñani Edes, jñana° D, jänu° HK 
107d ‘kriye ] EF; °kriyau Edes, ‘dvaye HK 
107d ubhe ] K; ubhau Edcs, ute F  108a 
samsthite ] A; samsthitau Eds, samsthito 
Esamsthità EGHJK, samsisthità C  108d 
jañghe ] FGJK; janghau Edes 108d prakir- 
tite ] AG; prakirtitau Edes, prakirtitäh C, 
prakirtità FHK  109b da-phau ] e.; matä 
Edes, smrtä E, éubhä HJK, pha$ ca vosaga F 


107d Reading as short for Jñänasakti and 
Kriyä$akti rather than ‘Jñäna/ and ‘Kriy4. 


546 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Kularatnoddyota s 


atordhvam mälinim brümi säñngopäñgasamanvitäm ||80|| 
samastavyastayogena varnaräsir varänane | 

nädiphäntakrameneha yathä bhavati tac chrau ||81|| 

pürvoktä vyäpakä varnä mäyâtattvasamanvitäh | 

mälinihrdayam näthe kütabijayutam bhavet ||82|| 

uttarädharanirmuktam väyutattvavivarjitam | 

pränäksarasamutpannam tad eva bhavate priye ||83|| 

nakäras tu $ikhästhänän Nädinisaktisamyutah | 

$iraso Grasanï varnam abhün mama varänane ||84|| 

r NivrttiPratisthä 7 / Vidyä Sänti / smrtah | 

$iromälà samutpannam etac chakticatustayam ||85|| 

dhadhaca netrodbhavau jñeyau samavarnau kuleévari | 

kaläs tatra imä proktä Cämundä Priyadar$anä ||86|| 

Guhya$aktir -varnasthä pränanädodbhavä mama | 

Vajrint bäksaram vakträn Mäyä 7 lalanodbhava ||87]| 

a vàg vâcahsamutpannä Vägesvaryä samanvitah | 

kädighäntäs ca ye varnäs te priye da$anodbhaväh ||88|| 

Kanñkata Kälikä caiva Siväghorä ca Chirvvarä | 

upari proktavarnais ca yuktä me dvijasambhaväh ||89|| 

Näräyani navarnena samyuktä $ravanäntarit | 

u à Mohani Prajñä ca karnabhüsanasambhaväh |[90|| 

va-varnakanthajam viddhi Sikhivähanisamyutam | 

Codices collated: Nxu4x=MS. NGMPP Reel no. À 25; Nc6=MS. Chandra Shum Shere c.348 
80c atordhvam |] em.; atordhva Nix; atorddham Nice 80c mälinim ] corr.; mälini 
codd. 80d sängopäñga® ] Niuxs sämgopäga” Ncce 81b varnaräsir ] corr.; varna[rä|- 
Sir Niux, varnaräsi Ncg  82a pürvoktä] Nixg pürvoktäd Ni4x  82b °samanvitäh ] 


Nic; ‘samanvitamh Nix 83a uttarädhara’ |] Nixxs unnarädhara’ Nik 83c 
‘äksarasamutpannam ] Niuk; °äccharasame-petäim Nix 83d bhavate ] ew.; [bhavalta 
Nxax, bhate Nice  84a nakäras tu &ikhä° ] Nxux; nakärastha&ikhä° Nos  84b °samyutah ] 
Nr; "samyutam Ncgs  84c éirastho |] ew.; éiraso codd.  84d abhün ] Nés; abhüt Nik 
85a nivrtti® ] Nos; nivrrtti® Nxux 85c °mäla] Nc; *mä[lä] Niux  dhadhaca] codd.; 
(unmetrical)  86a netro° ] Nix; netrau Ncg  86a “dbhavau ] Nic; bhavau Niux 87a 
“éaktir ] corr.; *Sakti ] Niuk, Saktih Nice 87ai-varnasthä ] Nix: varnasthä Nés 87b °nà- 
dodbhavä ] Nix: °[näldo[d]bhavaä Niux 870 vakträn ] Niuxs vaktrà Ncés  88aväcah° ] 
em.; käcah Niux, käca[h] Ncés 88a samutpannä ] Nik; samutpanno Nc 88dte ] Nix; 
[ste priye varnä] te Nxux  89a kanñkatä ] Nix kukkutä Nos 89b ca chirvvarä ] corr.; vac- 
chirvvarä Nix, cacchirvvarä Ncçs 89d dvijasambhaväh ] Nix: dvijam udbhaväh N;; 90b 
‘antarât | Nogss amearaätNiux 9lava] Nos ca Nxux 91a °kanthajam ] Nix: “kamcajam 
Ncés 


Somadeva Vasudeva 547 


da-dä-rnabähuyugalà LämäVinäyakiyutau ||91|| 
Paurnimä varnasamyuktä utpannä tha karadvayät | 
jha-ñau ca kara$äkhä dvau Jhamkäri Ürddhvakurdani ||92|| 
$üladandä 74 Dipanyä Jayanti järnasambhavi | 
daksapänau samutpannä äyudhärtham varänane ||93|| 
Kapälini #4-samyuktä vämahastodbhava priye | 

Bhisanä Väyuvegä ca bhayärnau skandhagau smrtau ||94|| 
Pütanä charnalärnena Chagalandä stanadvayät | 

Âmodi 4 payomadhyät parä sätmävinirgatä ||95|| 
Ambikä hetitah pränäd visargah pränaéaktijah | 

Pävant pärnahrdayäl Lambikä sodarän mama ||96|| 
manisthänodbhavä bhädre Samhari ksäksaränvita | 
nitambän #4 Mahäkäli $ guhyät Kusumäyudhä |[97|| 
am Bhairaviti sukrasthä Tarakä #rna ürukät | 

Jñänà e ai Kriyopete utpannau jänumandalät ||98|| 

o au Gâyatri Sävitri jañghäbhyäm sambhavau mama | 
Dahani dämghridaksasthä pha Phetkäri ca vämatah ||99|| 
sambhütä paramesäni jñätavyà érikulesvari | 

etad yogiganam sarvam varnamäläsamanvitam ||100| 
mantravidyäsamühasya padanispattikäranam | 


91d “vinäyaki° |] em.;*vainäyaki® N\ux, “venäyaki® Nc  92b tha ] ew.; ca codd.  92d ürd- 
dhvakurdani ] Nix; ürddhakurdani Nés  93a ra] Niuxs na Nc  93b järna° ] Nix: 
ksärna® Nc  93d äyudhärtham ] Niuxs äyudhädhva Noge  94a ta° ] Nés; tha° Nik 
94b priye ] Nxaks Ismrpriye Noé; 94d skandhagau smrtau ] conÿ.; skandhagonvitau Nix, 
skandhato smrtau Ncg  95a charnalärnena ] Nix; cchandalärnena Niux 95c ämodi] 
Nix; amodhi Nos  95c à] em.; ca codd.  95d paräsätmä° ] Nix; paräsänmaä” Ncgs 
96a pränäd ] Nu pränän Ncxs  96b visargah ] Nix: vifnilsargah Nc;  96b präna°] 
Nrax; pränafprä]® Nix  96c Pävani ] conj.; pärnavati codd.hypermetrical  96c °hrdayäl ] 
Nr “hrdayät Nos  96d lambikä sodarän ] em.; lambikäyodarän Nik, rambikämodarän 
Noé  97a bhädre ] Niux; bhädra Nés  97b samhaäri ] Nix: samljñahe]häri Nés 97b 
ksäksaränvitä ] Niuxs ksaksaränvitä Nés 97c ma ] Niuxs me Nc 97c mahäkäli ] Niux; 
mahäli Nes 97déa] Nix sa Nos 97d guhyät ] Nos: guhyä Nix 98a éukrasthä ] e.; 
guékrasthä Niux, guhyasthä Nos 98b tärakä ] Nos tälakä Nix 98b tärna ürukät ] Nix: 
bhärnajabhakät Nos  98c Jñänä ] em.; Jhäna codd.  98c kriyopetau ] em.; kriyopete Nic, 
kriyäpete ] Niux  98d utpannau |] e».; utpanne codd.  98d jänu° ] Nix; jâtu° Nes 99a 
gäyatri | Nue gäyatri® Nés  99b jañnghäbhyäm ] e.; jañnghäsyäm N° 99b sambhavau ] 
em.; sambhavän codd.  99c dämghridaksasthä ] ew.; däghridaksasthä Nix, dämhridaksastha 
Nos  100a sambhütä ] Nix; sambhütäh Niux  100b jñätavyä ] Nos; jhatavyäh Nix 
100d varna° ] Nix; svarna° Niux  101b °nispatti® ] Nu; °nispanti® Ni 


548 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


Srimatottara 22 


aim brim phrem hsaumh na nädini $ikhaye namab || 
(aim r nivrttyai namab ||) 
aim Ÿ pratisthäyai namah || 
aim l vidyäyai namah || 20|| 
aim | fäntyai namab || 
evam $iromäläm kramam nyaset || 
aim tha grasanib $irase namah || 
aim cämundà trtiyaneträya namab || 21|| 
aim dha priyadar$ani neträbhyäm namab || 
aim 1 guhyasaktir näsäputebhyo namab || 
aim na näräyani karnäbhyäm namah || 
aim u mohantï daksinakarnabhüsane namab || 22|| 
aim ü prajñà vämakarnabhüsane namab || 
aim va vajrini vaktramandale namah || 
aim ka kañkatà ürddhvadamstre namabh || 
aim kha kälikäyai adhodantapañktau namab || 23|| 
aim ga $iväyai ürddhvadantapañktau namab || 
aim gha ghoreghosäyai adhodantapañktau namab || 
aim na ghovirä ghantikästhäne namab || 
aim 1 mâyädevi jihvägre namah || 24|| 
aim a vägesvari väce namab || 
aim va $ikhivähini kanthe namab || 
aim bha bhisant daksinaskandhe namab || 
aim ya väyuvegäyai vämaskandhe namab || 25|| 
aim da lämidevi daksinabähau namab || 
aim dha vinäyaki vämabähau namab || 
aim tha pürnimä karatalamadhye namabh || 


Codex used for this section of patala 22: N=NGMPP reel no. A 194, Fv 120°-Fr 121° 


20cr] em;rN 2la $äntyai] corr; säntyäyai N  21b &iromäläm ] em; &romalaN 21c 
grasanih ] em.; grasani N° 21d °neträya ] em.; °netra N  22bï] em;iN  22b éaktir] 
em.; $akti N  22cna] em.;laN  22d °bhüsane ] corr; *bhüsani N° 23a ‘bhüsane |] corr.; 
“bhüsani N° 23b vaktra° ] ew.; cakra° N° ka ] em.; kam N  23c kañkatä | em.; kathane 
N  23c ürddhvadamstre ] e».; ürddhästre N  23d adhodantapañktau ] conj.; adhone N 
24a °pañktau ] e.; ‘yaktau N° 24b pañktau ] em.; paktau N° 24cña] em;ñamN 24c 
ghovirä |] corr; ghovira N  24diï] em;iN  25a vägeévari vace | conj; vaca vägeévari N 
26c °madhye ] em.; °hrye N 


Somadeva Vasudeva 549 


aim jha jhamkärini daksinakaräñgulinakhesu namab || 26|| 
aim ña kurddhanï vämakaräñgulinakhesu namab || 
aim ah icchäsaktih karaprsthäbhyäm namab || 

aim ta kapälini vämakare kapäla amrtaghürnite namah ||27|| 
aim ra dipani daksinatarjani $üladandam namabh || 
aim ja jayanti triülorddhvam namab || 

aim pa pävent hrdaye namah || 

aim sa paramätmasakti jivam namabh ||28|| 

aim ham ambikà präne namab || 

aim cha chagalandï daksinastane namah || 

aim la pütanà vämastane namab || 

aim à (à) modï stanamonah kstre namah ||29|| 

aim sa lambikäyai udare namab || 

aim ksa samdyärini näbhau namabh || 

aim ma mahäkäli nitambe namah || 

aim $am kusumäyudhäà guhye namah ||30|| 

aim | am\$ukradevi $ukre namah || 

aim tam tärà ürubhyäm namabh || 

aim e jñänini daksinajänuni namab || 

aim ai kriyäyai vämajänuni namab ||31|| 

aim o gâyatri daksinajañghäyäm namab || 

aim au sävitri vämajañghäyäm namah || 

aim da dahanï daksinapäde namabh || 

aim pha phetkärint vämapäde namab || 32|| 


26d jha] em.;rN jhamkärini] corr; jhamkärini N° 27c°éaktih ] corr; *éakti N  27d 
amrtaghürnite ] em.; amrtaghümitam ghürnitam N° ‘orddhvam ] e.; ärddham N  30d 
$am ] em.;*am*N 30d guhye ] em.; guhyaN 31lce] em; paN  32d pha] em.; phem 
N 


550 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


MANUSCRIPT SOURCES 


Agnikäryapaddhati  \1.] Gôttingen, Cod. Ms. Mu. 1, 134; [2.] Paris Sanscrit 1664. 

Aghoranirnaya see Päramesvarimata |3.]. 

Kularatnoddyotatantra {1.] NGMpPP 4206/10, ff. 96, paper, Neväri script, copied in 
1634 CE, colophon: ii $ri Adinäthavinirgate pañcäsathotivistirne $riKubjikäma- 
te Kularatnoddyote prayägädicakrapüjäpratistänänäkarmakaranakarmärambhäyä- 
cäryäbhisekayoginäm änt[yJestividhäno näma caturda$ah patalah ||; [2.] Bodi. 
Chandra Shum Shere C. 348; [3.] NAK 4-2454, NGMPP A146/6, ff. 93, paper, 
Nevari, colophon: iti fr Adidevät pañcäsathotivistirnäd vinirgate $rikularatno- 
ddyote $rikulasantäna ädisütranirnayo näma dväda$ah patalah ||; [4.] NAK 5-427, 
NGMPP A40/2, ff. 72, palmleaf, first lines of ff. 1-5 damaged; [s.] Nempp 119/3, ff. 
138, paper; [6.] NémPp 8118/12, ff. 100, paper; [7.] NAK 5-5142, NGMPP A147/10, 
f. 19, paper, Devanägari. 

Tantrasadbhävatantra \1.] NAK 5-445, NGMpp 444/2, . 186, palmleaf, Kutila script; 
[2.] NGmrp 444/1, palmleaf, Kutila script, copied in 1097 CE; [3.] NAK 51985 
NGMPP A188/22, ff. 132, a transcript of [2.]. 

Timirodghätana  NAK 5-690, NémpP 43 5/3, late Licchavi or early Kutila script on palm- 
leaf. 

Nityädisañgrahäbhidhänapaddhati of Taksakavarta, Bodl. Ms Stein Or.d.43, paper, Sa- 
radä script. 

Päramesvarimata [1.] NAK 3-364, NomPr 827/3, ff. 84, palmleaf, Kutila, ca. 12th 
century CE; [2.] NAK 1-259, NGMPP B27/2, . 77, palmleaf, Kutila script, illus- 
trated cover, the final chapter of this Ms has been catalogued seperately as [3.] 
Aghoranirnaya NAK PRA 1606, NGMPP B25/5, ff. 6, palmleaf, Kutila script, final 
cipher of date illegible: the range of dating is thus 1079-1088 ce, final colophon: 
rimsatimah patalah 

Matasära  NAK 3-379, NGMPP B28/16, ff. 161, palmleaf. 

Srimatottaratantra [1.] Nemrr 828/17, ff. 189, palmleaf, Pala script, colophon on fol. 
154": iti frimatottare frikanthanäthävatärite candradvipavinirgate yoginiguhye $i- 
rodütinirnayasädhanam näma dafamah patalah ; [2.] NAK 3-191, Nemrr 
B28/21, ff. 55, palmleaf, Devanägart, Begins with fol. 29”, colophon on fol. 53°: 
iti frimatottare frifrikanthanäthävatärite candradvipavinirgate frikulälikä ädye ma- 
Hflnäm pratisthälaksananirnayo caturthah patalah , change of hand at fol. 
66; [3.] Nemrr 4194/3, colophon title: Srimatottaracandradvipavinirgatasrika- 
nthanäthävatärite Vidyäpithe Yoginiguhye; NAK 1-1697 7/4, NGmPP 828/35, ff. 25, 
palmleaf, Devanägari. 


2 
090 
0. 
080 


2. 
080 
0. 
080 


General Bibliography 


ABBREVIATIONS 


BORI Bhandarkar Oriental Research Institute 

CNRS Centre National pour la Recherche Scientifique 
EFEO Ecole française d’Extrême-Orient 

IFI Institut français d’indologie 

IFP Institut français de Pondichéry 

KSTS Kashmir Series of Texts and Studies 

NAK National Archives of Kathmandu 

NGMPP Nepal-German Manuscript Preservation Project 
PDI Publications du département d’indologie 


PIFI Publications de l’Institut français d’Indologie 


EDITIONS 
AGNIPURANA 
(AP:) dvaipäyanamunipranitam agnipuränam änandäframasthapanditaih samsodhi- 
tam. Ânandä$ramasamskrtagranthävalih 41. Poona: Anandäéramamudranä- 
laya, 1900. 


(AP:) Agnipuräna of Maharsi Vedavyäsa, ed. Baladeva Upädhyäya. Kashi Sanskrit Se- 
ries 174. Varanasi: The Chowkhamba Sanskrit Series Office, 1966. 

(AP3) The Agnimahäpuränam, ed. Ksemaräja Srikrsnadäsa. Delhi: Nag Publishers, 
1985 (reprint). 


AJITAGAMA 
(AÀ) Ajitägama, ed. N. R. Bhatt. 3 Vols. PIFI 24.1-3. Pondicherry: IFI, 1964, 1967, 
1991. 
ATHARVAVEDAPARISISTA 


The Parisistas of the Atharvaveda, ed. George Melville Bolling & Julius von 
Negerlein. Vol. 1, parts 1 and 2. Leipzig, 1909, 1910. 
ANUTTARASTIKA 


Ed. K. C. Pandey in: PANDEY 1963, pp. 94344. 


552 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


ANUBHAVANIVEDANASTOTRA 
Ed. K. C. Pandey in: PANDEY 1963, p.953. 

ALAMKÂARASAMGRAHA Of Amrtänandayogin 
Alañkära sañgraha of Amrtänanda Yogin, re-edited with critical introduction and 
appendices, ed. K. Bhaskara Rao, Tirupati: Tirumala Tirupati Devasthanams, 
1984. 


See also KRISHNAMACHARYA & SARMA 1949. 


ALAMKARASARVASVA of Räjanaka Ruyyaka and Mañkha with the commentary (-vimarsini) of 

Räjänaka Jayaratha 
Alarkära sarvasva of Sri Räjänaka Ruyyaka & Mañkha With the Vimarsini of 
Jayarath And with the translation and explanation of both in Hindï, ed. Rewä Pra- 
säda Dwivedi. The Kashi Sanskrit Series 206. Varanasi: Chaukhamba Sanskrit 
Series Office, 1971. 

ALAMKARASARVASVASANJIVANT of Vidyäcakravartin 

(ASS) Alamkära-Sarvasva of Ruyyaka with Sañjivant Commentary of Vidyäcakravartin. 

Text and Study, ed. S.S. Janaki, Delhi: Meharchand Lachmandas, 1965. 

ASTAPRAKARANA 
Ed. Krsnasästri. Devakôttai: Sivägamasiddhäntaparipälanasañgha, 1923 (raT- 
TVAPRAKÂSA, TATTVASANGRAHA, TATTVATRAYANIRNAYA, With the commentaries 
of Aghorasiväcärya) and 1925 (RATNATRAYAPARIKSA, BHOGAKARIKA, NADA- 
KÂRIKA with the commentaries of Aghoragiväcärya, and MOKsAKARIKÀ and 
PARAMOKSANIRASAKARIKA with the commentaries of Rämakantha II). 


Astaprakaranam, ed. Vrajavallabha Dvivedï. Yogatantragranthamälä Vol. 12. 
Varanasi: Sampurnananda Sanskrit University, 1988. 


AHIRBUDHNYASAMHITA 
(AhirS)  Ahirbudhnya-Samhitä of the Päñcaräträgama, ed. by M. D. Ramanujacharya un- 

der the Supervision of F. Otto Schrader. Revised by V. Krishnamacharya. 2 vols. 
The Adyar Library Series 4. Madras: The Adyar Library and Research Centre, 
1986 (reprint of 2nd edition of 1966). 

AGAMADAMBARA Of Jayantabhatta 
See DEZs6 2005. 

ISADYASTOTTARASATOPANISADAH 
One hundred and eight Upanishads (ha & others.) with various readings, ed. 
Wasudev Laxman Shâstri Pans'ikar. Bombay: Nirnaya Sâgar Press, 1932. 

I$ANASIVAGURUDEVAPADDHATI: the Siddhäntasära of Tänasivagurudeva 
Hänasivagurudeva Paddhati of Känasiva Gurudeva, ed. T. Ganapati Sästri, 4 
Vols. Delhi: Bharatiya Vidya Prakashan, 1990. (Reprint, but with a substan- 
tial new introduction dated to 1987 by N. P. Unni, from Trivandrum Sanskrit 
Series Nos. 69 [Sämänyapädah], 72 [Mantrapädah, = Tantrasärah]; 77 [Kriyä- 
pädah pt. 1] and 83 [Kriyäpädah pt. 2, and Yogapädah]. Trivandrum, 1920, 
1921, 1922, 1925.) 

ISVARAPRATYABHIJNAKARIKA of Utpaladeva 


(PK) See TORELLA 2002 (1994). 


General Bibliography 553 


ISVARAPRATYABHIJNAKARIKAVRTTI Of Utpaladeva 
See TORELLA 2002 (1994). 
ISVARAPRATYABHIJNAVIMARSINI of Abhinavagupta 
(PV) The Éwarapratyabhijñà of Utpaladeva with the Vimarsini by Abhinavagupta, ed. 
Madhusudan Kaul Shästri. KSTS 22 and 23. Bombay, 1918-1921. 
See also BHASKARI. 


ISVARAPRATYABHIJNAVIVRTIVIMARSINI of Abhinavagupta 
(PVV) The Kvarapratyabhijna Vivritivimarsini by Abhinavagupta, ed. by Pt. Madhusü- 

dan Kaul Shästri. 3 vols. KSTS 60, 62, 65. Bombay, 1938, 1941, 1943. 

ISVARASAMHITA 
Üvarasamhitä, ed. Prativädibhayañkaränantäcärya. Sästramuktävali Series 45. 
Käñci, 1923. 

UDDAMARESVARATANTRA 
The Uddamareshvara Tantram (À Book on Magical Rites), ed. Jagad Dhar Zadoo. 
KSTS 70. Srinagar, 1947. 

UTTARAKAMIKAGAMA 

(UKAÀ) See KAMIKÂGAMA. 

UDDHARAKO$A 
Daksinämürtis Uddhära-ko$a. À Dictionary of the Secret Tantric Syllabic Code, 
ed. Raghu Vira & Shodo Taki. 2nd edition, New Delhi: Mushiram Manoharlal, 
1978. Originally published: 1938. 

O RGYAN LAM RIG 
See Tucci 1940. 

KARMAKÂANDAKRAMAVALI of Somasambhu 
Karmakanda-kramavali By Sri Somasambhu (Outlines briefly the procedure of 
Shaivistic Sandhya, Diksha and other ritual.), ed. Jagaddhar Zadoo. KSTS 73. 
Srinagar, 1947. 


(SP1—4) See Brunner 1963, 1968, 1977 & 1998. 


KADAMBARI of Bäna 
The Kadambari of Bänabhatta and his son Bhüsanabhatta (with the Commen- 
taries of Bhänucandra and his Disciple Siddhacandra, Proteges of the Emperor 
Akabar) ed. Kashinath Pandurang PARAB and revised by Wasudeva Laxmana 
Shastri Pansikar. Delhi: Nag Publishers, 1985. 

KAMAKALAVILASA 
Kämakaläviläsa by Punyänandanätha, with the commentary of Natanändanätha, 
ed. and trans. Sir John Woodroffe (Arthur Avalon), Madras: Ganesh & Co. 
Ltd., 1953. Second revised ed. 

KAMIKAGAMA 

(PKÀ) Kämikägama, Pürvabhäga. No editor accredited: published by C. Swaminatha 

Sivacarya. Madras: South Indian Arcakas' Association, 1975. 


(UKÀA)  Kämikagama, Uttarabhäga. No editor accredited: published by C. Swaminatha 
Sivacarya. Madras: South Indian Archakar Association, 1988. 


554 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


KARANAGAMA 
Pürvakäranägamam mülam. No editor accredited. Published by Mayilai 
Alakappa Mutaliyär. Cintätirippéttai, 1921 (ka/ 5023). 


Uttarakäranägamah. uttarakäranäkamam. No editor accredited. Published by 
Li. Ku. Civañänaccelvakkurukkal. Cuddalore (Katalür): Archana Printers, 
2002. (Photomechanical reprint of the 1928 Cintätiripéttai edition.) 

KALABHAIRAVASTAKA 
Printed in: Sräämkaragranthävalih, samputah 11, Stoträni, laghuprakaranäni ca, 
Shrirangam: Vanivilas Press, no date. 

KÂLIKASTOTRA of Sivänanda (Jñänanetra) 
In STUTISAMGRAHA and $RIGURUSTUTI. 

KIRANATANTRA 

(KA) Kiranatantra. [Edited by] TiRä  Pañcäpagesagiväcärya and KM. 

Subrahmanyaéästri.  $Sivägamasiddhäntaparipälanasangha 16. Devakôttai, 
1932. 


(KÀ) ['Kiranägama”. Testo e traduzione del “Vidyäpäda”, à cura di Maria Pia Vivanti, 
Supplemento n. 3 agli Annali, vol. 35 (1975), fasc. 2, Napoli; 2). 


(KÀ) See also GOODALL 1998. 


KIRANAVRTTI Of Bhatta Rämakantha II 
See GoopaLL 1998. 

KUBJIKAMATATANTRA 
The Kubjikämatatantra. Kulälikämnäya version. Critical Edition by T. Goudri- 
aan & J. A. Schoterman. Orientalia Rheno-traiectina 30. Leiden: Brill, 1988. 

KUMARATANTRA 
Kumäratantram. No editor accredited. Published by Mayilai Alakappa Mu- 
taliyär. Cintätirippéttai, 1915/16 (kali 5017). 

KUMARAPALACARITRASAMGRAHA 
Kumärapäla Charitrasamgraha (À Collection of works of Various Authors Re- 
lating to Life of Kumarapala of Gujarat), collected and edited from various old 
manuscripts by Acharya Jina Vijaya Muni. Singhi Jain Series, No. 41. Bombay: 
Adhisthätä, Singhi Jain Shastra Shikshapith, Bharatiya Vidya Bhavan, 1956. 

KUMARASAMBHAVA of Kälidäsa with the commentary of Vallabhadeva 
Vallabhadevas Kommentar (Säradä Version) zum Kumärasambhava des Kälidäsa, 
ed. M.S. Narayana MurTi. Verzeichnis der orientalischen Handschriften in 
Deutschland, Supplementband 20,1. Wiesbaden: Franz Steiner Verlag, 1980. 

KULACÜDAMANI 
Kulacädämani Nigama, ed. Arthur Avalon, with an introduction by Aksaya 
Kumära Maitra, Madras, 1956. 

KULANANDA 
In KAULAJNANANIRNAYA, pp. 107-113. 

KÜRMAPURANA 

(KüP) The Kürma Puräna. Critically edited by Anand Swarup Gupta. Varanasi: AIl- 

India Kashiraj Trust, 1971. 


General Bibliography 555 


KRSNAYAMARITANTRA 
Krsnayamäritantram With Ratnävalipañjikà of Kumäracandra, ed. Samdhong 
Rinpoche & Vrajvallabh Dwivedi. Rare Buddhist Texts Series 9. Sarnath: Cen- 
tral Institute of Higher Tibetan Studies, 1992. 
KAULAJNANANIRNAYA 
Kaulajñänanirnaya and some Minor Texts of the School of Matsyendranätha, ed. 
Prabodh Chandra Bagchi. Calcutta Sanskrit Series 3. Calcutta, 1934. 
KRAMASTOTRA Of Abhinavagupta 


Ed. K. C. Pandey in: PANDEY 1963, pp. 945-951. 


GANAKARIKA 
Ganakärikà of Acarya Bhäsarvajña with the Ratnatikà and four appendices, ed. 
Chimanlal D. Dalal. Gaekwad Oriental Series No. 15. Baroda, 1920. [Reprint 
1966.] 

GARUDAPURANA 


(GarP) The Garuda Mahäpuränam, ed. Khemaräja Srikrsnadäsa. Delhi: Nag Publishers, 
1984 (reprint). 
GURUNÂTHAPARAMARSA of Madhuräja 
Gurunäthaparämarsa of Madhuräja, ed. P N. Pushp. KSTS 85. Srinagar, 1960. 
GUHYASIDDHI of Padmavajra 
In GUHYADI-ASTASIDDHI-SANGRAHA. 
GUHYÂDI-ASTASIDDHI-SANGRAHA 
Guhyädi-astasiddhi-sañgraha, ed. Samdhong Rinpoche & Vrajvallabh Dwivedi. 
Rare Buddhist Text Series 1. Sarnath: Central Institute of Higher Tibetan Stud- 
ies, 1988. 
GORAKSASAMHITA 
Goraksasamhitä, ed. Janärdana Pändeya. Sarasvatibhavana Granthamälä 110. 
Varanasi, 1973. 
GAUTAMADHARMASÜTRA 
(GautDhSü) The Gautama-Dharma-Sütra With the Mitäksarà Sanskrit Commentary of Hara- 
datta, ed. Umesh Chandra Pandey. The Kashi Sanskrit Series 172. Varanasi: The 
Chowkhamba Sanskrit Series Office, 1966. 
GRUB THOB BRGYAD BCU RTSA BZHI I LO RGYUS 
In Roginson 1979, pp. 311-391. 
GHERANDASAMHITA 
The Gheranda Sambita Translated into English by Rai Bahadur Srisa Chandra 
Vasu. Delhi: Oriental Books Reprint Corporation, 1980 [reprint of Allahabad 
edition of 1914-15]. 
CATURVARGACINTAMANI Of Hemädri 
(CVC)  Chaturvarga-Chintémani by Hemddri, ed. Bharatachandra Siromani. Vol. 2, 
Fasc. 9. Bibliotheca Indica, New Series 372. Calcutta: Asiatic Society of Bengal, 
1877. 
CARYAGITITIKA of Munidatta 
Edited in: Per Kværne, 4n Anthology of Buddhist Tantric Songs. À Study of the 
Caryägiti. Det Norske Videnskaps-Akademi, II. Hist.-Filos. Klasse Skrifter Ny 
Serie No. 14, Oslo, 1977. 


556 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


CARYAMELAPAKAPRADIPA of Aryadeva 
Aryadevaviracitam Caryämeläpakapradipam. Phags-pa-lhas mdzad pa'i spyod pa 
bsdus pa i sgron 4es bya ba béugs so, ed. Janärdanasästri Pändeya. Durlabha Baud- 
dha Granthamälä 22. Särnätha, Väränasi: Durlabha Bauddha Grantha Sodha 
Yojanä, Kendriya Ucca Tibbati Siksä Samsthäna, 2000. 

CITTANUBODHASASTRA of Räjänaka Bhäskarakantha 
Cittänubodhasästram: färadätah devanägaräksaresv anuvartya prathamam mu- 
dranam/ Räjänaka-Bhäskarakanthapranitam, ed. Susamä Pändeya. Väränasi: 
Tärà Book Agency, 1990. 

CIDGAGANACANDRIKA of Srivatsa 
Cidgagana=candrikà with English Introduction by Arnold Avalon, ed. Trivikrama 
Tirtha. Arthur Avalon Series — Tantrik Texts, 20. Calcutta: Agamänusandhäna 
Samiti, 1937. 

CIDVILASASTAVA of Amrtänandayogin 
See NITYASODASIKARNAVA. 

JAYAKHYASAMHITA 

JS) Jayäkhyasambitä, ed. Embar Krishnamacharya. Gaekwad's Oriental Series 54. 

Baroda: Oriental Institute, 1931. 

JABÂLADARSANOPANISAT 
See I$ADYASTOTTARASATOPANISADAH. 

JAINARÂJATARANGINI of $rivara 
See KauL 1966. 

JRANASIDDHI of Indrabhüti 
In GUHYADI-ASTASIDDHI-SANGRAHA. 

TATTVATRAYANIRNAYA Of Sadyojyotis with vrtti of Aghorasiva 
In: Astaprakaranam. 

TATTVAPRAKASA of Bhojadeva with vrtti of Aghoragiva 
In: Astaprakaranam. 

TATTVAPRAKASATATPARYADIPIKA of Kumäradeva 
In: Astaprakaranam, ed. Vrajavallabha Dvivedi. 

TATTVABINDU of Vacaspatimiéra 
Le Tattvabindu de Väcaspatimira, édition critique, traduction et introduction, ed. 
Madeleine Biardeau, PIFI 3. Pondicherry: IFI, 1956. 

TATTVASANGRAHA of Sadyojyotis with #k4 of Aghorasiva 
In: Astaprakaranam. 

TANTRAVATADHANIKA attributed to Abhinavagupta 
The Tantravata-dhänika, ed. Mukund Räm Shästri. KSTS 24. Bombay, 1918. 

TANTRASÂRA of Abhinavagupta 
The Tantrasära of Abhinava Gupta, ed. Mukund Räm Shästri. KSTS 17. Bom- 
bay, 1918. 

TANTRALOKA of Abhinavagupta 
The Tantraloka of Abhinava=Gupta. With Commentary by Räjänaka Jayaratha, 
ed. Madhusüdan Kaul Sästri. KSTS 23, 28, 30, 35, 29, 41, 47, 59, 52, 57 and 
58. Bombay and Srinagar, 1918-38. 

TANTRALOKAVIVEKA of Jayaratha 

(TaÂÏVivg) See TANTRÂLOKA. 


General Bibliography 337 


TANTROCCAYA of Abhinavagupta 
‘The Tantroccaya of Abhinavagupta. Critical Edition’, ed. Raniero Gnoli & 
Raffaele Torella. In: Paolo Daffinà (ed.), /ndo-Sino-Tibetica. Studi in onore di 
Luciano Petech. Studi Orientali publicati dal dipartimento di Studi Orientali 9. 
Rome: Università di Roma “La Sapienzaæ”, 1990, pp. 153-189. 

TEVARAM 
Téväram. Hymnes sivaïtes du pays tamoul, édition établie par T. V. Gopal Lyer sous 
la direction de François Gros, volume 1 Nänacampantar. PIFI 68.1. Pondicherry: 
IFI, 1984. 


Téväram. Hymnes sivaïtes du pays tamoul, édition établie par T. V. Gopal lyer 
sous la direction de François Gros, volume IT Appar et Cuntarar. PIFI 68.2. 
Pondicherry: IFI, 1985. 


Digital Tväram, ed. Jean-Luc Chevillard and S. A. S. Sarma. Pondicherry: IFR 
EFEO and CNRS, forthcoming. 


DEVINAMAVILASA of Sähib Kaul 
The Devinämavilasa by Sähib Kaul, ed. Madhusüdan Kaul Shästri. KSTS 63. 
Srinagar, 1942. 

DEVIRAHASYA 
Devi rahasya: with parisishtas, ed. Ram Chandra Kak and Harabhatta Shastri. 
Delhi: Chaukhamba Sanskrit Pratishthan, 1993. Originally published: Srina- 
gar, 1941. 

DESOPADESA of Ksemendra 
The Desopadesa & Narmamalä of Kshemendra, ed. Madhusüdan Kaul Shästri. 
KSTS 40. Poona, 1923. 

DEHASTHADEVATACAKRASTOTRA 
Ed. K. C. Pandey in: PANDEY 1963, pp. 952-53. 

DVAYASAMPATTIVARTIKA of Vämanadatta 
‘Il Dvayasampattivärttikam di Vämanadatta’, ed. Raniero Gnoli, in: Gururäja- 
mañjarikä. Studi in onore di Giuseppe Tucci, Napoli: Istituto Universitario Ori- 
entale, 1974, vol. 2, pp. 451-455. 

DHVANYALOKA of Anandavardhana with the commentary (-locana) of Abhinavagupta 
Dhvanyäloka of Sri Anandavardhanäcärya ; with the Locana © Bälapriyä com- 
mentaries; by Sri Abhinavagupta &° Sri Ramasaraka ; edited with the Divyanjana 
notes, introduction, indices & appendices, ed. Pandit Pattabhirama Sastri. Kägi 
Samskrta granthamälä 135. Benares: Jaya Krishna Das Haridas Gupta, 1947. 


See also INGALLS, MASSON, and PATWARDHAN 1990. 


NARESVARAPARIKSÀ of Sadyojyotis with the -prakäfa of Rämakantha 
The Nareshvarapariksha of Sadyojyotih with commentary by Ramakantha, ed. 
Madhusudan Kau Shastri. KSTS 45. Srinagar, 1926. 
NADAKARIKÀ of Rämakantha 
(NK) In: Astaprakaranam. 
See also FILLIOZAT 1984. 


558 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


NARADIYASAMHITA 
(NaärS)  Näradiya Sarmhitä, ed. Räghava Prasäda Chaudhary. Kendriya Sanskrita 
Vidyapeetha Series 15. Tirupati: Kendriya Sanskrita Vidyapeetha, 1971. 
NITYASODASIKARNAVA 
Nityäsodasikärnava With two Commentaries Rjuvimarsini by Sivänanda & 
Artharatnävali by Vidyänanda, ed. (with Sanskrit introduction) Vrajavallabha 
Dviveda. Yogatantragranthamälä 1. Varanasi: Sanskrit University, 1968. [Also 
contains editions of the Tripurasundaridandaka of Dipakanätha, the Sxbhago- 
daya, Subhagodayaväsanä, and Saubhägyahrdayastotra of Sivänanda, and the 
Saubhägyasudhodaya and Cidviläsastava of Amrtänandayogin.] 
NILAMATAPURANA 
Nilamatapuräna, ed. K. de Vreese. Leiden: Brill, 1936. 
NETRATANTRA 
The Netra Tantram with commentary by Kshemaräja, ed. Madhusudan Kaul 
Shästri. KSTS 46 and 61. Bombay, 1926 and 1939. 
NYAYAMANJARI of Jayantabhatta 
Nyäyamañjart of Jayantabhatta with Tippani—Nyäyasaurabha by the editor, ed. 
K.S. Varadacharya. 2 Vols. Oriental Research Institute Series Nos. 116 & 139. 
Mysore: Oriental Research Institute, 1969 & 1983. 
NYASOPADESA 
(NyäsU) In: Näradapañcarätra (Bhäradväjasamhità) Sarayüprasädamisrakrtatikäsahitä. 
Bombay, 1827 [1905/1906 ap]. 
PANCAVARANASTAVA 
The Pañcävaranastava of Aghorafiväcärya: À twelfth-century South Indian pre- 
scription for the visualisation of Sadä$iva and his retinue, An annotated critical edi- 
tion, ed. Dominic Goodall, Nibedita Rout, R. Sathyanarayanan, S. A. $. Sarma, 
T. Ganesan, $. Sambandhasivacarya, Collection Indologie 102. Pondicherry: 
IFP/EFEO, 2005. 
PADMAPURANA 
(PP) vyäsapranitam padmapuränam, ed. Rävasäheba Mandalika and Vi$vanätha 
Näräyana. Vol. 3. Poona: Mahädeva Cimanäÿji Âpate, 1894. 
PARAMASAMHITA 
(ParS) Paramasamhitä [of the Päñcharätra], ed. and translated into English by S. Krish- 
naswami Aiyangar. Gaekwad* Oriental Series 86. Baroda: Oriental Institute, 
1940. 
PARAMARTHACARCA 
Ed. K. C. Pandey in: PANDEY 1963, pp. 946. 
PARAMARTHADVADASIKA of Ramyadeva 
Ed. K. C. Pandey in: PANDEY 1963, pp. 9944-45. 
PARAMARTHASARA Of Abhinavagupta 
The Paramärtha-Sära by Abhinava Gupta, with the commentary of Yogaräja, ed. 
Jagadisha Chandra Chatterji. KSTS 7. Srinagar, 1916. 
PARAMOKSANIRASAKARIKA Of Sadyojyotis with vrtti of Rämakantha 
In: Astaprakaranam. 


General Bibliography 539 


PARAKHYATANTRA 
(ParT) The Paräkhyatantra. À Scripture of the Saiva Siddhänta. À critical edition and 
annotated translation, ed. and trans. Dominic Goodall. Collection Indologie 
98. Pondicherry: IFP/EFEO, 2004. 
PARÂTRIMSIKÂTATTVAVIVARANA Of Abhinavagupta 
The Parä-trimshikä with commentary. The latter by Abhinava Gupta, ed. 
Mukunda Räma Shâstri. KSTS 18. Bombay, 1918. 


Îl'commento di Abhinavagupta alla Parätrimsikà (Parätrimsikätattvavivaranam), 
traduzione e testo, ed. Raniero Gnoli. Serie Orientale Roma 58. Rome: Istituto 
Italiano per il Medio ed Estremo Oriente, 1985. 


Parätrifikä-vivarana, the secret of tantric mysticism / Abhinavagupta. English 
translation, with notes and running exposition, by Jaideva Singh. Sanskrit text cor- 
rected, notes on technical points and charts dictated by Swami Lakshmanjee, ed. 
Bettina Bäumer, Delhi: Motilal Banarsidass, 1988. 


PARATRISIKALAGHUVRTTI 
The Parätrisikä Laghuvritti by Abhinavagupta, ed. Jagaddhara Zädoo Shästri. 
KSTS 68. Srinagar, 1947. 
PARÂTRISIKAVIVRTI of Lasa Käka (Laksmiräma) 
The Parätrifikä Vivriti of Räjänaka Lakshmiräma, ed. Jagaddhara Zädu Shästri. 
KSTS 69. Srinagar, 1947. 
PARYANTAPANCASIKA 
The Paryanta Pañcäsikà of Abhinavagupta, ed. V. Raghavan. Annals of Oriental 
Research 8. Madras, 1950-51. 
PADMASAMHITA 
(PädS) Padma Samhita, Vol. 1, ed. Seetha Padmanabhan and R. N. Sampath. Vol. IT, 
ed. Seetha Padmanabhan and V. Varadachari. Päñcarätra Pari$odhana Parisad 
Series 3 and 4. Madras: Päñcarätra Parisodhanä Parisad, 1974 and 1982. 
PARAMESVARASAMHITA 
(Pars) Päramesvarasamhitä, ed. Govindäcärya. $Srirañgam: Kodandarämasannidhi, 
1953. 
PASUPATASÜTRA With Pañcärthabhäsya of Kaundinya 
Pasupata Sutras with Pancharthabhashya of Kaundinya. ed. R. Ananthakrishna 
Sastri. Trivandrum Sanskrit Series, No. 143. Trivandrum: University of Tra- 
vancore, 1940. 
PÜRVAKAMIKAGAMA 
(PKÀ) See KAMIKAGAMA. 
PAIPPALADAVASADISATKARMAPADDHATI 
Paippalädavasädisatkarmapaddhati, ed. Pandita Umäkänta Pändä. Balasore, 
2002. 
PAUSKARASAMHITA 
(PausS)  Sree Poushkara Samhita. One of the Three Gems in Pancharatra, ed. Sampathku- 
mara Ramanuja Muni. Bangalore: A. Srinivasa Aiyangar and M.C. Thiru- 
malachariar, 1934. 


560 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


PAUSKARAGAMA 
(PÀ) Pauskarägama (Jñänapädah), ed. K. Ramachandra Sarma. The Adyar Library 
Pamphlet Series 50. Madras: The Adyar Library and Research Centre, 1995. 
PRATYABHIJNAKARIKA of Utpaladeva with his autocommentary (-vrtti) up to 3.20 
The Siddhitrayi and the Pratyabhijna-karika-vritti of Rajanaka Utpala Deva, ed. 
Madhusudan Kaul Shastri. KSTS 34. Srinagara, 1921. 
PRATYABHIJNAHRDAYA of Ksemaräja, sütras with autocommentary 
The Pratyabhijñà Hridaya being a Summary of the Doctrines of the Advaita Shaiva 
Philosophy of Kashmir, ed. Jagadisha Chandra Chatterji. KSTS 3. Srinagar, 
1911. 
PRAKIRNADHIKARA of Bhrgu 
(PrA) Prakirnädhikärah, ed. M. Ramakrishna Kavi. TTD Religious Publications Se- 
ries 483. Tirupati, 1997 (reprint of Madras 1929). 
PRAPANNAPARIJATA of Varadaguru 
(PraP)  Prapanna Parijata in Sanskrit with Translation in English by Nadadoor Ammal 
[= Varadaguru]. Madras, 1971. 
BAHURÜPAGARBHASTOTRA 
In CHAKRAVARTY 2005. 
BRHADBRAHMASAMHITA 
(BBS) näradapañcaräträntargatä brhadbrahmasamhitä, ed. $. Venegävakara. Ananda- 
éramasamskrtagranthävalih 68. Poona: Hari Näräyana Âpate, 1912. 
BODHAPANCADASIKÀ of Abhinavagupta with the commentary (-vivarana) of Harabhatta Shastri 
Bodhapanchadashika and Paramartha-charcha With the Vivarana by Pr Hara 
Bhatta Shastri, ed. Jagaddhara Zadoo Shastri. KSTS 76. Srinagar, 1947. 
BRAHMASÜTRA with SrZbhäsya and Srutaprakäsikà 
(BrSü)  bädaräyanapranita brahmasüträkhyasarirakamimämsäbhäsyam rämänujaviraci- 
tam $ribhäsyam sudar$anasüriviracitasrutaprakäfikäkhyavyäkhyäsamudbhäsitam. 
2 Vols. Ubhayavedäntagranthamälä. Madras, 1967. 
BRAHMANDAPURANA 
(Bd?) Sri-Vyäsa-maharsiproktam Brahmändapuränam. (With Introduction in Sanskrit 
and English and an Alphabetical Index of Verses), ed. J.L. Shastri. Delhi etc., 
1973. [Reprint of the Venkatesvara edition of AD 1912.] 
BHAGAVADGITARTHASAMGRAHA 
Srimad Bhagavad Gita With Commentary by Mabämäheshwara Räjänaka 
Abhinavagupta, ed. Pandit Lakshman Raina Brahmachäri [Swami Lakshman 
Joo]. Srinagar: Kashmir Pratap Steam Press, 1933. 
BHAVANISAHASRANAMA 
äcäryasrisähibhakaulakrtadevisahasranämaävaliprasiddha  bhaväninämasahasra- 
stutih svähäkärasahita. Srinagar: Srikantha Kacarü, 1958. 
BHAVOPAHARASTOTRA of Cakrapäni 
The Bhävopahära of Chakrapäni Nätha with commentary by Ramya Deva Bhatta, 
ed. Mukunda Räma Sästri. KSTS 14. Bombay, 1918. 
BHÂAVOPAHARAVIVARANA of Ramyadeva 
See BHAVOPAHARASTOTRA. 


General Bibliography 561 


BHASKARI of Räjänaka Bhäskarakantha 
Bhäskari. Kvarapratyabhijñävimarsini, Abhinavagupta. Vols. III, À Commen- 
tary on the Kvarapratyabhijñävimarsini of Abhinavagupta, ed. K. A. Subrahmia 
lyer and K.C. Pandey. 2 volumes. Allahabad: Superintendent, Printing and 
Stationery, United Provinces, 1938 & 1950. 

BHAIRAVASTOTRA Of Abhinavagupta 
In PANDEY 1963, pp. 951-952. 

BHAIRAVANUKARANASTOTRA of Ksemaräja 
In Gnort 1958, pp. 223-226. 

MANJUSRIMÜLAKALPA 
Aryamañjusrimülakalpa, ed. T. Ganapati Sästri, Trivandrum Sanskrit Series 70, 
76 and 84. Trivandrum: The Oriental Manuscript Library of the University 
of Travancore, 1920, 1922 and 1925. Reprinted by PL. Vaidya as Buddhist 
Sanskrit Texts 18 (one volume), Darbhanga: Mithila Institute, 1964. 

MATANGAPARAMESVARAGAMA 

(MPÀ)  Matañgapäramesvaragama (Vidyäpäda) avec le commentaire de Bhatta Räma- 

kantha, ed. N.R. Bhatt. PIFI 56. Pondicherry: IFI, 1977. 


(MPÀ)  Matañgapäramesvarägama (Kriyapäda, Yogapäda et Caryäpäda) avec le commen- 
taire de Bhatta Rämakantha, ed. N.R. Bhatt. PIFI 65. Pondicherry: IFI, 1982. 


MATSYAPURANA 


(MP) dvaipäyanamunipranitam Maïtsyapuränam änandä$ramasthapanditaih samsodhi- 
tam. Anandä$ramah Samskrtagranthävalih 54. Poona: Anandäéramamudranä- 
laya,1903. 

MANUSMRTI 


Manusmrti with the “Manubhäsya” of Medhätithi, ed. Gangänätha Jhä. Biblio- 
theca Indica No. 256. 2 Vols. Calcutta: Royal Asiatic Society of Bengal, 1932 
and 1939. 

MAYAMATA 

(MM) Mayamata: Traité Sanskrit d'Architecture, ed. and trans. Bruno Dagens. 2 Vols. 

PIFI 40.12. Pondichéry: Institut Français d’Indologie, 1976. 

MAHÂNAYAPRAKASA of Sitikantha 
The Mahänaya-Prakäsha of Räjanaka Shiti Kantha, ed. Mukunda Räma Sâstri. 
KSTS 21. Bombay, 1918. 

MAHÂNAYAPRAKASA (anonymous) 
Mahänayaprakäsa, ed. K.Sämbasiva Sästri. Trivandrum Sanskrit Series 130, 
Citrodayamañjart 19. Trivandrum, 1937. 

MAHÂBHARATA 

(MBh) The Mahäbhärata. For the first time critically edited by V.S. Sukthankar, with 

the cooperation of S. K. Belvalkar, A. B. Gajendragadkar, V. Kane, R. D. Kar- 
markar, P.L. Vaidya, S. Winternitz, R. Zimmerman, and other scholars and il- 
lustrated by Shrimant Balasaheb Pant Pratinidhi. (Since 1943 ed. $. Belvalkar). 
19 Vols. Poona: BORI, 1927-1959. 

MAHÂARTHAMANJARIPARIMALA Of Mahe$avaränanda 
The Maharthamanjari with the commentary Parimala of Mahesvarananda, ed. T. 
Ganapati Sâstri. Trivandrum Sanskrit Series 66. Trivandrum, 1919. 


562 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


MAHOTSAVAVIDHI Of Aghoragiva 
(MV) Mabotsavavidhi, ed. C. Swaminatha Sivacarya. Madras: South Indian Archakar 
Association, 1974. 

MAHOPADESAVIMSATIKA 
Ed. K. C. Pandey in: PANDEY 1963, pp. 946-47. 

MÂLINIVIJAYAVARTTIKA Of Abhinavagupta 
Mälinivijayavärttika of Abhinava Gupta, ed. Madhusudan Kaul Shastri. 
KSTS 31. Srinagar, 1921. 

See also HANNEDER 1998. 
MALINIVIJAYOTTARATANTRA 
(MVUT)  Mälinivijayottaratantram, ed. Madhusüdana Kaula Sästri. KSTS 37. Srinagar, 
1922. 
See also VasupEeva 2004. 
MRGENDRATANTRA 
(MigT) Sri Mrgendra Tantram (Vidyäpäda & Yogapäda) with the Commentary of 
Näräyanakantha, ed. Madhusudan Kaul Shästri. KSTS 50. Srinagar, 1930. 
(MigT)  Mreendrägama (Kriyäpäda et Caryäpäda) avec le commentaire de Bhatta- 
Näräyanakantha, ed. N.R. Bhatt. PIFI 23. Pondicherry: IFI, 1962. 

MRGENDRAVRTTIDIPIKÀ of Aghoragiväcärya 
$rt myrgendram kämikopägamam vidyäyoga-pädädvayamilitam $ribhattanäräya- 
nakanthaviracitayä vrityà tadvyäkhyayà ghorasiväcäryaviracitayä dipikayä cäla- 
ñkrtam, ed. Na. Krsnaästri and K.M. Subrahmanyasästri. Sivägamasiddhänta- 
paripälanasañgrahasamkhyä 12. Devakottai, 1928. 

MOKSAKARIKÀ of Sadyojyotis with vrtti of Rämakantha 
In: Astaprakaranam. 

YATINDRAMATADIPIKA 
Sri Bhäshya Värtika, À Treatise on Vifisthädvaita Philosophy; Also Yatindra Mat 
Dipikà, By Niväsà Chârya son of Govindä, And Sakalâchâryamat Sañgrah, ed. 
Ratna Gopâl Bhatta. Benares Sanskrit Series 123 & 133. Benares, 1970. 

YAJNAVALKYASMRTI 
Yajnavalkyasmrti With the commentary Mitäksarä of Vijñänesvara. Notes, Varient 
readings etc., no editor accredited. Delhi: Nag Publishers, 1985 (declared to be 
a reprint of ‘an earlier edition of Nirnaya Sagar Press’). 

YAJNAVALKYASMRTITIKA of Aparäditya/Aparärka 
aparärkäparäbhidhäparädityaviracitatikäsametà yäjñavalkyasmrtih, ed. the Pan- 
dits of the Anandäérama. 2 vols. Anandä$ramasamskrtagranthävali 46. Pune, 
19034. 

YOGACÜDAMANYUPANISAT 
See I$ADYASTOTTARASATOPANISADAH. 

YOGABHÀSYA of Vyäsa 

(YBh) See Yogasütra. 
YOGASÜTRA of Patañjali 
(YSü) Pätañjala-Yogasätra-Bhäsya-Vivaranam of Sañkara-Bhagavatpäda, ed. Polakam 
Sri Rama Sastri and $. R. Krishnamurthi Sastri. Madras Government Oriental 
Series 94. Madras: Government Oriental Manuscripts Library, 1952. 


General Bibliography 563 


YOGINIHRDAYA with the commentary of Amrtänandayogin 
yoginihrdayam amrtänandayogikrtadipikayaä, bhäsänuvädena ca sahitam, ed. Vra- 
javallabha Dviveda. Delhi: Motilal Banarsidass, 1988. 

RATNATRAYAPARIKSÀ of Srikantha 

(RTP) In: Astaprakaranam. 

RATNATRAYAPARIKSOLLEKHINI Of Aghoragiva 
In: Astaprakaranam. 

RAHASYAPANCADASIKA 
Ed. K. C. Pandey in: PANDEY 1963, pp. 954-56. 

RÂJATARANGINT of Kalhana 
Kalhanaï Räjatarañgini. Chronicle of the Kings of Kashmir. Volume III. San- 
skrit Text with Critical Notes, ed. M. A. Stein. Delhi: Motilal Banarsidass, 1988 
(reprint of Bombay edition of 1892). 

RÂJATARANGINI of Jonaräja 
See KauL 1967. 

RUDRANAMANI of Visuddhamuni 
Printed as an appendix to the Ganakärikä. See GANAKARIKA. 

RAURAVASÜTRASANGRAHA 
Published in volume 1 of RAURAVAGAMA, q.v. 

RAURAVAGAMA 

(RÀ) Rauravägama, ed. N.R. Bhatt. 3 Vols. PIFI 18.1-3. Pondicherry: IFI, 1961, 
1972, 1988. 
LAKSMITANTRA 
(LT) Laksmi-Tantra. À Pâñcarätra Agama Edited with Sanskrit Gloss and Introduction, 
V. Krishnamacharya. The Adyar Library Series 87. Madras: The Adyar Library 
and Research Centre, 1959. 

LALITASAHASRANAMA with the commentary (Saubhägyabhäskara) of Bhäskararäya 
brahmändapuränottarabhägiyam lalitäsahasranäma bhäskararäyapranitasaubhä- 
gyabhäskaräkhyabhäsyopetam, ed. Väsudeva $Sarmä Panasïkara, Bombay: 
Pändurañga Jävaji, 1935. 

LINGAPURANA 

(LiP) Sri-Vyäsa-maharsiproktam $ri-Liñgamahäpuränam, with the Sanskrit commen- 
tary Sivatosint by Ganesa Nätu, ed. Gañgävisnu (son of Krsnadäsa). Bombay: 
Venkatesvara Press, V.S. 1981 [= AD 19241]. [Reprinted, with a Slokänukramani 
by Nägaéarana Simha, Delhi: Nag Publishers, 1989 (2nd ed. 1996)] 

vAkYAPADIYA Of Bhartrhari 

(VP) Väkyapadiya of Bhartrhari with the Commentaries Vriti and Paddhati of Vrsabha- 
deva. Kända I, ed. K. A. Subramania Iyer. Deccan College Monograph Series 
32. Pune, 1966. 

(VP) Bhartrharis Väkyapadiya. Die Mülakärikäs nach den Handschrifien herausgegeben 
und mit einem Päda-index versehen, ed. Wilhelm Rau. Abhandlungen für die 
Kunde des Morgenlandes 42, part 4. Wiesbaden: Komissionsverlag Franz 
Steiner, 1977. 


564 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


VÂTÜLANÂTHASÜTRAVRTTI of Anantasakti 
The Vätülanätha-Sütras with the Vritti of Anantasaktipäda, ed. with English 
translation and notes by Pt. Madhusudan Kaul Shästri. KSTS 39. Bombay, 
1923. 
VAMAKESVARIMATA 
The Vämakesvarimatam With the Commentary of Räjänaka Jayaratha, ed. Mad- 
husudan Kaul Shastri. KSTS 66. Srinagar, 1945. 
VAYUPURANA 
(Val) The Väyumahäpuränam. Edit. by Khemaräja. Delhi: Nag Publishers, 1983. 
[Reprint of the Veñkateévara edition of AD 1895. 
(VäP:y)  Mahämunisrimad-Vyäsa-pranitam Väyupuränam, etat pustakam änandä$rama- 
sthapanditaih saméodhitam. Poona, $S 1827 [AD 1905]. Ânandä$ramasam- 
skrtagranthävalih 49. [reprinted without the critical apparatus in 1983]. 


VIJRANAKAUMUDI of Bhattäraka Ananda 
The Vijñäna-Bhairava with commentary called Kaumadi by Ananda Bhatta, ed. 
Mukunda Räma Sâstri. KSTS 9. Bombay, 1918. 
VIJNANABHAIRAVA 
Vijñänabhairavah anvayärtha-rahasyärthavyäkhyà (çamskria-hindi) samvalitah, 
ed. Vrajavallabha Dvivedï. Varanasi: Motilal Banarsidass, 1984. (Reprinted 
from an edition of 1978.) 
VIINÂNABHAIRAVAVIVRTI of Sivopädhyäya 
The Vijñäna-Bhairava with commentary partly by Kshemaräja and partly by Shiv- 
opädhyäya, ed. Mukunda Räma Sâstri. KSTS 8. Bombay, 1918. 
VISVAMITRASAMHITA 
(VisS) Visvämitra Sarhitä, ed. Undemane Shankara Bhatta. Kendriya Sanskrit 
Vidyapeetha Series 13. Tirupati: Kendriya Sanskrit Vidyapeetha, 1970. 
VISNUSAMHITA 
(VisnuS) The Visnu Samhitä, ed. M. M. Ganapati Sästri. Trivandrum Sanskrit Series 85. 
Delhi: Nag Publishers, 1925 (revised and enlarged edition of 1991). 
VISNUDHARMA 
(VDh) See GRÜNENDAHL 1983-89. 
VISVAKSENASAMHITÀA 
Visvaksena Samhitä, ed. Lakshmi Narasimha Bhatta. Kendriya Sanskrita 
Vidyapeetha Series 17. Tirupati, 1972. 
VINASIKHATANTRA 
The Vinäsikhätantra À Saiva Tantra ofthe Left Current, Edited with an Introduc- 
tion and a Translation by Teun Goudriaan. Delhi: Motilal Banarsidass, 1985. 
$ATARATNASANGRAHA Of Umäpatisiväcärya 


($RS) Sataratnasañgraha of Sri Umäpati Siväcärya, ed. and trans. P. Thirugnanasam- 
bandhan, Madras: University of Madras, 1973. 
SANDILYOPANISAT 


See I$ADYASTOTTARASATOPANISADAH. 


General Bibliography 565 


$IVADRSTI of Somänanda 
(SDr) The Sivadrsti of Srisomänandanätha with the Vritti by Utpaladeva, ed. Madhusu- 
dan Kaul Shastri. KSTS 54. Srinagar, 1934. 
$IVADRSTIVRTTI of Utpaladeva 
See SIVADRSTI. 
$IVANIRVANAPADDHATI 
In: panditakesavabhattajyotirvidä samskärasodhanäbhyäm sampäditam säñgopä- 
ñga-visnubalividhi-säñga-aivikriyätmakam karmakändam. caturthapustakam, 
Bombay: Nirnayasägara Press, 1936, pp. 205-292. 
SIVAPURANA 
(SivaP) The Sivamahäpuränam, ed. Ksemaräja Srikrsnadäsa. 2 Vols. Delhi: Nag Pub- 
lishers, 1986 (reprint). 
SIVAPÜJASTAVA of Jñänasambhu 
Svapñjästavah savyäkhyah jñänasambhusiväcäryapranitah, ed. K. M. Subrahma- 
nya$ästri. Sivigamasanghaprakägitagranthasankhyä 19. Devakottai: Sivägama- 
sañgha, 1935. 
SIVASÜTRAVARTIKA of Bhäskara 
Shiva Sütra Värittika by Bhäskara, ed. Jagadisha Chandra Chatterji. KSTS 4. 
Srinagar, 1916. 
$SIVASÜTRAVARTIKA of Varadaräja 
Shivasutra-Vartikam by Varadaräja, ed. Madhusudan Kaul Shastri. KSTS 43. 
Srinagar, 1925. 
SIVASÜTRAVIMARSINI of Ksemaräja 
The Shiva Sütra Vimarshini, being the Sütras of Vasu Gupta with the Commentary 
called Vimarshini by Kshemaräja. KSTS 1. Srinagar, 1911. 
$IVASTOTRAVALI of Utpaladeva with the commentary (-vivrti) of Ksemaräja 
The Sivastoträvali of Utpaladeväcärya with the Sanskrit Commentary of Ksema- 
râja edited with Hindi Commentary, ed. Räjänaka Laksmana [Lakshman 
Raina, Swami Lakshman Joo]. Chowkhamba Sanskrit Series 15. Varanasi: 
Chowkhamba Sanskrit Series Office, 1964. 
$ESASAMHITA 
($esaS)  Shesha Samhita of Pancharatna Agama, ed. G.R. Josyer. Mysore, 1981. 
SAIVAPARIBHASA 
srifivagrayogindrajñanasivacäryaviracita Saivaparibhäsa. The Saivaparibhäsä of 
Sivägrayogindrajñänasiväcärya, ed. H. R. Rangaswamy lyengar and R. Ramasas- 
tri. Oriental Research Institute Publications Sanskrit Series No. 90. Mysore: 
Oriental Research Institute, 1950. 
SAIVAGAMAPARIBHASAMANJARI 
(SAM)  Saivägamaparibhäsämañjari de Vedajñäna: Le Florilège de la Doctrine Sivaite, ed. 
and trans. Bruno Dagens. PIFI 60. Pondicherry: IFI, 1979. 
SRIKANTHACARITA Of Mankha 
Srikanthacaritam of Mañkhaka. With the Sanskrit Commentary of Jonaräja. 
Delhi/Varanasi/Patna: Motilal Banarsidass, 1983. [No editor accredited, but 
this is a reprint of the Bombay Nirnayasagar Press edition of 1897, Kävyamäla 
3, ed. Durgäprasäda & Käinäth Pändurang Parab.] 


566 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


SRIKANTHIYASAMHITÀ 
Part of this text is printed in an appendix in HANNEDER 1998. 
SRIGURUSTUTI 
Srigurustuti. Srinagar: Iévara Â$rama, Vikrama 2033 (a.b. 1976/7). A booklet 
for devotional use among the disciples of the Saiva Guru Swami Lakshman 
Joo (1907-1991) containing (1) the Srigurustuti of Rämeévaräcärya (Rämes- 
vara Jhà) (pp. 1-21); (2) an unidentified hymn on the following page; (3) the 
Sripädukästuti of Jiyà Läl Kaul (pp. 1-19); (4) the Dehasthadevatäcakrastotra 
attributed to Abhinavagupta (pp. 1-4); (5) the Xä/ikästotra of Jhänanetranätha 
(pp. 1-3); and (6) miscellaneous devotional verses by Rämeévara Jhä (5 pages, 
unnumbered). Items 1-3 are hymns in praise of Swami Lakshman Joo. 
SRIPRASNASAMHITA 
(SripréS)  Sriprafna Samhitä, ed. Seetha Padmanabhan. Kendriya Sanskrit Vidyapeetha 
Series 12. Tirupati: Kendriya Sanskrit Vidyapeetha, 1969. 
SATSAHASRASAMHITÀ 
The Satsähasrasambhitä. Chapters 1-5, ed. and trans. J. A. Schoterman, Leiden: 
Brill, 1982. 
SANATKUMARASAMHITA 
(SanS)  Sanatkumära-Samhità of the Päñcaräträgama, ed. V. Krishnamacharya. The Ad- 
yar Library Series 95. Adyar: The Adyar Library and Research Centre, 1969. 
SARVAJNANOTTARA 
(Ep) frikantaparamécuvarar $ri cuppiramaniyarukkupatécittaruliya caruvañänottara 
äkamam ñänapätam tamilmülam um, itarkut tiruvävatuturai ätina caivap- 
piracärakarum, tévakôttai civäkamacittänta paripälanacañkattuc cittäntacättira 
Pôtakarum äkiya tüttukkuti pô. muttaiyapillai elutiya muttiratnam ennum 
viruttiyuraiyum, ed. P6. Muttaiyapillai, Devakottai, 1923. 
(Er) Ed. Vi. Brahmänandasvämin (edition only of the ‘yogapäda’ and ‘vidyäpäde in 
Devanägari script with a Tamil translation). Tanjore, 1933. 
(E 1) ‘Sarvajñänottarägamah vidyäpäda and yogapäda’, ed. K. Ramachandra Sarma 
and revised by R. Thangaswami Sarma, Adyar Library Bulletin 62, 1998 [ap- 
peared 1999], pp. 181-232. 
SAMKHYAKARIKA 
The Sämkhyakärikä: Kvarakrsnas Memorable Verses of Sämkhya Philosophy with 
the Commentary of Gaudapädäcärya. Poona Oriental Series 9. Poona, 1933. 
SATTVATASAMHITA 
(SS) Sätvata-Sarhitä. With Commentary by Alasiñga Bhatta, ed. Vraja Vallabha 
Dwivedi. Library Rare Texts Publication Series 6. Varanasi: Sampurnanand 
Sanskrit Vishvavidyalaya, 1982. 
SADHANAMALA 
Sädhanamälä, ed. Benoytosh Bhattacharya. 2 volumes. Gaewkwad* Oriental 
Series 41. Baroda: Oriental Institute, 1968. 


Opening pages, including title page, not seen. 


General Bibliography 567 


SAMBAPANCASIKA 
The Sâmbapanchäs'ikà of Sämba. With The commentary of Kshemaräja, ed. Pandit 
Kedärnâtha and Wäsudeva Laxman Shâstri Panashikar. Kâvyamâlâ 13. Bom- 
bay: Nirnaya-Sâgar Press, 1910. 
SARDHATRISATIKALOTTARA 
(SärK)  Särdhatrisatikälottarägama avec le commentaire de Bhatta Rämakantha, ed. N.R. 
Bhatt. PIFI 61. Pondicherry: IFI, 1979. 


See also TORELLA 1976. 


SIDDHAYOGESVARIMATATANTRA 
(SYM) See TÜRZSÔK *1999. 

SIDDHAHEMACANDRA of Hemacandra 
Hemacandras Grammatik der Prâkritsprachen (Siddhahemacandram Adhyâya 
VTT) mit kritischen under erläuternden Anmerkungen, ed. Richard Pischel, Os- 
nabrück: Biblio Verlag, 1969 (reprint). Originally published: 1877-1880. 

SIDDHANTASARAVALIVYAKHYA of Anantasambhu 

(SSAV) Published in five parts in the Bulletin of the Government Oriental Manuscripts 

Library Madras: Vol. 17.1, pp.29-68 (ed. A. A. Ramanathan and T.H. 
Viswanathan); Vols. 17.2, pp. 1-48; 18.1, pp. 1-64 and 19.1, pp. 53-84 (ed. 
R. K. Parthasarathi and T. H. Viswanathan); Vol. 19.2 pp. 1-48 and Vol. 20.2, 
pp.49-71 (ed. T.H. Viswanathan, P.G. Seetharaman and R. Ganesan). 
Madras, 1965-1968. 

SUPRABHEDA 
$rimat suprapêtäkamam, printed by Mayilai-Alakappa Muyaliyär (no editor ac- 
credited). Madras (Cintätiripéttai): Civañänapotayantracälai, 1908 (Kaliyuga 
5009). 

SUBHAGODAYA of Sivänanda 
See NITYASODASIKARNAVA. 

SUBHAGODAYAVASAN of Sivänanda 
See NITYASODASIKARNAVA. 

SUBHÂSITAVALI of Vallabhadeva 
The Subhäshitävali of Vallabhadeva, ed. Peter Peterson and Pandit Durgâpra- 
sâda. Bombay Sanskrit Series no. 31. Bombay, 1886. 

SOMA$SAMBHUPADDHATI 


(SP1—4) See Brunner 1963, 1968, 1977 & 1998. 
See also KARMAKÂANDAKRAMAVALI. 


SAUNDARYALAHART attributed to Sañkarabhagavat 
Srimacchamkarabhagatpädaviracità Saundaryalahari Laksmidharä-Saubhägya- 
vardhani-Arunämodini-Anandagiriya- Titparyadipini-Padärthacandrikä-Di- 
ndimabhäsya-Gopälasundari-Anandalahari-Kaivalyavardhant,  ämglänuväda, 
tippanï, prayogayantra tathä püjà vidhi sahita, ed. À. Kuppuswami. Revised & 
enlarged edition. Delhi: Nag Publishers, 1991. 

SAUBHAGYAVARDHANT of Kaivalyäsrama 
See SAUNDARYALAHARI. 


568 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


SAUBHÂGYASUDHODAYA of Amrtänandayogin 
See NITYASODASIKARNAVA. 

SAUBHÂGYAHRDAYASTOTRA of Sivänanda 
See NITYASODASIKARNAVA. 

SAUBHÂGYANANDASANDOHA Of Maheévaränandanätha, son of Konkanastha Bhäskararäyayajvan 
Paramänandatantram With the Commentary Saubhägyänandasandoha by 
Mahesvaränandanätha, ed. Raghunätha Mira. Vogatantra-Granthamäla 9. 
Varanasi: Sampurnanand Sanskrit Vishvavidyalaya, 1985. 

SKANDAPURANA 

(SPD The Skandapuräna. Volume I. Adhyäyas 1-25. Critically Edited with Prolegomena 
and English Synopsis by R. Adriaensen, H.T. Bakker and H. Isaacson. Supple- 
ment to Groningen Oriental Studies. Groningen: Egbert Forsten, 1998. 


(SPIIA) The Skandapuräna. Volume ITA. Adhyäyas 26-31.14. The Väränasi Cycle. Critical 
Edition with an Introduction, English Synopsis & Philological and Historical Com- 
mentary by Hans T. Bakker & Harunaga Isaacson. Supplement to Groningen 
Oriental Studies. Groningen: Egbert Forsten, 2004. 


(SPyu) Skandapuränasya Ambikäkhandah, ed. Krsnaprasäda Bhattaräi. Mahendra- 
ratnagranthamälä 2. Kathmandu, 1988. 


STAVACINTAMANIVIVRTI of Bhatta Näräyana 
The Stava-Chintämani of Bhatta Näräyana with commentary by Kshemaräja, ed. 
Mukunda Räma Sâstri. KSTS 10. Srinagar, 1918. 

STUTIKUSUMANJALITIKA 
The Stutikusumänjali of Jagaddhara Bhatta with the commentary of Râjânaka Rat- 
nakantha, ed. Pandit Durgâprasâd and Käsinâth Pândurang Parab. Kavyamala 
23. Bombay: The Proprietor of the Nirnaya-Sâgara Press, 1891. 

STUTISAMGRAHA 
A booklet published by the Saiva Mandali (Kashmir) without publication de- 
tails. Contains the following: (1) a Ganesadhyänaslokah (p. 1); (2) the Bahu- 
räpagarbhastotra attributed to the Lalitasvacchanda (pp. 1-12); (3) the Sam- 
grahastotra of Utpaladeva (pp. 13-14); (4) the Xä/ikästotra of Jfänanetranätha 
(pp. 15-16); (5) the Mahimnabstotra of Puspadanta (pp. 17-24); and (6) the 
Bhaïravastava of Abhinavagupta (pp. 24-25). 

SPANDAKARIKAVIVRTI Of Räjanaka Rämakantha 
The Spanda Kärikäs with the Vivriti of Rämakantha. KSTS 6. Srinagar, 1913. 

SPANDAKARIKAVRTTI of Kallata 
The Spanda Kärikäs with the vritti by Kallata, ed. Jagadisha Chandra Chatterji. 
KSTS 5. Srinagar, 1916. 

SPANDANIRNAYA of Ksemaräja 
The Spandakarikas of Vasugupta with the Nirnaya by Kshemaraja edited with Pref- 
ace, Introduction and English Translation, Madhusüdan Kaul Shästri. KSTS 42. 
Srinagar, 1925. 

SPANDAPRADIPIKA of Bhägavatotpala 
In: Tantrasañgraha [Part I], ed. Gopinatha Kaviraja. Yogatantra-granthamäla 
3. Varanasi: Director, Research Institute, Varanaseya Sanskrit Vishvavidyalaya, 


1970. 


General Bibliography 569 


SPANDASANDOHA of Ksemaräja 
The Spanda Sandoha of Kshémaräja, ed. Mukunda Räma Shâstri. KSTS 16. 
Bombay, 1917. 
SPHOTASIDDHI of Mandanamiéra 
Sphota Siddhi (La démonstration du sphota) par Mandana Mi'sra. Introduction, 
traduction et commentaire par Madeleine Biardeau. Texte sanskrit établi par N. R. 
Bhatït avec la collaboration de T. Ramanujam, ed. Madeleine Biardeau. PIFI 13. 
Pondicherry: IFI, 1958. 
SVACCHANDATANTRA With -UDDYOTA of Ksemaräja 
(SvT) The Svacchanda-Tantram with Commentary by Kshema Räja, ed. Madhusüdan 
Kaul SHAsrri. KSTS 31, 38, 44, 48, 51, 53, and 56. Bombay, 1921, 1923, 
1926, 1927, 1930, 1933, 1935. 
SVAYAMBHUVASÜTRASANGRAHA 
Srifaivagame sväyambhuvasütrasañgrahah (svayambhuvä mabharsibhya uddistah), 
ed. Veñnkatasubrahmanyasästri, Mysore, 1937. 
See also FILLIOZAT 1994. 
HAYASTRSAPANCARATRA 
(H) The Hayasirsa Pancharatram. Adikända, ed. Bhuban Mohan Sänkhyatirtha. 2 
Vols. Rajshahi: Varendra Research Society, 1952, 1956. 
HARAVIJAYA of Ratnäkara 
The Haravijaya of Räjänaka Ratnäkara with the Commentary of Räjänaka Alaka, 
ed. Durgäprasäda and Kä$inäth Pändurang Parab. Kävyamälä (reprint) 22. 
Varanasi: Chaukhamba Sanskrit Sansthan, 1982. Originally published: Bom- 
bay: Nirnaya Sagar Press, 1890. 
HEVAJRATANTRA 
See SNELLGROVE 1959. 
HEVAJRATANTRAYOGARATNAMALA of Känhapäda 
In SNELLGROVE 1959. 


TRANSLATIONS AND STUDIES 


ABHYANKAR, K. V. (ed.) 
1967 Paribhäsäsamgraha (a collection of original works on Vyäkarana Paribhäsäs) edited 
critically with an introduction. Post-graduate and Research Department Series 
No. 7. Poona: BORI. 
ACHARD, Jean-Luc 
1999 LEssence perlée du secret: recherches philologiques et historiques sur l'origine de la 
Grande Perfection dans la tradition rNying ma pa. Bibliothèque de l'Ecole des 
Hautes Etudes, Section de Sciences Religieuses, volume 107. Turnhout: Bre- 
pols. 
ACHARYA, Diwakar 
forthcoming À Antestividhi: À Manual for the Funeral Rite of the Lakulisa Paäsupatas. 


forthcoming B Pätravidhi: À Pä$upata Manual on Purification of the Pot. 


570 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


forthcoming C Präyascittavidhi: À Manual on Atonement of a Lakuliéa Päsupata. 
AcCRI, Andrea 
forthcoming ‘On the Textual Basis of Saivism in Ancient Indonesia. The Sanskrit-Old Ja- 
vanese Tutur Literature from Bali’, in: Rivista di Studi Sudasiatici 1. 


Baccui, Prabodh Chandra 


1934 See KAULAJNANANIRNAYA. 
BAKKER, Hans 
2000 ‘Somasarman, Somavaméa and Somasiddhänta. A Päsupata tradition in 


seventh-century Daksina Kosala. Studies in the Skandapuräna IV, in: Ryutaro 
Tsuchida and Albrecht Wezler (eds.), Haränandalaharï. Volume in Honour of 
Professor Minoru Hara on his Seventieth Birthday. Reinbek, pp. 1-19. 


2004 ‘At the Right Side of the Teacher: Imagination, Imagery, and Image in Vedic 
and $Saiva Initiation’, in: Phyllis Granoff and Koichi Shinohara (eds.), mages in 
Asian Religions. Vancouver: University of British Columbia Press, pp. 117-148. 


BANERJEA, Jitendra Nath 
21956 The Development of Hindu Iconography. Calcutta: Munshiram Manoharlal Pub- 
lishers (reprint of 1985). 
BEAL, Samuel (transl.) 
1884 Si-yu-ki. Buddhist Records of the Western World. London: Trübner. 
BHAG Ram, Raï Bahadur Pandit 
1893 The Kashmir State. The Report on the Census and Imperial and Supplementary 
Tables. Census of India, 1891, Volume 28. Lahore: Mufid-i-am Press. 
BHATTACHARYA, Kamaleswar 
1966 ‘Linga-koéa’, in: Ba Shin, Jean Boisselier & A. B. Griswold (eds.), Essays offered 
to G. H. Luce by his colleagues and friends in honour of his seventy-fifth birth- 
day, Volume Il. Papers on Asian Art and Archaeology. Ascona: Artibus Asiae 
Publishers, pp. 6-13. 
BisscHor, Peter 
2004 Sivas dyatanas in the Various Recensions of Skandapuräna 167, in: Hans 
T. Bakker (ed.), Origin and Growth of the Puränic Text Corpus. With Special Ref- 
erence to the Skandapuräna. Papers of the 12th World Sanskrit Conference Vol. 3.2. 
Delhi, pp. 65-78. 
2005 ‘Pañcärthabhäsya on Pä$upatasütra 1.37-39 Recovered from a Newly Identified 
Manuscript in Journal of Indian Philosophy 33, pp. 529-551. 
2006 Early Saivism and the Skandapuräna. Sects and Centres. Groningen Oriental 
Studies XXI. Groningen: Egbert Forsten 
forthcoming À ‘The Sütrapätha of the Päfupatasütra”, submitted to the /ndo-lranian Journal. 
forthcoming B ‘Two parallel passsages in the Väyupuräna and the Skandapuräna.” To be pub- 
lished in the Proceedings of the 13th World Sanskrit Conference, Edinburgh, 
10th—14th July 2006. 
BisscHop, Peter, & GRIFFITHS, Arlo 
2003 ‘The Päsupata Observance (Atharvaparisista 40), Indo-lranian Journal 46 
(2003), pp. 315-348. 


General Bibliography JA 


Boccio, Fabio 
*2005 La Bhogakärikà di Sadyojyotis con il commento di Aghorafiväcärya. (Unpublished 
doctoral thesis submitted to the University of Rome “La Sapienza”). 
BÜHLER, Georg 
1877 Detailed Report of a Tour in Search of Sanskrit MSS. made in Kafmfr, Rajputana, 
and Central India. Extra number of the Journal of the Bombay Branch of the 
Royal Asiatic Society. Bombay and London: Trübner. 
Burrow, T. & EMENEAU, M. B. 
1984 À Dravidian Etymological Dictionary. 2nd edition. Oxford: Clarendon Press. 
CHAKRAVARTY, Hemendra Nath 
2005 ‘Bahurüpagarbhastotra: An Annotated Translation’, in: Sadananda Das & Ernst 
Fürlinger (eds.), Sämarasya. Studies in Indian Arts, Philosophy, and Interreligious 
Dialogue, New Delhi: D.K. Printworld, pp. 37-47. 
CHANDRA, Lokesh 
1979 ‘Oddiyäna, À New Interpretation’, in: Ludwik Sternbach Feliciation Volume, 
pt. 1, Lucknow: Akhil Bharatiya Sanskrit Parishad, pp. 491-514. 


1984 Sanskrit Texts from Kashmir, Volume 7. Sata-pitaka Series, Indo-Asian Litera- 
tures, No. 333. New Delhi: Sharada Rani. 


CHAVANNES, Edouard 
1969 Documents sur les Tou-kiue (Turcs) Occidentaux, receuillis et commentés suivi de 
notes additionelles. Reprint. Taibei: Ch’eng Wen Publishing. This combines 
Documents sur les Tou-kiue [Turcs] Occidentaux (originally published: Paris: 
Adrien-Maisonneuve, 1903) and ‘Notes additionnelles sur les Tou-kiue (Turcs) 
Occidentaux’ (originally published: Toung Pao 2nd series, 5, pp. 1-110, 1904). 
Cœpës, George 
1937-1966 Inscriptions du Cambodge. 8 volumes. Paris: EFEO, 1937 (vol. 1), 1942 (vol. 2), 
1951 (vol. 3), 1952 (vol. 4), 1953 (vol. 5), 1954 (vol. 6), 1964 (vol. 7), 1966 
(vol. 8). 
CoLas, Gérard 
1996 Visnu, ses images et ses feux. Les métamorphoses du dieu chez les vaikhänasa. Mono- 
graphies 182. Paris: Presses de l’École Française d'Extrême-Orient. 
DascurraA, Surendranath 
1922 À History of Indian Philosophy. Vol. V: Southern Schools of Saivism. Delhi, etc.: 
Motilal Banarsidass (reprint of 1991). 
Davis, Richard H. 
*1986 “Ritual in an Oscillating Universe.” Ph.D. diss. University of Chicago. 


1991 Ritual in an Oscillating Universe: Worshiping Siva in Medieval India. Princeton: 
Princeton University Press. 


1992a ‘Aghoraëiva's Background’, in: The Journal of Oriental Research Madras (Dr. S.S. 
Janaki Felicitation Volume) 56-62 (1986-1992), pp. 367-378. 

1992b ‘Becoming a Siva, and Acting as One, in Saiva Worship’, in: Teun Goudriaan 
(ed.) Ritual and Speculation in Early Tantrism: Studies in Honor of André Padoux, 
Albany: State University of New York Press, pp. 107-119. 


572 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


DEVASENAPATHI, V. A. 
1966 Saiva Siddhänta as expounded in the Sivajñaänasiddhiyar and its six commentaries, 
Madras University Philosophical Series No. 7. Madras: University of Madras. 
DEzs6, Csaba (ed. transl.) 
2005 Much Ado About Religion by Bhatta Jayanta. Clay Sanskrit Library. New York: 
New York University Press/JJC Foundation. 
Dowman, Keith (transl., comm.) 
1985 Masters of Mahämudrä: Songs and Histories of the Eighty-Four Buddhist Siddhas. 
Albany: State University of New York Press. 
DunuwiLA, Rohan A. 
1985 Saiva Siddhänta Theology. À context of Hindu-Christian Dialogue. Delhi: Motilal 
Banarsidass. 
Dvyczxowskr, Mark $. G. 
1988 The Canon of the Saivägama and the Kubjikä Tantras of the Western Kaula Tra- 
dition. New York: State University of New York Press. 
Epigraphia Indica 
1892—.  Epigraphia Indica, Calcutta/Delhi: Archaeological Survey of India. 
FiLLIOZAT, Pierre-Sylvain 
1984 ‘Les Nädakärikä de Rämakantha, Bulletin de l'Ecole française d'Extrême-Orient 
73, pp. 223-55. 


1994 Sväyambhuvasütrasamgrahah, vidyäpädah, sadyojyotiskrtatikäsahitah. The Tantra 
of Svayambhü vidyäpäda With the commentary of Sadyojyoti, ed. and trans. 
Pierre-Sylvain Filliozat. Kalämülasästra Series 13. Delhi: Indira Gandhi Na- 
tional Centre for the Arts & Motilal Banarsidass Publishers. 


2001 Structures architecturales et iconographiques de temples de Siva au Karnätaka 
du XI au XII siècle’, pp.667-85 in: Académie des inscriptions et belles- 
lettres— Comptes rendus des séances de l'année 2001, janvier-mars. 


FRAUWALLNER, Erich 
1992 Nachgelassene Werke IL Philosophische Texte des Hinduismus, ed. Gerhard 
Oberhammer and Chlodwig H. Werba. Osterreichische Akademie der Wis- 
senschaften, philosophisch-historische Klasse, Sitzungsberichte 588, Verôf- 
fentlichungen der Kommission für Sprachen und Kulturen Südasiens 26. Vi- 
enna: Verlag der Osterreichischen Akademie der Wissenschaften. 
GANESAN, T. 
2005 ‘Approaching the Âgama: A brief Survey of their contents’, in: Lakshmi- 
narasimha Bhatta, K. Hayavadana Puranik & Haripriya Rangarajan (eds.) 
Glimpses of the National Seminar on Agamas. Agamasusamä, Rashtriya Sanskrit 
Vidyapeetha, Tirupati Series 115. Tirupati: Rashtriya Sanskrit Vidyapeetha, 
2005, pp. 140-62. 
2006 ‘Caiväkamanñkal kürum tirukkôyil urcavañka/”, in: Tiruvitaimarutür Arulmiku 
makäliñgacuvämi tirukkoyil tirukkutannïrättu peruvilä malar, Tiruvavaduthu- 
rai: Tiruvavaduthurai Adeenam, pp.93-104. 


General Bibliography 573 


GENGNAGEL, Jorg 
1996 Mäyä, Purusa und Siva. Die dualistische Tradition des Sivaismus nach Agho- 
rafiväcäryas Tattvaprakäsavrtti. Beiträge zur Kenntnis südasiatischer Sprachen 
und Literaturen 3. Wiesbaden: Harrassowitz. 
GNoLt, Raniero 
1958 ‘Miscellanea Indica, East and West 9 (n.s.), pp. 215-226. 


1959 ‘Väc. Il secondo capitolo della Sivadrsti di Somänanda’, Rivista degli Studi Ori- 
entali 34.12, pp. 55-75. 


1985 Îl Commento di Abhinavagupta alla Parätrimsikä (Parätrimsikävivarana). 
Traduzione e Testo. Serie Orientale Roma 58. Rome: Istituto Italiano per il 
Medio ed Estremo Oriente. 


1999 Abhinavagupta, Luce dei Tantra. (Tanträloka). Biblioteca Orientale 4. Milan: 


Adelphi Edizioni. 
GoopaLi, Dominic 

1998 Bhatta Rämakanthas Commentary on the Kiranatantra. Volume I: chapters 1-6. 
Critical edition and annotated translation. PDI 86.1. Pondicherry: IFP/EFEO, 
1998. 

2000 ‘Problems of Name and lineage: relationships between South Indian authors of 
the Saiva Siddhänta’, Journal ofthe Royal Asiatic Society, Series 3, 10, 2, pp. 205— 
16. 


2001 ‘The Saiddhäntika Paräkhyatantra, its Account of Language, and the Inter- 
polation of the Eighth Chapter of the Published Pauskarägama’, in: Raffaele 
TorELLaA et al. (ed.) Le parole e i marmi. Studi in onore di Raniero Gnoli nel 
suo 70° compleanno. Serie Orientale Roma 92.12. Rome: Istituto Italiano per 


l’Africa e l’Oriente, pp. 327-50. 


2004 See PARAKHYATANTRA. 
2005 See PANCAVARANASTAVA. 
2006 ‘Initiation et délivrance selon le éaiva siddhänta’, in: Gérard Colas & 


Gilles Tarabout (eds.), Rites hindous, transferts et transformations. Collection 
Purusärtha 25. Paris: École des Hautes Études en Sciences Sociales, pp. 93— 


116. 
GoupriaAN, Teun 
1985 See VINASIKHATANTRA. 


1986 ‘Kubjikäs Samayamantra and Its Manipulation in the Kwbjikämata’, in: André 
Padoux (ed.), Mantras et Diagrammes Rituelles dans l'Hindouisme, Paris: Edi- 
tions du Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique, pp. 141-60. 


GOUDRIAAN, T. & SCHOTERMAN, ]. À. (ed.) 
1988 The Kubjikämatatantra. Kulälikämnäya Version. Leiden: Brill. 
GRIERSON, Sir George A. 
1929 ‘The Language of the Mahä-naya-prakä$a: an Examination of Käshmiri as Writ- 
ten in the Fifteenth Century’, Memoirs of the Asiatic Society of Bengal 11, 
pp./73-130. 


574 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


GRIERSON, Sir George, assisted by Mukundaräma Sästri of Srinagar 
1915 & 1932 À Dictionary of the Käshmiri Language compiled partly from materials left by 
the late Pandit Kvara Kaula. Bibliotheca Indica, New Series No. 1405. Hert- 
ford: Asiatic Society of Bengal. Reproduced in one volume, Delhi: Low Price 
Publications, 1993. 
GrirriTHs, Arlo (in collaboration with J.C. Eade and Gerdi Gerschheimer) 

2005 ‘La stèle d'installation de $ri Tribhuvaneévara : une nouvelle inscription 
préangkorienne du Musée National de Phnom Penh (K. 1214)’, Journal Asi- 
atique CCXCUE, pp. 11-43. 

GRriIFrITHS, Arlo 
2006 See BisscHor. 
GRÜNENDAHL, Reinhold (ed.) 
1983-89  Visnudharmäh. Precepts for the Worship of Visnu. 3 Vols. Wiesbaden: Otto Har- 
rassowitz. 
GUENTHER, Herbert V. 

1994 Wholeness Lost and Wholeness Regained: Forgotten Tales of Individuation from 
Ancient Tibet. SUNY Series in Buddbhist Studies. Albany: State University of 
New York Press. 

HANKNEDER, Jürgen 

1998 Abhinavaguptas Philosophy of Revelation. An edition and annotated translation of 
Mälinislokavärttika LL 1-399. Groningen Oriental Series Volume XIV. Gronin- 
gen: Egbert Forsten. 

HANNEDER, Jürgen & SLAJE, Walter (ed.) 

2002 Bhäskarakanthas Moksopäya-tikä. À Commentary on The Earliest Available Re- 
cension of the Yogaväsistha. I Vairägyaprakaranam. Revised edition in Devanägari 
script. Geisteskultur Indiens. Texte und Studien, Bd. 1. Indologica Halensis. 
Aachen: Shaker Verlag. 

HARA, Minoru 

2002 Päsupata Studies, ed. Jun Takashima. Publications of the de Nobili Research 

Library Volume 30. Vienna: Sammlung de Nobili. 
HARIMOTO, Kengo 

2004 ‘Appendix. Adhyäyas in the R and À Manuscripts’, in: Hans T. Bakker (ed.), 
Origin and Growth of the Puränic Text Corpus. With Special Reference to the 
Skandapuräna. Papers of the 12th World Sanskrit Conference Vol. 3.2. Delhi, 
pp- 139-190. 

HärTEL, Herbert 

1987 ‘Archaeological Evidence on the Early Väsudeva Worship’, in: Orientalia losephi 
Tucci Memoriae Dicata, ed. G. Gnoli and L. Lanciotti. Serie Orientale Roma 
56,2. Roma: Istituto Italiano per il Medio ed Estremo Oriente, pp. 573-587. 

HazrA, Rajendra Chandra 
1953/1954 ‘Studies in the Genuine Âgneya-Puräna alias Vahni-Puräna. 2 parts. In: Our 
Heritage 1/2 (1953), pp. 209-245; 2/1 (1954), pp. 77-110. 


21975 Studies in the Puränic Records on Hindu Rites and Customs. Delhi: Motilal Ba- 
narsidass (first edition: Dacca, 1940). 


General Bibliography DA 


L'HERNAULT, Françoise (avec des collaborations de PR. SrINIvasAN et de Jacques DUMARÇAY) 

1987 Darasuram. Epigraphical Study, Étude architecturale, Étude iconographique. 
2 volumes. Publications de l'EFEO, Mémoires Archéologiques XVI. Paris: 
EFEO. 

Huun, Michel 

1980 Mrgendrägama. Sections de la doctrine et du yoga avec la Vrtti de Bhattanäräyana- 
kantha et la Dipikà d'Aghorasiväcärya. Traduction, introduction et notes. PIFI 63. 
Pondicherry: IFI. 

INGALLS, Daniel H. H., Masson, Jeffrey Moussaieff & PATWARDHAN, M. V. 

1990 The Dhvanyäloka of Anandavardhana with the Locana of Abhinavagupta, trans- 
lated by Daniel H.H. Ingalls, Jeffrey Moussaieff Masson, and M.V. Patwardhan:; 
edited with an introduction by Daniel H.H. Ingalls, Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard 
University Press. 

JANAKI, S.S. 

1988 Dhvaja-Stambha (Critical Account of its Structural and ritualistic Details). My- 

lapore, Madras: The Kuppuswami Sastri Research Institute. 
Kamrs, Eivind 

1998 Indian Semantic Analysis. The ‘nirvacana’ tradition. University of Cambridge 

Oriental Publications 55. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. 
KARMAY, Samten Gyaltsen 

1988 The Great Perfection (Rdzogs chen): À Philosophical and Meditative Teaching in 

Tibetan Buddhism. Leiden: Brill. 
Kauz, Srikanth 

1966 Räjatarañginyau  Srivara-Sukäbhyäm  krte. te ca päthavimarsaupayikena 
päthabhedäditippanena samyojite satyau. Woolner Indological Series 8. 
Hoshiarpur: Vishveshvaranand Institute. 


1967 Räjatarañgini Jonaräjakrtä. Woolner Indological Series 7. Hoshiarpur : 
Vishveshvaranand Vedic Research Institute Press. 


KERSENBOOM, Saskia C. 
1987 Nityasumañgali: Devadasi Tradition in South India. Delhi: Motilal Banarsidass. 
Kirei, Willibald 
1920 Die Kosmographie der Inder (nach Quellen dargestellf). Bonn/Leipzig. [reprint: 
Hildesheim 1967]. 


1927 Das Puräna Pañcalaksana. Versuch einer Textgeschichte. Leiden. 


1954 Das Puräna vom Weligebäude (Bhuvanavinyäsa): die kosmographischen Traktate 
der Puränas. Versuch einer Textgeschichte. Bonner Orientalische Studien N.S. 1. 
Bonn. 


Kout, Anand 
1924 The Kashmiri Pandit. Calcutta: Thacker Spink & Co. Reprint: Delhi: Utpal 
Publications, 1991. 
KRAMRISCH, Stella 
1946 The Hindu Temple. 2 Vols. Calcutta, 1946 (reprinted Delhi: Motilal Banarsi- 
dass, 1976). 


576 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


KRISHNAMACHARYA, V. and K. Ramachandra SARMA (ed.) 
1949 Alamkärasamgraha of Amrtänandayogin. Adyar Library Series, 70. Madras: The 
Adyar Library and Research Centre. 
KuwayAMA, Soshin 
1991 Linscription du Ganésa de Gardez at la chronologie des Turki-sähis, Journal 
Asiatique 279, pp. 267-287. 
La VALLÉE-PoussiN, Louis de 
1929 Vijñäptimätratäsiddhi: La Siddhi de Hiuan-tsang. Traduit et annotée. Paris: Paul 
Geuthner. 3 vols. 
MAHALINGAM, T. V. 
1988 Inscriptions of the Pallavas. New Delhi/Delhi: Indian Council of Historical Re- 


search/Agam Prakashan. 
Maramoup, Charles 
1976 ‘Terminer le sacrifice: Remarques sur les honoraires rituels dans le brahman- 


isme”, in: Madeleine Biardeau & Charles Malamoud, Le sacrifice dans l'Inde 
ancienne, Paris: Presses universitaires de France, pp. 155-204. 
OBERHAMMER, Gerhard 
2004 Materialien zur Geschichte der Rämänuja-Schule VII. Zur spirituellen Praxis 
des Zufluchinehmens bei Gott (Saranagatih) vor Veñkatanätha. Osterreichis- 
che Akademie der Wissenschaften, philosophisch-historische Klasse, Sitzungs- 
berichte 710). Wien, 2004. 


2006 Ahirbudhnyasamhitä 37. Ein Beitrag zur Geschichte der saranägatih", in: Karin 
Preisendanz (ed.), Expanding and Merging Horizons. Contributions to South 
Asian and Cross Cultural Studies in Commemoration of Wilhelm Halbfass. Wien: 
Verlag der Osterreichischen Akademie der Wissenschaften, 2006, pp. 667-678. 
(In press.) 


OBERLIES, Thomas 
1998 Die Svetäévatara-Upanisad. Edition und Übersetzung von Adhyäya IV-VI. 
(Studien zu den “mittleren” Upanisads II — 3. Teil), Wiener Zeitschrift für die 
Kunde Südasiens 42, pp. 77-138. 


2003 À Grammar of Epic Sanskrit. Indian Philology and South Asian Studies Volume 
5. Berlin/New York: De Gruyter. 


ORk, Leslie C. 

2000 Donors, Devotees, and Daughters of God: Temple Women in Medieval Tamilnadu. 
South Asia Research. New York: Oxford University Press. 

*2004a  ‘Priests and Kings/ Temples and Teachers: The Making of $aiva and Vaisnava 
Identities in the Chola Period.” Paper presented at the Annual Meeting of the 
Association for Asian Studies, San Diego. 

2004b  ‘Processions in the Medieval South Indian Temple: Sociology, Sovereignty and 
Soteriology’, in: Jean-Luc Chevillard and Eva Wilden (eds.) South-Indian Hori- 
zons: Felicitation Volume for François Gros on the occasion of his 70th birthday, 
pp.437-70. PDI 94. Pondicherry: IFP/EFEO. 


General Bibliography DA 


*2005 ‘Cholas, Pandyas, and “Imperial Temple Culture” in Medieval Tamilnadu’. Pa- 
per presented at the conference of the European Association of South Asian 
Archaeology and Art History, London. 


2006 ‘Preface in: Pondicherry Inscriptions. Putuccèri Mänilak Kalvëttukkal. Part I: In- 
troduction and texts with notes, compiled by Bahour S. Kuppusamy, ed. G. Vi- 
jayavenugopal. Collection Indologie 83.1 Pondicherry: IFP/EFEO. 


Papoux, André 
1978 ‘Contributions a l'étude du mantragästra I. La sélection des mantra (mantro- 


ddhära) , Bulletin de L'Ecole française d'Extrême-Orient 65, pp. 65-85. 


1990 Väc. The Concept of the Word in Selected Hindu Tantras (transl. Jacques Gontier), 
Albany: State University of New York. 


PanDev, Kanti Chandra 
1954 Bhäskari. Vol. II. An English Translation of the Kvara Pratyabhijñà Vimarsini in 
the Light of the Bhäskarï With an Outline of the History of Saiva Philosophy. The 


Princess of Wales Saraswati Bhavana Texts 84. Lucknow. 


1963 Abhinavagupta. An Historical and Philosophical Study. Second edition, revised 
and enlarged. Chowkhamba Sanskrit Series, Vol. 1. Varanasi: Chowkhamba 
Sanskrit Series Office. 


PELLIOT, Paul 
1904 ‘Deux Itinéraires de Chine en Inde’, Bulletin de l'Ecole française d'Extrême- 
Orient 4 (1904), pp. 131-413. 
PETECH, Luciano 
1984 Medieval History of Nepal (c. 750-1482). Second, thoroughly revised edition. 
Serie Orientale Roma, 54. Rome: Istituto Italiano per il Medio ed Estremo 
Oriente. 
PiscxeL, Richard 
1900 Grammatik der Prakrit-Sprachen. Grundriss d. indo-arisch. Philol. u. Altertum- 
skunde Bd. 1. Strassburg: Trübner. English translation by Subhadra JHA: Com- 
parative Grammar of the Präkrit Languages. Varanasi/Delhi/Patna: Motilal Ba- 
narsidass, 1957. 
RAGHAvAN, V. 
1980 Abhinavagupta and His Works. Chaukhamba Oriental Research Studies 20. 
Varanasi/Delhi: Chaukhambha Orientalia. 
[RaINa, A. K.] 
1989 À Catalogue of Sanskrit Manuscripts. Srinagar: The Research and Publication 
Department, Jammu and Kashmir Government. Based on a draft prepared by 
Srikanth Kaul and Dinanäth Yach. 
RaMESsH, K. V. & Tewari PS. 
1983 ‘Risthal Inscription of Aulikara Prakä$adharmma, [Vikrama] Year 572”, Journal 
of the Epigraphical Society of India 10, pp.96-103. 
Rao, T. A. Gopinath 
1914, reprinted 1997 Elements of Hindu Iconography. 2 volumes, each in 2 parts. Delhi, Moti- 
lal Banarsidass: 1997. 


578 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


RasTELLI, Marion 

1999 Philosophisch-theologische Grundanschauungen der Jayäkhyasamhitä. Mit einer 
Darstellung des täglichen Rituals. Osterreichische Akademie der Wissenschaften, 
philosophisch-historische Klasse, Sitzungsberichte 668, Beiträge zur Kultur- 
und Geistesgeschichte Asiens 33. Wien: Verlag der Osterreichischen Akademie 
der Wissenschaften. 

2006 Die Tradition des Päñcarätra im Spiegel der Päramesvarasamhitä. Osterreichis- 
che Akademie der Wissenschaften, philosophisch-historische Klasse, Sitzungs- 
berichte 748, Beiträge zur Kultur- und Geistesgeschichte Asiens 51. Wien: Ver- 
lag der Osterreichischen Akademie der Wissenschaften. 

RasToGi, Navjivan 
1979 Krama Tantricism of Kashmir. Volume 1. Delhi: Motilal Banarsidass. 
Ray, H.C. 
1931-1936 The Dynastic History of Northern India (Early Medieval Period). Calcutta. 
RoBiNsoN, James B. (transl.) 

1979 Buddhaï Lions. The Lives of the Eighty-Four Siddhas, Caturakiti-siddha-pravrtti 
by Abhayadatta, Translated into Tibetan as Grub thod breyad cu rtsa bzhÿi rgyus 
by sMon-grub Shes-rab. Berkeley, CA: Dharma Publishing. 

SACHAU, Edward C. 

1964 Alberunis India. an Account of the Religion, Philosophy, Literature, Geog- 
raphy, Chronology, Astronomy, Customs, Laws and Astrology of India about 
A.D. 1030, edited with notes and indices. Two volumes in one. Delhi/New 
Delhi/Jullundur/Lucknow/Bombay: S. Chand & Co. Originally published: 
1887. 

SANDER, Lore 

1968 Paläographisches zu den Sanskrithandschriften der berliner Turfansammlung. 
Verzeichnis der orientalischen Handschriften in Deutschland, Supplement- 
band 8. Wiesbaden: Franz Steiner Verlag. 

SANDERSON, Alexis 

1985 ‘Purity and Power among the Brahmans of Kashmir’, in: M. Carrithers, S. 
Collins and S. Lukes (ed.), The Category of the Person. Anthropology, Philoso- 
phy, History, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, pp. 190-216. 

1985b  Reviewof: N.R. Bhatt, Marañgapäramesvarägama (Kriyäpäda, Caryäpäda et Yo- 
gapäda), avec le commentaire de Bhatta Rämakantha. Édition critique. (PIFI 65), 
Pondichéry 1982; Idem: Rauravottarägama. Édition critique, introduction et 
notes. (PIFI 66), Pondichéry 1983”, Bulletin of the School of Oriental and African 
Studies 48, pp. 564-68. 

1986 ‘Mandala and Agamic Identity in the Trika of Kashmir, in: A. Padoux (ed.), 
Mantras et Diagrammes Rituelles dans l'Hindouisme, Paris: Editions du CNRS, 
pp. 169-214. 

1987 Article ‘Krama Saivism’, in: 7he Encyclopedia of Religion edited by Mircea Eliade, 
volume 13, pp. 14a-15a. New York: Macmillan Publishing Company. 

1988 “aivism and the Tantric Traditions, in: S. Sutherland, L. Houlden, P. Clarke 
and E Hardy (eds.), The World5 Religions, London: Routledge, pp. 660-704. 


General Bibliography 579 


1990 ‘The Visualisation of the Deities of the Trika’, in: André Padoux (ed.), L'Image 
Divine, Paris: Éditions du CNRS, pp. 31-88. 


1992 ‘The Doctrine of the Mälinivijayottaratantra’, in: Teun Goudriaan (ed.) Rirual 
and Speculation in Early Tantrism: Studies in Honor of André Padoux, Albany: 
State University of New York Press, pp. 281-312. 


1995 ‘Meaning in Tantric Ritua/, in: Essais sur le rituel IT. Colloque du centenaire 
de la section des sciences religieuses de l'Ecole Pratique des Hautes Etudes sous la 
direction de Anne-Marie Blondeau et Kristofer Schipper. Louvain, Paris: Peeters. 


*1997 Lecture series: ‘Seeking the Mata Level of Esoteric $aivism: New Sources’. 
(Handout 4 contains edited citations of the /zyadrathayämala.) 


2001 “History through Textual Criticism in the study of $aivism, the Pañcarätra and 
the Buddbhist Yoginitantras’, in: François Grimal (ed.), Les Sources et le Temps. 
Sources and Time. À Colloquium. Pondicherry 11-13 January 1997. PDI 91. 
Pondicherry: IFP/EFEO, pp. 1-47. 


2002 ‘Remarks on the text of the Kubjikämatatantra’, /ndo-lranian Journal 45 
(2002), pp. 1-24. 


2004 “The Saiva Religion among the Khmers (Part I)”, Bulletin de l'Ecole française 
d'Extrême-Orient 90-91 (2003-2004), pp. 349-462. 


2005a ‘A Commentary on the Opening Verses of the Tantrasära of Abhinavagupta, 
in: Sadananda Das and Ernst Fürlinger (eds.), Sämarasya. Studies in Indian Arts, 
Philosophy, and Interreligious Dialogue, New Delhi: D.K. Printworld, pp. 89- 
148. 


2005b ‘Religion and the State: Saiva Officiants in the Territory of the Kings Brah- 
manical Chaplain’, {ndo-lranian Journal 47 (2004), pp. 229-300. 


2006 ‘The Läkulas: New Evidence of a System Intermediate Between Päñcärthika 
Päsupatism and Âgamic Saivism’, Indian Philosophical Annual 24 (2003-2005), 
pp. 143-217. 


forthcoming a (2007) ‘Swami Lakshman Joo and His Place in the Kashmirian $aiva Tradi- 
tion’, in: Bettina Bäumer and Sarla Kumar (eds.) Samvidulläsah. Manifestation 
of Divine Consciousness. Swami Lakshman J00, Saint-Scholar of Kashmir Saivism. 
À Centenary Tribute. New Delhi: D.K. Printworld. 


forthcoming b ‘The Date of Sadyojyotis and Brhaspati, in: Marzenna Czerniak-Drozdiowicz 
(ed.), Tantra and Vifistädvaitavedänta. Cracow Indological Studies Vol. 8 
(2006). Cracow: Ksiegarnia Akademicka. 


forthcoming c Religion and the State: Initiating the Monarch in Saivism and the Buddhist Way of 
Mantras. Ethno-Indology. Heidelberg Studies in South Asian Rituals, Volume 
2. Wiesbaden: Harrassowitz. 


SCHOTERMAN, J. A. 
1982 See SATSAHASRASAMHITA. 
SFERRA, Francesco 
1991 ‘Aspetti della speculazione linguistica nello $aivasiddhänta. Le Nädakärikä di 
Rämakantha, Rivista degli Studi Orientali 65.3-4, pp. 311-337. 


580 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


SINGH, Tehsildar 
1985 ‘Agni-Puräna on Temple Architecture’, Wishveshvaranand Indological Journal 
23/1-2 (1985), pp. 176-190. 
SIRCAR, D. C. 
1976 ‘Indological Notes: R.C. Majumdars Chronology of the Päla Kings, Journal of 
Ancient Indian History 9 (1975-76), pp. 209-210. 
SIVARAMAN, Krishna 
1973 Saivism in Philosophical Perspective. À Study of the Formative Concepts, Problems 
and Methods of Saiva Siddhänta, Delhi/Patna/ Varanasi: Motilal Banarsidass. 
SmitH, H. Daniel 
1975 À Descriptive Bibliography of the Printed Texts of the Päñcaräträgama. Vol 1. 
Gaekwad* Oriental Series 158. Baroda: Oriental Institute. 


1978 The Smith Agama Collection: Sanskrit Books and Manuscripts Relating to Pañcara- 
tra Studies. a descriptive catalog. Foreign and Comparative Studies / South Asian 
Special Publications 2. Syracuse: Maxwell School of Citizenship and Public Af- 
fairs, Syracuse University. 


SNELLGROVE, David L. 
1959 The Hevaÿra Tantra. À Critical Study. London Oriental Series Vol. 6. London: 
Oxford University Press. 
South Indian Inscriptions 
1980— South Indian Inscriptions. Madras/Delhi: Archaeological Survey of India. 
STEIN, Mark Aurel 
1979 Kalhanaï Räjataranñgini. À Chronicle of the Kings of Kafmir. Translated with an 
Introduction, Commentary and Notes. 2 Volumes. Delhi: Motilal Banarsidass. 
Reprinted from the edition of 1900. 
TAGARE, G.V. 
1984 The Brahmända Puräna. Translated and Annotated. Part IV. Ancient Indian Tra- 
dition and Mythology Series 25. Delhi. 


1988 The Väyu Puräna. Translated and Annotated. Part IL. Ancient Indian Tradition 
and Mythology Series 38. Delhi. 


TANTRIKABHIDHANAKOSA I 
2000 Tintrikäbhidhänakosa I. Dictionnaire des termes techniques de la littérature hin- 
doue tantrique. À Dictionary of Technical Terms from Hindu Tantric Litera- 
ture. Wôrterbuch zur Terminologie hinduistischer Tantren. sous la direction de H. 
Brunner, G. Oberhammer et A. Padoux. Osterreichische Akademie der Wis- 
senschaften, Philosophisch-historische Klasse, Sitzungsberichte 681, Beiträge 
zur Kultur- und Geistesgeschichte Asiens 35. Vienna: Verlag der ôsterreichis- 

chen Akademie der Wissenschaften. 

TANTRIKABHIDHANAKOSA II 
2004 (TAK Il) Zntrikäbhidhänakosa IT. Dictionnaire des termes techniques de la littérature 
hindoue tantrique. À Dictionary of Technical Terms from Hindu Tantric Liter- 
ature. Wôrterbuch zur Terminologie hinduistischer Tantren. sous la direction de 
H. Brunner, G. Oberhammer et À. Padoux. Osterreichische Akademie der Wis- 
senschaften, Philosophisch-historische Klasse, Sitzungsberichte 714, Beiträge 


General Bibliography 581 


zur Kultur- und Geistesgeschichte Asiens 44. Vienna: Verlag der ôsterreichis- 
chen Akademie der Wissenschaften. 
TorELLA, Raffaele 

1976 ‘Il Sérdhatrisati-Kälottarägama (edizione critica e introduzione a cura di Raf- 
faele Torella)”, Rivista degli Studi Orientali 50.3-4, pp. 279-318. 

1988 ‘À Fragment of Utpaladeva's Iévarapratyabhijñä-vivrti, East and West 38, 
pp. 137-74. 

1998 ‘The Kañcukas in the $aiva and Vaisnava Tantric Tradition: À Few Consid- 
erations Between Theology and Grammar’, in: G. Oberhammer (ed.), Ssd- 
ies in Hinduism 11, Miscellanea to the Phenomenon of the Tantras, Osterreichis- 
che Akademie der Wissenschaften, Philosophisch-historische Klasse, Sitzungs- 
berichte 662, Beiträge zur Kultur- und Geistesgeschichte Asiens 28. Vienna: 
Verlag der üsterreichischen Akademie der Wissenschaften, 1998, pp. 55-86. 


2001 ‘The Word in Abhinavagupta's Brhad-Vimarsin?, in: Raffaele Torella et al. (ed.) 
Le parole e i marmi. Studi in onore di Raniero Gnoli nel suo 70° compleanno, Serie 
Orientale Roma 92.12, IsIAO, Rome, pp. 853-874. 

2002 The Kvarapratyabhijnäkarikà of Utpaladeva with the Author Vrtti. Critical edi- 


tion and annotated translation, Delhi: Motilal Banarsidass. (1st ed. appeared as 
Serie Orientale Roma 71, Rome: IsSMEO, 1994.) 


2004 ‘How is Verbal Signification Possible: Understanding Abhinavagupta's Reply’, 
Journal of Indian Philosophy 32, pp. 173-188. 

forthcoming À ‘Studies on the Kvarapratyabhijnaä-vivrti. Part I. Apoha and anupalabdhi in a 

Saiva garb”, in: Preisendanz, K. (ed.), Halbfass Commemoration Volume. Vienna. 


forthcoming B ‘Studies on the Kvarapratyabhijna-vivrti. Part II. What is memory?’ in: Hart- 
mann, J. U., Klaus, K. (eds.), {ndica et Tibetica. Festschrift fr Michael Hahn zum 
65. Geburtstag von Freunden und Schülern überreicht, Vienna. 
TORZSÔR, Judit 
*1999 ‘The Doctrine of Magic Female Spirits.” À critical edition of selected chapters of 
the Siddhayogesvarimata(tantra) with annotated translation and analysis. Unpub- 
lished doctoral thesis submitted to the University of Oxford, *1999. 
2003 ‘Icons of Inclusivism: Mandalas in Some Early Saiva Tantras’, in Gudrun Büh- 
nemann (ed.), Mandalas and Yantras in the Hindu Traditions, Leiden: Brill, 
pp. 179-224. 
TripÂtHi, Ramä Sañkar 
1971 Descriptive Catalogue of the Samskrit Manuscripts in Gaekwada Library, Bhärat 
Kalä Bhavana Library and Samskrit Mahä-Vidyälaya Library, Banaras Hindu 
University. Banaras Hindu University Samskrit Series 6. Varanasi: Banaras 
Hindu University. 
Tuccr, Giuseppe (transl.) 
1940 Travels of Tibetan Pilgrims in the Swat Valley. Calcutta: The Greater India Soci- 
ety. 
TuRNER, R. L. 
1966-71 À Comparative Dictionary of the Indo-Aryan Languages. 3 volumes. London: 
Oxford University Press. 


582 Mélanges tantriques à la mémoire d'Hélène Brunner 


VASUDEVA, Somadeva 
2004 The Yoga of the Mälinivijayottaratantra. Chapters 1-4, 7, 11-17. Critical Edition, 
Translation & Notes. Collection Indologie 97. Pondicherry: IFP/EFEO. 
VETTER, Tilmann 
1966 Dharmakirtis Pramänavini$cayah 1. Kapitel: Pratyaksam. Einleitung, Text der 
tibetischen übersetzung, Sanskritfragmente, deutsche übersetzung. Vienna: Verlag 
der Osterreichischen Akademie der Wissenschaften. 
VtELLE, Christophe 
2005 ‘From the Väyuprokta to the Väyu and Brahmända Puränas: Preliminary Re- 
marks towards the Critical Edition of the väyuprokta Brahmändapuräna’, in: 
Petteri Koskikallio (ed.), Epics, Khilas, and Puränas: Continuities and Ruptures, 
Proceedings of the Third Dubrovnik International Conference on the Sanskrit Epics 
and Puränas September 2002. Zagreb, pp. 535-560. 
Warson, Alex 
2006 The Selfs Awareness of Itself: Bhatta Rämakanthaÿ Arguments against the Buddhist 
Doctrine of No-self. Publications of the De Nobili Research Library, 32. Vienna. 
Yokocxi, Yuko 
*2004 The Rise of the Warrior Goddess in Ancient India. À Study of the Myth Cycle of 
Kausiki-Vindhyaväsini in the Skandapuräna. [Unpublished] Thesis, University 


of Groningen. 


